pulling for Enron.  I hope the bank deal comes through quickly.

I wonder which beach AF is on right now.

I thought I'd pass this along in case you need a laugh.

Jim

(See attached file: Attack_on_Taliban.mp3)
_____________________________
Jim Easter
Reliant Energy Solutions
Transaction Development & Support
713-207-3170 - Office
713-898-9481 - Mobile
877-330-0952 - Pager
jeaster@reliant.com

FYI, Rick Buy
Ryan,

In the follow up to the meeting we had on Wednesday I would like
to reinforce one point I made. I feel strongly that I cannot support
the valuations my group has produced so far for the LJM/Raptor
related transactions without examination of all the related legal documents.

I feel that we did solid work based on verbal information,  but I cannot
guarantee the quality of the final product without looking at the contracts.
These transactions are too complex and controversial to bypass due diligence requirements 
that you would expect from any professional.

Vince Kaminski

FYI, Rick Buy

Rick,
Let me know if you would like to get together to discuss how the Raptor unwind is accomplished from a mechanical standpoint, as well as, what comes back to Enron in the transaction.  I would happy to sit down and walk you through it.  Just let me know when might work for you to get together.  Thanks Rick,
Ron Baker

I think that all investments that were hedged in Raptor are on th MPR and are being monitored and reported against.  Is this true?  Ron, will you take the lead in making sure we have a smooth transition on this?  Thanks
Now that Raptor is blown up, should we begin valuation efforts of assets and include in merchant portfolio. I am not familiar with details of how it unwound so I don't know what we are left with. Is this worth a meeting with you or your designesss? Rick

As I alluded to in my note yesterday, Enron has received a commitment for $1 billion in additional credit from our agent banks. This is great news, more from a market perception standpoint than an actual cash need. You can be assured that senior management is totally focused on the need to shore up the balance sheet with additional equity, now that we have the debt in place, but the equity we be a longer process.

In the meantime, lets get back to work. I would encourage people to talk to their supervisors about this situation if you feel "angst".

Rick

Bank deal happened. Hopefully we can return to "normal" (asylum) now. I imagine AF is not enjoying any beach right now. Thanks for the laugh. Rick

Rick.

Hang in there.  Beleive it or not, everyone in the industry I talk with is
pulling for Enron.  I hope the bank deal comes through quickly.

I wonder which beach AF is on right now.

I thought I'd pass this along in case you need a laugh.

Jim

(See attached file: Attack_on_Taliban.mp3)
_____________________________
Jim Easter
Reliant Energy Solutions
Transaction Development & Support
713-207-3170 - Office
713-898-9481 - Mobile
877-330-0952 - Pager
jeaster@reliant.com

Amusing attachment. Rick

Rick.

Hang in there.  Beleive it or not, everyone in the industry I talk with is
pulling for Enron.  I hope the bank deal comes through quickly.

I wonder which beach AF is on right now.

I thought I'd pass this along in case you need a laugh.

Jim

(See attached file: Attack_on_Taliban.mp3)
_____________________________
Jim Easter
Reliant Energy Solutions
Transaction Development & Support
713-207-3170 - Office
713-898-9481 - Mobile
877-330-0952 - Pager
jeaster@reliant.com

Thought you might like the attachment. Love, Dad

Rick.

Hang in there.  Beleive it or not, everyone in the industry I talk with is
pulling for Enron.  I hope the bank deal comes through quickly.

I wonder which beach AF is on right now.

I thought I'd pass this along in case you need a laugh.

Jim

(See attached file: Attack_on_Taliban.mp3)
_____________________________
Jim Easter
Reliant Energy Solutions
Transaction Development & Support
713-207-3170 - Office
713-898-9481 - Mobile
877-330-0952 - Pager
jeaster@reliant.com

Ray- Steel group wants to purchase $15.3 million per month of steel for 3 years. It appears this deal is creating inventory (no offsetting short). Do you have any thoughts on this as acting head of EIM? Doesn't sound like the best use of our liquidity at this point. Rick (We have a million issues to address like this around the company).

Go for it!

George Robinson
04/27/99 04:14 PM

I began discussions regarding this issue with Sonny, an employee of Cliffwood 
Oil & Gas, operator of the Ft. Stockton Unit Water Station. This is the 
outfit that was taking our recovered groundwater. Sonny discussed this with 
Cliffwoods' reservoir engineers in Houston and they decided they did not want 
to accept this water regardless of permit status due to their concern that 
the relatively fresh water may cause calcium carbonate to precipitate in the 
disposal well perforations and plug up their well. 

Lee Cisneros of 4C Construction, the outfit hauling the recovered water, put 
me in touch with Kenneth McIntyre of Stockton Water Inc. Kenneth informed me 
that they would accept the water if permit condition would allow it. Kenneth 
said they would dispose of the water in one of two wells, their University 
165 or RS Pershing Well#1. 

This afternoon I discussed the issue of disposal of recovered water with 
Doris at the TRC District 8 office. Doris looked up the permit for these two 
wells and informed me that they were permitted for produced water only. After 
further discussion of the situation she transferred my call Mark Henkhaus, 
District 8 Director. Mark said that normally this waste stream would go to an 
"oil and gas waste" disposal facility as you had pointed out in our meeting 
last week, but suggested an alternative. Mark suggested that I obtain a 
letter of no objection from the operator of the SWD disposal well and 
transmit the letter with a request for approval from his office to dispose of 
the recovered water in the SWD disposal well for a period not to exceed 12 
months. He said he will issue an approval for such a request.

I think this will be the most cost effective manner to manage recovered water 
over the next few months, particularly if recovery operations continue to 
proceed as favorably as they have to date and we can cease active remediation 
activities toward the latter part of this year. If you concur, I will obtain 
the letter from the disposal well operator and submit the request to the TRC.

Thanks, George

The environmental clearances are still in effect as long as we stay on our 
right of way and in our measuring station yard.  For any construction work at 
the PG&E station, we will need written aprpoval from PG&E.  I  will notify 
the state and county of California when we do the construction work.  Earl, I 
will need to know the amount  of natural gas which will be released during 
the blowdown of the 1850 feet of pipe, our separator and meter tubes.  Pg&E 
will be responsible for the notification of gas release for their separator 
and piping....

David Roensch
08/07/99 10:44 PM

The following is the update I received from the Kingman Team on todays 
pigging activities:

Tiny,
 We kicked two pigs today with 55 gals of diesel in front of each pig.  On 
the first run we got only enough liquid to get a sample.  The pig came out 
with a big chunk out of it.  Don't know what is causing this because we have 
received a couple of pigs that were damaged.  This is only the second pig 
that has come in that we cannot use again.   
 When the second pig came in, we received 41 gals of liquid.  We had to haul 
it out a pail at a time.  We pulled about half from the seperator and half 
from the drain tap in front of the seperator.
 These two runs took us nine hours to run, that is why we only did two.  We 
plan on putting in 100 gals of diesel tomarrow since they are going to ship 
some more diesel for us on Monday.  If flow rate permitting we plan on 
kicking two more pigs tomarrow with 100 gals each.

Brent  & Russ

Per this evenings discussions with Gas Control, it looks like we will have 60 
mmcfd scheduled to PG&E for tomorrows (Sundays) gas day.  Gas Control will 
make every effort to coordinate flows with PG&E and insure we have higher 
flowing volumes during the pigging hours if at all possible.  Again the new 
pigs are due to be on site by Tuesday.   I forwarded an e:mail message to 
Kingman informing them to insure they split a sample with PG&E on the 15 MP 
sample point.  

I've set up a conf. call for this Friday the 13th at 10:00 am Houston time.  
We should have additional sampling infromation by this time not only from the 
Weekly Report but on the pigging activites as well.  (877-795-3687   pin 
323297)

My comments on information communicated to Boschee are shown below.

Michel Nelson
08/07/99 10:37 AM
Hope you had a better flight home than me - late one hour departing, flew to 
Omaha and circled because of lightning and thunderstorms until we had to go 
to Kansas City for fuel, then back to Omaha to sneak in between lightning 
bolts - the drive home was a combination of being blinded by lightning, 
unable to see because of driving rain, or praying the car could make it 
through the flooded streets! Anyway, home by 1:15 AM, so not too bad.

Here's what I believe to be our current plan, which will be communicated to 
PG&E through letter to Rod Boschee.

1.  Continue to inject diesel at a 55 gal rate and pig daily through 8/15
We will be running from 2 to 4 pigs daily (depending on flow rates) and 
injecting 100 gallon per pig run.  Today (Saturday) was the exception because 
of flow rates and the volume of diesel on hand (400 gn's).  Two pigs were run 
at 55 gallons of diesel per pig.  This 400 gallons under the previous pigging 
schedule would have lasted for 1 1/2 weeks at the single pig per day & at 55 
gallons per pig.  A load of diesel will be on location Monday.   

2.  Collect liquids from all pig runs for analysis and trending (daily or as 
often as pigs are received)

3.  Collect liquids from TW's filter / separator for analysis and trending 
(daily)
This is above and beyond the weekly accumulation and split sampling at this 
point.  The Weekly Split sampling will still continue.  

4.  After 8/15, continue pigging daily w/o injection of any liquids to dry 
pipe through 9/7

5. Repeat steps 2 and 3 above

6. Schedule Vector to be on site September 7 to decontaminate a.) 1850' of 
pipe from TW's measurement to PG&E's filter/separator and b.)  PG&E's 
filter/separator.  
Larry/Earl - We're still OK on clearances for ROW and excavation etc... 
should we need to make a cut into the 1850' of pipe aren't we?  I'm assuming 
the clearances we received for the siphon project would carry forward????

7. Post 5 day outage for scheduled pipeline maintenance on EBB as soon as 
Vector confirms date.

8. Trending and analysis will determine if any pigging or further decon work 
will be done on TW's upstream pipe.

Please review, add, subtract, correct, etc. prior to Monday. Thanks for 
continuing help - this is going to be a very tough win, if a win is possible. 
Mike

A meeting has been scheduled on 3/16 with the California Fish and Game to 
discuss the following issues:  1)presentaiton of the 1999 and 2000 annual 
reports which are required by the facility's 2081 permit. 2) developing an 
agreement with F&G as to how the 41 acre credits held by EOTT will be managed 
to ensure compliance with requirements of the F&G. 3) Presentation of the 
results relating to surveys conducted in the path of construction for the 
Rogas project.

The waiver to lay pipeline above ground for the Rogas constsruction was 
approved by the Offfice of the State Fire Marshall, Pipeline Safety 
Division.  There were 8 city, county, state and federal agencies notified by 
application for approval to construct the 9 mile pipline system consisting of 
3 piplines.  This is the only agency approval received as yet.

Acre credits were obtained from Aera for the construction of the Rogas 
pipeline.  Aera is an oil company with major holdings of acreage available 
for purchase.  It was felt that due to the time constraints for initiating 
this project and the concern with not receiving the credits from the F&G that 
EOTT would purchase Aera credits to ensure procurement of the necessary 
acreage for the Rogas project.  This is a major plus for the project.

The rough draft of the baseline noise survey for the turbine installations in 
Az. was received.  Some changes will be made in each document.,  as the 
contractor has made some obvious conclusions and asumptions which are not 
valid or representative of the mitigation Transwetern will do.  The Navajo 
Nation has requested that an onsite survey be conducted at the C/S on the 
reservation (C/S 3 and 4)  for T&E plants and animals and archeology.  A 
contractor has been notified and surveys will be completed by 3/12. The F-1 
environmental report  for the FERC application will be submitted to Donna by 
this friday.   

The air permit applications for C/S 1 and 2 have been started.   A meeting 
with EPA in San Francisco has abeen set to discuss permitting the C/S 
facilities on the reservation on 3/20.  After the meeting, applications 
should be in front of the Navajo air permitting agency and the EPA within a 
week. Air permits are expected  within 5-7 months after submittal of the 
application.  During a conference call this week, a proposal was submitted to 
remove the existing auxillary generators and replace with 2 units at each 
location.  This will delay submittal of the air applications 3-4 days, 
assuming no major issues result.  One interesting issue that might develop is 
that one of the generators might possibly be a wind turbine.  

Byron as per the Red Rock expansion conference call today presented below are 
the emissions estimates for the auxillary engines at sta. 1-4.  Understand 
these are not actual emissions, but are emissions based upon potential to 
emit.  When these units were permitted actual testing data was not required, 
so each unit was permitted based upon an accpeted emissions limit from an EPA 
approved document.  This has worked out in our favor as the emisisons numbers 
presented in the EPA document were high, therefore, this will allow us to net 
more emissions, if needed.  Emissions are presented for a single engine only 
in tons per year, even though there are two auxillary units at each facility 
except Sta. 1 where they only have one auxillary unit.

Sta. 1 1- Waukesha 350 Hp LRZ

 NOx 30.48

 CO 121.94

 VOC 1.31

Sta. 2  2- Waukeshas 350 Hp LRZ 

 NOx 30.48 

 CO 121.94

 VOC 1.31

Sta. 3 2-366 Hp PSVG Ingersol Rands

 NOx 35.35

 CO 30.40

 VOC .04

Sta. 4  2-450 Hp Waukeshas F3520 GU

 NOx 43.46

 CO 37.38

 VOC .05

Terry, the entire facility has not been disturbed.  Only most of it.  Id say 
approx 70%.  The other 30% has been impacted but not tot the point of 
disturbing all the vegetation, just foot and vehicle traffic.  I dont have 
problem with saying the above, but keep in mind, the facility has been there 
and just because the trees havent been disturbed, doesnt mean that the 
understory beneath the trees has been pristine.   It has always been 
Transwetern's policy to maintain an environmetnal presence at all of its 
locations, especially at sites where there is some aesthetic value (scenery 
wildlife etc).  I dont have a problem with including resource reports 3 and 7 
for vegetation and soils.  I have received a verbal from the US Fish and 
Wildlife and they agreed with the intent in my letter to them that pipline 
activites at each location tend to preclude any impacts to sensitive or 
critical habitats.  In addition, the adjacent lands are of the same habitat 
types as that which are contained within the facility and therefore, would 
not be an issue of habitat loss.   There are not any old TW hands around to 
positively verify that the site was cleanred and there has been natural 
encroachment of the trees into the area, I seriously doubt it.  Again, TW 
tried to mantain a postive presence at each site, but did utilize the sites 
for their intended purpose.

In Arizona, we do not have a blanket approval for discharges of hydrostatic 
testwater.  We do however plan to use new pipe and water supplied either from 
the closest City (ie Flagstaff for station 2 construction) or from a drinking 
well source.  In any event, we will test the water prior to discharge and 
ensure that the discharge will stay on the facility property to soak into the 
ground.  I cant imagine that there will be large volumes of hydro water as we 
dont plan on installing a large amount of new pipe.

If we need to discuss the above, give me a call     

Larry,

I gave the tree issue at Station 2 some thought and I have a couple of
concerns regarding the environmental report.  The report is being written,
based on the fact that all construction will occur within the station yard
and on previously disturbed ground.  If we impact areas (even within
existing facilities) that were not previously disturbed we are required to
include environmental data about those areas.

So the first question is whether the entire station yard has been
"previously disturbed".  To help determine this, I downloaded a USGS aerial
(1996) of the station from the internet and the trees occurring within the
station yard look to be the same age/size as those surrounding the station.
This would indicate that the areas within the station covered with trees
have not been "previously disturbed".  A copy of the aerial is attached.

However, it is conceivable that the site was cleared prior to initial
construction and the trees simply grew back.  Unfortunately, I don't have
that information and don't know if you do either.  And let me point out that
my concern is not whether Transwestern will receive approval to construct,
but the amount of information supplied in the report.  I want to feel
comfortable that we are supplying the required information to FERC.

For this project, that would primarily include a description of the existing
vegetation and soils (resource report 3 and 7).  All we would really need is
a brief description of the existing vegetation and soils, and how much will
be permanently impacted, etc. However, we did not budget any time to obtain
this information, nor did we anticipate the need for site visits.

My hope is that we can find an answer to whether the site was previously
disturbed or not.  If not, I hope to come up with some verbiage that
everyone is comfortable with to satisfy the FERC requirements.  Otherwise,
we will have to obtain the necessary information, and that's beyond our
initial scope.

If you have had any biological reports done for the area on other projects,
that may provide enough information.  Again, it only needs to be brief.
Also, we need to verify for the other 3 stations that we are constructing in
previously disturbed areas.

Lastly, Arnold has indicated that the hydro-test water will come from
existing water source at each station and that it will be discharged under
Transwestern's blanket permit.  Please verify...and I think we should
provide a copy of the blanket permit with the filing.

After you have had a chance to think about this, please call and we can
discuss.

Terry.

 <<Station 2 aerial.jpg>>

It is our policy that e-mails are intended for and should be used for
business purposes only.

This footnote also confirms that this email message has been swept by
MIMEsweeper for the presence of computer viruses.

ENSR
www.ensr.com
postmaster@ensr.com
 - Station 2 aerial.jpg

I spoke to John Nystedt, the contact person for the Navajo Nation F&W service 
concerning the need to do endangered plants and animal  surveys at the two 
C/S on reservation lands.  I had sent to him the USGS quad sheets of the C/S 
sites for review.  Today he stated that he didnt think surveys would be 
needed at either location due to the fact that there had been historic 
disturbance at each location and that there was no sensitive habitiats in or 
near the C/S sites which would warrant surveys.  However, because of the 
issue of tribal lands, he was going to discuss this issue with the Navajo 
Nation director and verify his opinion and he would let Transwestern know on 
Monday of next week as to what the Tribes final decision would be, but he was 
almost sure that the Trib would recommend no surveys.  

John has faxed to me the list of approved botonists and boilogists which are 
approved to do work on the reservation.  I have contacted a number of 
individuals on the list and they are prepared to do the boilogical surveys 
next week  in the unlikely event a survey is required. 

I spoke with Ralph Komai, PCB person with SoCal, concerning the SWG meeting 
about PBCs on the SWG system.  As mentioned in the last note, SWG has 
discovered PCBs and has been sampling to determine extent and movement into 
their system.  SWG receives gas from SoCal and PGE at two separate and 
independent interconnects.  Liquids have been collected at the two 
interconnects from SoCal at concentrations of <500 and <100 ppm, 
respectively.  They have taken approx. 100 wipe samples and have had "hits" 
but nothing over 100 ug per wipe.   

In the meeting, SWG has expressed aggressive interest to SoCal about the 
installation of filter separators at the SoCal/SWG interconnects.  They felt 
that the installation of separators would greatly benefit the reduction of 
PCBs into their system.  Becasue of this, Ralph stated that SWG would be 
sending him a proposal for the installation of separators at the two 
interconnect locations.  I gave Ralph Earl Chanleys phone number as he was 
involved in the separator construction project last summer with PG&E.   

Maria, as per your request, please see the attached data:

All the below figures were calculated using the 4500 hp factor on the 
mainline ( TCV-12 Clark ) units
and 450 hp on the ( 4520 Waukesha ) auxillary. Units 601, 602, and 603 are 
the mainline units. Unit 621 is the 
auxillary engine and runs back up power, if needed.  The year 1997 was 
figured by Kerry Welch who no longer is with us.  
1998, 1999, and 2000 operating hours and fuel use numbers were calculated 
using the spread sheet that was provided by our mechanical analyst.
 

Engine hours     601       602      603       621         Fuel Volume ( MM 
scf / yr )          601             602              603             621

1997                    3818     1973   2847       
337                                                                     
27.98         27.98            27.98         3.53

1998                    1564          70     993        
24                                                                       
62.43           2.79           39.64           .07

1999                     457          186    218         
78                                                                      
18.24           7.43            8.70             .24

2000                      426        747     2644      
454                                                                     
17.01           29.82         105.55       1.39

The total throughput on condensate has been ( 0 gallons ) for 1997, 1998, 
1999, and 2000. This is due to the fact that our narutal gas supply changed 
in 1997 to a more dry natural gas and therefore, there was no liquids 
associated with the gas.

Again I apologize the inconsistency in the data.  We have had employee 
turnovers at the facility and different spreadsheets were used to provide the 
information to the EPA.  We are in the process of standardizing our data 
collections to eleminate this problem in the future.  I hope this information 
will help in the permit review process.  Again please accept my apologizes in 
the data collection errors.
 
 

Okpala.Maria@epamail.epa.gov on 02/15/2001 01:50:35 PM
Please confirm the following throughput and operating hours.  The
information below was given to me by Butch Russell

Compresssor Engine Operating hours  for 1997 is 38.87 *106 hp-hr??"         "                   "            "               "          "?1998  is 11.82 * 106 hp-hr

 Let me know the operating hours for 1999, and 2000.   Which HP was used in
the calculation.

The throughput found in the application  for 1998, the annual throughput
for condensate  (gal/yr) is 115, 165 while the maximum hourly throughput
(gal/yr) is 2,500.   The May 1999 data for both the annual throughput and
the maximum hourly throughput for May 1999 read 0.  Please confirm this and
let me know.

Thanks

Thanx John, for the attachment.  How did the presentation go?

John March <john.march@rolls-royce.com> on 03/14/2001 07:07:48 AM
Please respond to john.march@rolls-royceesi.com
Larry,

I was requested to submit our expected CO emissions data we presented to 
Arnold
Eisenstein and Byron Rance on Tuesday, March 13th in Houston.  Attached is the
powerpoint presentation with the CO emissions curves.

--
John A. March,  P.E.
Market Manager
Rolls-Royce Energy Systems, Inc.
105 North Sandusky Street
Mount Vernon, Ohio  43050
U.S.A.
Phone:  740-393-8391
Fax:  740-393-8781
Email:  john.march@rolls-royce.com

 - Transwestern CO Management.ppt

John, Bill this is the latest on the environmental issues for the turbines in 
Arizona.  The arch surveys at stations 3 and 4 on the Navajo reservation have 
been completed and nothing reportable was found or identified.  Each 
contractor is now preparing their reports and hopefully, will have them 
submitted to their mgt. for review in a couple of days and then issued to 
TW.  

The Forest Service has given us permission to do the arch survey for station 
2 on Monday.  The arch survey for station 1 is scheduled for Tuesday.   
Preliminary quotes for the surveys are $4-5000.00 for both sites.  The 
original word from them was 7-10 prior to giving approval.   This was 
definatley a plus.

Still no word on where the turbine buildings are to be located and what 
turbine equipment is to be installed at each facility.  GE or Rolls Royce.  
Additionally, confirmed decisions have not been made as to what auxillary 
power will be installed at each location (wind, natural gas, diesel).    

I received a call from the consultant who performed the archeology survey at 
stations 1 and 2.  Based upon the plot plan provided by construction, the 
archeology discovery at station 1 does not occur within the area of proposed 
impact, even though  part of the discovery is within the facility fence.  The 
report  recommendation to the SHPO by the archeologist will be that during 
construction activities in this area, an archeologist be onsite to monitor 
and ensure that the site is not impacted.  They will also recommend that we 
fence the discovery area within our facility to ensure that future pipeline 
activities will not disrupt the site.  

I have asked that two reports be prepared for each site.  One report for each 
station covering the construction areas and the other reports to include the 
entire 40 acres at each compressor station.  All four reports will be 
submitted to Bret Fritch in Omaha on Monday, the 26th of March.

The Title V air permit applications for C/S's 3 and 4 were submitted to 
Region IX EPA in San Francisco.  These were the last two applications to be 
filed for the Redrock Mainline Exspansion project in Arizona.

Assistance was given to all field teams in Arizona in the preparation and 
submittal of the required annual complaince certifications required under 
each facilities Title V Operating Permit.

2000 emissions inventories were submitted to the TNRCC for the eleven C/S in 
the Midland Region.

A revised APEN was submitted to the state of Colorado for the forthcoming 
power turbine unit replacement to be conducted at the LaPlata C/S.  

Presented Title V training to the Flagstaff Team.  The training included 
responsibilities, recordkeeping and semi annual reporting requirements.

A meeting was held with representatives of Transwestern and PG&E to discuss 
activities related to removing PCB's from the Topock Lateral.  Sampling data 
was reviewed and discussions were held addressing past cleaning efforts.  
PG&E has stated by letter and verbally that natural gas volumes will be 
decreased weekly until PCB concentrations fall below 5 ppm.  Transwestern 
will be implementing a pipeline cleaning of the remaining 1850 of pipe 
between our M/S and the PG&E C/S.  Included in this cleaning will be 
decontamination of the additional filter separators and meter runs.

Assisted in the compilation and data gathering of the Title V compliance 
monitoring and annual certification reports for C/S No. 5, Thoreau.

The annual blanket request for the Arizona SHPO was submtted for renewal.

Notification letters were submitted to the state of New Mexico notifiying the 
agency of like for like replacements of recipricating engines at the AToka 
No. 1 C/S.  Additional notifications were submitted to the agency apprising 
them of engine removal activities at C/S's No. 5 and 9 which would impact 
emissions fees.

Guys, look at the attached draft of a letter I plan on sending to the Laguna 
pueblo regarding Transwestern efforts to date of finding new technologies to 
address and remove PCB contamination from the groundwater at the facility.

You may remember, we had a meeting in January to hear the Laguna's concerns 
that Transwestern was not moving fast enough to clean up the site.  This 
letter addresses our attempts to find a solution to the PCB problem, and that 
remediation technologies are not presently available to operate effectively 
at the site given the sites unique characterisstics.  Id like to send this 
out on Friday or Monday.

      

David, nice touch with the NC.  I sure John will have some ideas on how to 
best to get this thing going after the NC gets back with you.  Ill leave it 
up to Mr. Shafer as to his preference to have dinner with Mr. Smith during 
our June tour of the C/S facilities.  Good to hear that the team  has bought 
in on supporting the NC by participation.  If you want me to, I can put on a 
little presentation to the other 2 teams in Arizona and see if we can get 
their support and participation also.  Let me know and we can do this at one 
of their safety meetings.......

David Roensch
04/17/2001 11:13 PM

Larry, per your request following our phone conversation today I'm forwading 
a brief note regarding our dinner meeting last night with the Arizona Chapter 
of the Nature Conservancy.  

Hank Hull (Flagstaff Team leader) and I met with Edward Smith, the Northern 
Arizona Program Ecologist with the Nature Conservancy, here out of 
Flagstaff.  The purpose of the meeting was to make introductions between Ed 
and Hank and to informally discuss opportunities in which the Flagstaff Team 
could support the local chapter.  The Flagstaff Team made a committment in 
their Team Objectives and each team member in their Peer Committments to 
support the Conservancy in some manner this year.  To date all eight of the 
Flagstaff Team members (2 positions currently vacant) have taken advantage of 
the free membership offered through ETS.  Also, Ed was quite impressed with 
ETS's sponsorship of the employee and family memberships.  I won't get into 
the details but, it was obvious that opportunities will exist for the Team to 
become active in local activities.  So, as a follow up to the meeting, Ed 
will make a list of the areas and locations the Conservancy is in need of 
help and forward this list to Hank who will then poll the various Team 
members and solicit volunteers.  This may take a couple of weeks to get up 
and running but we should be well on our way by June.  Our goal, for now, 
will be to committ on a monthly, quarterly or annual basis to providing a 
given number of volunteer hours.  I'll keep you posted on how things 
progress.  

Ed also, offered to come out to one of the Team's meetings and give the group 
an overview of the Arizona Chapter of the Nature Conservancy and discuss our 
involvement with the entire Team.  And last but not least, when you, Bill, 
John, Rich and Randy come out for your West End field trip we may be able to 
coordinate a dinner get togeather with Ed to discuss any topics of interest.  
Just a thought.....   

Have a good week....... 

Kermit Team, I received a letter from the TNRCC concerning emissions fees 
that have not been paid for a facility called the "Hendrick/Wink Tank Farm".  
The letter was addressed to a Mr. Paul Newman of EOTT.  The letter stated 
that we may owe emissions fees for the facility.  My question is, do you have 
such a facility in your team area, and what does it comprise?  ie..number and 
size of tanks, throughput in 2000.  The TNRCC letter was dated March 28, 2001 
and we are required  to provide information to them within 30 days.  I just 
received the letter today.  HELP!!  I need something from you by this 
afternoon or tomorrow at the latest.

Kermit Team, I really need your assistance on this.  I received a notice from 
the TNRCC about the above facility.  Apparently, the emissions fees for the 
facility have not been paid for 2000.  In light of this, does this facility 
exist in your area of responsibility?  Please let me know.  If so, I need the 
follwoing information ASAP to aviod an NOV for the facility.

 Size of each tank 

  height and capacity

 Number of tanks

 Color of tank(s)  and roof(s)

 fixed or floating roof 

  if floating, internal or external 

  primary or secondary seals

 how is tank loaded and or unloaded 

  ie trucks, pipeline etc...

 Relative vapor pressure if known

 monthly throughput

 maximum fill rate of tank  

  how long does it take to fill tank

Alison, have you found out anything about the above referenced?  The deadline 
for submitting the FY 2001 emissions fee is April 30.  The TNRCC can levee a 
fine on the facility if we dont provide them with some informaiton pretty 
fast.  Your assistance in this will be appreciated.

Alison, better send me what you have via fed-x or fax (505) 627-8172.  I have 
spoken to Bill about this.  We need to send a check to the agency to cover 
ourselves prior to the April 30 deadline. I beleive that EOTT is responsible 
for paying the fee.  I have left a message with Larry Fensted and  his 
associate Ruth Ann and expressed the need for the $416.00 check by 4/1.

I didn't forget about you.  I was trying to verify which facility you were 
asking about since there are several Hendrick and Wink facilities on my file 
list.  I was able to verify that an EOTT "PLP" check in the amount of $416.00 
was cut on 10/29/99 to pay the FY 2000 Emissions Fee (9/1/99 - 8/31/00) for 
Hendrick/Wink Station (TNRCC Account # WM01910).  However, there is no 
evidence of payment for FY 2001.  I believe, though, that Craig Willoughby of 
ENTRIX did some work on emissions for at least one of the Hendrick facilities 
while he was working for EOTT last year.  I left a message for him a couple 
of days ago but haven't heard from him yet.  I think that whatever he put 
together is in the ETS file.  I've left a message for Kerry Fields to check 
the ETS files for information.  Bottom line:  Looks like the invoice you have 
does need to be paid, but which company is responsible for this fee?

P.S. Would you like a copy of what I found?

Alison Campbell
Fleet Operations
Phone:  (713) 993-5088
Fax:  (713) 402-2842
Email:  alison.campbell@eott.com

	Larry Campbell@ENRON
	04/25/2001 03:33 PM
		 
Alison, have you found out anything about the above referenced?  The deadline 
for submitting the FY 2001 emissions fee is April 30.  The TNRCC can levee a 
fine on the facility if we dont provide them with some informaiton pretty 
fast.  Your assistance in this will be appreciated.

I am sending this notification to your department to seek a solution of 
halting and stopping inappropriate e mail materials which I am receiving.  I 
have been requested by Louis Soldano, Enron attorney for the Gas Pipeline 
Group, to apprise you of this situation.  The content of materials received, 
I consider offensive, and am sure it would also be considered objectionable 
and innappropriate by the standards of Enron Corporation.   Please be 
advised, that many times it is  difficult to screen this material based upon 
the headings and titles that accompany the contents.  Consequently, 
innappropriate materials such as this are opened.  I have accidently opened 
two such e mails by mistake and have received the "Enron warning"  that my 
name and mailbox will be or may be audited in the future and that my name has 
been placed in a file.    Because of this, I am extremely uncomfortable about 
future accidents occuring and more importantly, about the increased frequency 
and accessability of my e mail box to trash and questionable materials.     

I would appreciate your immediate attention in this matter.  Thank you very 
much.

Randy, this is a short summary of the environmental findings that were 
identified during the records review conducted at the Corpus Christi Koch 
facility offices on May 1st and 2nd of this year.

All environmental records which were available in the file data room at the 
Koch office  were reviewed.  Assumptions were made that the environmental 
records were complete for all assets included in the sale.  Primary emphasis 
was placed on those environmental issues which are normally associated with a 
sale or purchase of assets dealing with distribution and transmission of 
crude oil. In particular, pipeline and tank farms were the most critical 
assets which were reviewed. 

Based upon the data review, the Koch assets were in compliance with the 
following:

  Air permitting, permit by rule, standard expemtions, recordkeeping and fee 
payments were documented 

  NSPS recordkeeping and inspections for VOC control on large crude oil tanks 
were documented 

  Oil Pollution Act-OPA 90 plans had been prepared and were up to date

  SARA compliance and reporting had been completed

  SPCC plans had been prepared for each site which qualified under 40 CFR 112

  Spill reporting history and notifications to the state agency were 
available for review

   There are ongoing groundwater and soil remediation activities at one site 
included in the asset for sale
     (permits for the remediation activity is in place)

  Hazardous waste notifications, annual reportings and fee payments were 
documented

Based upon the above review, there were no issues which could be identified 
which would be condsidered a major environmental limitation or would be a 
considered a major environmental  liability.  This statement is again based 
upon the assumption that all environmental information was present in the 
data room for the assets in question.  It should also be stated that this 
analysis of Koch's environmental compliance is based upon the fact that Koch 
has not held back or provided false or misleading information or knowledge 
during their presentation or informaiton contained in the facility files.

Pending further development and interest of this potential purchase, a 
recommendation is made to conduct a phase I due diligence and site visit to 
each location to verify findings from the records review.   Also, due to the 
past history of Koch's operating practices, it is recommended that contract 
conditions be implicitly stated that EOTT will not be held liable for 
discoveries of past deficiencies or releases of contamination which have 
occurred on any of the Koch assets purchased.  

      

On behalf of EOTT, an environmental records review was completed for a block 
of Koch crude oil pipeline assets located in south Texas.  There were no 
issues or environmental deficiencies identified during the review.  A due 
diligence was recommended to verify confirmation of the housekeeping  
activities presented in the records review.

The air permit modification for the La Plata C/S was received from the state 
of Colorado.  This modification allows for additional emissions and fuel use 
as a result of  a change in gas quality supplies in the San Juan basin.  

 

Shudeish, the buildings and stack heights for each of  the Flagstaff And 
Kingman Compressor Stations are presented below.  Building and stack 
demensions (in feet), are as follows:

FLAGSTAFF

    length   width    height

 Engine Room  108   59   40

  stack 1        28
  stack 2        28
  stack 3        28

 Control Room  37   37   14

 Auxillary Room  50   37   20

 Port a Camp  40   10   10

 Office   163   40   24
  
  stack 1         17
 
 Weilding Bldg.  30   42   17

 Domestic Water 19   8   9

KINGMAN

 Engine Room  110   60   45

  stack 1        32
  stack 2        32
  stack 3        32

 Control Room  14   38   18

 Auxillary Room  50   38   25

 Shop/Washrack 52   52   18

 Warehouse  10   40   18
  
  stack 1         17
 
 Butler Bldg.  16   56   11
  
 
 Let me know if you need anything else.....

James, lets go ahead and provide her with an annual report for Puckett with 
the information you provided.

thanx again

Larry,

I received this email message from Leslie this afternoon... she asked if I
had received the letter from her that approved TW's request to discontinue
the groundwater monitoring at the Puckett site.

She may have asked this because she may have expected to receive an annual
report last week.

Last week, I sent to you a draft of what I thought should go into the new
annual reports, now that we don't have any groundwater monitoring to report.

Please let me know if you want me to send an annual report to her.

Later,
James

James - did you get letter?
Thanks
leslie

Randy, based upon the records review, this is the only issue that may be a=
=20
problem.  If a tank has been moved to another location, it would trigger=20
requirements which were enacted on the date of the relocation.  For instanc=
e,=20
if a tank constructed prior to 1973 was moved in 1978, there would be=20
emissions control requirements placed on the tank as required by the 1978=
=20
tank regulations.  If the tank had remained at its original location, it=20
would be grandfathered with respect to emissions.  However, because the tan=
k=20
was relocated, it is looked upon as being a tank constructed in 1978 and=20
subject to the 1978 regulations and is no longer grandfathered.

I was not given this information during the records review, so I dont know =
if=20
any of the tanks apply.  If any of the tanks fit into the above scenerio,=
=20
EOTT or Koch will be  looking at some major $$$$$ to bring any subject tank=
=20
into compliance.  Generally speaking, the regualtions and costs to comply=
=20
increase as a function of date.   =20

1. Q. Of the tanks listed on the spreadsheet, have any of the tanks been=20
relocated from its original construction locations?  List the tank, date=20
moved and   location moved to.
A.  Benevides Station Tank 6125 and Mirando Station Tank 28591 were relocat=
ed=20
to those stations.  Three Rivers Tanks 28508 and 28100 were   relocated and=
=20
re-erected at that station.  Duval Station Tank 28052 and Mirando Station=
=20
28045 were relocated and re-erected at those stations prior  to Koch=01,s=
=20
acquisition of those assets.

=09"Lofing, Michael" <LofingM@kochind.com>
=0905/08/2001 09:48 AM
=09=09=20

Jim
Attached are the Koch South Texas Pipeline data room questions with answers
attached.  I have also attached data provided to other bidders.  If you hav=
e
any additional questions, please contact me, 828-4027.
Regards,
Mike

 <<EOTT Questions and Answers_.doc>>  <<over-short labor utilities.xls>>
<<CrudeVehicles.xls>>

 - EOTT Questions and Answers_.doc
 - over-short labor utilities.xls
 - CrudeVehicles.xls

Arnold, I  have attached a spreadsheet showing what information I need to 
complete the air permit applications.  I have set the Flagstaff site as the 
model, due to its elevation and temperature which is the worst case site.  
Let me know if there are any problems with the attached data request.

      

Arnold L Eisenstein@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
05/08/2001 11:31 PM

Fax:   Davide Iannucci, Project Manager
 (39) 055423 2800

 tel: (39) 055423 2920
 or e-mail davide.iannucci@np.ge.com

we are here thru Thursday (Italy time 7 hours ahead of Houston)

Larry Campbell@ENRON
05/07/2001 03:09 PM
Arnold, I assume that when you say you are at the factory, you mean Italy.  
If so, is it possible for you to get a fax?  If so, I could fax over to you a 
template of what information I need.  If not, Ill give you a list of the 
engine parameters.  Let me know...

Arnold.L.Eisenstein@enron.com on 05/07/2001 10:14:14 AM
Larry,

could you draft a template for NP the way you want them to give the
emissions warrenty to support your filing.

we are at the factory and could care of this now.

Arnold

Scott, I have sent out twice a request to each of the field teams in the 
Midland Region to provide some desperately needed tank information to 
determine compliance for all the EOTT crude oil tanks in the Midland area.  
So far, only the Midland, Lovington, Kermit, Andrews, Hobbs and Jal teams 
have responded. I would appreciate your assistance in motivating the 
remaining seven teams to get this information to me at their earliest 
convenience.  I have attached the most recent update of the tank spreadsheet 
for you to pass on to the teams.  

Thanks for the help.

     

Hazardous waste fees were submitted to the state of Arizona.

Emissions fees were submitted to the state of New Mexico For C/S's 7,8,9, 
Atoka No. 3 and Bloomfield.

Submitted to the state of Texas an admisistraitve revision for the "like for 
like" replacement of an IC engine at Irion Co. No. 1 C/S.  To meet the 
requirements of 2 gms for NOx, a catalytic converter has been installed on 
the replacement unit.

Submitted to the state of New Mexico notification of a "like for like" 
replacement  of an I/C engine at Atoka No. 2 C/S.

A revised Title V application was submitted to Region VI, EPA for C/S No. 6, 
Laguna.

The emissions inventory for the TW Keystone C/S was submitted to the state of 
Texas.

The spreadsheet development for the EOTT tanks in the Midland Region has 
slowed down.  Six of 13 teams have responded with tank information.  A 
request was made to Scott Clark, Regional Director,  to assist in notifying 
the teams of the importance of submitting this data.

Louie/Ed I know you guys are busy, but because of the emphasis Enron places 
on ensuring that action items from consolidated audits are completed prior to 
the action item completion date, I really need to know how Scott and I are to 
proceed on the subsurface drilling activities for potential contamination at 
the Bakersfield Fractionator.  The scheduled completion date for six of the 
items is 6/30.  I understand the there is an issue concerning Koch's 
individual and shared responsibility for some of the issues identified during 
the audit.  Rich Jolly has contacted me asking me when the drilling will 
begin, as he does not want to see us exceed the 6/30 date and have the items 
show up as deliquent in his region.  Whatever you can do to assist us in 
either initiating the investigations or placing a hold on the drilling would 
be greatly appreciated.   

Ed, I would appreciate it very much if you would review the action item list 
from Scott Jones and choose which items are Koch's responsibility and which 
items  belong to EOTT, and let Scott and I know.  Ill contact Scott and have 
him send you the action item list for your review.  As I had previously 
mentioned, Scott and I have until 6/30 to complete the subsurface 
investigations and knowing which items are EOTT's and which are Koch's would 
greatly help us.  As Scott's server is down, Ill phone him and have him send 
you the action item list.  Again Thanks very much.

Sorry I have not responded sooner, but I've been tied up with the crude lines 
transaction.

The mercury contamination by the old meter shop and hydrocarbon contamiantion 
at the truck rack are Koch's responsibility.  Per EOTT/Koch contract, Koch 
must be allowed to do the remediation.  I sent Koch a letter in December 
requesting they undertake it.  I suggest a call (followed up by a letter) to 
Frank Van Ryn at Koch to set it up.  I'm happy to review or write such a 
letter.  But at this point, you guys should be coordinating with Koch for 
Koch to remediate.

If any other items on your audit need to be addressed (e.g., chromium), 
please let me know, as I will need to send a demand letter to Koch for them 
if they are Koch's responsibility.  Thanks.  --ETA

	Larry Campbell@ENRON
	05/11/01 09:35 AM
		 
Louie/Ed I know you guys are busy, but because of the emphasis Enron places 
on ensuring that action items from consolidated audits are completed prior to 
the action item completion date, I really need to know how Scott and I are to 
proceed on the subsurface drilling activities for potential contamination at 
the Bakersfield Fractionator.  The scheduled completion date for six of the 
items is 6/30.  I understand the there is an issue concerning Koch's 
individual and shared responsibility for some of the issues identified during 
the audit.  Rich Jolly has contacted me asking me when the drilling will 
begin, as he does not want to see us exceed the 6/30 date and have the items 
show up as deliquent in his region.  Whatever you can do to assist us in 
either initiating the investigations or placing a hold on the drilling would 
be greatly appreciated.   

Under the regulations of the state of Arizona, facilities which have a 
pollution prevention plan (sta.1, sta. 2 and Needles) are required to have an 
annual training to evaluate pollution prevention activiies.  I have scheduled 
with the above three facilities to have pollution training on the following 
dates:

  Kingman team June 21

  Flagstaff team June 22

This training is to be completed by July 1 of every year.  This training will 
last for approximately 2-3 hours.  Employees that works at any of the three 
facilities are required to be present for the training.  Your participation 
in this will be greatly appreciated.

Lorraine, Ill give you a call this afternoon.  By the way, did they test the 
liquids for PCBs?  I havent heard from the Gallup team on whether they have 
gone and checked for collected liquids at their I/C's.  Rick, can youcheck on 
this for me?

Larry - Today I met with representatives from PNM and we discussed the 
information set forth below.  PNM recently tested for liquids at Rio Puerco 
and found liquids, specifically C5+ and think this is coming from TW.  Please 
call me to discuss.  Thanks.

Lorraine

Lorraine, the first of three...........
Team Laguna
05/07/2001 08:25 AM

We went out to our Rio Puerco interconnect and tried collecting a liquid 
sample for PCB sampling, but
had no liquid to collect.  So, Larry if you can let Lorraine know that we 
were unsuccessful in collecting this sample
I'd highly appreciate it. Thank you !

Laguna Team   /  Norm

Louie, after the presentation MIchael gave, there were some issues about the 
data and predictions ie., like how much solvent do we really need to clean 
the pipeline and the injection intervals and locations, but not whether the 
solvent or technology would or would not work.  The data did show that  
terpenoline does remove PCB's from pipeline.  But because Penn State was so 
deeply involved in the modeling study, and we were still under the PG&E 
thumb, it appeared to be in the best interest of TW to see it to the end.   
There wasnt anyone who had any better suggestions or ideas.  The thought was 
that because of the amount of $$$$$$ we had previously spent, not to see it 
through would have meant 0 return  for the money we had invested.    And if 
it works, the money would have been wisely used. 

The real truth of course is when we do a trial run.  I signed a six month 
extension to the contract for Penn State (I sent out a memo on this) but not 
for additional $$$$$$.  They needed the extra time to complete the modeling 
study and data evaluation.  Last summer/fall, Tiny had been overseeing the 
operational side of this (ie terpenoline storage locations and coordinating 
injection points and the pigging activities).  When the decision is made to 
begin the injections and pigging, Tiny will be ready  and waiting......  

	

didn't we kind of shut michael down???

Michael, I know its been some time since we communicated, but how is the PCB 
pipeline modeling efforts going?   I would appreciate a  summary from you 
identifying  recent discoveries and a general update on the project.    

Have you thawed out from the Pennsylvania winter?

Bill you may want to sit in on this if you have time.  It seems we have items 
of concern that were identified during the consolidated audit at Bakersfield 
which were tied into  a previous agreement with Koch for which the action 
team did not know when the action items were prepared.  The action dates are 
approaching and   Scott and I are having a hard time getting clearification 
on how to initiate getting the the action items started due to the 
responsibility of Koch for some of the items.  Ed, the attorney for EOTT,  
will be requested by Lou, to notify Koch concerning their responsiblity.  If 
this sounds convoluted, then you know as much as I..... 
The conference call will be held Friday May 18th at 3:00pm CST.  The dial in 
number is 
1-800-713-8600, and the Passcode is 2357.

Thank you,
Jan for Lou Soldano

Thanx John, I look forward to seeing you at the Doubletree for dinner on the 
night of the September 3.  Let me know your traveling plans 

JOHN

John P. Woodyard, PE
Roy F. Weston, Inc.
3 Hawthorn Parkway, #400
Vernon Hills, IL 60061-1450
847-918-4008 phone/4055 fax
woodyj@mail.rfweston.com

Laguna and or Moutainair team, because I dont know which team is responsible 
for the Belen delivery point, would someone check on liquids at this location 
and if present, collect a sample and have it analyzed for PCB's?  We're 
required to do this by the contract.  If no liquids are present, drop 
Lorraine and or myself a message  stating such.  Thanx

Larry - PCB testing that TW has committed to with PNM for October 1, 2001 
through September 30, 2006 is the same as the commitment TW agreed to 5 yrs. 
ago and that is as follows:

"...PCB sampling program standards set forth by the EPA at the TW/PNM 
delivery points of Rio Puerco, Ft. Wingate and Belen".

Thanks for your assistance.

Lorraine

FYI, Lorraine.  As I understand it there are three site for which you want 
samples collected.  One is Rio Puerco, the other is this site, what is the 
last I/C?
 	Team Gallup 05/16/2001 09:46 AM 

 sampling at pnm/wingate innerconnect has no liquids,would you let lorraine 
know thanks larry.
walt at the gallup team we be jammin, and you da man larry.

Larry, I have filled out this as best as i could. I hope this helps out. Let 
me know if i can help anymore.

Wade Jordan
05/15/2001 03:58 PM

Bill, any delays on this project are NOT from the env. matrix.  I received 
the matrix from the team sometime last week (tuesday -thursday) when I was 
out of town on business.  When I came back on friday, I completed the matrix 
and sent it back to the team.  Any delays on this issue are from the team, 
not from me.  As I remember the project, it involved work on the right of way 
and therefore was covered by the blankets we have for SHPO and F&W.  There 
were no project delays in terms of permits or approvals...... 

William.Kendrick.enronXgate@enron.com on 05/20/2001 08:12:13 AM
Larry--

Any thoughts on this?  Please respond to me only.

Thanks, Bill
We continue to have some "attitude" from this person in scheduling for
EOTT. I thought you may be able to work with Scott and is people on a
process to make this better.
R2

(Embedded image moved to file: pic00041.pcx)
Lance Nash @ EOTT on 05/15/2001 10:48:39 AM

Wade - As you're probably aware of by now, on April 2nd, Carl Eby with
Phillips called inquiring about a possible tie-in of the subject unit to
our "Young Deep" pipeline system we acquired from Koch.  A question arose
as to whether or not a west to east spur existed off the north/south
mainline which would be near the unit.  It was initially conveyed to me
that ETS would take a backhoe out to the mainline to make this
determination.  I have since learned that this has been delayed due to the
need for an "environmental matrix", whatever that may be.  The roads to
this unit are in extremely poor condition, and the operator would like to
pipeline connect if possible.  Production is represented at 300 bpd.

A couple of issues:

1)  Could someone explain to me the process involved in an "env. matrix",
and why it take 2 months to determine if we have a pipeline in the ground?
Is someone with ETS in Houston delaying this, if so, who is the responsible
party?
2)  Tariff on this system (NMSCC #17) is 50 cents/bbl at this time, plus
PLA.  From the maps I have, it appears this system consists of around 10 to
12 miles of gathering and mainline.  Current production on the system is
around 115 bpd of WTI, or $23,000/yr monetized.  The pipe in the ground is
fairly new from what I've been told by my contact at Koch.  If we can
manage to tie this well in, revenue would be raised an additional
$60,000/year at current tariff rates.  What costs are currently associated
with this system?  A decision needs to be made on the economic feasibility
of keeping it operable given the current tariff rates and current/proposed
throughput, or the rates needed to keep the system viable.

Bottom line, Phillips and the producer need an answer, one way or the
other, so they can get on with the business of safely transporting this
crude oil.  EOTT Pipeline needs an answer, one way or the other, so we can
decide how to best manage this system.

Any assistance in moving this forward and allowing EOTT to maintain some
image of credibility would be appreciated.  I would also like to pass along
my appreciation of Rick Cribbs and the information he has been able to
provide thusfar.

Lance Nash
Commercial Manager
EOTT Energy Pipeline L.P.
(713) 993-5296
lance.nash@eott.com

 - pic00041.pcx

After reveiwing the documents entitled, "Baseline Environmental Investigation 
of Arco North Coles Levee Plant 8, Rogas Loading Facility and Associated 
Natural Gas Pipeline Systems Kern County, California" and "Report of 
Preliminary Asessment Sampling North Coles Levee Gas Plant Loading Rack Area 
Tupman, California", it appears that the following areas should be 
investigated further to detemine horizontal and vertical extent of  
identified contamination from the above referenced reports:

 Tank 15 area-  total petroleum hydrocarbons

 Glycol reboiler area- total petroleum hydrocarbons

 Hot oil heater area- total petroleum hydrocarbons

   Wash rack area- lead

 Propane comp. area lead  
    total petroleum hydrocarbons
    chromates

 Cooling tower area- chromates

 Compressor area- BTEX
    chromates
    lead

In the "Baseline Environmental Investigation" report, sampling was only 
conducted to an approximate depth of 2.5'.  I am not comfortable with basing 
decisions for further investigations on such a shallow depth, in leau of the 
fact that  many times water soluble constituents may horizonatlly move 
vertically from surface shallow depths into the lower subsurface areas.  This 
is indeed the case for chromates.  I based my recommendations for metal 
concentrations on the federal RCRA Subtitle C hazardous waste target levels 
for metals and evaluated  the TPH and BTEX levels with the  underground 
storage tank guidlines for California.  There were references to a 1989 
document in the "Baseline" report for specific parameters, but there may have 
been an update to target contamination level requirements since that date and 
therefore, I used 10,000 ppm which is a general action level for most states 
for total petroleum hydrocarbons.  Again, I did not evaluate the mercury or 
the loading rack issues.

One last issue.  As you know, identification of contamination is usually 
accomplished by sight observations of visible contamination, knowledge of 
processes and or history.  Report results of the surface contamination do not 
show there to be an immediate environmental concern.  Due to the age of the 
facility, there may be concerns which were not identified in the reports.  
However, based upon the locations of the preliminary samplings which were 
conducted throughout the facility, it appears that the information presented 
in the reports would be adequate to address suspected contamination at the 
facility.       
    

OK Ed try this:

 Tank 15 area-  Total petroleum hydrocarbons TPH concentrations in soil 
exceed 10,000 mg/kg.  This value has been identified in the "Leaking         
Underground Fuel Tank Field Manual, (State of Califonia, 1989).  This value 
was identified as a         potential threat to groundwater aquifers.  

 Glycol reboiler area- Total petroleum hydrocarbons  TPH concentrations in 
soil exceed 10,000 mg/kg.  This value has been identified in the 
"Leaking         Underground Fuel Tank Field Manual,(State of Califonia, 
1989).  This value was identified as a         potential threat to 
groundwater aquifers.  

 Hot oil heater area- Total petroleum hydrocarbons TPH concentrations in soil 
exceed 10,000 mg/kg.  This value has been identified in the "Leaking         
Underground Fuel Tank Field Manual, (State of Califonia, 1989) as a potential 
threat to          groundwater aquifers.  

   Wash rack area- Lead    Lead values exceed the Toxic Characteristic 
Leaching Procedure target levels as a  hazardous         waste (40 CFR 261)

 Propane comp. area Lead      Lead values exceed the Toxic Characteristic 
Leaching Procedure target levels as a  hazardous         waste (40 CFR 261)
    
    Total petroleum hydrocarbons TPH concentrations in soil exceed 10,000 
mg/kg.  This value has been identified in the "Leaking         Underground 
Fuel Tank Field Manual, (State of Califonia, 1989) as a potential threat 
to          groundwater aquifers.  
    
    Chromates   Chromate values exceed the Toxic Characteristic Leaching 
Procedure (TCLP) target levels as a          hazardous waste (40 CFR 261)

 Cooling tower area- Chromates   Chromate values exceed the Toxic 
Characteristic Leaching Procedure (TCLP) target levels as a          
hazardous waste (40 CFR 261)   

 Compressor area- BTEX    Benzene concentrations in soil exceed 1.0 mg/kg.  
This value has been identified in the "Leaking         Underground Fuel Tank 
Field Manual, (State of Califonia, 1989) as a potential threat to          
groundwater aquifers.   
    
    Chromates   Values exceed the Toxic Characteristic Leaching Procedure 
(TCLP) target levels as a           hazardous waste (40 CFR 261) 
    
    Lead    Values exceed the Toxic Characteristic Leaching Procedure (TCLP) 
target levels as a           hazardous waste (40 CFR 261)  

In light of the Koch indemnity, at minimum we'll need to come up with a 
specific reason for each area, based on California standards, and to 
communicate that rationale to Koch prior to doing any substantial work -- 
certainly before boring.  Thanks.

	Larry Campbell@ENRON
	05/21/01 09:54 AM
		 
After reveiwing the documents entitled, "Baseline Environmental Investigation 
of Arco North Coles Levee Plant 8, Rogas Loading Facility and Associated 
Natural Gas Pipeline Systems Kern County, California" and "Report of 
Preliminary Asessment Sampling North Coles Levee Gas Plant Loading Rack Area 
Tupman, California", it appears that the following areas should be 
investigated further to detemine horizontal and vertical extent of  
identified contamination from the above referenced reports:

 Tank 15 area-  total petroleum hydrocarbons

 Glycol reboiler area- total petroleum hydrocarbons

 Hot oil heater area- total petroleum hydrocarbons

   Wash rack area- lead

 Propane comp. area lead  
    total petroleum hydrocarbons
    chromates

 Cooling tower area- chromates

 Compressor area- BTEX
    chromates
    lead

In the "Baseline Environmental Investigation" report, sampling was only 
conducted to an approximate depth of 2.5'.  I am not comfortable with basing 
decisions for further investigations on such a shallow depth, in leau of the 
fact that  many times water soluble constituents may horizonatlly move 
vertically from surface shallow depths into the lower subsurface areas.  This 
is indeed the case for chromates.  I based my recommendations for metal 
concentrations on the federal RCRA Subtitle C hazardous waste target levels 
for metals and evaluated  the TPH and BTEX levels with the  underground 
storage tank guidlines for California.  There were references to a 1989 
document in the "Baseline" report for specific parameters, but there may have 
been an update to target contamination level requirements since that date and 
therefore, I used 10,000 ppm which is a general action level for most states 
for total petroleum hydrocarbons.  Again, I did not evaluate the mercury or 
the loading rack issues.

One last issue.  As you know, identification of contamination is usually 
accomplished by sight observations of visible contamination, knowledge of 
processes and or history.  Report results of the surface contamination do not 
show there to be an immediate environmental concern.  Due to the age of the 
facility, there may be concerns which were not identified in the reports.  
However, based upon the locations of the preliminary samplings which were 
conducted throughout the facility, it appears that the information presented 
in the reports would be adequate to address suspected contamination at the 
facility.       
    

I spoke with Ken Jacobs, with the Forest Service in Flagstaff, concerning his 
agencies approval for the turbine construction at Station 2.  As a condition 
of the approval from his agency, he has requested that all the ponderosa pine 
trees to be removed for the turbine construction activities be flagged for 
identification.  After the trees have been marked, we are to then contact him 
so that he can visit the site and make an evaluation as to whether the Forest 
Service will charge us for the tree removal or whether no additional charges 
will be incurred as a result of the construction activity.  The charges will 
depend upon the calculation of how many board feet of lumber there are in the 
trees which are flagged.

As this activity is included in the time line for completion of all permits 
and approvals, please contact me when the trees have been tagged and flagged 
and I will contact Ken Jacobs so that he can make a site visit.

Byron/Tiny, I spoke to Ken Jacobs with the Forest Service and have attached 
his e mail below concerning the Forest Sevice's choice for the building.  I 
have informed him that our new piping and ancillary equipment will remain 
white which is consistent with the existing equipment.  He had no problems 
with this.  I also had asked him if there was a name for the brown which the 
FS uses on their signs and he did not know of a specific name, so I think the 
best thing would be to match as closely as possible.

The Forest Service would like the new Compressor Building to be painted
dark brown.  The color should be close to the color that we use for our
signs.  Call me at 520-214-2464 if you would like to discuss this.

Ken Jacobs
Lands Staff Officer
Ranger District
Coconino National Forest

Byron Rance@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
05/22/2001 08:35 AM
David.

Need to know the current color scheme for TW for the new buildings.

Think its white wall and roof with blue trim.

Do we have to hide anything at any of the sights behind desert tan.

Please advise.

Byron

Michael, I will be discussing with John and others in the near future about 
the status of the study.  When will your progress report be ready for 
review?  It might be a good idea to let us review your report and then we can 
make comments and recommendations based upon your findings.  Im glad that 
things are going well with your data and that we may be able to apply 
something positive towards our situation.  Thanks for getting back with me.

Michael Adewumi <michael@pnge.psu.edu> on 05/24/2001 06:10:20 AM
Hi Larry:
 Sorry for the delayed response. I have just got back from an
overseas trip yesterday. I am in the process of preparing a progress report
for you. We have obtained some additional interesting results. I was also
waiting for input from your group. You may recall that at the end of our
Houston meeting, John told me that he would be getting back to me on some
specific directions from the group. I believe that we would be done with the
major aspects of PCB work soon, then we would be focusing on arsenic. Please
let me know of any thoughts and ideas. Thanks Larry.
  We are finally seeing the Spring here and maybe a short one for that
matter. Summer is just around the corner.
Best Regards,
Michael

Michael, I know its been some time since we communicated, but how is the
PCB pipeline modeling efforts going?   I would appreciate a  summary from
you identifying  recent discoveries and a general update on the project.

Have you thawed out from the Pennsylvania winter?

Bob, James, Roger,

Im having a hard time getting a response from the teams in the Midland Region 
in completing the attached EOTT tank spreadsheet.  Ive heard from some of the 
teams but nothing from others.  Im under the gun as to finding  out where the 
MIdland Region is in term of permits and and environmental compliance and the 
only way I can begin to make the evaluation is to have the field data inputed 
onto the spreadsheet.  This is where the teams assistance is required.  I 
have attached the latest version of the spreadsheet in the hope that you will 
deliver it to the following teams for their valued input:

 Monahans Team
 Hamlin/Haskel Team
 Lamesa Team
 Big Lake Team
 Midland Team
 Eunice Team
  

Your assistance in this will be greatly appreciated.

In light of the recent PCB issue with PG&E on the Topock Lateral,  I have 
asked Mr. John Woodyard of Roy F. Westin to c ome to Houston and make a  
presentation on PCB's in natural gas pipelines.  Mr. Woodyard has 
considerable experience in the management of PCB's and works closely in 
industry associations (INGAA and GRI),  Mr. Woodyard also works as a 
consultant in this capacity. 

The date of this meeting will be on Friday, September 3rd, beginning at 9:00 
am.  Lou Soldano will be setting up a meeting room and will notifiy all 
attendees via lotus notes prior to the September 3rd meeting date. 

I think this meeting will be very interesting and informative and and 
encourage all to attend, if possible.

Randy, I need your assistance with something.  Im trying to determine 
compliance for all the EOTT crude oil storage tanks in the Midland Region.  
Bill told me that you have a spreadsheet of the EOTT tanks showing some of 
the tank characteristics (size, storage, date of installation, state etc). 
Whatever you have, I would greatly appreciate your shaing it with me.  E mail 
works best for me.  

Thanks again.

If you send this to me, I promise to let you out fish me like you did in 
Minnesota a couple of years ago.......

Ivan,  the reason that you're having such a hard time making contact, is 
because the Foundation is going through some changes in their management. 
They are having a big pow-wow  this week to get things straightened out.  The 
new CEO will be a person named Ron Marcoux, and I  will be speaking with him 
next week.  In the interim, I have been working out some issues with the New 
Mexico/Texas Director and am scheduled  to meet with the Arizona Director in 
a couple of weeks.  Its pretty exciting to see the support from others in 
Enron.  Based upon initial contacts with the Missoula headquarters and 
regional directors, habitat conservation efforts are where the Foundation is 
placing a large part of its emphasis.   Ill keep you apprised of the 
partnership and how others can get involved after my discussions with the 
Foundations new CEO........

Ivan.Hamilton.enronXgate@enron.com on 06/12/2001 09:03:46 AM
Larry  - Sorry for the delay, but with PRC, life in HR has been pretty
intense.  I also made some initial contacts with the RMEF and have only
managed to play phone tag with the people I really needed to talk to.
Sounds like you've had better luck.

My approach was to look at a way to partner with the RMEF with their land
and habitat conservation programs on a national level rather than focusing
on any particular state.  Hopefully this would encourage broad based Enron
employee support and not foster any state biased partisanship.

Rocky Mountain Elk Foundation contact I tried is:

     Tony Schoonen
     VP Marketing
     Missoula, MT
     406/523-3432

Other Enron Employees I discussed this endeavor with and have indicated
their support are: Ken Crowl (Omaha), Virgil Pfennig (Iowa), & Ty McNeil
(Clifton, KS).

Others that might be interested are: Bob Besecker (Hugoton, KS), Roger Buck
(South Omaha), Andy Gieser (Omaha), Bill Sugg (Glasgow, MT), Ray Knox
(Clifton, KS), Joe Hill (Wolf Point, MT), Ron Omsberg (Mandan, ND), John
Nelson (North Branch, MN), Don Keller (Beatrice, NE), Larry Lottman
(Beatrice, NE), Steve Stedman (Beatrice, NE), Dale Johns (Palmyra, NE),
Kurt Weber (Beatrice, NE), Scott Finkbiner (Glasgow, MT), Bob Hopkins (Wolf
Point, MT), Roger Westfall (Omaha), & Jeff Boyce (Glen Ullin, ND).

All these are from my previous experience in North Operations.  As I
develop relationships as HR Rep for SE Operations, I am sure I will find
more interested employees.

Let me know what you think we should do from here.

ivan -

Ivan, I had an opportunity to make contact with the Rocky Mountain Elk
Foundation.  I have contacted the Montana office, which is  the national
headquarters and they have steered me to contacts in New Mexico and
Arizona.  I have met with the New Mexico RMEF contact and he is extremely
interested in GPG involvement and assistance.  I plan on meeting the
Arizona contact in the near future.  If you will steer me on to the states
you and other Enron employees would be interested in providing some
volunteer time and efforts, Id be glad to do the initial RMEF contact for
you.  Let me know at your convenience.....
His name is Ivan Hamilton.
R2

    -----Original Message-----
   Randy, about a month ago, you passed along a name to me of an employee
   that had expressed an interest in developing a partnership with the
   RMEF.  During the conversation with him, he was supposed to check with
   his relatives for a contact name for the RMEF.  I havent heard from him
   since that conversation.  Would you please help me out with his name and
   telephone number.  I want to check with him and see if he is still
   interested.  If not, Im going to pursue a partnership effort  through
   the New Mexico and Arizona chapters of the foundation.

   Thanks for your help.

Eunice team,  The NNG Eunice C/S is required to prepare and submit the semi 
annual and annual reports required by the facilities Title V Operating Permit 
which was issued by the State of New Mexico.  The reports are required to be 
submitted to the state of New Mexico and the EPA by July 19, 2001.   These 
reports are required even though the facility is not in operation.  If you 
would like assistance in the preparation and submittal of each document, give 
me a call and we can set up a time to meet at the C/S to do each report.  
This should take about half a day. 

John, I just spoke with Dan Walker, Vice President  of Development for the 
Rocky Mountain Elk Foundation about Enron's initiative for a corporation 
partnership.  After we had discussed our interest and desire and what 
opportunities are available with the Foundation for Enron, Dan stated that 
will be visiting with the Foundation's CEO next week and one of the issues to 
be discussed will be development of  an MOU or Agreement between Enron and 
the RMEF.  Looks like things are beginning to progress.

Im having quite a bit of interest from some of the Houston based Enron 
employees about how they can get involved.  Any suggestions on how I can 
"advertise" opportunities within the Corporation for employee involvement 
with the RMEF?

Had a conversation with Dan Walker, V.P. of Development for the Rocky 
Mountain Elk Foundation concerning Enron's future as a partner.  Dan will be 
meeting with the CEO of the Foundation to pursue actions towards an Agreement 
or MOU between Enron and the RMEF.  Interest has been surprisingly high for 
employees within and without GPG expressing a desire to be involved with the 
Foundation.  

Assisted C/S No. 8, Corona with the development and submittal of the 
facility's Title V semi annual report and annual compliance certification 
report submittals.

Presented annual pollution prevention training for the Kingman and Flagstaff 
teams as required by the State of Arizona for large quantity generators of 
hazardous waste.

Received a Compliance Order from the State of New Mexico, Air Quality Bureau, 
for an outstanding turbine replacement activity at the P-1 C/S which occurred 
in 1996.   Transwestern had met with the AQB over this issue in 1996 and 
assumed that the issue had been resolved. The issue in question was 
Transwestern's replacement of internal components from a smaller turbine to a 
larger turbine, with the internal components of the larger turbine components 
(inlet guide vane adjustment and removal of the regenerator) mechanically 
adjusted to simulate conditions of the smaller turbine.  When Transwestern 
received permit approval from the AQB to operate at the larger turbine 
capacity, Transwestern made the upgrade adjustments operable.   Apparently, 
EPA has mandated that the AQB act on all issues considered to be outstanding 
as determined by the EPA.  Dave Nutt has been sent the Compliance Order to 
review.  Under the conditions of the Order, Transwestern has 30 days to 
request another hearing.  

Transwestern received a Compliance Order from the State of New Mexico, Air 
Quality Bureau, for an outstanding turbine replacement activity at the P-1 
C/S which occurred in 1996.   Transwestern had met with the AQB over this 
issue in 1996 and assumed that the issue had been resolved, as no further 
actions were received from the agency until this Compliance Order was 
received. The issue in question was Transwestern's replacement of 
interchangeable internal components from a 4700 turbine into the existing 
smaller turbine (3505).  The larger internal components  (inlet guide 
vanes/nozzles) which were placed into the 3505 were mechanically derated to 
simulate conditions of the smaller turbine.  When Transwestern received 
permit approval from the AQB to operate at the larger turbine capacity, 
Transwestern made the upgrade adjustments and then operated at the higher 
turbine value 4700.  The AQB did not understand that Transwestern could not 
make the adjustments to the inlet guide vanes as any such activity by 
Transwestern would void the warranty with Soalr Mfg.  Only Solar is 
authorized to make adjustments to the turbine.  This prevents Transwestern 
from randomly and arbitrarily manipulating and adjusting horsepowers of this 
turbine at their descretion.

In the 1996 meeting with the AQB, Transwestern committed to conducting a 
emissions test of the 4700 to determine if emissions were more or less than 
the permitted values for the 3505.  It was shown that emissions from the 4700 
were less than that permitted by the AQB for the 3505.  It should also be 
mentioned that the 3505 was a regerative turbine and the 4700 is a simple 
cycle.   

  Apparently, EPA has mandated that the AQB act on all issues considered to 
be outstanding as determined by the EPA.  Dave Nutt has been sent the 
Compliance Order to review.  Under the conditions of the Order, Transwestern 
has 30 days to request another hearing. 

Id like to have a group discussion to decide how Transwestern will manage and 
handle this issue.  Would someone contact Anabelle and have her set up a 
conference call for sometime next week? 

I received a phone call from Frank Van Ryn of Koch, concerning the letter 
that was sent to him on 6/19.  Frank has stated that Koch will be contacting 
Arco concerning the two contamination issues.  Apparently Koch has been 
indemnified by Arco for the mercury issue and possibly the hydrocabon issue 
at well.  In any event, Frank said that he would be getting back with me in a 
couple of weeks to present a plan and initiate the cleanup, but wanted to 
discuss the issue with Arco.
I will keep everyone apprised on the progress.  

I dont know if you guys are doing this, but a requirement to your air permit 
states that the facility is to report the number of hours of operation each 
year to the Air Quality Bureau for the Catepillar generator.  The report is 
to be submitted by January 31st of each year.  If we need to discuss this, 
give me a call.

The annual pollution prevention plans were completed and submitted to the 
State of Arizona.  These plans are requried for the three large quantity 
generators of hazardous waste in Arizona.

Annual hazardous waste fees were paid and submitted to the State of New 
Mexico for four facilities in New Mexico.

A conference call was held with Houston Legal and Environmetnal Affairs to 
discuss the alleged NOV issued for the P-1 C/S which involved a turbine like 
for like replacement activity.  Data has begun to be collected to 
substantiate Transwestern's position concerning the proposed action by the 
State of New Mexico.  A field trip was made to the Air Quality Bureau to copy 
all files relevant to the P-1 C/S and will be delivered to the contract 
attorney who will be assisting Transwestern with this issue. 

Copies of the New Mexico EOTT air permits were received.  Comparisons will be 
made with the nearly completed EOTT tank database spreadsheet to determine 
status of permit compliance with each air permit.

Kim, please give me a call at (505) 625-8022 concerning the above.  Im trying 
to generate employee interest in the RMEF and need some help.  Ive gotten 
some positive requests and involvement from some employees about the 
Foundation, but would like to open it up to others in Enron.

Mr. Cates, sir, would you please approve of the attached expense report?  You 
are a kind and generous man.

Be advised that there will be a meeting on Thursday 11:00 am August 23 at the 
NNG Turbine station, south of Kermit Tx.  to complete and submit annual 
certification reports which are required by the following Title V permitted 
facilities:

Seminole
Brownfield
Plainview

Spraberry

Irion Co. No. 1
Reagan Co. 2
Eldorado

Wt-2
Walton
Keystone

Kermit Turbine

Should a team decide not to attend this meeting, be advised that the required 
submittal date for the annual certifications for the state of Texas is 
September 8, 2001.  It will be your teams responsibility to ensure that the 
certifications are submitted prior to the 9/8/01 deadline should you decide 
not to attend the August 23 meeting.

Participated in the compliation and submittal of the Title V semi annual 
monitoring and annual certification reports for the NNG Eunice C/S.

Data gathering and correspondance continues with the third party lawyer for 
the NOV issue at the P-1 C/S.  This involved a like for like replacement of a 
turbine in New Mexico.  

Annual blanket renewal requests were submitted to the Texas SHPO and the 
Arizona F&W.

A permit be rule has been submitted to the TNRCC for the like for like I/C 
engine replacement at the NNG Reagan Co 2 C/S. 

The EOTT tank database is 90% complete.  Field verification with each team 
will begin to determine  compliance with recordkeeping, fees, NSPS and air 
permit status.  Air permits for the EOTT facilities in New Mexico were copied 
from the  agencies records.  Compliance status will be determined for these 
facilities also.

John some quick thoughts on agenda items for the meeting with PG&E:

1. Status of the mini filter separator installations at PG&E 
interconnect/delivery/receipt points?  Future thoughts/plans for additional 
separator installations.

2. PG&E customer attitudes about potential PCB introduced into their 
equipment.  Any new customers with positive hits of PCBs?

3. Internal sampling activities.  How far have PCB's spread into the PG&E 
system.  (wipe tests results versus liquids collections). A map would be 
nice   depicting this.

4. Transwestern continues to be pretty much dry on mainline and extremely dry 
on the Topock lateral.  Maybe we should have a little presentation showing  
liquids collected in the last year on the mainline and Topock lateral.  Our 
commitment to keeping the PCBs as immobile as possible. 

5. We might consider sharing what we've learned from our PCB modeling study 
with Penn State and what our  future plans are.  Another Tranwestern effort 
to  show our commitment.

John, if we plan on opening up our separator, has a decision been  made to 
decon it or just clean out the hydrocarbon buildup and replace the filters.  
If we do decide to decon our separator and or theirs, we will need to line 
out a contractor to be onsite when we blow down the systems.  Id like to 
discuss possibly not using  Vector for this type of routene activity any 
longer.  There is a company in Farmington, NM (Riley) that can probably do 
the job.  As you know, this decon work is not rocket science and Vector is 
$$$$$$$, although they do a good job. 

Chew on these and if I think of any other additional topics, Ill send them 
your way.....By the way, Earl Chanley is now in Roswell.  FYI in case you 
plan on asking him to attend the meeting........

Larry,
Glad you got this audit out of the way.  I will be needing your agenda items 
for our meeting with PG&E so we can send them to Rod Boschee.  Think it over 
carefully, and let's have all of the items we need to discuss ready to go 
over with them.  Looking forward to seeing you.  Randy and I will fly out 
early on July 24 and maybe we can have some time that afternoon and all day 
July 26 to see some of the facilities we had discussed before.  John

Don, Ill send the environmental audit manual to Ted for the audit.  Thanks 
for your  understanding...

Larry,
Got your message and am sorry that you can not attend.  We will work with Ted 
on getting you a replacement.  Good luck with your meeting.  
See you next time.
Don Bruce

Don, Ive been requested by John Shafer to attend a meeting with one of 
Transwestern's biggest customers during the same time period of the 
consolidated audit  in the Dakotas.  I am requesting that I be relieved from 
the environmental audit responsibility due to the sensitivity and importance 
of the meeting with PG&E.  Your understanding in this will be appreciated.   
Larry,
This is a very important meeting with PG&E.  I will be discussing with them 
the schedule to take the ultimate separators down this fall and do some 
testing.  You should be at this meeting.  John

John, Ive got a consolidated audit scheduled for that week.  Should I attend 
the PG&E meeting in Flagstaff or do the audit?

On behalf of Randy Rice:

John and Randy have rescheduled their Flagstaff trip to meet with PG&E, on 
Wednesday, July 25th and Thursday, July 26th if needed.  They will be flying 
into Flagstaff in the late PM on Tuesday, July 24th and departing in the PM 
on Thursday, July 26th.  Sarita and I will provide their travel itinerary 
once arranged.

He suggests the meetings be held at the Little America Hotel in Flagstaff,AZ, 
(phone no. 520-779-2741.  Please inform what meeting arrangements need to be 
made for the actual meeting room once your meeting times are arranged with 
PG&E.  Also, Randy asks that you provide agenda items to be addressed during 
the meeting(s).

Thank you,
Kim Ladish
713-345-5863

In the final phase of developing and determining environmental compliance for 
the EOTT crude oil tanks in the Midland Region, I have planned a one day site 
visit on the following days to visit each team location to finalize the 
spreadsheet for EOTT crude oil tank environmental compliance:

Hobbs team  August 6 8:00 am

Lovington team  August 7 8:00 am

Jal team  August 8 8:00 am

Eunice team  August 9 8:00 am

I would appreciate one member from each team be available at the team office 
on the assigned day and time to discuss tank history and possibly visit each 
tank farm within the teams area of responsibility.  Your patience and 
assistance in finalizing this information will be greatly appreciated.  If a 
conflict arises, give me a call at (505) 625-8022.

I received from the TNRCC an NOV letter for the above facility for failure to 
submit an emissions inventory for 2000.  This notification from the agency 
originally came to Rick Loveless by way of Wayne Brunette.  I called the 
TNRCC and spoke to Kevin Cauble concerning the NOV and he pulled the 
emissions inventory submitted in 1999 for the facility.  Because VOC's are 
the issue, I asked him what the emissions were for VOC's on the 1999 
inventory.  Kevin stated that the inventory showed VOC emissions of 19.50 
tons/yr actuals and 33.56 tons/yr potentials.  We discussed why EOTT would 
submit an inventory as it is not a major source and not required to.  The 
only thing we could come up with is that EOTT may have anticipated an 
increase in throughput at this site and therefore, wanted to ensure that this 
facility was shown as a title V source.  According to the phone records from 
the TNRCC for this facility, Craig Willoughby of Entrix had  requested that 
the faciltiy be kept on the list of facilities required to do inventories.  I 
have a call into EOTT to determine whether increased throughput is proposed 
for this facility in the near future.  

In speaking with Kevin, he suggested that if a determination is made that if 
there is to be an increased throughput that wont exceed the 100 ton/yr limit 
on VOC's, or that throughput conditions remain approximately consistent with 
previous years, EOTT should provide written notification to the agency that 
this facility does not meet the applicability requirements of 101.10 
(emissions inventory requirements) and request that this facility be removed 
from the TNRCC mailings. Should EOTT confirm the status of operating 
throughput to be below the 100 ton/yr VOC emissions limit, I will make make 
written notification to the TNRCC requesting removal from the list.

 

John, I was just thinking that if this deconning becomes a routene activity 
for us and PG&E, we might want to consider breaking  in a company that is 
less expensive, can more quickly mobilize and get the same quality work 
product.  Vector, has to travel  from Ohio.   Deconning the separators 
becomes an internal  washing job of the vessel.  

I will discuss this with Tiny about possibly using someone else.  Tiny, do 
you think Riley would be interested in tackling this issue for us and PG&E?  
As you know, they do not have a deconning permit from the EPA, but with the 
new PCB rules in place, a permit is not necessary anymore to do deconning 
activities.  How do you think PG&E will respond to us possibly using another 
contractor other than Vector for the work.  I suppose we can bring this issue 
up in Flagstaff.

Mums the word on the PCB modeling issue, John.  Thanks for your guidance and 
thoughts.  

Larry,
Good thoughts.  I believe Rod Boschee told me he was putting the same 
thoughts on the agenda which cover your items 1-4.  However, I will take a 
close look at his draft agenda and make certain that the equivalent thoughts 
are on there.  Now, about item 5 and your closing paragraph.   Item No. 5 - I 
do not want to open the issue of the "PCB Model" to PG&E at this time.  Maybe 
later, but not now.  As far as your thoughts in the closing paragraph - Randy 
Rice and I want the Ultimate Separators "deconned".  We took great pains last 
fall (when we had the separators down) to test and decon them - so we could 
establish a "base line".  Why would we take the system down and change the 
filters out and test any residue without also deconning the facility?  If we 
did that - then hypothetically - next fall (2002) when we took the system 
down and changed the filters - if we took any wipe samples - it could contain 
residue accumulated over a two year period and not just during the past 
twelve months.  It seems to me that it makes much more sense to decon the 
separators at the same time that we change the filters and that way we will 
know exactly what has hit them sense the last time we opened them up.  I'm 
open to further argument on it - but that is the way Randy and I see it at 
this point in time.  

On the subject of the selection of the contractor - Randy and I believe that 
you and Tiny should probably select whatever consulting firm can do the best 
job and is most dependable.  Remember that PG&E had confidence in Vector (at 
least that is what I recall from last fall).  So, if we go with a new 
consultant - will PG&E have the same confidence?  Also, you and Tiny must 
make certain that the firm we use has some "acceptable" credentials.  What 
PCB issues have they handled in the past, etc.  

I will be glad to discuss any of this with you or Tiny as needed.

Thanks, John Shafer

John some quick thoughts on agenda items for the meeting with PG&E:

1. Status of the mini filter separator installations at PG&E 
interconnect/delivery/receipt points?  Future thoughts/plans for additional 
separator installations.

2. PG&E customer attitudes about potential PCB introduced into their 
equipment.  Any new customers with positive hits of PCBs?

3. Internal sampling activities.  How far have PCB's spread into the PG&E 
system.  (wipe tests results versus liquids collections). A map would be 
nice   depicting this.

4. Transwestern continues to be pretty much dry on mainline and extremely dry 
on the Topock lateral.  Maybe we should have a little presentation showing  
liquids collected in the last year on the mainline and Topock lateral.  Our 
commitment to keeping the PCBs as immobile as possible. 

5. We might consider sharing what we've learned from our PCB modeling study 
with Penn State and what our  future plans are.  Another Tranwestern effort 
to  show our commitment.

John, if we plan on opening up our separator, has a decision been  made to 
decon it or just clean out the hydrocarbon buildup and replace the filters.  
If we do decide to decon our separator and or theirs, we will need to line 
out a contractor to be onsite when we blow down the systems.  Id like to 
discuss possibly not using  Vector for this type of routene activity any 
longer.  There is a company in Farmington, NM (Riley) that can probably do 
the job.  As you know, this decon work is not rocket science and Vector is 
$$$$$$$, although they do a good job. 

Chew on these and if I think of any other additional topics, Ill send them 
your way.....By the way, Earl Chanley is now in Roswell.  FYI in case you 
plan on asking him to attend the meeting........

Larry,
Glad you got this audit out of the way.  I will be needing your agenda items 
for our meeting with PG&E so we can send them to Rod Boschee.  Think it over 
carefully, and let's have all of the items we need to discuss ready to go 
over with them.  Looking forward to seeing you.  Randy and I will fly out 
early on July 24 and maybe we can have some time that afternoon and all day 
July 26 to see some of the facilities we had discussed before.  John

Don, Ill send the environmental audit manual to Ted for the audit.  Thanks 
for your  understanding...

Larry,
Got your message and am sorry that you can not attend.  We will work with Ted 
on getting you a replacement.  Good luck with your meeting.  
See you next time.
Don Bruce

Don, Ive been requested by John Shafer to attend a meeting with one of 
Transwestern's biggest customers during the same time period of the 
consolidated audit  in the Dakotas.  I am requesting that I be relieved from 
the environmental audit responsibility due to the sensitivity and importance 
of the meeting with PG&E.  Your understanding in this will be appreciated.   
Larry,
This is a very important meeting with PG&E.  I will be discussing with them 
the schedule to take the ultimate separators down this fall and do some 
testing.  You should be at this meeting.  John

John, Ive got a consolidated audit scheduled for that week.  Should I attend 
the PG&E meeting in Flagstaff or do the audit?

On behalf of Randy Rice:

John and Randy have rescheduled their Flagstaff trip to meet with PG&E, on 
Wednesday, July 25th and Thursday, July 26th if needed.  They will be flying 
into Flagstaff in the late PM on Tuesday, July 24th and departing in the PM 
on Thursday, July 26th.  Sarita and I will provide their travel itinerary 
once arranged.

He suggests the meetings be held at the Little America Hotel in Flagstaff,AZ, 
(phone no. 520-779-2741.  Please inform what meeting arrangements need to be 
made for the actual meeting room once your meeting times are arranged with 
PG&E.  Also, Randy asks that you provide agenda items to be addressed during 
the meeting(s).

Thank you,
Kim Ladish
713-345-5863

A meeting was held with the third party attorney who is providing assistance 
with the recently issued NOV for the P-1 C/S over a like for like turbine 
exchange which occurred in 1996.  A history was given of the incidents which 
led up to the NOV being issued and results of the meeting which Transwestern 
had with the AQB in 1996 which lead Transwestern to believe that issue had 
been resolved.  

The calendar year 2000 PCB annual document logs were prepared and submitted 
to each generator of PCBs on the Transwestern system.

Training was given to the Midland Region over the correct completion and 
submittal of forms used to report natural gas releases  to the TNRCC.  The 
agency has updated and has become more stringent with respect to Regional 
requirements for the reportable releases which are submitted to them.  An 
incomplete form submittal by a compressor station facility near MIdland led 
to this emergency training being given.  Based upon a phone call with Region 
7 of the TNRCC, the agency stated that they will be issuing NOV's to 
facilities that submit incomplete "Upset/Maintenance NOtification Forms for 
Reportable Events".  

A newly revised rule (Subpart HH) has just been implemented by the EPA 
concerning curde oil tanks with a daily throughput of equal to or greater 
than 500 bbls. per day.  If there is any tank within your teams area of 
responsiblity which equals or exceeds the 500 bbls. per day throughput 
criteria, please provide to me the following:

 tank name/serial number

 tank size

 average daily throughput

Thanks for your help in this matter....
 

 Bill, presented below is a summary of the Midland EOTT tank compliance=20
status verified by fax and telephone with the teams.  This information is 9=
8%=20
complete until actual onsite verification occurs, which is set up for the=
=20
month of August. I plan on visiting each team and tank in the Midland=20
Region.  However, until the site visits are completed, this should give you=
 a=20
good idea of the status of the EOTT pipeline tanks stand with respect to ai=
r=20
compliance. =20

1. Tank compliance database, general.  The database, which included 366 tan=
ks=20
at the onset, has been reduced to 106 EOTT P/L tanks.  Tanks operated by EO=
TT=20
Trucking; non-EOTT tanks;  tanks sold, removed, duplicated, or otherwise=20
listed in error, were removed (and saved in another file).  Of the 106 tank=
s=20
listed, 80 are active, 12 are inactive, 10 are permanently out-of-service,=
=20
and 4 are abandoned in place.

=20
2. Permit issues.=20
Federal

a. Title V permit concerns do not appear to be a problem.  Electric pumps a=
re=20
the norm  at EOTT tank farms, so site emissions are exclusively from the=20
tanks and do not exceed 100 TPY.  (Only Crane Station has a Title V permit)=
. =20
This statement is based on =01&worst case=018 calculations using EPA TANKS =
4.0=20
which indicated that in a:

5,000 bbl fixed roof tank:  3.6 MM bbls of RVP 5 crude throughput  (i.e., 7=
20=20
turnovers) produced annual emissions of 48 tons (2 tpy breathing loss, 46 t=
py=20
working loss).=20

55,000 bbl EFR tank:  14.0 MM bbls of RVP 5 crude throughput  (i.e., 255=20
turnovers) produced annual emissions of 9 tons (6 tpy breathing loss, 3 tpy=
=20
working loss).=20

55,000 bbl fixed roof tank:  14.0 MM bbls of RVP 5 crude throughput  (i.e.,=
=20
255 turnovers) produced annual emissions of 4 tons (1 tpy breathing loss, 3=
=20
tpy working loss).=20

State=20

b. State permit concerns do not appear to be a problem.  Sixty-three (63) o=
f=20
the 106 tanks were constructed before 1971 (and not modified or=20
reconstructed). These tanks are grandfathered and require no permit as long=
=20
as throughputs do not significantly change. =20

All of the EOTT Texas tanks of any size constructed/modified/reconstructed=
=20
after 1971 and equipped with a floating roof are exempt under Standard=20
Exemption 86, currently known as Permit-by-Rule 106.478.   None of the tank=
s=20
store material with a true vapor pressure above 11.0 psia, and total actual=
=20
VOC emissions authorized under exemption from any site does not exceed the =
30=20
TAC 106.4 limit of 25 tpy.   No registration for the exemption is necessary=
,=20
since the tanks are not located in a nonattainment county for ozone.

New Mexico=01,s permitting program for petroleum storage tanks is being=20
developed but,  currently, there are no requirements. Therefore, all EOTT=
=20
tanks in New Mexico meet state permit requirements.  However, when finalize=
d,=20
the control requirements for tanks in New Mexico will not be more stringent=
=20
than the federal NSPS Subpart Kb.  Therefore, a tank equipped with a floati=
ng=20
roof would be authorized to store petroleum product with a true vapor=20
pressure up to 11.0 psia.   Only the four fixed roof tanks at Maljamar and=
=20
the one at Loco Hills could be affected.=20

4. Recordkeeping and inspection issues.  The grandfathered tanks have no=20
requirements. For tanks subject to NSPS Subpart K, only capacity data is=20
required.  Tanks subject to Ka and Kb require inspection, repairs if=20
warranted, and recordkeeping. =20

Note: Especially for some of the older tanks, neither a manufacturer=01,s=
=20
identification plate or=20
strapping table is available.  I would suggest that we pursue a records=20
search of old EOTT files to verify construction dates.  I dont know where t=
o=20
start on this.

5. Specific compliance/requirements summary.  The tabled information=20
identifies the following:

Federal
- 2 tanks (McElroy 58005, Loco Hills 4602) may not be meeting NSPS control=
=20
requirements
- 4 tanks (Maljamar 1519-1522)  may not be meeting NSPS control requirement=
s

(All are cone tanks,  subject to Ka/Kb.  Based on a capacity > 472 bbls and=
=20
product true vapor pressure > 2.18 psia, the tanks require a floating roof =
or=20
closed vent system);

- 28 tanks at 18 sites are subject to NSPS K/Ka/Kb inspection and/or=20
recordkeeping requirements:
K (recordkeeping of tank capacity, dimensions only):
Foster 787, 790=20
Quito-Hendrick 58044
Sands 15089A
Lynch 1511;

Ka/Kb (inspection & recordkeeping):
  Burger 58018 (if returned to active status)
China Grove 56007-56010
  Garden City 56003
Haskell, N. 58509 (if returned to active status)
Haskell, S.  58023 (and 58022, if returned to active status)
  McAfee 1523
  McElroy 58005
  Midland 1516
  Scurry 1517
  Wildfire 1524
  Livingston-Ridge 68414
  Loco Hills 4602, 68417, 68418
  Maljamar 1519-1522
  Sonora 1515 (if returned to active status)
Thomas 68413

State

- Crane Station has an emissions potential > 100 tpy and is therefore=20
required to remit a TNRCC emissions fee, due by 11/1 each year:=20
=20

 10 sites are subject to an NSPS Subpart (i.e., K, Ka, Kb) and are therefor=
e=20
required to remit a  TNRCC emissions fee, due by 11/1 each year:=20
China Grove, Foster, Garden City, Haskell S., McAfee, McElroy, Midland,=20
Quito-Hendrick, Scurry, Wildfire;

- 8 sites need a TNRCC account number from the Regional office: China Grove=
, =20
Haskell S., McAfee, McElroy, Midland, Quito-Hendrick,=20
Scurry, Wildfire;=20
I have initiated the request to the TNRCC for account number for the above=
=20
sites
=20
- 4 additional sites which, if returned to active status, need a TNRCC=20
account number and are subject to a TNRCC emissions fee, due by 11/1:
Burger, Haskell N., Sands, Sonora;

- 3 sites that are not subject to a TNRCC emissions fee, but paid one last=
=20
year:
Adair, Hendrick, Ozona.

6. Specific inspection requirements: Primary and secondary seal inspections=
.=20
 See Attachment A for list of tanks affected.=20
 API Standard 653-based  =01&In-service=018 inspection checklist.
 Internal/External Floating Roof Inspection Report checklists.
 Sketch and Calculation for Perimeter Seal Gap Measurement.

Comprehensive =01&Out-of-service=018 inspections are performed after the ta=
nk is=20
cleaned and should=20
be budgeted at approximately $5000. each.  This will include a thorough flo=
or=20
scan but will not include required repairs.  =20

=20

ATTACHMENT A

IFR/EFR Storage Tanks
Seal Inspections

For the tanks equipped with a floating roof and subject to Ka or Kb, the=20
following requirements apply:

- Tanks with an IFR (internal floating roof) require an internal inspection=
=20
every 5 years
(however, the interval can be extended to every 10 years if an annual visua=
l=20
inspection is performed):

Burger 58018 (if returned to service)
China Grove 56007-56010
Garden City 56003
Haskell S. 58023 (and 58022, if returned to service)
McAfee 1523
Midland 1516
Scurry 1517
Wildfire 1524
Livingston Ridge 68414=20
  Loco Hills 66417, 66418
  Thomas 68413

- Tanks with an EFR (external float. roof) require measurement of the gap=
=20
between the shell wall and the primary seal every 5 years, and between the=
=20
shell wall and the secondary seal  annually:

Foster 787, 790
Quito-Hendrick 58044
Lynch 1511
Sonora 1515 (if returned to service)

=20

I just spoke to the state of Arizona concerning the tree removal at Station 
2.  Their response to our request to remove the trees has been APPROVED, 
provided that this is the only pre activity  we do prior to receiving the air 
permit.  This means that no other  construction or preparation activities can 
be performed  or conducted untill the air permit has been issued.   This 
approval also includes stump removal if need be......

Larry -FYI    -Earl mentioned in the conference call that the State may 
consider cutting down trees as construction activities and we may need to 
hold off until we receive the air permit.

HOld off on the tree cutting, till we hear from the state of Arizona.  Under 
the regulations of the air permitting, we are not allowed to initiate any 
kind of construction activity untill the air permit is received.  Cutting the 
trees could be construed as initiating construction.......

Cecil Gutierrez
07/17/2001 10:58 AM
hey mike , how are you.
I should be getting a "day/date" from Earl as to when to give the Forest 
Service the date(s) for them to schedule their tree cutting.
Ken Jacobs has asked me (TW) for a date/week.  The forest service will then 
set up a crew and send them in.  Once the trees are cut, Ken will send me the 
Tree Contract and invoice for those trees.

I mentioned this to Donna Marten and Earl in last weeks conference call.

NNG Gomez Plant, Site Cleanup has been completed.  All activities associated 
with the items identified during the sale of the facility have been 
corrected.  
Becuse ET&S  owns and WGR operates, there is a concern that WGR may not 
adhear to compliance and housekeeping  at the facility.  This has been the 
case in the past.  Discussions will be held with Enron Legal to address these 
concerns.

 TW Bell Lake Gas Plant, Ground Water Remediation.  A revised Water 
Development Easement from the State Land Office was received. This will allow 
TW access to install one additional downgradient groundwater monitor well.  
The tentative schedule to install the well will be the week of September 13th.
 
A construction permit application for installation of an SVE remediation 
system for the North Crawar C/S was mailed to the TNRCC.

The State of New Mexico conducted an air quality inspection of the Atoka No. 
2 C/S.  No items or deficiencies were identified by the agency.

The Title V air permit application for the Atoka No. 3 C/S was mailed to the 
State of New Mexico, Air Qualtiy Bureau.

The Notice of Intent air permit application for the Crawford C/S was mailed 
to the State of New Mexico, Air Quality Bureau.

Annual blanket request letters were submitted to the USFWS in New Mexico and 
Texas for renewal.

A meeting was held in Houston with John Woodyard of Roy F. Weston and ET&S 
mgt. addressing PCB activity in natural gas pipelines as related to the 
PG&E PCB Topock Lateral issue.  

 

Sta.3, 4 and 5

As you may know, we are at the end of our grace period for not being required 
to do monthly sampling for the public water systems at sta. 3,4 and 5.  Jeff 
Lobstein has been requested to do the monthly drinking water sample 
collections at  each of the three compressor station and has three months 
completed.  This memo is a reminder that each location is again required to 
send their drinking water analytical reports to the following agencies on a 
monthly basis as the analytical results are received at each compressor 
station.     

Stations 3 and 4:   each months reports are to be sent to the following 2 
agencies:

 Navajo Nation EPA
 P.O. Box 339
 Window Rock, AZ 86515

 Atten: Yolanda Barney   Program Manager

 US EPA    Region IX
 75 Hawthorne Street
 San Francisco, CA 94105

 Atten: Danny Collier (WTR-6)

Station 5:    your water sample reports are to be sent to the Navajo Nation 
EPA in Window Rock, AZ, only.  In speaking with Charlie, he has indicated 
that he will be handling  the reporting for Station 4 also.

I have contacted Nortest in Flagstaff (520) 774-2312, which is the lab 
selected to do the testing to send station 3 reports to station 3 and station 
4 and 5 reports to station 5.

The Navajo Nation has been given primacy and will be taking over the drinking 
water program for the Navajo Nation in November of this year.  Expect some 
changes in reporting.   Youmay want  to use MCS as a monthly reminder for the 
submittal of the reports.  Questions, give me a call  505 625-8022.. 

 

The Air Quality Bureau conducted an agency inspection of C/S's 7 Mountainair 
and 8 Corona.  There were no deficiencies or items of concern identified by 
the inspector.

Facility records were copied from the Air Quality Bureas files in Santa Fe 
for the P-1 C/S.

The excess emissions semiannual report as required under NSPS for turbines 
was submitted for the Bloomfield C/S. 

A custom fuel monitoring schedule  reqeust was submitted to Region VI EPA for 
the NNG Plains turbine C/S.

Emissions fees were submitted for Laguna C/S.

A meeting will be held with the vice president of development for the Rocky 
Mountain Elk Foundation to begin preparation of a MOU between Enron and the 
Foundation.  The meeting will be held in Albuq. during the 1st or 3rd week in 
August.

Advisors, presented below is a memo from GPG Houston requesting that we 
provide to them the number of ETS employees in each team who have taken 
advantage of the one year free membership with The Nature Conservancy.  
Apparently there is some concern that employees are not taking advantage of 
the opportunity which has been provided for them to get involved with an 
organization that has some benefit towards wildlife and habitat preservation 
and enhancement.  Should an employee desire to sign up for the one year free 
memebership, the Conservancy the web address is www.tnc.org.  You can click 
the button that says "Become a member" and sign up for the annual membership 
at that time.  At the request of Mr. John Shafer, please provide to me a 
total by  team of the number of individuals which have signed up with the 
Nature Conservancy by the end of the month.

Your assistance in this is greatly appreciated
	
	

On a conference call on Wednesday concerning the ETS/TNC partnership, John 
Shafer was concerned about the numbers of ETS employees signing up for the 
free membership program.  John ask that I contact each of the DES's and 
coordinate with them the contact of members of all ETS teams to encourage 
them to take advantage of the free membership.  The thought is once the team 
members receive the material concerning The Nature Conservancy (TNC) they 
might as individuals or as teams be encourage to participate actively in the 
programs.

Phil Lowry endorses the program and has agreed for ETS to pay the first years 
membership.  It would probably be correct to contact your Regional Directors 
and Advisors prior to contacting the teams.  John Shafer would like to see 
100 % participation in the program.

I understand we all have busy schedules, so if you don't have time, I would 
be happy to make the contact for you.  John asked that I track these numbers 
for reporting to him on our next conference call (probably in September).  
Could I get the team names and the number of employees that have elected to 
participate.

In advance thank you for your time and effort in this matter.  Again I would 
be happy to make the contacts for you. 

  

Kevin, I apologize for not getting back to you sooner as I have been out of 
touch for the last week.  I read John's message to you and agree with him 
that we should develop a formal plan to address how we will generate public 
support and address any future environmental concerns before they jump up and 
bite us.  As you may know, Flagstaff is one of those areas where there is 
much environmental support to keep the area as pristine as possible and there 
does exist a number of environmental groups which use this as their agenda to 
keep development to a minimum.  I will forward to you a memo from David 
Roensch, team advisor in the Flagstaff area, of an article he found providing 
the active participation of the environmental groups in the Flagstaff area.  
Ive done some cusory inquiries as to land status and have polled the Bureau 
of Land Management, State of Arizona,  State Historic Preservation Office and 
the Forest Service which is the major landowner between Flagstaff and 
Phoenix.  I have not heard back from all of agencies as yet, but will let you 
know if there are any glaring environmental concerns or if there  appears to 
be trouble on the horizon.   John and I have briefly traded thoughts on this 
project and we would  like to take a more proactive approach  "up front" with 
regard to public participation and input prior to breaking ground.  Its hard 
to deal with public issues when construction is underway. 

As for the $$$$$ for the environmental studies, you are correct in assuming 
that the existing portion of the project from Bloomfield to Flagstaff will 
require very little capital, as long as we limit and ensure our construction 
activities to the existing right of way.  Proceeding south from Flagstaff to 
Phoenix is where the initial expenditures will be the greatest.  Once the 
pipeline corridor is identified and staked, surveys will need to be completed 
for the following:   threatened and endangered plants and animals, archeology 
surveys for bones, artifacts, relics etc, noise surveys should this portion 
of the project require installation of horsepower.  The FERC will require an 
EIS (environmental impact statement) and environmental report to be 
conducted.  These activities include not only the environemntal issues but 
also things like socioeconomics, land use soils, geology etc.  Past 
consttruction projects has shown that third party involvement with this 
greatly expidites the process (John has eluded to this previously).  Due to 
the rough terrain and topography of the land south of Station 2 into Phoenix 
makes this project extremely hard to give an approximate dollar amount  for 
the environmental baseline surveys and permits to be completed as the entire 
proposed right of way (140 miles) from station 2 into Phoenix will need to be 
walked and surveyed by several people.  I would rather wait until we can 
identify on a map the corridor route and send out proposals for each of the 
surveys to be performed on the pipeline prior to giving a $$$$ figure.   
However, because you need something for a preliminary budget estimate, I 
would recommend an amount of $70,000 to 90,000  for the baseline 
environmental work and this might be a little light, in the event the surveys 
identify something.......please dont hold me too close to this number as it 
is a WAG contingent upon a number of variables that are relatively unclear at 
this time.  Having the pipeline corridor identified on a map will greatly 
assist in the environmental budgeting for this project.

I received the vmail from Bill last week basically stating there were no 
environmental deal killers for this new gas pipeline project, at least not 
from a 30,000 foot high level survey.  

My question is now what are our next steps?  I am building a work order 
authorization for some minimal dollars to get things like the ROW, EIS, etc. 
scoped out.  Assuming we have necessary market support, what would it cost to 
move to the next level on the EIS?  What do we get for our money?  I am 
mostly concerned about the "greenfield" portion of the line that would run 
from Flagstaff to Phoenix.  

Please call me at your earliest convenience to discuss an action plan.

thanks
Kevin Hyatt
713-853-5559

Kevin, as promised, attached is the information that was found by David 
Roensch on environemntal perspectives in the Flagstaff area...... 
	
	

Larry, per our phone conversation tonight.  I found this article interesting, 
especially in light of potential future expansions on TW.  Note the section 
below in bold Red text.  Camp Navajo is nearly due South of Station 2 just 
across Interstate 40 and as you know, Kachina Village is South of Flagstaff 
off Interstate 15.  This may or may not pose any direct threats to TW ROW's 
but, it does give us a flavor of public sentiment with regards to conserving 
these areas.....   Anyhow, fyi...  (Oh yea, The Grand Canyon Trust & The 
Nature Conservancy in Flagstaff share the same office building)  

New land pegged for preservation

By ANNE MINARD
Sun Staff Reporter
07/29/2001

  |
Reader Comments

It's been less than a year since Arizona voters narrowly
rejected Proposition 100, a plan to protect 290,000
acres of State Trust Land from development.
And in about a month, voters could be asked to begin
signing petitions to get another initiative on the
ballot that would protect significantly more of the
state's legacy -- 1 million acres, or about 10 percent,
including thousands of acres in and around Flagstaff.

The difference, conservationists say, is that this land
has been chosen with the goal of protecting biologically
and aesthetically important areas. The environmental
community rallied against Prop. 100 because they said
the lands chosen for protection were insufficient and
had little value for conservation.

For example, the Proposition 100 campaign identified 10
acres of Rio De Flag in east Flagstaff -- near a
wastewater treatment plant outflow -- as one of the
state's "crown jewels" needing to be preserved.

Two other parcels in the Flagstaff area included 15
acres on Wildcat Hill with an unimpressive view of an
industrial park and 269 acres of steep slopes littered
with shot-up refrigerators and television sets called
Turkey Hills.

Rogers Lake, an important wetland and major ecosystem
south of Flagstaff, was also slated for preservation
under Prop 100. But that plan only included its soggy
lakebed, while 2,000 acres of highly developable
shoreline owned by the State Trust Land Department was
still up for grabs.

THE NEW PLAN

The new initiative would include all areas around Rogers
Lake, excluding those that are private or held by the
U.S. Forest Service. One proposed parcel does still fall
in the Turkey Hills area, and three others lie between
Flagstaff proper and Walnut Canyon (not included is
Section 20, which is likely to be sold and developed,
but at densities that are still in dispute between the
county and the city).

Other areas would include parcels around Observatory
Mesa (a contiguous chunk of land south and west of the
Naval Observatory) and a checkerboard pattern of
sections -- interspersed with Forest Service land --
south of Camp Navajo and west of Kachina Village and
Griffiths Spring.

Like Prop. 100, an initiative would be only a first
step. If it were to appear on the ballot and then pass,
it would take an act of Congress, and a constitutional
amendment, to change the availability of State Trust
Lands.

State Trust Lands include about 135 million acres across
the country -- 9.3 million in Arizona -- originally
allocated by the federal government when each state was
formed to help fund public schools. (See related story
on Page A11.)

Brad Ack, program director for the Flagstaff-based Grand
Canyon Trust who is helping spearhead the initiative,
said the state's schools shouldn't be bought and paid
for with proceeds from unmanaged sprawl. Areas set aside
under the initiative could still be leased for grazing,
agriculture or other current uses -- but they would
never be sold for commercial development.

Making an informed decision to set aside designated
State Trust Lands will free others from the battles that
now accompany proposals to develop them, he said.

The initiative is a collaborative effort between the
Grand Canyon Trust and other conservation groups, along
with some business and development affiliates.

And supporters are touting a recent poll conducted by
the Grand Canyon Trust, the Sonoran Institute in Tucson
and the Nature Conservancy that showed 88 percent of
Arizona voters agreed that some of Arizona's State Trust
Land should be conserved.

TALKING COMPENSATION

But members of the State Department of Lands charged
with managing the tracts -- and a lobbyist for
superintendents and principals in the state's school
system -- say the initiative backers are missing the
mark in the state land debate.

"We have a fundamental difference of opinion with our
friends in the environmental community," said Mike
Smith, a contract lobbyist for the Arizona School
Administrator Association. "Preserve, set aside ... we
think those are great ideas. The question is
compensation. Those State Trust Lands are in trust for
the schools. It's acutely important for schools to
maximize the returns on state lands."

Smith acknowledged that the awareness of their legacy is
new for the state's schools. Until recently, the schools
didn't see a whole lot of benefit from the state trusts.

"We haven't seen any of it. The state Legislature has
taken the annual earnings, and has used it to reduce
state aid coming out of the general fund."

That all changed with the passage of Proposition 301,
passed last year, he said.

"In addition to increasing sales tax for the schools ...
they also said, 'By the way, all new earnings from the
state trust fund go into the school site fund.' All of a
sudden, it's real different for us. Before it supplanted
our funding, now it will supplement it. It's real money
to us."

The Legislature will still keep the money it has been
earning from State Trust Lands -- about $80 million a
year. But anything above that mark will now go to the
schools, and both Smith and Nick Simonetta, manager of
communications and legislative affairs for the Arizona
Department of Lands, are optimistic that figure will
climb rapidly in the coming years. Simonetta estimates
the schools could see $650 million in addition to
legislative appropriations over the next decade.

LOOKING BACK

But the past irregularities are a stronghold for
conservationists who are promoting the land reform
initiative.

In background literature for its State Trust Land Reform
Initiative, the Grand Canyon Trust says that the State
Trust Lands haven't been used as they were intended
anyway, and very little money has gone to Arizona
schools.

"State Trust Lands currently provide less than 2 percent
of the annual funding for public education," the
document reads. "... there is little, if any, direct
benefit from State Trust Lands to our public schools."

Simonetta said he strongly disagrees with that
assessment.

"I think those statements are severely misleading and
not reflective of what is currently the case. You can
throw around percentages any way you want. If you look
at what the trust has been contributing to the school
construction budget, it's more like 30 or 40 percent."

Regardless, Simonetta and Smith agree that the future of
State Trust Land will rest on its ability to generate
funds -- and won't be given away for free.

"It comes down to this: We are in intense discussion
with the conservation community," Smith said. "Our
conversations are all around the question of
compensation. We are not going to support any initiative
that contemplates setting aside State Trust Land without
compensation. You can take that non-support as far as
you like. If they attempt to go to Congress, we are
going with them."

Anne Minard can be reached at aminard@azdailysun.com or
556-2253.

George, Dave Cobrain of the NMED has verbally approved of the soil 
characterization work plan which you submitted to him for review and has said 
that we can begin work as soon as the plan is approved by the OCD.  I have 
not heard from Bill Olson of the OCD yet.  Dave was going to inform the OCD 
that their office has given approval of the plan and that this might expidite 
Bill's review process.  Ill let you know when I hear from the OCD.

Today I spoke with Jean Calhoun of the Arizona Chapter of The Nature 
Conservancy about the proposed Sundevil Pipeline Construction Project. She 
was very cordial and appreciative concerning Transwestern's proactive efforts 
to contact not only her office but all federal and state agencies  which may 
have jurisdictional lands impacted by the project.  Although the proposed 
route of the pipeline corridor has not been firmly established, she did  
offer some general, yet valuable information concerning the geographic area 
which exists south of Flagstaff into roughly northern Phoenix.  

The area south of Flagstaff into Phoenix crosses of three major ecological 
regions identified by the TNC with major biological diversity of plants and 
animals.  The TNC has completed published studies on two of the regions.  The 
TNC has requested that should this project be apporved, these publications be 
used to assist in the environmental studies which will need to be completed 
prior to construction and approval by FERC.  To the south and east of 
Flagstaff is a sensitive portfolio consisting of the Verde River which is of 
ecologic interest due to the abundance of endangered fish and bird species 
which live in and around the area of the River.   This river could be 
impacted by the pipeline due to its meandering in a southwesterly direction 
across Arizona.  

I have contacted other state and federal governmental agencies, in addition 
to the TNC, and all parties have expressed difficulity in assessing the 
environmental impact of a project of this magnitude without knowing the 
pipeline corridor route.  Part of this concern is due to the extensive and 
unique biological diversity of Arizona.  I think we will have a better handle 
on how we address the environmental concerns and opportunities when this 
piece of the puzzle is completed and also how much more specific and helpful 
the agencies assistance will be when identified areas are known.

The State of New Mexico has issued the settlement penalty for the turbine 
replacement issue at the P-1 C/S.  You may remember that the original amount 
levied against Transwestern in 1997  was $14,700.  After the Air Quality 
Bureau sat on this issue for more than 4 years, they reassessed the penalty 
to be $162,770.  I would like to get together and discus what our options are 
on this. 

The Southwest Region will be hosting its 2001 environmental roundtable in 
Albuquerque, NM on October 16-17 at the Holiday Inn Crowne Plaza (505) 
821-3333.  Room rates are $89.00 per night.  Each attendee will be 
responsible for his/her room reservations for the two day event.  The agenda 
for this roundtable will be sent out in the near future.  If you would like 
to be a speaker and give a presentation on a topic or product please send to 
my attention for possible incorporation into the program.  

In order to hold a sufficient block of rooms, provide adequate roundtable 
space and accomodations,  your reply is required to my attention via emal or 
voice mail (505) 625-8022 by September 31. 

As per your request, an environmental due diligence was completed of the 
assets and outstanding issues of Northwest Natural Gas Company (NWNG), a 
local distribution company  (LDC), with its corporate headquarters located in 
Portand, Oregon.  This  due diligence, which was conducted on August 7-9, 
2001,  was performed to determine the environmental liabilities and exposures 
which may be associated with  NWNG and identify and evaluate the 
environmental risks associated with each issue.  A relative risk number 
between 0 and 3 has been assigned to each discipline to evulate the potential 
risk impact.  A rating of "0" indicates that there is no risk associated with 
this regulation or issue and a rating of "3" indicates a major problem or an 
issue that has a potential long term risk or exposure.  An approximate cost  
value has also been assigned to each discipline.   It is to be understood and 
explicitly stated that in the calculation of each cost, conservative 
estimates were used to determine a dollar value to repair, remediate or 
formally close each issue. 

Presented below, by discipline, are the environmental activities which impact 
and affect NWNG.  The evualtion and written discussion of each disicpline is 
based upon the availability of records, documents and discussions with NWNG 
personnel.  Therefore, this summary report is limited to the availability of 
information presented.

General Pipeline Characteristics ;

This is a dry pipeline system.  No pipeline liquids are generated, only small 
volumes of compressor oils are collected.
All cast iron pipe has been removed from the system.  There is still approx. 
100 miles of steel pipe which will be repalced in the near future.  
The only location where horsepower and compression exists is at Mist Storage, 
and underground injection and storage reservoir (10.5 bcf storage capacity). 
this is a non Title V major source.
NWNG is planning additional property acquisitions to increase their 
underground storage capacity. 
NWNG is planning a 60 mile pipeline construction project to begin in fall of 
2002.  All environmental studies have been completed and sumbmitted to the 
agencies.
Landslide hazards appear to be the biggest pipeline safety concern.  NWNG has 
completed a study to locate and identify high potential landslide areas.    

Environmental Procedures Manual.   The NWNG environmental procedures manual  
appeared to be comprehensive and in a easily understood format.  The topics 
covered in the manual addressed all environmenatl issues that the company 
appeared to be involved with.  The manual addressed waste management, 
permitting,  disposal and environmetal stewardship.  There was also a written 
statement from management supporting and attesting to NWNG's commitment to 
enhancing and promoting a clean environment in all activities by NWNG. 
Risk: 0  Cost: $0

Notices of Violation (NOV)/Notices of Noncompliance (NON).   In a summary 
page provided by NWNG, a list of all state and federal agency actions against 
the company was available.  Although the company had received a few  notices 
(<10), they were of a very minor nature and involved mostly small 
recordkeeping and right of way issues.  There were no outstanding judgements, 
NOVs, NONs or pending agency actions or  issues to be resoved.  
Risk: 0  Cost: $0 

PCBs.  In interviews with NWNG, they attested to the fact that they have 
never used PCBs on their pipeline and that PCBs have never been detected.  
Although NWNG is an LDC and receives its gas from Northwest Pipeline Company, 
the status of PCBs on the Northwest pipeline system  was unknown.
Risk:  1  Cost: $0        

Mercury.   Mercury was used on the NWNG system, but only in monometers and 
not in natural gas metering equipment.  A decision was made by environmental 
management of NWNG in 1986-87 to remove mercury manometers.  An investigation 
has never been initiated to determine mercury releases from broken manometers 
or potential mercury releases from old historic mercury containing equipment 
which may have been used. 
Risk:  1  Cost:  $3,000-$40,000

Onsite Disposal.  Other than the issues surrounding the manufactured gas 
plants, in interviews with NWNG's environmental management, they were not 
aware of any onsite waste disposal of any hazardous, toxic or non hazardous 
waste.
Risk:   1  Cost:   undefined

Hazardous Waste.  There is only one location where hazardous waste is 
generated and this location is a service center where a small parts washer is 
used.  This site is classified as a conditionally exempt small quantity 
generator.  The remainder of the NWNG system is a non generator of hazardous 
waste.
Risk: 0  Cost:  0 

NORMS.  The environmental management of NWNG has stated that natrually 
occurring radioactive materials (NORMS) are not a problem in the pipeline 
system.  Tesing has not been completed to verify or confirm this, nor does 
NWNG have evidence to determine NORM status from Northwest  Pipeline Company.
Risk:  1  Cost:  $500

Underground Storage Tanks (UST).  There is only one regulated underground 
storage tank (UST) remaining on the NWNG system (Albany), and this tank is in 
complance with the UST regualtions for monitoring, testing and 
recordkeeping.  All other underground tanks have been removed.  At one of the 
tank removal sites, there exists  an active remediation in progress.  Closure 
of this site is expected in the near future.
Risk: 1  Cost: $500

LNG plants.  In interviews with NWNG environmental management, there are no 
histoirc or present outstanding environmental issues at the liquified natural 
gas (LNG)  plants.  The exception to this is a historic site of a 
manufactured gas plant (Linnton site) which underlies the LNG plant.  This 
issue will be addressed under the section of the Linnton Manufactured Gas 
Plant. 
Risk: 0  Cost:  $0

Manufactured Gas Plants.  NWNG owned and operated  a number of manufactured 
gas plants (MGPs).  Presented below are the MGP sites that NWNG owned or had 
operating interest in for which there are associated liabilites and risks.

 Eugene Water and Electrical Board. The City of Eugene has determined that  a 
parcel of property within the city has been contaminated by   numerous 
responsible parties of which NWNG owned and operated a MGP during the time 
period of 1958-1976.  The Eugene Water and Electrical Board  (EWEB), which is 
the regulatory agency in Eugene,  has determined that the total cost to clean 
the entire area will be approximately $1,300,000, of which  the EWEB has 
indicated that NWNGs responsibility will be $93,750.  NWNG has offered to pay 
compensation damages in the amount of $70,000-90,000 to  be relaesed from all 
liability and damages associated with the contamination impacts to the City 
of Eugene.   The environmental management of NWNG  has stated that the EWEB 
has verbally and in principal agreed with the NWNG  offer of approximately 
$94,000.
 Risk: 1-2 Cost:  $94,000

 Salem Site. According to NWNG management, this historic MGP site has been 
remediated and formally closed by the City of Salem, which is the   
regulatory agency with jurisdiction over this site.  NWNG has received 
endemnification and written closure from the City of Salem for this feature.  
 Risk: 1   Cost: $0

 Manufactured Gas Plant. This site, which ceased operation in the early 
1900's, was dismantled and  abandoned.  From the time the facility ceased  
operations, untill the present, a railroad has constructed a steel rail 
bridge over the site and the City of Portland and constructed a city park.  
The site is  immediately adjacent ot he Wilammette River, a major perennial 
watercourse in Oregon.  There have been no soil, groundwater or river/ river 
sediment   studies  completed  to determine potential environmental impacts.  
NWNG environmental personnel have stated that the site was insured by Lloyds 
of  London.  The insurance policies were not available at the time of this 
due diligence to determine policy applicability and coverage amounts for this 
site.
 Risks: 2-3 Costs: 0-$300,000,000

Portland Harbor Superfund Site.  The Environmetnal Protection Agency has 
determined that the Portland Harbor, on the Wilammette River,  has received 
contamination of a sufficient nature and magnitude to warrent and classify 
the 6.7 miles of the Harbor as a Superfund site.  This superfund site extends 
for a distance of 6.7 miles and includes the Linnton and Wacker sites, 
originally owned by NWNG.  The EPA has designated approximately 69 primary 
responsible parties  which are directly or indirectly involved in the 
contamination of this section of the Willamette River.  NWNG has been 
identified as a contributing member to the contamination.

 Linnton MGP/Wacker Site.   The Linnton MGP and Wacker Site, has 47 acres of 
water front exposure on the Wilammette River and is included in the  Portland 
Harbor Superfund Site.  The Linnton facility, which originally included the 
Wacker Site,  initiated operation in 1913 and ceased operation in 1956.   
During the operation of the  facility operation,  various organic coal tar 
wastes, comprised of light non aqueous phase liquids (LNAPLs) and dense non  
aqueous phase liquids (DNAPLs) were generated.  Characteristically these 
waste products include: polynuclear aromatic hydrocarbons (PAHs), BTEX  and 
cyanide.  During the early stages of facility operation, these wastes  were 
originally directly deposited into the Willammette River, and then later, in  
1941 unlined ponds were constructed at the facility.  Preliminary 
investigation reports of the volumes of regulated waste from the facility 
operations which  were released either directly or indirectly into the soil 
underlying the facility or into the Wilamette  River were in excess of 4.6 
million gallons or 23,000 cubic  yards.   It was also estimated from these 
reports that there is approximately 250,000 cubic yards of tar and tar mixed 
with soil underlying the historic tar  ponds.  

 Negotiations for cleanup and closure of this site may take up to 20 or more 
years.  NWNG has stated that it has insurance policies from Lloyds of 
London   which they feel will cover all costs assciated with NWNG's portion 
of this superfund responsibility.  The policies were not availble during the 
due diligence  to verify or confirm the amount of coverage.  Additionally, 
because the horizontal and vertical extent of the contamination in the 
subsurface soil,   groundwater and in the Willamette River sediments has not 
been determined, it seems unlikely that insurance coverage can adequatley be 
evaluated.   It  should also be mentioned that because the proportionate 
extent of NWNGs contamination responsibility is not known, adequate insurance 
coverage  appears to be somewhat premature. 
 Risk:  3  Cost:  $50,000,000-300,000,000

 

 

The PCB Annual Document Logs for the facilities that generated PCB waste and 
stored it at TW's long term storage facility were completed and distributed 
to locations and entered into Envisions.

The 2rd quarter Transwestern/SoCal PCB mgt. committee conference call was 
completed.  This committee meets to discusss PCB management on the SoCal 
system and review invoices generated by SoCal during each quarter.  This 
quarters invoice amount was $280,633.48 of which Transwestern is 86% 
responsible or $241,344.79.

Final activities are in progress at the Topock Lateral where cleanup of the 
1850' pipeline and appurtenances has been completed.  Analytical results of 
the wipe samples and liquid samples taken showed the cleanup to be 
successful.   All wipes after the cleaning showed to be less than 1 
microgram/100 cm. sq.  Analytical results of the liquids showed to be less 
than 20 ppb.  The next phase of the cleanup activities will be in November 
when the remaining 11 miles of pipe will be cleaned and have launcher 
facilities installed at the mainline interconnect.   

Donna/Arnold  sorry about not making the conference call today.  The state of 
New Mexico showed up at my office this  morning and made a surprise 
inspection at one of our C/S south of Roswell.  I felt the need to tag along 
with them.... 

Heres the way it is.  The EPA is required to address all federal concerns 
when they are the lead agency is a permitting issue.  Even when it comes to 
an issue like approving a turbine installation on previously disturbed 
ground, they are required to ensure compliance with the Endangered Species 
Act (ESA).  This is not a new issue with the EPA.  Im having the same thing 
happen to me by the EPA I had called the EPA in San Francisco about the 
status of the air permits for the Red Rock expansion for C/S 3 and 4.  The 
permitting engineer told me that prior to issuance of the permits, their air 
group would need assurances that the ESA regulations are being adressed.  I 
told the engineer that becasue C/S 3 and 4 are on the reservation and that 
the Navajo Nation has its own EPA group, that the ESA requirements are taken 
care of by the Navajo Nation EPA.  (As you remember, the Navajo Nation 
verbally told me that surveys would not be requried on the compressor station 
sites for endangered plants and or animals).   I gave the EPA engineer the 
Navajo Nation Fish and Wiildlife contact and he said that he would give him a 
call and that he would also check this issue out with the legal attorneys 
with the EPA.  Bottom line is that we are waiting for a response from EPA as 
to whether surveys would be required or not.  I told him that we were 
expecting the permits by the end of September and that if necessary, I would 
schedule ESA surveys and circumvent this whole issue.  He advised me not to 
do this.  I think his decision had something to do with  the EPA usurping 
authority of the Navajos and asserting authority on Indian Lands without 
Indian consent.  He said he would get back with me on this by Friday as to 
whether their attorneys agreed that the jurisdiction of the EPA on Navajo 
Lands when the Navajos have an environmental agency which administrates these 
types of issues. 

Im a little irritated that the EPA didnt notify me about this when it first 
became an issue, but didnt pursue this as I didnt want to possibly  delay 
issuance of the permits.  Ill send something out via email when I hear from 
the EPA.  

Larry -Arnold reported in the weekly meeting today that the EPA is requesting 
a T&E survey at Stations 3 & 4 prior to issuing air permits.  Don't know if 
you anticipate this being a problem or lengthy process, but Steve Burns sent 
the following message to me (which I thought I had forwarded to you-sorry 
looks like I didn't).  Any way, I don't know if he could help push the 
process along or not or if the permits he is talking about are ROW only....if 
so, give him a call.

Thanks, Donna.
The reason I ask is that we've been fighting a long political/policy issue 
here in Washington on rights-of-way across federal lands.  
Thus far the issue has focused on telecommunications (EBS and fiber optic 
cables).  The agencies we've been pitted against are the BLM and Forest 
Service, and the issue is the federal land agencies have tried to raise ROW 
fees and rents to exorbitant levels in order to get more money out of 
companies.
The agencies have recently said that what they tried to do to fiber cables 
they'll also do to pipelines.  
Two weeks ago, I spoke at a pipelines conference in New Orleans on this 
issue.  El Paso pipelines told me they've had a tough time getting 
compression station upgrade permits from the BLM for their pipeline expansion 
into California.
My request therefore would only be that IF you have any problems with the 
Forest Service in obtaining permits or new rights-of-way, and you think you 
might need some help, please feel free to let me know.  We meet regularly 
with Dept of Agriculture senior staff, and should soon meet with the new 
Forest Service Chief Dale Bosworth.  We could help if you have any problems.
(Can't help you with the Navajo Nation, though!  But seriously, we'd always 
like to learn if you have problems on Indian lands as well.)

Steve Burns
Washington

Yes -Stations 2, 3 & 4 are on federal land.  Station 2 is on national forest 
land and Stations 3 & 4 is leased to the Navajo Nation.   Questions, let me 
know.  Thanks. Donna

Donna,

Could you please answer the question below for Stephen and Nancy since you 
are the lead Analyst on the Red Rock project.

Thanks,
Bret

Bret, this is a question from someone in my office.  Can you help?

Thanks,
Nancy

Are any of the four compressor station upgrades on the Transwestern line on 
federal lands?

The State of New Mexico conducted a surprise air inspection of the TW Atoka 
No.3 C/S.  The agency found no non compliance issues or violoations during 
the inspection.

The second quarter Transwestern/SoCal PCB management committee meeting was 
held this week.  Transwestern's share of the PCB management and disposal 
activities on the SoCal system for the quarter was $125,950.00.

The State of New Mexico has issued the settlement penalty for the turbine 
replacement issue at the P-1 C/S.  The original amount levied against 
Transwestern in 1997  was $14,700.  After the Air Quality Bureau sat on this 
issue for more than 4 years without resolution, they reassessed the penalty 
to be $162,770.   A conference call will be set up to discuss Transwestern's 
next course of action.

The summary report for due diligence conducted in Portland Ore. was completed 
and submitted to Environmental Affairs in Houston.

Began initial field confirmation of EOTT crude oil tanks and equipment in the 
MIdland Region.  Five of the thirteen teams which have EOTT facilites have 
been inpsected and appropriate changes made to the database and spreadsheet.

A meeting was held with the Midland field teams which have Title V 
facilities, to complete and submit the required annual certifications.  All 
Title V locations in the MIdland region were in compliance for this year.

Region IX EPA has made a determination that prior to issuance of the air 
permits for the Redrock turbine installation, Transwestern is to conduct an 
endangered species survey of C/S's 3 and 4.  A contractor has been contacted 
and the surveys will be completed prior to September 15th.   This is not a 
new issue, as EPA Region VI, Dallas required consideration of the Endangered 
Species Act to be completed at the Luguna C/S, which is on Laguna Indian 
Lands.  The Title V permit will not be issued for the Laguna C/S until the 
EPA is satisified that endangered species are not a concern.  

Preliminary environmental and right of way field data are being provided to 
an environmental contractor to initiate a fatal flaw analysis of a proposed 
project for Transwestern Pipeline Company.

Continued EOTT crude oil release data collections for forthcoming Sept. 27th 
NFL meeting in MIdland. 

Leon, thanks for the list.  If this is a complete list of the parts which are 
replaced, what parts are "common" between the 3505 and the 4700?  Bill Scott 
is the attorney on this for Enron and I have copied him on this 
correspondence  "wcs@modrallcom."  Plese keep him in the loop on this...... 

Larry,

The hardware that is replaced during overhauls is:
All Bearings (#1,#2,#3)
All seals #1 brg, IGV & variable stators, #2 brg, #3 brg, #1 
nozzle,              #2 nozzle, #3 nozzle
All hardware (nuts, bolts, washers for cases, housings etc.)
All gaskets and packings (air/oil tube, oil drain tubes etc)
All o-rings (oil inlet tubes, etc)

This applies to recoupes and standard engines.  The thing different on the 
recoupe is that some of the hardware for the cases is different and the 
internal blankets are replaced.

If you have any questions or if I can be of further service, please do not 
hesitate to give me a call.

Leon O'Bryan
(801) 352-5100-office
(801) 560-2136-Cell

Particpated in the EPA NFL spill release and discharge data request for the 
Midland Region.

A meeting was held with the New Mexico Environment Department, Air Quality 
Bureau concerning the NOV for the P-1 C/S.  Transwestern presented letters 
from the AQB to Transwestern which apparently had not been reviewed by the 
AQB prior to issuance of the NOV.  The AQB requested a delay to re evaluate 
the new evidence which had been given to them.  They indicated that they 
would be contacting us after they had reviewed this new data and information.

John, I plan on grabbing not only a digital camera but also my video camera 
to handle the panarama part of the equations.  In conversations with Doug 
Cebryk, it looks like the primary routes are Interstate 17 and El Paso's 
existing right of way south.  I spoke with Kevin Hyatt about a possible route 
that exists south to a power plant between station 1 and Kingman Az, and then 
heading southeast into the Phoenix area, but didnt know if the economics 
would work out. Ive got ENSR looking at other routes that might hold 
promise.  I also plan on addressing what might be considered sensitive areas 
of potential impact (streams, rivers, riparian habitat, difficult terrain, 
population and  critical habitat  issues etc)  Ill have a report to you 
shortly after the trip...

	

Larry,

Please give me a report following your fly-over of the route with Doug 
Cebryk.  I am very interested in what you see and the potentials that are 
there.  Don't forget to take your camera.  Pictures (slides) would be most 
helpful as we work through the early planning stages for the greenfield 
portion.  As the primary route begins to solidify with alternates, we will 
need to develop some preliminary maps.  It is my understanding that no maps 
of the route will be released with sign-off from the entire group of: Hyatt, 
Taylor, Veatch and Shafer.

After we receive the "fatal-flaw" desk-top analysis from ENSR (Sept. 21 - 
although I hope to get it sooner), I would offer that several events should 
be scheduled to expedite the project as follows:
1. If the open season reflects that we have a project and Eric Gadd approves, 
a couple of quick meetings will be held with strategic groups to discuss the 
project potential (TNC, State Land Managing agencies, US Forest Service, 
etc).  These strategic groups will be identified by the ENSR fatal-flaw 
analysis.
2. Simultaneously, we will begin working with ENSR (if the open season 
reflects that we have a project) on developing a full scoped Environmental 
Strategy for Sun Devil (this will include an RFP that will immediately go out 
soliciting bids for the Resource Reports and permits). 
3. We will work with Steve Veatch and Joe Hartso to schedule a meeting with 
the FERC Staff (we need the commitment of the State Land Managing Agencies, 
US Forest Service, etc. to collaborate with the FERC on the NEPA review) to 
introduce the project and solicit their commitment to offer staff resources 
early in the process.
4. We will also need to develop a Public Relations and Government Affairs 
strategy which will identify the early meetings that need to be held with 
local, state, federal jurisdictional governing bodies and politicians - so 
the right folks have a heads-up on the project before it hits the news 
media.  This also includes developing a strategy on where and when the 
project will formally be announced (i.e., news conference in Phoenix or 
Houston, etc.).  A $580 Million project will be a big deal in the Phoenix 
area and for the Southwest.

I know there is more, but this will help to keep some of the early events 
coordinated.  John Shafer

NORTHERN NATURAL GAS

Reviewed Title V Operating Permit renewal applications with field teams for 
Finney Co. 1, Finney Co. 3 and Fowler.  Contractor has made revisions and the 
permit applications will be overnighted to the State of Kansas for Monday, 
September 10, 2001 delivery.

TRANSWESTERN

EOTT

Started EPA 308 Request response Tuesday, September 4, 2001 at Russell, 
Kansas and for EOTT releases in the Amarillo Region.  Large contingency of 
employees worked jointly to provide files on each release experienced since 
1998.  DES had Title V Operating Permits due so environmental coordinators, 
Steve Mitchell and Monte Stebens, stayed in Russell until all files were 
completed. DES would like to thank the environmental coordinators and all 
other employees who worked on the information response.  Everyone did an 
excellent job.

GENERAL INFORMATION

Submitted semi annual NSPS reports for P-1 and Plains C/S's.

Yesterday evening I phoned both the state of Arizona ( agency for stations 1 
and 2) and Region 9 EPA ( agency for stations 3 and 4) concerning the status 
of when the air permits would be issued by both agencies for the Redrock 
expansion.  I was surprised to find out that both agencies stated a 2-4 month 
delay prior to issuance.  They cited back log of other permits, public 
comment periods, and workload as being the main reasons.  I am particularily 
disappointed because there were pre meetings with both agencies identifying 
what was to be included in each application package, and even after the 
applications were submitted in March of this year, each agency came back and 
asked for different information that from what was discussed at each meeting.

I have a call into the state of Arizona ( construction is to begin at Station 
2 and they have jurisdiction for this station) to see if we can initiate  
some construction activities  such as laying pipe and building foundations 
prior to receiving the permit.  I have been given these types of approvals 
from other agencies in the past, but these types of approvals are extremely 
narrow and restrictive.   If this flys I am sure that they will require us to 
make sure the turbine is not brought on site until the permit has been 
issued.  I know this will require written approval from the agency, but this 
may allow us to proceed on schedule and avoid any delays.  Ill keep you 
apprised of this issue.

The 2001 environmental roundtable  has been confirmed  for the above location 
and dates.   Make your reservations at the Holiday Inn Crowne Plaza 
(505) 821-3333.  The hotel is located on the frontage road off I-25 north at 
the Paso del Norte exit.  Room rates are $89.00 per night.  A block of rooms 
is being held under "Enron Transportations Services-Environmental 
Roundtable".  The agenda for the roundtable is presented below:

Tuesday October 16th

  7:00-8:00 am  Contintental Breakfast.

  8:00-8:15 am  Welcome and Opening Remarks.

  8:15-8:45 am  Bill Kendrick, Director Environmental Affairs, ETS.

  8:45-9:15 am  Chad Ingalls, The Nature Conservancy (Station 2 Project).

  9:15-10:00 am  Ruth Jensen, Air Issues and Compliance. 

10:00-10:15 am  BREAK

10:15-11:15 am  Denise Celani Safety Kleen.  "What happens to your waste 
after we get it"

11:15-12:00 pm  Joe Lueras.  Envisions training and demonstration.

12:00-1:30 pm  LUNCH

  1:30-2:30 pm  Mike Riedel.  Emissions Inventories.

  2:30-2:45  pm  BREAK

  2:45-3:45 pm  Ruth Jensen.  Star Program

  3:45-4:30 pm  Larry Campbell. Rocky Mountain Elk Foundation.

  4:30-4:45 pm  Closing Remarks and Adjourn.

Wednesday October 17th

  8:30-12:00 pm  Surprise Exercise.

12:00-1:30 pm  LUNCH

  1:30-3:00 pm  Larry Campbell.  Discussion of Surprise Exercise.

  3:00-3:15 pm  BREAK

  3:15-4:30 pm  Larry Campbell.  Mock Environmental Situations.

  4:30-4:45 pm  Questions and comments concerning roundtable.

  4:45 pm  Adjourn.

Looking forward to seeing you all and having a productive and interesting 
session.

With respect to the September 13, 1999 letter from Richard and Oreane Garcia 
concerning pipeline integrity  and noise issues, Transwestern Pipeline 
Company offers the following response:

Pipeline Integrity.  With the construction of the evaporation ponds over 
Transwestern's right of way and pipline, Transwestern has closely monitored 
the potential for  impacts for the pipeline.  This includes a more frequent 
inspection of the pipeline conditions underlying the ponds by taking 
potentiometric readings to verify that  corrosion is not present.  
Transwestern has also installed rectifiers to assist in eleminating the 
potential of pipeline corrosion.  As a DOT requirement, Transwestern has 
cathodically protected the entire pipeline system with an external pipeline 
coating to further ensure the integrity of the pipeline underlying the 
evaporation ponds.   The pipline safety  measures implemented by Transwestern 
are designed to not only identify corrosion iimpacts to the pipeline system 
at   the inception of detrimental impacts as a result of corrosion, but also 
allow for long term stability and integrity  by conducting state of the art 
monitoring and detection. 

Noise Issue.  In the initial environmental assessment and study, Transwestern 
conducted baseline surveys of the area to determine existing noise levels.  
This study was completed to assist Transwestern in the mitigation measures 
which will be implemented after construction of the Gallup Compresso 
Station.  Pending completion of the facility, Transwestern will conduct post 
noise studys to determine whether facility noise levels have increased above 
those levels mandated by FERC.  In the event of operational noise levels 
exceeding the FERC regulatory level of 55 ldn, Transwestern is committed to 
performing any and all  mitigation measures necessary to ensure that the post 
noise level of the facility will not be above the level mandated by FERC.

Decrepancy of trailer park residents.  In the letter by Mr. Garcia, it was 
stated that Transwestern's assessment of the number of residences in the 
adjacent trailer park  was not 18 as had been stated in our original study, 
but "more like 35 trailers".  The number of mobile home residences currrently 
in the trailer park may in fact be closer to 35.  Transwestern's trailer park 
residence count was taken in the winter of the year when the fluctuating job 
market is normally down and the number of residences in the park was low.  
The transient nature of mobile home residences and the fluctuating job 
economy of the area is probably a direct reflection of the up and down nature 
of the residences.  It should also be noted that during the time that the 
trailer park count was made, the owner of the trailer park who is also the 
operator of the evaporation ponds was experiencing major difficulties in the 
operation of the  ponds and raw sewage  had overflowed the pond embankments 
and  had resulted in the raw sewage ponding in the yards of many of the 
trailer park residents.  It was actually noted that many of the spaces 
normally occupied by mobile homes had been vacated.  This unsanitary 
condition was also identified by the New Mexico Environment Department.  The 
NMED had implemented enforcement actions against the trailer park owner.     

Ruth, I spoke to the ADEQ about the accelerated permit program and apparently 
there are some internal problems with this program and the third party 
contractors which are on their "list".  At this stage of the game, they 
recommended that we do not resort to this alternative as most of the work 
that the contractor would do has been done by the ADEQ allready.  I then 
indicated that I would be contacting the Director of the ADEQ about the 
urgency of this multi million dollar project and the benefits to the state of 
Arizona.  The permit engineer thought that would be a good idea. Because we 
will be permitting through this agency again for Sundevil, and dont want to 
upset the agency cart, I am going to speak with the permit engineers 
supervisor and then to the Director of the ADEQ next week about either an 
accelerated issuance of the permit or more realistically, allowance to do 
some construction activities while the ADEQ is completing the review and 
permit writing.  This way, I wont step on any toes.  By the way, the ADEQ 
said that they dont consider this to be a PSD issue.  The following time line 
for permit issuance under the Arizona laws at this stage appears to be: 
another 2-3 weeks to write the permit, one month by the ADEQ technical staff 
to do the required internal review and then the  EPA is given a one month 
period to do their review, which is requried by the EPA for all class 1 
permit applications in Arizona.  Because Im going to be in Phoenix next week, 
I might be able to set a meeting up with the ADEQ Director and plead 
Transwestern's case.  Ill let you know how it goes......

 

Attached is a web site concerning expedited permitting in Arizona.

Ruth

http://www.adeq.state.az.us/environ/air/permit/index.html#permit

John, I look forward to you being there, hopefully,  for both days.  Your 
presence and participation shows the field teams the environmental commitment 
from Houston. 

Concerning the agenda, the first day is devoted to presentations.  The second 
moring will be devoted to a  "surprise" participation at a local compressor 
station about 45 miles west of Albuquerque.  I havent spread this around yet, 
except to Rich Jolly and got his OK, but  I plan on dividing the guys into 
groups of 2 and having them conduct an investigation/audit of the compressor 
station.  I plan on setting and hiding  some placebo environmental issues the 
night before at the station to see if they can discover them and other 
housekeeping issues the next morning during the audit.  We will then convine 
back at the hotel in the afternoon to discuss what they found and how they 
would address the issues identified.  The group that identifies the most 
issues, will get a small gift.  Do I need your approval on the spending of 
some $$$ for a gift?  I was thinking of a couple of $25 gift certificates for 
the two winners at a big sporting goods store and let them choose what they 
want.  The final afternoon session will be devoted to mock environmental 
situations under varying circumstances, like we did last year with the whole 
group being divided into four individuals and participating as teams. 
thoughts comments......

I plan on coming for at least a day.  John Shafer

The 2001 environmental roundtable  has been confirmed  for the above location 
and dates.   Make your reservations at the Holiday Inn Crowne Plaza 
(505) 821-3333.  The hotel is located on the frontage road off I-25 north at 
the Paso del Norte exit.  Room rates are $89.00 per night.  A block of rooms 
is being held under "Enron Transportations Services-Environmental 
Roundtable".  The agenda for the roundtable is presented below:

Tuesday October 16th

  7:00-8:00 am  Contintental Breakfast.

  8:00-8:15 am  Welcome and Opening Remarks.

  8:15-8:45 am  Bill Kendrick, Director Environmental Affairs, ETS.

  8:45-9:15 am  Chad Ingalls, The Nature Conservancy (Station 2 Project).

  9:15-10:00 am  Ruth Jensen, Air Issues and Compliance. 

10:00-10:15 am  BREAK

10:15-11:15 am  Denise Celani Safety Kleen.  "What happens to your waste 
after we get it"

11:15-12:00 pm  Joe Lueras.  Envisions training and demonstration.

12:00-1:30 pm  LUNCH

  1:30-2:30 pm  Mike Riedel.  Emissions Inventories.

  2:30-2:45  pm  BREAK

  2:45-3:45 pm  Ruth Jensen.  Star Program

  3:45-4:30 pm  Larry Campbell. Rocky Mountain Elk Foundation.

  4:30-4:45 pm  Closing Remarks and Adjourn.

Wednesday October 17th

  8:30-12:00 pm  Surprise Exercise.

12:00-1:30 pm  LUNCH

  1:30-3:00 pm  Larry Campbell.  Discussion of Surprise Exercise.

  3:00-3:15 pm  BREAK

  3:15-4:30 pm  Larry Campbell.  Mock Environmental Situations.

  4:30-4:45 pm  Questions and comments concerning roundtable.

  4:45 pm  Adjourn.

Looking forward to seeing you all and having a productive and interesting 
session.

Joe, presented below is the first memo I sent out concering the air permit 
issue:

[Yesterday evening I phoned both the state of Arizona ( agency for stations 1 
and 2) and Region 9 EPA ( agency for stations 3 and 4) concerning the status 
of when the air permits would be issued by both agencies for the Redrock 
expansion.  I was surprised to find out that both agencies stated a 2-4 month 
delay prior to issuance.  They cited back log of other permits, public 
comment periods, and workload as being the main reasons.  I am particularily 
disappointed because there were pre meetings with both agencies identifying 
what was to be included in each application package, and even after the 
applications were submitted in March of this year, each agency came back and 
asked for different information that from what was discussed at each meeting.

I have a call into the state of Arizona ( construction is to begin at Station 
2 and they have jurisdiction for this station) to see if we can initiate  
some construction activities  such as laying pipe and building foundations 
prior to receiving the permit.  I have been given these types of approvals 
from other agencies in the past, but these types of approvals are extremely 
narrow and restrictive.   If this flys I am sure that they will require us to 
make sure the turbine is not brought on site until the permit has been 
issued.  I know this will require written approval from the agency, but this 
may allow us to proceed on schedule and avoid any delays.  Ill keep you 
apprised of this issue.]

I spoke with the ADEQ after our conference call and they directed me to 
another group (compliance) in the air permit section.  They strongly 
suggested that I contact the compliance group before contacting Nancy Wrona, 
Director of the ADEQ.  I left a message with the supervisor of the ADEQ 
compliance section, Kathy McConnell (?) 602-207-2328, but have not heard back 
from her.  Either Bill Kendrick or I will  be touching base with her again, 
tomorrow.

Arnold has given me the following list of construction items he would like to 
have the ADEQ grant us permission/waiver to do in leau of receiving the air 
permits:

 all earthwork
 trench construction and piping tie ins
 all foundation and building construction
 installation of ancillary equipment

This list is probably too aggressive and falls out of what the agency may 
allow us to do.

The EPA contact for the Sta. 3 and 4 air permits: permit engineer  Roger 
Cohn      (415) 744-1238
      Supervisor  Geraldo Rios    (415) 744-1259

The ADEQ contact for Sta. 1 and 2 air permit permit engineer  Shudeish 
Mahadev (?)   (602) 207-2323
      Director   Nancy Wrona  
 

John, I read Phil's statements concerning the Redrock air permit issue and 
would like to shed some additional light concerning the reason why  
Transwestern  did not know about the delay in the agencies issance of the air 
permits.  I had met with each agency prior to submitting each application to 
ensure that each application contained the correct and proper information 
required by the EPA and State of Arizona.  When I told them that we were 
expecting the permits by the end of September, each agency indicated that a 
September permit issuance would not be a problem, in light of the fact that 
energy issues were to be given top priority in the State of Califonia.   I 
phoned the  permit engineer assigned to each application monthly to be kept 
aware of possible conflicts and resolve any concerns.  In all monthly calls, 
both agencies assured me that things were progressing on schedule.  As we 
approached the anticipated September issuance, calls to the agencies were 
conducted weekly and this was when I found out about the 1-4 month additional 
time which would be required for the permit issuance.  I dont know what else 
could have been done to track and alleviate problems encountered to ensure 
that the permits would be issued in a timely manner.

John, I read Phil's statements concerning the Redrock air permit issue and=
=20
would like to make sure everyone has the facts why  Transwestern was unawar=
e=20
of the delay in the agencies issance of the air permits.  I had met with ea=
ch=20
agency prior to submitting each application (February of this year) to ensu=
re=20
that each application contained the correct and proper information required=
=20
by the EPA and State of Arizona.  When I told them that we would need the=
=20
permits by the end of September, each agency indicated that a September=20
permit issuance would not be a problem, in light of the fact that energy=20
issues related to California were to be given top priority.   On a monthly=
=20
basis I phoned the  permit engineer assigned to each application to be kept=
=20
aware of possible conflicts and resolve any concerns.  In all monthly calls=
,=20
both agencies assured me that the permits were progressing on schedule and =
no=20
delays were expected .  As we approached the anticipated September issuance=
=20
date, calls to the agencies were conducted weekly and this was when I was=
=20
first informed of the 1-4 month additional time beyond the September issuan=
ce=20
which would be required for the permit issuance.=20

In light of this issue, we in ETS might want to use this as a training=20
exercise and develop a protocol that the other DES's should apply to stay o=
n=20
track with the permit progress for construction projects.=20

Phil,
I agree with your assessment, but would offer some additional information.=
=01;=20
After returning from Austin on Wednesday and learning that Larry Campbell=
=20
had=01;received a negative reaction from EPA Region IX concerning a possibl=
e=20
meeting with them, I worked on this issue most of Thursday and Friday.=01; =
The=20
strategy I discussed with Lou was to locate a local Arizona or California=
=20
"political/lawyer" type=01;who would have the necessary contacts to get us =
in=20
there and get the permits moving.=01; Lou agreed and we have been working o=
n=20
that strategy while gathering more information related to the "right" conta=
ct=20
that could get this job done.=01; I personally have had lengthy discussions=
=20
(Thursday and Friday) with Lou, Larry Campbell, Bill Kendrick and several k=
ey=20
consultants that have extensive contacts within both Arizona and=20
California.=01;We are closing in on a=01;local law firm and also a "high le=
vel=01;air=20
consultant"=01;who will be able to get us in at the Director or Air Permit =
Chief=20
level=01;to present (1) our=01;situation, (2) clean air needs for Arizona a=
nd CA,=20
and (3) how long these permits have already been on file.=01; We should hav=
e=20
someone identified early this next week.=01;=20
=01;
Let me present the following information to=01;complement yours:
* =01;The permitting timeline=01;being used=01;was based on historical=20
timelines=01;encountered=01;while processing prior Arizona projects.=01; No=
 indication=20
of backlogs or slower processing in the beginning.=01; A familiar consultan=
t=20
(Argent)=01;was used for the air permit applications and no indication was=
=20
offered by the AZ DEQ or EPA Region IX that normal processing was not=20
occurring.=01; Applications filed in March, 2001 and by letter from the age=
ncies=20
were deemed complete by mid-April.
* Within the last two weeks, the Arizona DEQ Permit Engineer assigned to th=
e=20
applications for Station 1 and 2 has stated that he is overloaded and worki=
ng=20
on the applications as they are in the "que".=01; He told Larry Campbell (a=
nd I=20
have verified=01;it also by talking to outside consultants that permit in=
=20
Arizona) that this is true and the AZ DEQ have been very slow lately in=20
getting permits out. (Caveat: One of the suggestions we want to carry in to=
=20
AZ DEQ is that we would be willing to pay for a third-party contractor to=
=20
take the permits and work them up=01;for release to the publishing firm so =
they=20
can be sent out for public comment.=01; AZ DEQ is willing to meet with us a=
nd=20
discuss our applications.)=01;=01; Even if we get this part going, this is =
only=20
part of the problem.=01; Bottom line is=01;we must play our cards=01;correc=
tly at this=20
juncture to be able to get our applications moved up in the que, typed, and=
=20
out for public comment; but EPA Region IX will still have thirty days after=
=20
that for their review of those two state issued permits.
* EPA Region IX is a different story.=01; It is most difficult to put press=
ure=20
on them, more so than AZ DEQ.=01; The applications for Stations 3 and 4 are=
 on=20
tribal land and these=01;applications are not delegated to any state air qu=
ality=20
department.=01;=01;After the technical meetings in the office last week, La=
rry made=20
a couple of calls=01;to the Permit Engineer=01;in Region IX and received a =
negative=20
response.=01; Larry was told that the=01;permits would issue in one to four=
 months=20
and that=01;there was no need for a meeting with them.=01; Again,=01;my adv=
ice at this=20
point is to find the right person with the right contacts at a very high=20
level and get the meeting set.=01; It's one thing to pressure the State of=
=20
Arizona and get a permit applications moving; but if we are not very carefu=
l=20
with Region IX we could damage our ability to not only get Sun Devil's=20
permits, but create audits and compliance situations that are far reaching.=
=01;=20
Again, we must first get a personal meeting with them=01;to enable us to=20
present=01;the need, circumstances, and how long these permits have already=
 been=20
on file.=01; Locating the=01;correct person to help us do that is of upmost=
=20
importance!
* Clarifying the complicated point, EPA Region IX has responsibility=20
to=01;review and publish not only the permits for Stations 3 and 4, but to =
also=20
review the AZ DEQ permits for stations 1 and=01;2 for 30 days.=01; Therefor=
e, if we=20
anger EPA Region IX over permits for Stations=01;3 and 4, they could delay =
the=20
issuance of the permits for Stations 1 and 2 that=01;have been expedited wi=
th=20
the AZ DEQ.=01; It's a two-edged sword.
Our Strategy:
* Continue to work on the technical staff permit engineers, but very=20
carefully.=01; Indications are that our phone calls are beginning to annoy =
them.
* Locate a political/lawyer type that has connections at the top of AZ DEQ=
=20
and EPA Region IX to help us get the=01;desired meeting with key=01;people =
in order=20
to=01;move=01;the permits.=01; This should be done within the next week.
* Offer to assist in any manner (e.g., funding a third party) to get the=20
permit applications moving out of AZ DEQ and EPA Region IX for public comme=
nt.
I have some strategic ideas that will increase the=01;probability that this=
 type=20
of circumstance will not occur in the future.=01; I will be glad to discuss=
 any=20
of this with you on Monday morning.=01; John Shafer
=01;

At Stan=01,s staff meeting last week, the discovery of a delay in the issua=
nce=20
of Air Permits was discussed.=01; Stan indicated that this was unacceptable=
.=01; I=20
requested that you conduct a meeting that afternoon with key people to=20
outline a plan of attack to get the permit schedule back on track.=01; I am=
=20
aware that you did such and you provided a voice mail update that indicated=
 a=20
plan.
=01;
Here is the problem.=01; Apparently the matter was further discussed at the=
=20
weekly Red Rock status meeting on Friday and the following feedback was=20
provided by a =01&little birdie=018.=01; We can expect another unpleasant d=
iscussion=20
at Monday=01,s 8am meeting with Stan.
=01;
* Joe Hartsoe has been unable to pursue any discussion with Washington=20
officials to put pressure on Arizona.=01; WTC attacks!=20
* Operations is unwilling to put much pressure on Arizona/EPA out of concer=
n=20
for future responsiveness from the agency Re: Sun Devil=20
* Sun Devil is a bird in the bush and Red Rock is a bird in the hand.=20
* There is no way that we can get the Red Rock project completed as promise=
d=20
because we waited until it was too late to find out what was going on with=
=20
the Air Permits.=20
* The agency will not allow a bifurcation of the project and let us proceed=
=20
with on site construction prior to a permit and delay delivery of the=20
compressor to the site.=20
* We haven=01,t yet had any contact with the agency after the discussion la=
st=20
Monday.=20
=01;
=01;
=01;
=01;
=20
=01;
=01;

Dan, sorry about taking so long it getting back to you about this, but I had 
a couple of crises I had to address,  Im still realing from the impact.  I 
have attached for your review the agreement which we are in the process of 
finalizing with the Wild Turkey Federation.  Take a look at the document and 
let me know what you think.  After your review we can make the necessary 
changes and modifications.  I have been advised by our legal department that 
each of the three major pipelines owned and operated by Enron will need a 
separate contract, with the RMEF, so what we decide for Transwestern, will 
undoubtably work for the others.  Thanks for your patience in this.

  

After the telephone conference call we had on 9/17, I contacted the Roger 
Kohn permit engineer with EPA about a possible meeting with his agency to 
resolve and assist the issuance of the air permits for stations 3 and 4.  His 
message back to me was a reiteration of the last request I made to him, that 
he could see no way that Transwestern would be able to help the EPA in this 
matter.  We discussed the possibility of Transwestern contacting his 
supervisor, Gerardo Rios, about a potential meeting and he indicated that we 
could choose this avenue if we desired. 

Gerardo's telephone number is 415-744-1259.

Shudeish with the state of Arizona just phoned and said that he and Probaht 
Baragava are available to meet with us on Thursday at 2:00 pm.  This is the 
only time and day of this week that they will be able to see us.  I asked 
about whether Kathy OConnell and Nancy Wrona would be able to attend this 
meeting and he stated that their calendars were full this week and would not 
attend.   He will need to know by tomorrow whether to book this meeting and 
who will be attending.  Sarah had mentioned that Thrusday was not a good day 
for her.  Should we schedule this and if so, who will be attending in Sarah's 
place?    

Larry Campbell
09/18/2001 08:29 AM
After the telephone conference call we had on 9/17, I contacted the Roger 
Kohn permit engineer with EPA about a possible meeting with his agency to 
resolve and assist the issuance of the air permits for stations 3 and 4.  His 
message back to me was a reiteration of the last request I made to him, that 
he could see no way that Transwestern would be able to help the EPA in this 
matter.  We discussed the possibility of Transwestern contacting his 
supervisor, Gerardo Rios, about a potential meeting and he indicated that we 
could choose this avenue if we desired. 

Gerardo's telephone number is 415-744-1259.

Would you please check on the status of this expense report.  The last entry 
I had on it was 9/5/01, 13 days ago.  My AMEX bill will be charged interest 
if I dont receive a check in the near future.  YOur assistance in this will 
be greatly appreciated.

enron_update@concureworkplace.com on 09/05/2001 11:08:25 AM
The Approval status has changed on the following report:

Status last changed by:  Automated Administrator
Expense Report Name: Larry Campbell
Report Total: $2,232.28
Amount Due Employee: $2,232.28
Amount Approved: $2,232.28
Amount Paid: $0.00
Approval Status: Pending
Payment Status: Pending

To review this expense report, click on the following link for Concur Expense.
http://expensexms.enron.com

NORTHERN NATURAL GAS COMPANY

Submitted Title V Permit Renewal for Mullinville Compressor to the KDHE.

Submittal of standard exemption documention for the NNG Kermit, Plainview, 
Seminole and Brownfield C/S's were submitted to the TNRCC.

TRANSWESTERN PIPELINE COMAPNY

A conference call was held with Region IX EPA to discuss Redrock Expansion 
issues related to the issuance of Title V air permits for Sat. 3 and 4 which 
are on Indain lands.  The agency provided a tentative date of 7 weeks before 
the the permits would be issued.  The EPA has required Transwestern to 
respond to issues related to the Endangered Species Act prior to issuance of 
the air permit.  Transwestern is in the process of preparing a biological 
assessment for the properties within the facility fences of stations 3 and 4.

A meeting was held with the Arizona DEQ to discuss what activities 
Transwestern may participate in to assist the agency with the issuance of the 
air permits for Station 1 and 2.  The agency gave a date of April 2002 as a 
normal issue date.  Even under expidited conditions the date is expected to 
be mid December of this year.  Transwestern plans on actively pursuing ADEQ's 
management to determine if the date for issuance can be further decreased.  
On a side note, under the current Arizona regulations, certain construction 
activities can begin in leau of receiving the permit and include; foundation 
construction, laying underground piping and consturction of permenant 
underground structures. This wil benefit the inbitiation of the Redrock 
construction prior to receivng the air permits for these stations. 

EOTT

Rawlins pump station was struck by lighting, causing a release and a loss of 
crude and the tanks do to fire.  Visiting site Friday, September 21, 2001to 
evaluate and for a clean up and remediation plan.

continuation of 308 reporting for EOTT facilities in amarillo region.

Remediaiton of EOTT Weatherford Station.

GENERAL

Attended the KDHE annual environmental conference in Hutchinson, Kansas.

Completed Title V annual certifications for Texas and Oklahoma facilities.

completed workbooks for Amarillo roundtable.

Kay, the choice is yours as to how you want to clean your oil staining.  both 
technologies will work.  I prefer the quicker of the two......in the interest 
of time ie steam

Kay Woods
09/30/99 07:07 AM
Got a question:
At the Amarillo round table, a salesman was doing a pitch on his "bugs" that 
"eat oil"
The EPA gurus there didn't have a complaint against this.....
How do ya'll feel about this? Is this something we should look at doing? Or 
should we continue to clean our burms as we normally do (ie: steam clean)
Let me know
Thanks
Kay

Thanks Scott, I heard about the same thing, and was checking futrher to see 
if this was actually the case.... 

By the way, I got a call back from Greg Simmons in the BLM State Office in
Arizona - my question to him was whether or not a proposed ROW across the
Agua Fria National Monument would constitute a "Fatal Flaw."  He indicated
that it likely would be a fatal flaw.  He said that it would take "an act of
congress" literally, not figuratively, to put a pipeline across a National
Monument.  The boundary of the Monument is the east side of I 17, south of
Cordes Junction - I don't know if we can stay on the west side of the
Interstate there, but we might oughta check it out - it looks like we could
get into some pretty rough side-sloping, two-toning.  FYI.

Scott J. Patti
Senior Project Manager
ENSR International
1601 Prospect Parkway
Fort Collins, CO  80525
Phone: (970) 493-8878
Fax:     (970) 493-0213
Email:  spatti@ensr.com

Lady and Gentlemen,

As the Subject line would lead you to believe, I am attaching a further
refinement of our cost estimate, spread out over the life of the project.  I
know that you, Dave, requested a breakdown by personnel and hours, but I am
going to have to go home and pack for my trip.  We certainly can break this
down by personnel and hours, but I cannot do it tonight.  I apologize for
any inconvenience this may cause any of you.  Please remember that you can
contact Jon Alstad in my absence (cc'ed).  I will be back in the office on
October 1st.  Scott

Scott J. Patti
Senior Project Manager
ENSR International
1601 Prospect Parkway
Fort Collins, CO  80525
Phone: (970) 493-8878
Fax:     (970) 493-0213
Email:  spatti@ensr.com

It is our policy that e-mails are intended for and should be used for
business purposes only.

This footnote also confirms that this email message has been swept by
MIMEsweeper for the presence of computer viruses.

ENSR
www.ensr.com
postmaster@ensr.com

Scott, I shold probably clearify something.  The existing right of way, which 
we intend on staying in, at least around Cordes Junction is located west of 
I-17, which will not impact the Agua Fria National Monument, which occurs on 
the east side of the interstate.  Should we be forced to move to the east 
side of I-17, then the Monument may become a problem.  Like you, I was taking 
into consideration all possible issues in the pathway of the proposed 
construction and also those that are in the near proximity and have the 
potential of becoming an "opportunity" in the event we are forced to deal 
with them.  I appreciate your wirk in this......

Gentlemen,

Attached is our work to date (minus the telephone call summary sheets and
permit requirement summary sheets [Appendix A] you've already received) on
the Fatal Flaw Analysis/Briefing Report for Project Sundevil (or is it The
Sundevil Project, or Sun Devil [2 words, rather than 1])?  It truly is a
working document, and can be expanded in areas as you see fit, or there may
be other areas you may want us to discontinue researching.  This review
draft is provided for your review and input as to where you might like it
expanded and where you might like effort to be discontinued.  As I mentioned
yesterday, I will be out of town the remainder of the week.  Please contact
Jon Alstad in my absence with any action items and input you may have.
Thanks,  Scott

Scott J. Patti
Senior Project Manager
ENSR International
1601 Prospect Parkway
Fort Collins, CO  80525
Phone: (970) 493-8878
Fax:     (970) 493-0213
Email:  spatti@ensr.com

It is our policy that e-mails are intended for and should be used for
business purposes only.

This footnote also confirms that this email message has been swept by
MIMEsweeper for the presence of computer viruses.

ENSR
www.ensr.com
postmaster@ensr.com
 - Fatal Flaw Analysis.doc
 - Table 1 - Cat-Constraint.doc
 - Table 2.doc
 - sundevilschedule.ppt

Roger, thats great that the public notice for station 3 and 4 air permits 
will initiate on October 4.  I really appreciate your work and effort on 
this. I will be looking forward to reviewing the rough draft for both of the 
permits during the first week of October.....

Kohn.Roger@epamail.epa.gov on 09/27/2001 06:07:00 PM
Larry,

An advertisement in the Navajo Times on October 4 will start the 30-day
public comment period for the Leupp and Klagetoh permit mods.  We will send
you copies of the draft permits and statements of basis, which you should
receive a day or two before October 4.

I will be out of the office until October 22.  If you have any questions
about these permits in my absence, please call Gerardo Rios at
415.744.1259.

Roger Kohn
U.S. EPA Region 9
75 Hawthorne St., Mail Code AIR-3
San Francisco, CA  94105
phone: (415) 744-1238
fax:   (415) 744-1076

I think that I might have seen that face somewhere before, in fact that
could be one of our faces.  I found out last week that I didn't get drawn
for the deer/hog hunt that I have gone on the last two years.  Are you going
to take Ryan hunting?  If so when and where.  Right now Daniel is tied up
with being football manager and we don't get to do much.  Thanks for the air
force song that you sent, I got a big kick out of it.  I have been going to
a seminar call "Making your children mind without loosing yours" by a man
named Kevin Leman.  It has been really good and is Biblically based.  He has
a book out by the same name that I would highly recommend.

Later,
Randy

Jon and Ruth, presented below are the comments to the air perimts at 3 and 
4.  Please review for clairty and content.  I have spoken to Roger Kohn about 
all of these issues and the only one which may be a problem is with No. 2.  
He is checking on what the EPA can do about this.  I have spoken to Arnold 
Eisenstein about what we can do with the strict 25 ppmvd requriement for NOx 
and CO and he has said that we can hold to the 25 ppm value by doing some 
major gas recycling.  This is a fuel waste and costly.  Anyway, depending 
upon how long this issue delays the issuance of the permit will undoubtably 
determine whether we give in to the 25 ppmvd or hold out for 40 ppmvd.  Id 
like your comments asap.

          1.  The responsible official name change to  Danny Pribble.

                         2.. The draft permit limits NOx and CO emissions to 
25 ppmv at 15% O2, based on a 3-hour average, except during periods of 
startup   and shutdown.  At 60F and above the GE data indicates that these 
rates are achievable under all operating conditions.  However, GE   data 
indicates that NOx and CO may be as high as 40 ppmv during low-load 
conditions of 60%and lower.

 The permit application represented turbine operations at base load 80% of 
the time with reduced load operations (64% load) occurring  no more than 20% 
of the time.  The potential to emit calculations presented the emissions in 
the application in units of lb.hr and ton/yr.  These values were accepted by 
the EPA for the netting analysis, and  took were taken into account by the 
EPA (See EPA Statement  of Basis document).  Because the permit conditions 
hold us to ppmvd values and not lb/yr or ton/year values, Transwestern is   
concerned that under low load conditions of less than 60%, the emissions of 
NOx and CO would be 40 ppmvd.  Transwestern is  requesting that  a provision 
be made in the permit conditions that  emissions of NOx and CO be held to 40 
ppmvd during the 20 % of  the time that the turbines operating conditions is 
less than or equal to 60%.

3. The word "Catepillar" is mispelled throughout the permit.

4. Permit conditions for sulfur testing in the fuel gas requires Transwestern 
to use methodologies (wet chemistry technology) that are not     normally 
used to monitor and measure sulfur in the natural gas.  Transwestern has 
received approval from the EPA for other custom  fuel monitoring schedules to 
use  "GPA Standard 2377" (length of stain tube) or gas chromatography as the 
proposed methodology  to  monitor sulfur in the natural gas.

  

Roger, presented below are the comments which Transwetern has on the permits 
which were issued to the Klagetoh and Luepp compressor station.  The most 
critical and sensitive issue for us is item 2 below. The permits really 
restrict us and cause us some major operational concerns if we are held to 25 
ppmvd for NOx and CO throughout the entire operating range of the turbines.  
We would really appreciate your help and assistance in this issue.  Let me 
know what additional information you may need. 

1.The responsible official name change to Danny Pribble, VP Southwest
Operations.

2.The draft permit limits NOx and CO emissions to 25 ppmv at 15% O2, based
on a 3-hour  average, except during periods of startup and shutdown.  At 60F
and above the GE data indicates that these rates are achievable under all
operating conditions.  However, GE data indicates that NOx and CO may be as 
high as 40 ppmv during low-load conditions of 60% and lower.

The permit application represented turbine operations at base load 80% of
the time with reduced load operations (64% load)occurring no more than 20%
of the time.  TWP also included a 15% safety factor to cover periods of
reduced operating loads and fluctuating ambient temperatures.  The potential
to emit calculations presented the emissions in the application in units of
lb/hr and ton/yr.  These potential to emit values were accepted by the EPA
for the netting analysis, and were taken into account by the EPA (See EPA
Statement of Basis document). Because the permit conditions hold us to ppmvd
values and not lb/yr or ton/year values, Transwestern is concerned that
under low load conditions of less than 60% and low ambient temperatures, the
emissions of NOx and CO could go as high as 40 ppmvd.  Transwestern is
requesting that a provision be made in the permit conditions that allows
emissions of NOx and CO be held to 40 ppmvd during the 20 % of the time that
the turbines operating conditions is less than or equal to 60% load.

3. The word "Catepillar" is mispelled throughout the permit.

4. Permit conditions for sulfur testing in the fuel gas requires
Transwestern to use methodologies (wet chemistry technology) that are not
normally used to monitor and       measure sulfur in the natural gas.
Transwestern has received approval from the EPA for other custom fuel
monitoring schedules to use  "GPA Standard 2377" (length of stain tube) or
gas chromatography as the proposed methodology  to  monitor sulfur in the
natural gas.

John, we are working out some issues with the station 1 permit and the EPA=
=20
permits for 3 and 4.  Briefly here they are.

First issue, that we did not anticipate from the ADEQ.  It applies to hours=
=20
of operation for the generator.  The ADEQ has restricted hours of operation=
=20
because we are close to the PSD levels at the facility.  In talking to=20
Shdeish, the ADEQ protects itself and applies a 10% safety factor on all=20
applications that approach PSD to ensure that the PSD levels are not=20
triggered.   This is there policy not regulation.  What is ironic is that=
=20
they accepted our calculations for the netting, but did not indicate that=
=20
they would apply any safety factor for their comfort.  Im concerned about t=
he=20
time frame to iron out this issue and the construction start date.  I need=
=20
some guidance.  Do we want to spend time fighting this, not knowing how lon=
g=20
it will take to resolve or do we bite the bullet and put on a catlytic=20
converter for the generator and have unlimited operating hours?  In speakin=
g=20
with Shudeish, I got the impressions that when an application approaches th=
e=20
PSD limit, they want to see the applicant apply CEMS or some kind of contro=
l=20
technology just to be sure that they stay under the 250 ton limit.  I know=
=20
time is of the essence.

Second issue.  The EPA has given us a pretty good permit for stations 3 and=
=20
4, but have restircted us to ppmvd values for NOx and CO, instead of lb./hr=
=20
or ton/yr.  The values that they have given us in the permit are OK (25 ppm=
vd=20
for NOx and CO) at base load operation. GE will guarantee this.   However, =
at=20
lower tempertures and at reduced loads of 60%, the manufactures numbers are=
=20
40 ppmvd for NOx and CO.  We cant live with this.  In our application, we=
=20
stated that we would be operating at low loads for 20% of the time and we=
=20
applied a 15% safety factor for the higher NOx and CO levels and presented=
=20
this in lb.hr and tons/yr.  This would have covered us, but because the=20
permits limits are in ppmvd, we would exceed  these limits during low loads=
=20
and low temps.  I have requested from Roger that we would accept permit=20
conditions that would allow us 40 ppmvd during low temps and low loads with=
=20
with requiring us to do associated recordkeeping and Roger said that he wou=
ld=20
bring this before his management.  Ill keep you apprised of this issue.

=20
Larry,
Please also keep Jerry D. Martin in the loop on progress with the permits.=
=01;=20
Thanks, John

 this is what Im trying for.=01; The permits dont hold us to a mass rate of=
=20
emissions, just ppmvd.=01; We covered ourselves when we presented emisisons=
=20
rates of t/yr in the application, but the EPA came back with NSPS limits,=
=20
which of course hurt us when we operate at loads of less than 64%.=01; We c=
an=20
either cave in to their NSPS limits and when we get under low load condtion=
s,=20
just do a bunch of recycling which wastes gas, or we can spend some valuabl=
e=20
time trying to get the EPA to give us emission limitations=01; in lb/hr or=
=20
t/yr.=01; Im discussing this with the EPA permit engineer.=01;=01; He is ch=
ecking with=20
his management on this issue.=01; Ill keep you apprised.=01;=01;=20

 cc:=01;=01;=01;=01; William Kendrick/ENRON@enronXgate=20

 Subject:=01;=01;=01;=01;=01;=01;=01; RE: Staions 3 and 4 air permit commen=
ts to EPA

 I agree with your comments.=01; Can't we get a lb/hr limit (based on the=
=20
netting calculations) that we can live with?=01; We're only required to hav=
e a=20
ppm limit that matches NSPS requirements, and that value would be a lot=20
greater than 25 ppmv.

 Ruth

 =01;-----Original Message-----

 Sent:=01;=01; Tuesday, October 09, 2001 3:55 PM

 Subject:=01;=01;=01;=01;=01;=01;=01; Staions 3 and 4 air permit comments t=
o EPA

 Jon and Ruth, presented below are the comments to the air perimts at 3 and=
=20
4.=01; Please review for clairty and content.=01; I have spoken to Roger Ko=
hn about=20
all of these issues and the only one which may be a problem is with No. 2.=
=01;=20
He is checking on what the EPA can do about this.=01; I have spoken to Arno=
ld=20
Eisenstein about what we can do with the strict 25 ppmvd requriement for NO=
x=20
and CO and he has said that we can hold to the 25 ppm value by doing some=
=20
major gas recycling.=01; This is a fuel waste and costly.=01; Anyway, depen=
ding=20
upon how long this issue delays the issuance of the permit will undoubtably=
=20
determine whether we give in to the 25 ppmvd or hold out for 40 ppmvd.=01; =
Id=20
like your comments asap.

 =01;=01;=01;=01;=01;=01;=01; =01;=01;=01;=01;=01;=01;=01;=01; 1.=01;=01;=
=01;=01;=01; The responsible official name change to=01; Danny=20
Pribble.

 =01;=01;=01;=01;=01;=01;=01;=01;=01;=01;=01;=01;=01;=01;=01;=01;=01;=01;=
=01;=01;=01;=01;=01;=01; 2..=01;=01;=01; The draft permit limits NOx and CO=
 emissions=20
to 25 ppmv at 15% O2, based on a 3-hour average, except during periods of=
=20
startup=01; =01;=01;=01;=01;=01;=01;=01; and shutdown.=01; At 60F and above=
 the GE data indicates that=20
these rates are achievable under all operating conditions.=01; However, GE=
=20
=01;=01;=01;=01; =01;=01;=01;=01;=01;=01;=01; data indicates that NOx and C=
O may be as high as 40 ppmv during=20
low-load conditions of 60%and lower.

 =01;=01;=01;=01;=01;=01;=01; The permit application represented turbine op=
erations at base load=20
80% of the time with reduced load operations (64% load) occurring =01;=01; =
no more=20
than 20% of the time.=01; The potential to emit calculations presented the=
=20
emissions in the application in units of lb.hr and ton/yr. =01;=01;=01;=01;=
 These values=20
were accepted by the EPA for the netting analysis, and=01; took were taken =
into=20
account by the EPA (See EPA Statement =01;=01;=01;=01;=01;=01;=01; of Basis=
 document).=01; Because=20
the permit conditions hold us to ppmvd values and not lb/yr or ton/year=20
values, Transwestern is =01;=01; =01;=01;=01;=01;=01;=01;=01; concerned tha=
t under low load conditions=20
of less than 60%, the emissions of NOx and CO would be 40 ppmvd.=01;=20
Transwestern is =01;=01;=01;=01; requesting that=01; a provision be made in=
 the permit=20
conditions that=01; emissions of NOx and CO be held to 40 ppmvd during the =
20 %=20
of =01;=01;=01;=01; the time that the turbines operating conditions is less=
 than or equal=20
to 60%.

 3.=01;=01;=01;=01;=01; The word "Catepillar" is mispelled throughout the p=
ermit.

 4.=01;=01;=01;=01;=01; Permit conditions for sulfur testing in the fuel ga=
s requires=20
Transwestern to use methodologies (wet chemistry technology) that are=20
not=01;=01;=01; =01;=01;=01;=01; normally used to monitor and measure sulfu=
r in the natural gas.=01;=20
Transwestern has received approval from the EPA for other custom =01;=01;=
=01;=01;=01; fuel=20
monitoring schedules to use=01; "GPA Standard 2377" (length of stain tube) =
or=20
gas chromatography as the proposed methodology=01; to =01;=01;=01;=01; moni=
tor sulfur in the=20
natural gas.

 =01;=01;=01;=01;=01;=01;=01;=01;=20

Transwestern Pipeline Company

Transwestern has run into some problems with the air permit conditions for 
the Redrock Expansion.  For the state permits, the ADEQ wants to abitrarily 
set a 10% safety factor to the emissions levels which approach PSD. This 
means that they have written into the draft permit a reduction in the 
allowable hours of operation for  the generator from 8760 to 7800.  This 
generator is the facility's prime source of power and therefore, needs to be 
operated for 8760 hours.  Transwestern will challenge the agency's authority 
to apply a 10%safety factor.

For the Indain lands permits, the EPA has written a permit condition of 25 
ppmvd for NOx and CO under all operating conditions.  Manufacturerers 
guarantees only apply at 25 ppmvd at loads above 65% and at 0F.  It appears 
that Transwestern may have convenienced the EPA to back away from permit 
limits in ppmvd and include as permit conditons lb/hr and ton/yr emissions 
limits that Transwestern originally placed into its applications.

Northern Natural Gas Company

A standard exemption for the NNG Martin Co. No. 1 facility was submitted to 
the TNRCC.  Preliminary maintenance activities and newly published AP-42 
emissions factors have shown that the Martin Co. 1 facility may be a Title V 
facility.  Under the old AP-42 factors, the units at the facility were not 
greater than 100 ton/year sources.  Continued investigation  is being 
conducted to determine emissions levels from the units at the facility. 

EOTT
A request and supporting documentation was submitted to the TNRCC to remove 
the EOTT Crane facility from the Title V operating permit program.  New data 
on the crude oil received into the facility shows the emissions limits for 
VOCs to be less than the Title V regulated limit. 

General

Preparations are being  finalized for the environmental roundtable to be held 
next week in Albuquerque.

Shudeish, I spoke with Roger Kohn, Region IX EPA permit engineer, about the 
time his agency will take to do the air permit reveiw for Kingman and 
Flagstaff.  He stated that EPA normally gets the allowed 45 days to do the 
permit review, however, at the request of the state agency, his office will 
do an expidited review.  Because of the urgency of Transwetern desiring to 
initiate construction, by this email, I am asking the ADEQ to request  an 
expidited review  of the Kingman and Flagstaff air permits from the EPA.

Again, thanks for your work and effort that you have put in on this project.

Shudeish, our advisor in Arizona left me a voice mail message that the signs 
were posted at both locations...thanks for your help with an expited request 
to Region IX EPA.

Larry- Thanks for the update. I am glad that the operating hours in the 
alternative scenario for BOTH STATIONS are agreeable to Transwestern. I will 
be sending the permits to EPA review today with a request for an expedited 
review.

The public notice period starts today, so i trust that the notice signs are 
posted outside your facilities.

Shudeish
____________________________________________________
>>> <Larry.Campbell@enron.com> 10/15/01 11:33AM >>>

Shudeish, the spreadsheets look great.  I spoke to the project engineer
about an hour ago and he told me that we can live with the numbers you have
given us in the permits for Stations 1 and 2 under the alternate operating
scenerio.  He has been in Boliva for the past 2 weeks and was unavailable
for comments.  Please accept my gratitude for all the extra work and effort
you have put in on this issue of operating hour under the alternative
operating scenerio.  We are going to accept the hours as stated in the
permits.  Thanks very much

Just a short message to apprise everyone of the cleaning results performed on 
the filter separator from the Transwestern M/S.  Wipe tests taken of the 
interrior portions of the separator prior to cleaning revealed PCB results 
of: 360, 500 and 520 microgram.   This was not a standard wipe taken of a 
specific area.  These wipes were taken over large areas to determine 
presence/absence of PCB's within the separator.  After the cleaning operation 
was completed, three wipe samples were taken of the interrior portions of the 
separator.  All results showed non detect at less than 1.0 microgram.  I feel 
we can be fairly certain that the separator is free of residual PCBs.  

Jeff, would you pass this information on to your counterpart for PG&E?  

Rich, whats your thoughts on a decent pipeline segment for the modeling 
study.  I kind of like Sta. 4 to Sta. 3.  It encompasses alot of the 
variablity present on the Transwestern system (elevation, temperature, 
consistent activities with respect to the rest of the PCB contaminated 
system).  Let me know before the Penn State visit, so I can start rounding up 
the analytical data for the pipeline and stations.....

Rich Jolly on 10/03/99 06:25:00 PM
Larry let me know how I can help.
Rich

Larry Campbell
10/01/99 11:04 AM
Mike, Ill take the last request, "General PCB concentrations found in the 
section".  I need to know which section the modeling study will be performed 
in.
In the last conference call, I think it was decided that we might concentrate 
on a section of pipe between C/S 3 and C/S 4.  This might be  a good 
candidate....

Michael Terraso
10/01/99 10:04 AM

As I mentioned in the conference call last Monday , I have set up an 
appointment with Michael Adewuni at Penn State for 9 am on Tuesday October 26 
for the purpose of reviewing his pipeline flow model and potential 
application to predicting PCB movement and collection points in pipelines.  
He has performed previous research studies utilizing various hydrocarbon 
solvents , including  terpinol.  

Dr. Adewuni has requested that we provide to him before the meeting the 
following information:

Drawings of the particular section of pipe and the configuration;
The general volumes of condensate passing through the pipeline;
The natural gas flow rate and variables
General PCB concentrations found in the section.

Please respond and let me know who will take the responsibility for selecting 
the section of pipe and providing the requested information?

Dr. Adewuni 's email address at Penn State is ----    michael@pnge.psu.edu

Please also provide a duplicate information package to me prior to the trip 
for review.

Thanks Mike

Roger, if EPA has approved other alternate methods for determining sulfur in 
fuel gas, can you approve of these for our sulfur methods?   The reason I ask 
is that we are not set up to do any of the applications mentioned in Appendix 
D.  We  have approved custom fuel monitoring schedules in place at 5 other 
compressor station locations and have been approved to use "stain tubes" or 
total sulfur analyzers.  These were issued by Region IX and Region VI.  I can 
send you copies of the approvals from the other Regions if that will help.  
If not, I would recommend that you write the permit with all the below 
referenced test methods and we will work out the details.  WIll it be 
possible to make a change to the permit after things quiet down a bit and we 
have more time to taylor the permit  for you and us?

Kohn.Roger@epamail.epa.gov on 10/18/2001 05:54:40 PM
Larry,

I am going on vacation for two weeks - my last day will be Oct. 31,
which is a little before the end of the comment period.  I am doing
everything I can to make sure the permits are ready to issue when the
comment period ends.  You have asked about using a sulfur analyzer.
Since that is not typical practice for facilities subject to NSPS GG, I
would have to research that.  Frankly, if you want your permits ASAP,
there really isn't time for that.  Does one of the test methods in
Appendix D of Part 75, which I've pasted below, work for you?  (I know
some don't.)  Please advise so we can keep the process moving.  Thanks.

2.3.3.1.2      Use one of the following methods when using manual
sampling (as applicable to the type of gas combusted) to determine the
sulfur
content of the fuel: ASTM D1072-90, "Standard Test Method for Total
Sulfur in Fuel Gases", ASTM D4468-85 (Reapproved 1989) "Standard
Test Method for Total Sulfur in Gaseous Fuels by Hydrogenolysis and
Radiometric Colorimetry," ASTM D5504-94 "Standard Test Method for
Determination of Sulfur Compounds in Natural Gas and Gaseous Fuels by
Gas Chromatography and Chemiluminescence," or ASTM D3246-81
(Reapproved 1987) "Standard Test Method for Sulfur in Petroleum Gas By
Oxidative Microcoulometry" (incorporated by reference under
o  75.6).

Roger Kohn
U.S. EPA Region 9
75 Hawthorne St., Mail Code AIR-3
San Francisco, CA  94105
phone: (415) 744-1238
fax:   (415) 744-1076

John, in response to you questions below, im da man.  Ill call you today or 
tomorrow concerning  your possible suggestions and recommendations for 
dinner, blocking the rooms and the time for the event....the group had 
originally planned on blocking out 70 rooms.  Enough for the field DES's, 
safety specialists, env. and safety group in Houston, Danny Pribbles direct 
reports, Rich Jolly and his advisors, plus guests and speakers.......anyone 
else? 

John.Shafer.enronXgate@enron.com on 10/29/2001 09:52:44 AM
Meeting Planning Team,
This like it is on target at this point.  You should probably circulate the
draft to Pribble, after you are comfortable with it, to get his preliminary
buy-in.  Now, I do have a few questions.  Is someone talking with the
Little America Hotel in Flagstaff and blocking out enough rooms for our
meeting?  When can we get some preliminary dates (How about the week of
April 22, 2002?)???   If that week is not good, then go to the second week
in May as I will have serious conflicts with the first week of May.  Also,
who will be in charge of planning the evening dinners?  I would like to
talk with that person as I have a couple of "fun" ideas to offer about
where we might go for dinner.  Thanks to both the North Safety Team and the
SW Environmental Team for taking a lead role in this.  John

    -----Original Message-----
   Hi all,
   Attached is a rough draft of the spring Flagstaff Safety and
   Environmental meeting. Please feel free to comment, the second page are
   notes from our meeting with assignments.

                                << File: Flagstaff agenda.doc >>

   andy
   402 398 7183 office
   402 616 3438 cell

Bill as per your request, presented below is a status of the air permitting 
activity by the agencies as of today 11/01/01.

Stations 1 and 2. The EPA has completed is review of these state permits and 
has sent them back to the ADEQ for comment.  I have spoken to Shudeish, the 
permit engineer for the ADEQ, and he is reviewing EPA's comments as this e 
mail is being written.  He will give me a call when his review is complete, 
but he does not anticipate any major issues which cant be resolved prior to 
the public hearing.  These permits went out for public notice on October 15 
and 16, which means that the comment period ends on Nov. 15 and 16.  The ADEQ 
plans on holding the public hearing for both permits on monday Nov. 19 in 
Williams AZ. at 7:00 pm.  I plan on being there.  Williams is located approx. 
30 miles west of Flagstaff, AZ.  The address for the hearing is the Council 
Chambers located at 113 south 1st street.  So far, there have been no 
responses submitted to the ADEQ by the public.  In EPA's review process, 
they  had a problem with methodology proposed by Transwestern for measuring 
sulfur in the fuel gas.  We had proposed stain tubes in the custom fuel 
monitoring schedule, they wanted us to do wet chemistry.  We convinced them 
otherwise (Byron, because of this, you wont need to order a sulfur analyzer 
for the Needles facility.  This should save you about $40K).  There was also 
an issue with manufacturers quarantees regarding particulate matter emissions 
from the turbine and catepillar.  This has been resolved also.

Stations 3 and 4.  I received a call from Roger Kohn, the permit engineer for 
the EPA.  He is satisified with the permit application contents and has also 
approved stain tubes for the sulfur measurement at these locations.  There 
are no outstanding issues on these permits from the EPA.  The public comment 
period for the Station 3 and 4 permits ends Nov.  3.  After this date, it 
will take 1-2 weeks for the Regional Administrator of the EPA to sign off on 
the permits  and then he will have them issued to Transwestern.  As of this 
date, there have been no comments submitted to the EPA for the permits for 
station 3 and or 4.

Ill keep everyone apprised of future events.

Jerry, I have not cancelled the Station 4 air permit.  I have spoken to Roger 
Kohn,EPA permit engineer,  about the possibility of not doing the turbine 
installation at station 4 only due to what you described as not enough market 
commitment.  My plans are to hold off on making any decisions and have the 
EPA issue the station 4 permit.  If we do not initiate any construction 
pertaining to the turbine or auxillary generators, then the new permit doesnt 
apply and we can still operate under the existing permit which was issued 
about 2 years ago.  In Enron, 6 months is an eternity and who knows what will 
happern then?  By having the permit, but not constructing, we will be  OK.  
If we decide to do the turbine project  within the period of time that the 
permit is valid, then were ahead of the game.  If not, and a more firm 
decision is made to not do anything in the future, Ill contact EPA and 
request termination of the permit.  Usually, the agency places a caveot that 
if construction does not proceed in a specified time then the permit 
automatically cancels itself and the facility must comply witht he conditions 
of the existing permit for the facility..  

John, I agree with your points.  Has EPA already been notified?  If not, we 
should put the proper spin on it, which, in my opinion, should come from 
Marketing.  Something like, "we tried hard, and continue to try hard, to sell 
more capacity, but the market has not cooperated, so we must defer (not 
cancel) the station for now.  We haven't even told FERC yet, so you are the 
first to know."

Jerry

Larry,
(Caveat: The following is just an observation at this point and the view 
expressed is my own).  What concerns me most about this scenario is that we 
pressured the EPA Region IX quite a lot to get this permit and now we are 
just going to let a portion of it go "null and void".  At least, the portion 
applicable to Station 4.  I know we didn't lean on the EPA as hard as we did 
the AZDEQ, but we did repeatedly call them.  Even the FERC Environmental 
Staff was calling Region IX asking when were they going to get the draft out 
- because the FERC was under the assumption that we needed all or none.  

At a time when Enron's veracity has come into question all across America, 
its too bad there isn't a better way to handle this.  Don't be surprised the 
next time you go in asking for expedited treatment on a federal air permit, 
if the regulators look at you with a "question" mark.  I wouldn't say we 
"burned bridges", but we definitely used some "green stamps".  There are only 
so many "green stamps" that we can use with an agency and we used a bundle on 
this one - and now we don't need it.  John

Arnold, I take care of cancelling the air permit for Station 4.  Based upon 
other EPA permits that TW has withdrawn, if the construction activity does 
not take place, the permit by itself becomes null and void.  I have a call 
into the EPA permit engineer to verify this.  Ill let you know......

 << OLE Object: Picture (Device Independent Bitmap) >> 
Arnold.L.Eisenstein.enronXgate@enron.com on 11/14/2001 03:28:41 PM
THIS MAKES IT OFFICIAL..

Larry - It looks like we will not accept the air permit at station 4 and
will withdraw the application.    Is this correct?

Donna - what about FERC?

Arnold

This is to confirm our conversation today, the Transwestern Red Rock
expansion currently is scheduled to replace the existing units at Station
1, 2, 3 and 4 with a new unit at each station.  Due to market conditions,
Marketing and Operations have agreed to officially remove Station 4 from
the Red Rock expansion.  We will need to prepare (overhaul) the existing
units at Station 4 to flow the new incremental 120 mmcf/d.
With this information Environmental Affairs can withdrawal the air permit
application for Station 4 and Regulatory Affairs can make necessary
filings.
Thanks for your help.
Dan

Just to keep all permit information together, I spoke to Roger Kohn and he 
has sent to me the station 3 and 4 air permits.  We are now free to initiate 
construction at these two sites....

As Larry has probably reported to you by now, the public hearing last night 
in Williams was accomplished with a satisfactory result. Shudeish had copies 
of the draft permits, which Larry reviewed and found satisfactory. 
Apparently, about three weeks ago, Prabhat Bargava left his DEQ position as 
Section Manager, Compliance, to take a position with a consultant, CH2M Hill, 
which is trying to start an air group in Arizona.
I just spoke with Shudeish about how soon the actual permits will be issued. 
He said that DEQ had to wait a few days after the November 23 close of the 
comment period (this was announced at the hearing) to allow mailed comments 
postmarked on Friday, Nov 23 to reach DEQ. He then said that he expected both 
permits would be issued middle to end of next week (by Nov. 30): he said he 
had to blend the EPA issues into the permits, but that was not problemmatic. 
Larry talked with Shudeish last night about the EPA issues, and that did not 
seem to be any difficulty.
I then asked Shudeish why the comment period was extended until Nov 23 when 
the rule states that the comment period is only 30 days long and the comment 
period opened by first publication on October 17. The public hearing also 
must be no sooner than 30 days after first publication, and that is why it 
was set for Nov. 19. Thus, even allowing for a couple of days after what 
should have been the close of comment period (Nov 19, because Nov 17 was a 
Saturday), the permits should be issued by the first of next week rather than 
the end of the week. Shudeish said he would check and get back to me.
I know this is only a couple of days difference (assuming the permits are 
issued by Nov 30), but I am sensitive to Jerry's urgency to get moving 
quickly, and I also want to lay some groundwork to object if actual issuance 
starts dragging.
Please let me know if you have any thoughts or comments.
Van Wolf

The information contained in this electronic mail message is confidential 
information intended only for the use of the individual or entity named 
above, and may be privileged.  If the reader of this message is not the 
intended recipient or the employee or agent responsible to deliver it to the 
intended recipient, you are hereby notified that any dissemination, 
distribution or copying of this communication is strictly prohibited.  If you 
have received this communication in error, please immediately notify us by 
telephone (602-382-6000), and delete the original message.  Thank you.

G. Van Velsor Wolf Jr.
Snell & Wilmer L.L.P.
One Arizona Center
Phoenix , Arizona 85004-2202
602.382.6201 (direct)
602.382.6000 (main number)
602.382.6070 (fax)
vwolf@swlaw.com

The third quarter PCB meeting with Southern California Gas Company was held 
this morning.  SoCal presented a third quarter invoce of their PCB management 
and disposal activities for which Transwestern is responsible for $120,602.19 
(86%).  All charges were appropriate and considered normal operating expenses 
for PCB activities in California.  On a similar note, while speaking to Ralph 
Komai, PCB person for SoCal, some interesting things are happening on their 
system and are presented below:

SoCal is beginning to notice accumulations of PCB pipeline liquids on 
portions of their system which has been considered PCB clean.  It is these 
portions of their pipeline for which they have been petitioning EPA to 
declassify.  These liquids are not new liquids introductions into the SoCal 
system but historic liquids that have laid in their pipeline. Because of the 
fact that Transwestern is not seeing liquids accumulations at the compressor 
stations upstream of Needles, we know that liquids are not being sent inot 
California.  Due to the increase of Transwestern gas into the SoCal system, 
it appears  the gas is sweeping old historic liquids into these new pipeline 
areas.    

SoCal will be meeting with PG&E within the next couple of weeks to discuss 
the discovery of pipeline liquids at an interconnect where SoCal provides 
natural gas to PG&E.The PCB concentrations are less than 5 ppm.  The location 
of this  interconnect is near Bakersfield, Ca.

Southwest Gas has requested that 2 filter separators be installed at 2 
interconnects where they receive gas from SoCal.  As you know, Transwetern 
supplies gas to SoCal who then provides gas to Southwest.   The price of the 
2 separators will be approx. $33,000 plus installation charges.  Ralph stated 
that theses charges will show up on the first or second quarter of 2002.  Of 
note, Southwest has asked SoCal to install each separator on the SoCal side 
of the interconnect which means that maintenance and operation of each 
separator will be SoCal's responsiblility.  these charges will be passed on 
to Transwestern at 86%.

The third quarter PCB meeting with Southern California Gas Company was held 
this morning.  SoCal presented a third quarter invoce of their PCB management 
and disposal activities for which Transwestern is responsible for 
$120,602.19.  All charges were appropriate and considered normal operating 
expenses for PCB activities in California.

The public hearing was held in Williams, AZ for the Kingman and Flagstaff air 
permits under the Redrok Expansion.  There were no comments or concerns 
brought up at the meeting as no individuals came to the meeting.  An email 
was received from the ADEQ presenting the minor additions which will be added 
to each permit.  Each comment and addition will not impact or change the 
draft permits which were received earlier this month.  The permits for 
Klagetoh and Luepp were received from the EPA last week.  The permits from 
the ADEQ for the Kingman and Flagstaff C/S will be issued the later part of 
this week. 

Attended the incident investigation and technical writing workshop in Omaha.

Assisted the Mountainair team with the semiannual Title V compliance 
monitoring report  for C/S No.7.

A meeting was held in Phoenix, Az with PG&E to review charges and invoices by 
PG&E for PCB management and disposal activities on their system for the last 
several months.   Also discussed was recent liquids sampling results and 
proposed PCB activities on the PG&E system for 2002. 

Midland Team, the Martin Co. No. 1 facility is potentially in non compliance 
because there is new emissions data from the EPA which shows the units at 
this facility  emit emissions which would trigger a Title V air permit.  
Steve San Miguel and Stoney tried to conduct an emissions test  with a 
portable analyzer but were unable to collect representative emissions data 
due to the fact that the unit was in very poor mechanical shape and showed 
very high emissions.  We have a couple of options.  Spend the $$$$ necessary 
to bring the unit up to standards that allow a representative emissions test 
to be conducted and determine whether the emissions from the units trigger 
permit action or use the new EPA data and submit an air permit application.  
The choice is yours.  Understand, this permit if issued, places some 
recordkeeping and mechanical responsibilities on the Midland team.  Let me 
know what you would like to do.
Stoney,
Let me know what I can do to help.  Call me on the cell   713-408-9579
Gary

Larry, you need to direct this to them also, they dont seem to be to worried. 
I have asked them several times of the status of the work that needed to be 
performed but have not gotten to far. I think it would benifit us both if you 
would tag the Director and advisor for them to help me with this.

Thanks, Stoney

Larry Campbell
11/26/2001 04:34 PM
Stoney, whats going on with Martin1?  We are gooing to be in a crack with the 
state of Texas if we dont have some data which proves we are either greater 
than 100 tons of emissions on less than the 100 tons.   Give me a status

Thanks  Larry

Larry F Campbell
05/10/2000 10:21 AM
Sue---

Enron Energy Services sold Perry Gas 831dts for April 2000.
 .3902/790753

Enron Energy Services sold NUI 2579dts for April 2000.
 .3902/790753

LC

Thanx.  Very professionally written.  I only had to look up a couple of words.

LC

Butch, you may want to attend this
Fred Hansen <fhansen@nmoga.org> on 10/15/99 01:58:15 PM
>
> >The following information was received from Fank Gray and he got it from 
the
> Oil Conservation Division.  The schedule is attached to this E-Mail in
> Microsoft Word and I have added Adobe 4.  Also the New Mexico Oil
> Conservation Division website is www.emnrd.state.nm.us/ocd.  They also have
> the schedule in both  Acrobat Reader and Microsoft Word.
>
> In summary, the New Mexico Oil Conservation Division (NMOCD) will hold a
> training session in Midland Texas on November 9 and 10, 1999.  These 
training
> sessions cover most of the forms and procedures involved in dealing with the
> NMOCD.
>
> We have had good reports in the past about this training and members are
> encouraged to send their employees.  Things work much better when everyone
> knows how to complete and file the paperwork.
>
> Note that in the past there has been a $35 charge but the charge has been
> dropped.  Note that the registration forms should go directly to the Oil
> Conservation Division.
>
 - att1.htm
 - ocdtrg.PDF
 - ocdtrngmid.doc

test

Carmen---

My night differential has not posted to my last four paychecks.
The last time I received it was for pay period ending 05/15/2000.
Would you please include a retro adjustment to my next check?

LC
522-94-9373
x3-9351

http://www.vegasinsider.com/vhtml/u/ce/multi/0,2863,2606032,00.html

SCROLL DOWN TO OHIO STATE.

I did.  What does he want me to do with it?  Have him call me.

LC
713.853.9351

http://content.health.msn.com/content/article/1728.59719

Dan

I did not include them in the upload sheet b/c I path directly to them.

LC

As a result of feedback received at the July 6 reliability collaborative,
Con Edison has made the following changes to its capacity release/delivery
service programs for the 2000/2001 winter season.

First, to assist you in meeting your primary point obligations relating to
the firm load on our system that you are serving, Con Edison will make
available to Marketers 25,000 dt/day on Transco.  Your allocation based on
active customers in your group as of July 1, 2000 is
511 dt/day in the form of either:

  (a) a capacity release of Transco capacity at the
Transco maximum
   rate for the 12-month period November 2000 through
October 2001,
   or

  (b) a bundled citygate sale for November 2000 through
March 2001 priced
   as follows:

*  Inside F.E.R.C.=01,s first of the month index price at
    Transco/Zone 3 (Station 65) plus $1.00/dt.

 or;

  (c) a combination of the two adding up to 511 dt per
day.

Second, in addition to the above, we can make available to you 204 dt/day
during March 2001 as a bundled citygate sale on the same terms as set forth
above.

Third, with respect to the balance of capacity that you may require to meet
your primary point obligations,

  (a) There will be no citygate allocation requirements
for this winter, except for the 25% limitation on Texas Eastern. (i.e., you
may deliver     all of your gas to any of the
following receipt points, except that no more than 25% may be delivered to
Texas Eastern.

       Transco (Receipt
Point: 134th Street - Manhattan, Central Manhattan, Narrows or Long Beach)

       Tennessee (Receipt
Point:  White Plains)

  (b) We will permit you to meet the primary point
requirement using your Daily Load Following Service Quantity (for Load
Following Service)  or Daily Load Quantity (for Daily Delivery Service)
during November instead of the Average Day/Peak Month quantity used during
the remaining four winter months.

  (c) Prior to the winter, you can trade all or part of
your citygate allocation on Texas Eastern to another marketer, so long as
the aggregate entitlement for deliveries on Texas Eastern among all
marketers remains below 25% of the combined total allocation.

Please let us know on or before close of business Friday, July 28, 2000
which, if any, of the above-described services you are interested in.

NOTES:
1. We will advise you if additional capacity becomes available as a
result of actions taken by other marketers.
2. Bundled sales service is subject to the execution of a written
agreement (on mutually agreeable terms), including a take-or-pay commitment
and resolution of any creditworthiness issues.

Michele Doyle
Manager
Transportation Services

phone:  212-460-8172 fax:  212-529-1452   e-mail:  doylem@coned.com

Patty

Could you please forward this to Susan Fick.  I don't have her e-mail.

LC

Bret, what do you think about this?  We have pretty much proven that we are 
not the culprits is this activity.  I have a problem conducting an ongoing 
sampling for an issue that were not responsible for, even though we initiated 
the sampling activity.  I plan on visiting the OCD about this issue and 
either forcing them to justify why we should continue the sampling when the 
data points to our neighbors.  Additionally, because of the turnover and 
inability to get the guilty party to get moving on this, spending additional 
money and not receiving any return seems like a waste of time.  Thoughts.... 

George Robinson
10/22/99 08:42 AM

The last groundwater sampling event at the Eunice Station was completed in 
August 1997. Subsequently, the OCD approved our revised sampling plan that 
calls for biennial sampling. In light of this we were due to sample this past 
August. I held off on sampling in hope that Texaco would soon assume this 
responsibility, however, since it does not appear that this is going to occur 
anytime soon enough I will schedule a sampling event within the next four 
weeks. Since there are only six monitor wells to sample at this site, 
sampling can be completed in one day by one person at a cost of about $2500 
(including expenses and lab costs).

LONG ABOUT:

ET: 2500
PSEG: 4000

713.853.9351

	Enron Energy Services
	

Larry,  Please be advised that the three (3) Suiza/Tuscan Dairy accounts in 
Union, NJ behind Elizabethtown are ready to receive supply from EES beginning 
September 1, 2000.  Any questions, please call.

Call me.

713.853.9351

WHAT'S YOUR NUMBER?

BENNETT 4.994
HOMASOTE 4.996
REHEIS 4.93
WHITE  4.695

LC

PATTY DRUMM

LC

http://www.vegasinsider.com/u/futures/summerlin/NFLgames.htm

june  2000

bennett  4.689
reheis  4.689
white  4.689

homasote:

feb 2.9375
mar 3.104

lc

HAVE 2100 FOR JULY.

713.853.9351

Sithe Power Marketing, L.P.
335 Madison Ave.
New York, NY 10017
212.351.0680 P
212.351.0705 F
Janine Maher
Elizabethtown
July 1, 2000 forward

George, after Bret's memo, go ahead and conduct the sampling.  the soonest I 
can discuss the issue with the OCD is in the middle of November.  I have 
reviewed the reports and results of the studies conducted by us and them and 
the evidence weighs in our favor.  At your leisure and prior to the November  
OCD meeting,  prepare a memo to file of the resaons and justification based 
upon the report results and data why Eunice is not the bad guy in this and 
why Texaco is.  Gradients,  plume elevations and characteristics of the 
contaminants show that this is not our problem.  Id like to have sufficient 
evidence, both mine and yours, to force OCD to go afterTexaco and  get us out 
of this issue.  

I think this would also help Bret's case for having Texaco (or whoever is 
responsible)  reimburse Northern  for the costs we have incurred for what is 
Texaco's problem.

Thanx  

George Robinson
10/22/99 08:42 AM

The last groundwater sampling event at the Eunice Station was completed in 
August 1997. Subsequently, the OCD approved our revised sampling plan that 
calls for biennial sampling. In light of this we were due to sample this past 
August. I held off on sampling in hope that Texaco would soon assume this 
responsibility, however, since it does not appear that this is going to occur 
anytime soon enough I will schedule a sampling event within the next four 
weeks. Since there are only six monitor wells to sample at this site, 
sampling can be completed in one day by one person at a cost of about $2500 
(including expenses and lab costs).

EES sold for July 2000:

North Atlantic  2864
Kenilworth(Sithe) 337

LC

3.837

LC

NO

June

.2250 per dth.

EES sold for July 2000:

North Atlantic: 2721
Sithe:  0

Disregard the previous e-mail.  This is the correct one for July 2000.

LC

Do you have the final reads for July and the new ones for August.

LC

http://www.vegasinsider.com/vhtml/u/ce/column/0,2863,2643914,00.html

http://WWW.DANCESAFE.COM/

Demand charge for July: .60

The swing rate will be on the July invoice which is scheduled to go out, 
along with June, in about 2 weeks.
May's invoice should go out next week.

George, I will attend this meeting with you on the 16th.

George Robinson
10/22/99 01:42 PM

On Wednesday, October 20th, I contacted Ms. Barbara Bernacik at the Office of 
the Pueblo of Laguna, Division of Environment. I contacted Ms. Bernacik at 
the suggestion of Norm Gonzales (TW Laguna Team) to discuss outstanding 
environmental issues at the Station. 

In a conversation with Norm the previous week, Norm indicated to me that he 
had met with Ms. Bernacik and Ray Lucero (Engineer, Pueblo of Laguna) 
recently in regards to backfilling an open excavation which had been 
excavated in 1993 when a diesel UST was removed from the site. The excavation 
had not been backfilled pending authorization from the Pueblo of Laguna. This 
and other outstanding issues were discussed in a meeting with Ray Lucero, the 
Governor of the Pueblo of Laguna, Ted Ryther, Larry Campbell, Butch Russell, 
and myself back in 1995 but there was no resolution of the issues, primarily 
because at the time the Laguna's did not have an environmental staff person 
to address such issues. Subsequently, Ms. Bernacik was hired as the Laguna's 
environmental staff person about two years ago. 

In the course of Norm's conversation with Ms. Bernacik and Mr. Lucero, Mr. 
Lucero indicated some concern that the Pueblo of Laguna had not been kept 
apprised of environmental issues at the Station. In light of this, I have 
prepared a "Report of Groundwater Monitoring Activities". This report covers 
monitoring activities between June 1994 and June 1999. As previously 
mentioned, I also contacted Ms. Bernacik for the purpose of introducing 
myself and to inform her that a report has been prepared and will be 
delivered to her office. I also suggested that we meet at the site to discuss 
outstanding environmental issues. The response from Ms. Bernacik was very 
favorable and we agreed to meet at the site at 10:00 am November 16th. Ms. 
Bernacik also indicated that someone from the BIA will be with her.

Apply the storage gas only to our storage customers.

LC

ok

sorry.  apply it to our commercial customers.

LC

4.284

LC

PRICK

rstalter@nyiso.com on 08/16/2000 08:13:14 AM
Please be advised that Larry Campbell  from your organization has applied for 
a
digital certificate.  As a security procedure for the NYISO and our customers,
we verify each applicant with our contact list.  Our list for your 
organization
does not include this name.  As MIS Administrator for your organization, you
must confirm via email that this person is eligible for the digital 
certificate
applied for as soon as possible.

We appreciate your assistance in this matter.

Regards,
Ray Stalter

Raymond Stalter
NYISO Customer Relations
Phone-518-356-6077
Fax-518-356-6146
email-RStalter@NYISO.COM

Amber---

Marriott fell off July 1, 2000 behind BUG.

LC

Marlene, please call me if this is not correct.

Sherry 
713 345-3461

Can you help Sherry with this set-up.

LC 
	Enron Energy Services
	

Larry,

Here is the info on the Elizabethtown Suiza that should begin 9/1.  I was not 
copied on the e mail, but you should have received a notification to flow 
from JoAnn Lavine.  Utility turn on should be complete by CSC.  Please let me 
know if serving this site is a problem.

Thank you!

Susan

Mike,  I reveiwed the proposal by Adewumi and it is correct and fairly 
accurate, for the purposes of a historic account and and in as far as  what 
was provided to him in the way of data and history.  His proposed scope seems 
to be conclusive and appears to be what we need.   I have included Louie in 
the distribution  and am sure he will have some input. 

My comments are as follows:

1.  I dont know how relevant it is to know about the customers facilities at 
this time.  As you know, we have more than one customer (PG&E and SoCal), and 
I  think that we should maintain a low profile especially with respect ot 
SoCal.  Both parties in the past,  have been helpful and very cooperative in 
matters  pertaining to PCB's. Because the modeling study will be conducted 
between C/S 3 and C/S 2, the customers facilities should have no impact on 
this.  

2.  Also, I would like to see if we can deal with  PCB's and arsenic at the 
same time?  Is it possible to simultanously model both contaminants?

3. Because the modeling efforts are conducted on a very small portion of the 
pipeline, can this section be used for all of the Transwestern system?  In 
leau of  the fact that we have pipe under rivers, over rivers, major 
elevation chages in short distances etc which are not covered in the section 
to be modeled, will  the pipeline characteristics be covered to the extent 
that it will yeild information applicable to the entire pipeline system?

4. I am also concerned about stirring up the PCB's and moving additional 
PCB's into the SoCal system.  Its been pretty quiet  in discussions with the 
SoCal  PCB person.  I wonder if we should notify Ralph Komai to be on the 
alert when we start the cleaning?  Louie, thoughts?

5. Injection of terpenol into the station yard piping.  How will we do this 
and how do we get it out?

6. Impact of terpenol on gaskets, engine parts, etc.  

Dear Mike, David, Larry and Ben:
 Please find attached the draft of the PCB migration/cleanup proposal as
promised. This is only the technical portion of the proposal. Once we agree
on the specific scope of the work, the necessary man-hours and the
associated budget can then be developed.
 In addition, we have studied the material given during our meeting and have
developed a preliminary list of the data that we would need from you once
the project begins. I have decided to attach the list so as to give you
adequate time to collect and/or collate this information.
 Please give me your feedback on the proposal as soon as possible so that we
can develop the final version and submit an official proposal. Equally
important, the more preparation and planning we do at this stage, the faster
the progress that would be made once the project actually begins. Thank you
and have a wonderful weekend.
Michael A. Adewumi,PhD.,
Professor of Petroleum & Natural Gas Engineering,
Department of Energy & GeoEnvironmental Engineering,
The Pennsylvania State University,
202 Hosler Bldg.,
University Park, PA 16802
(814) 863-2816
(814) 863-1875 (FAX)

 - PROPOSAL_Draft1.doc
 - required_data.doc

mailer@util1.sportsline.com (Vegas Insider)@util1.sportsline.com (Vegas 
Insider) on 08/24/2000 06:34:32 PM
Please respond to mailer@util1.sportsline.com (Vegas Insider)
      VEGAS INSIDER.com NEWSLETTER
        === August 24, 2000 ===

Be on the look out for Vegas Insider.com's
FREE fantasy football and football contests
this season. You can win plenty of cash and
it's FREE to play. So get ready!!

Do you want to handicap winners like the pro's.
Then, be sure to come to the Vegas Insider.com's
'Meet the Insiders' seminar. Learn from the top
handicappers in the country, and see what it
takes to pick winners.

Stay on top of all the pro football and baseball
news with our up to date stories and arenas. See
what the Insiders have to say.

Click Here:
http://www.vegasinsider.com/

IN THIS ISSUE:

1.) FOOTBALL HANDICAPPING SEMINAR
2.) SEE OUR FREE CONTESTS AND FANTASY
3.) SIGN-UP FOR OUR FREE DAILY NEWSLETTER
4.) VEGAS INSIDER.COM FOOTBALL PREVIEW
5.) THE GOLD SHEET HAS WHAT YOU NEED
6.) CHECK OUT THE VERY LATEST MLB MATCHUPS

1.) FOOTBALL HANDICAPPING SEMINAR

Join us for our 3rd Annual Football Handicapping
seminar at the Stardust Hotel and Casino on
August 26th and 27th, 2000. Get all the inside
information about betting football this season

Click here for more information:
http://www.vegasinsider.com/vlinks/2/63/vegasseminar0824.cgi

2.) FREE CONTESTS AND FANTASY FOOTBALL

Thousands of dollars will be given away weekly
in our Fantasy and Office Pool contests. Don't
miss out on the action.

Click Here:
http://sports.dbc.com/cgi-bin/htx.exe/contests/contest.html?source=contests/vi

3.) FREE DAILY NEWSLETTER

Vegas Insider.com is pleased to offer you a free
daily newsletter. This comprehensive newsletter
will keep you informed of today's latest sports
gaming information. Sign up now!!!

Click here:
http://www.vegasinsider.com/vlinks/2/63/vegasletter0824.cgi

4.) VEGASINSIDER.COM FOOTBALL PREVIEW

Check out Vegas Insider.com to see how you can secure
a copy of the VegasInsider.com football preview,
which hits newsstands this month. The inaugural issue
will cover pro football like no other magazine on the
market. Also, this preview, there will be a bonus
pull-out section of the Gold Sheet featuring pro and
college football. Don't miss out!!

Click here:
http://www.vegasinsider.com/vlinks/2/63/vegasmagazine0824.cgi

5.) THE GOLD SHEET IS HERE

The Gold Sheet, the leader in sports gaming publications
for 44 football seasons, is offering Vegas Insider users
the kick-off issue absolutely free. This issue will give
in-depth analysis on the first week of the NFL schedule and
45 college football games. Key Releases, Stats, Angles and
opinions for nothing.

Go to:
http://www.goldsheet.com/cgi-bin/samplesvi.cgi?vi01

6.) CHECK OUT THE VERY LATEST MLB MATCHUPS

Vegas Insider.com gives you the most up-to-date look
at the MLB matchup pages. Click here to get all the
Game Day analysis you'll need for this year's baseball
season.

Click here:
http://www.vegasinsider.com/vlinks/2/63/vegasmatchups0824.cgi

****************

Sponsored by: VIPsports.com

VIPSPORTS EXCLUSIVE REWARD POINTS BONUS

Join VIPsports.com, the PREMIER ONLINE SPORTSBOOK,
through the link on this E-mail and receive a HUGE
reward point bonus:

Deposit just $5 and receive 5000 VIP points

Deposit $200 and receive 10,000 VIP points

Deposit $1000 and receive a massive 25,000 points!

Open an account today and be ready for the football season.

http://www.vipsports.com/javadefault.asp?sSource=Webst-346

Thanks for making Vegas Insider.com your first choice
for gaming information. If you know someone who
would like to receive this newsletter, feel free
to forward it to them.

Sincerely,
Robert Green
Manager, Member Services
Vegas Insider.com
http://www.vegasinsider.com

P.S. If you wish to be removed from this mailing list, please send a
     reply to this message to mailer@util1.sportsline.com and include
     in your reply the line shown below that contains your email
     address. The full text of this line is necessary in your reply
     so that we can correctly confirm your identity and promptly
     remove you from our list.

     All questions should be directed to VegasInsider.com Member Services
     at 1.800.211.4759 or E-mail to oddshelp@vegasinsider.com

[{(lcampbel@enron.com)}]

Gordy Hayes <ghayes@McWilliamsForge.com> on 08/23/2000 06:01:56 AM
 - Monthly Plant Fuel Use.xls

Looks familiar?

http://www.cnbc.com/commentary/commentary_full_story_tools.asp?StoryID=21748

Return-path: <CMN123@cs.com>

Return-Path: <baylor@texas.net>
Received: from  rly-yc01.mx.aol.com (rly-yc01.mail.aol.com [172.18.149.33]) 
by air-yc05.mail.aol.com (v75_b3.11) with ESMTP; Tue, 22 Aug 2000 13:20:37 
-0400
Received: from  mw1.texas.net (mw1.texas.net [206.127.30.11]) by 
rly-yc01.mx.aol.com (v75_b3.9) with ESMTP; Tue, 22 Aug 2000 13:19:38 -0400
Received: from Devin.texas.net (tcnet01-006.houston.texas.net 
[216.166.44.6])          by mw1.texas.net (2.4/2.4) with SMTP   id MAA22583; 
Tue, 22 Aug 2000 12:19:18 -0500 (CDT)

 - priceless2.jpg

whazupppppp!!!!!!!!!!

cert@nyiso.com on 08/21/2000 02:07:33 PM
Your NYISO certificate application has been approved.

With the same computer and browser you used to make the application,
you can pick-up/install your new NYISO digital certificate at:

http://cert.nyiso.com/displayBySerial?op=displayBySerial&serialNumber=638

Please contact Market Relations if you experience any problem
either installing or using your new NYISO digital certificate.

518-356-6060

cert@nyiso.com on 08/21/2000 02:07:33 PM
Your NYISO certificate application has been approved.

With the same computer and browser you used to make the application,
you can pick-up/install your new NYISO digital certificate at:

http://cert.nyiso.com/displayBySerial?op=displayBySerial&serialNumber=638

Please contact Market Relations if you experience any problem
either installing or using your new NYISO digital certificate.

518-356-6060

ckramer2@csc.com on 08/30/2000 07:08:58 AM
We still have not received the May LILCO invoice, nor the July Swing Rate.
Please advise when we will receive this information.

Thank you!

lcampbel@enron.com on 08/10/2000 11:50:22 AM

Demand charge for July:  .60

The swing rate will be on the July invoice which is scheduled to go out,
along
with June, in about 2 weeks.
May's invoice should go out next week.

jrevans@pplweb.com on 08/30/2000 05:41:26 AM
Hi Larry,

      We had to change your logon this morning. With the new release of
our software, the "&" does not translate well on your logon.

      Effective 8/30/00 your new logon is:

      PGEES-TE

      The password has been changed to match.

thanks

  Bill, we had an air inspection at the facility a couple of weeks ago and 
all went well.  Prior to the state visit, we went through a "trouble 
shooting" scenario and found out that Solar provided us with innacurate 
permitting information for that altitude and temperature.  Solar was very 
helpful and provided us with updated information to reflect conditions at the 
facility.  I submitted a permit revision and it was submitted to the state of 
Colorado prior to their inspection, requesting more fuel but no more 
emissions.  Recent testing has shown that even under extreme low 
temperatures, the emissions are under the original permitted levels.  Because 
we did not request additional emissions, I expect the permit to be issued 
within the next couple of months..... bottom line is that no NOV will be 
issued for the fuel use issue.

William Kendrick
11/06/99 10:06 AM

Larry---

Will the permit exceedances mentioned in one of your recent weekly reports at 
the La Plata station result in an NOV?

Thanks, Bill

dbrown66@csc.com on 08/29/2000 03:24:58 PM
Larry,

I spoke with Debbie Flynn this afternoon to acquire June usage information
for our customers on ELZ.  She said that she has faxed and mailed this
information to you.  Can you please let us know asap if you have that
information?  We only have two days left this month to invoice the
customers and would greatly appreciate your assistance in helping us do so.

Thanks!

Dyaniese

http://biz.yahoo.com/bw/000830/ca_juniper.html

http://www.vegasinsider.com/vhtml/u/ce/multi/0,2863,2717268,00.html

    The attached file contains directions for requesting Long Island
customer profiles electronically.  This will be in effect as of
9/5/2000, any requests entered prior to 9/5 and not received will be
distributed in this manner.

Gary Smith
Retail Access
516-545-3857

 - LI Profile Req. Directions.doc

http://quotes.freerealtime.com/rt/frt/news?symbol=RBAK&art=C2000083000243u6509

I'm going to be out tomorrow.  You can page me at 1.800.963.0942.

LC

get on her list
Jane James <JJames@NUI.com> on 08/31/2000 04:30:12 PM
 <<Cash Out Prices for August 2000.xls>>

Jane James
NUI Elizabethtown Gas Company
908-289-5000 X5745

Never Underestimate Initiative

Jane James
NUI Elizabethtown Gas Company
908-289-5000 X5745

Never Underestimate Initiative

 - Cash Out Prices for August 2000.xls

id lcampbel
psswd megan1

http://quotes.freerealtime.com/rt/frt/news?symbol=PMCS&art=C2000090100245b1087

I am no longer with the gas desk.  Please remove from list.

LC

Ken Earl
11/10/99 04:30 PM
Rich,  Heads up!

Larry,  This facility belongs to Rich.
Larry Campbell
11/10/99 04:14 PM
I just received a call from the TNRCC concerning an air quality inspection to 
be conducted at the above referenced facility on November 30, 1999.  The 
person conducting the inspection will be arriving onsite at 11:00 am.  I am 
planning on being present for the inspection.  It would be a good idea to 
have available and at the site the following:

 emissions fees paid for the last 3 years

 emissions inventories submitted for the last 3 years 

 1999 natural gas throughput

 inlet gas analysis for 1999

 H2S analysis for 1999

Also have the facility's air permit history for as far back as you can go.  
If your records have been entered into envisions, spend some time getting 
familiar with the data retrival and look like you know what you're doing on 
the 30th.

If requested, I can drive over on the 29th and assist you guys in getting 
ready for this......let me know.....

Tana Fry <TFry@allenergy.com> on 09/05/2000 09:47:36 AM
I have length in August.  Please call if you need gas behind Elizabethtown.

Thank you,
Tana Fry
781-906-2288

get on her list.
FWMO@dynegy.com on 09/05/2000 11:51:10 AM
I have 300 or so to sell behind the city gas gate if anyone needs it.

remove from list.  no longer with gas desk.

LC

http://www.scoresandodds.com/

Heard anything?

I'll call you later tonight.

LC

http://www.vegasinsider.com/u/football/college/2000returnees.htm

Larry F Campbell
09/05/2000 04:30 PM
http://www.vegasinsider.com/u/football/college/2000returnees.htm

Please be advised that the KeySpan Energy Delivery deadline for October
enrollments is Wednesday September 20, 2000 at 2PM (NY time) and the
deadline for drops is Friday, September 15, 2000 at 2PM (NY time).

We strongly recommend that you process your transactions as well in
advance of these deadlines as possible. Key Span will not accept any
transaction beyond these dates. Transactions that are rejected and
resubmitted subsequent to the deadline dates will not be accepted.

Your cooperation in compiling with this request is greatly appreciated

Thank You,

KeySpan Energy Delivery

Laura Kunkel
11/11/99 10:09 AM
Mr. C.  

Attached is an environmental matrix to install EFM on the existing fuel run.  
All work will be inside the Northern Natural Gas Kermit Compressor Station.  
The only excavation required will be for a pole and conduit.  

No asbestos will be disturbed.  No hydrotest water will be used.  

Roger W. - Am sending you a copy of this so you can obtain any necessary ROW 
permits.  Please give me a call at 505/627-9124 if you have any questions.  
ljk

Amey Mesko <amesko@NUI.com> on 09/08/2000 10:20:47 AM
Due to internal issues, the BTU factor, previously reported to the marketers
for the month of August 2000 as 1.027, was incorrect.

The correct BTU factor for August 2000 is 1.029.

Any questions may be directed to my attention.
Amey Mesko

Never Underestimate Initiative !!!!

908-289-5000,x 5263

Lawrence

We bought 100mw at $50 for HE 11-23 edt.  If the P&L shows 50mw, that's 
because we had to give the cash guys 50mw.

Larry C.
800-963-0942

I don't have an expense account.  I guess I'll let the money sit until I 
think it's safe to take it out.  Thanks for your help.

LC 
39351

I am short 2762 behind Etown,  Please call 603-430-5351 if you have extra
gas.
Thanks, Tom Dyer

get transmission done

http://mis.nyiso.com/public/rtapp/nyiso.html

click on this then bookmark it.

Datek????

Don Baughman@ECT
09/14/2000 12:30 PM
 - KELLOGS_.JPG
 - GREENGIA.JPG
 - TUBBIES_.JPG
 - SANDWICH.JPG
 - BASTARDC.JPG

Don Baughman@ECT
09/14/2000 12:35 PM
 - salsa_1.mpe

Jane James <JJames@NUI.com> on 09/13/2000 04:53:29 PM
September 13, 2000

Attached please find a letter concerning changes in our distribution on the
NUI/Elizabethtown Gas system.  If you are not the proper person to receive
this information, please forward it to that person and notify me so that I
may
update my records.  Thank you.

   <<E-Mail Marketer Distribution Ltr. 9-8-00.doc>>

Jane James
NUI Elizabethtown Gas Company
908-289-5000 X5745

Never Underestimate Initiative

 - E-Mail Marketer Distribution Ltr. 9-8-00.doc

This is just a short update on the conference call just completed with 
Michael Adewumi of Penn State, concerning the PCB pipeline modeling project 
proposed for the Transwestern mainline system.  David Roensch, Dr. Adewumi 
and myself discussed the latest proposal submitted by Adewumi and based upon 
his answers to the technical and operational questions, it appears that the 
model will yeild some useful information.  Adewumi was asked about the 
simultaneous modeling of PCB's and arsenic and feels that the model can 
address this situation.  He felt that by initiating the model to the pipeline 
segement  selected for the study (between C/S 4 and C/S3) this information 
could be projected to the other pipeline segments with physical and 
elevational conditions not represented in the segment selected.  As is the 
case with most projects of this nature, answers to some questions cannot be 
addressed until we begin the process. 

It appears that the next step in this process is to have Mike Terraso contact 
Michael Adewumi.  David Roensch and I will be available to feed technical and 
operational information to Adewumi for his modeling input.  It may also be in 
the best interest of this project  to see a team of technical and operational 
experts from Enron and Transwestern begin a  brain stroming of this project 
during the data input stage to address issues related to the field cleaning 
trials, both of the pipeline system and the C/S piping.  By working through 
the process, we may be able to alleviate some potential concerns  and 
increase the cleaning success.  Although Transwestern has been involved in 
this type of cleaning for a number of years, based upon the liquids data 
results, the system has met with variable success.  The more technical and 
operational information we can incorporate into the model, the better will be 
the modeling conclusions and results of the  cleaning activity. 

I am no longer with the gas desk.
Sherry is the contact person.
713.345.3461

Kayne--

I need you to e-mail these two people, carlj@pjm.com & grosser@pjm.com, to 
inform them that Zurita is no longer our oasis administrater.
They need Richard's info on file:

lc

Think about it over the weekend.  I'll call you Sunday.  The RSVP is next 
Wednesday.

LC

Here are the directions:

Bank of America 1.800.299.2265
 
 1) press 0# twice in order to bypass the voice menu and connect to an 
operator.
 2) tell them you need to wire funds.

Datek  
http://www.datek.com/popinframe.html?ref=/helpdesk/index.html&navNumber=3

 This link has all the info you need.
 On the left side of the page, click "Helpdesk" then "Managing funds".
 Scroll down to the heading, "Wire Instructions for Transfer of Funds to 
Datek Online".
 Have this page up while you talk with the bank operator because she will 
need the info off this page.
 
 
 

Scott--

Would you please include my name on all future e-mails.
I am the real time NY/NE trader.

LC

What are the Klan's attitude toward Asians?

LC

E*TRADE <etradeservice@etrade.0mm.com> on 09/21/2000 03:21:39 PM
						[IMAGE]
?						
						Get up to 25 trades on us!
[IMAGE]	[IMAGE]	[IMAGE]	[IMAGE]Dear larry:
			
			You've wanted to kick the tires. This month we'll let you test drive the 
whole car. Did we mention you could take it out 25 times? You'll also get the 
following great features:
			
			Trade stocks, bonds, options, and over 5,000 mutual funds 
			Free S&P Stock Reports-a $120 annual value 
			Free unlimited real-time quotes 
			Access to apply for IPOs2 
			Low commission and margin rates 
			CDs and Interest checking through E*TRADEc Bank3
			
			Open up a world of financial opportunity -- join E*TRADE  Securities today. 
We look forward to welcoming you as a  brokerage customer.  
			
			Sincerely, 
			
			Connie Dotson
			Connie Dotson
			Chief Service Quality Officer 
			E*TRADEc 
			
			P.S. Call us at 1-800-654-2360, and we'll help you fill out  your application 
over the phone -- just mention Special Offer  Code KR2.	[IMAGE]	[IMAGE]	[IMAGE]
						It's time for E*TRADE
						
		[IMAGE]	1Offer not valid for E*TRADE Bank, IRAs, retirement, business, or club 
accounts. Excludes existing E*TRADE customers or non-residents of the U.S. A 
$19.95 cash rebate for each stock trade, up to a maximum of 25 trades for the 
first 30 days your account is open, will be credited to your account. You 
will pay the normal rate on all stock trades at the time of the transaction, 
and your account will be credited with the rebate within eight weeks after 
your account is opened and funded. For listed securities orders over 5,000 
shares, per share for the entire order, add $.01 per share. For broker 
assisted trades, add $15. The rebate applies to stock transactions only. 
Limit one new account bonus per type of account. To be eligible, account 
holders must maintain minimum funding in all accounts ($500 for cash 
accounts, $2,000 for margin accounts, less any trading losses), for a minimum 
of six months. E*TRADE reserves the right to terminate this offer at any 
time. Not valid with any other offer. Other terms apply.
			
			2 IPO suitability requirements apply. No guarantee of receiving IPO shares. 
Please be advised that public offerings are not suitable for all investors. 
Public offerings are highly volatile and risky and should not be considered 
by investors with conservative investment objectives or low tolerance for 
risk.
			
			3 E*TRADE Bank is a wholly-owned subsidiary of E*TRADE Group Inc. Deposits 
are insured up to $100,000 by the FDIC. E*TRADE Bank and E*TRADE Securities, 
Inc. are separate but affiliated companies.
			
			System response times may vary due to a variety of factors, including trading 
volumes, market conditions, and system performance. The services described 
herein are available to U.S. residents only.
			
			Copyright , 2000 E*TRADEcSecurities, Inc. All rights reserved. Member 
NASD/SIPC. E*TRADE is a registered trademark of E*TRADE Group, Inc. All other 
trademarks and registered trademarks mentioned herein are the property of 
their respective holders.			
		[IMAGE]				
?						

HOW TO UNSUBSCRIBE:
You received this e-mail because you registered on the E*TRADE Web site, or 
on one of our partners' sites. If you do not want to receive partner e-mail 
offers, or any E*TRADE marketing e-mail, you can change your preferences now. 
You are subscribed at: lcampbel@enron.com. E*TRADE takes your privacy 
seriously. To learn more about E*TRADE's use of personal information, please 
read our Privacy Policy.
[IMAGE]

?
 - britneyspot.jpg

?
 - britneyspot.jpg

Tracy, thanks for the heads up.  Beginning in January of 2000, provide me 
with the new and old serial numbers for each unit and a closer exchange date, 
as things (scheduling, changeout activities etc.) tend to move dates around. 

Team San-Juan
05/14/99 09:31 AM
	

The Bloomfield Station will be exchanging three turbines in 2000. The La 
Plata Station will be exchanging one unit in 2000.

Bloomfield
#1001 on 03-06-2000
#1002 on 03-08-2000
#1003 on 03-14-2000

La Plata
#1 on 06-07-2000

These units are like for like exchanges.
                                                                Tracy

A meeting was held at C/S 6, Laguna on Tuesday November 16th, to reintroduce 
the pueblo of Laguna to Transwestern's environmental activities at the 
facility.  The Laguna's have hired an environmental person to oversee 
environmental issues on pueblo lands.  The meeting centered around three 
issues:  a UST site which had been removed, but not formally closed, a 
historic removal of asbestos which had been buried at the facility in the 
late 1980's, and the ongoing groundwater remediation at  the site.  

Transwestern provided a history of the above mentioned activiites and why 
these issues were unresolved in the "eyes" of the Laguna.  Transwestern 
committed to submitting closure requests for the UST and asbestos issues.  
With repsect to the groundwater issue, a presentation was given enlighting 
the Laguna representative of the difficult nature of the subsurface geology 
and groundwater characteristics to rapidly clean the contaminants 
(chlorinated solvents and PCB's) and Transwestern's intent to continue its 
remediation efforts. Transwestern assured the Laguna environmental 
representative that all correspondance and data pertaining to environmental 
issues would be submitted to the pueblo agency.   At the conclusion of the 
meeting, the Laguna's understood Transwestern's commitment to maintaining the 
policies and practices consistent with the pueblo of Laguna.

The meeting provided Transwestern and the Laguna's with the opportunity to 
meet and share ideas and opinions and initiate working relationships.  The 
Laguna's now have an understanding of the environmental activities at the 
site and what Transwestern's approach is to removing the contaminants.   The 
Laguna's appreciated Transwestern's efforts and commitment to environmental 
compliance on the Laguna pueblo.

?
 - britneyspot.jpg

sign me up.

I guess I can try to clear my calendar( ha ha).  Just let me know when and 
where.
Why am I the only one on this e-mail list?

LC

BOTH

Since I'm a single man, I would be willing to contribute whatever is 
necessary to make this a memorable event for you.

LC

do you have specific time info for saturday's activities?
i might be tied up in the morning.

LC

Noon works really well for me.
When did you make partner?

LC

tentatively, we'll leave Houston at about noon and get back to Houston at
about 10. we're still finalizing the BP plans and we'll let you know ASAP.

Regards,

Joe Jong

Thomason, Moser, Patterson, & Jong L.L.P.
3040 Post Oak Blvd. # 1500
Houston, Texas 77056
(713) 623-4844
fax (713) 623-4846
www.tmpjlaw.com

**CONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION**
This transmission contains information from the law firm of Thomason, Moser
& Patterson, L.L.P., which is confidential or privileged. The information is
intended to be for the use of the individual or entity named on this
transmission. If you are not the intended recipient, be aware that any
disclosure, copying, distribution or use of the contents of this information
is prohibited. If you have received this transmission in error, please
notify us by telephone immediately so that we can arrange for the retrieval
of the original documents at no cost to you. Alternatively, notify the
sender by replying to this transmission and delete the message without
disclosing it. Thank you.
>
> do you have specific time info for saturday's activities?
> i might be tied up in the morning.
>
> LC
>
>

what about lake charles?

what are you talking about????

you might want to get on this list.
Alert Posted: 4:25 PM October 7, 2000: Demand Mismatch Order Notice
Effective Monday, October 9, 2000 at 10:00 a.m., and until further notice, 
AGLC is issuing a demand mismatch order for the following primary pool :
South GA. VAldosta
Therefore, for Monday, October 9, 2000 at 10:00 a.m., Valdosta primary pool
 will be under a Demand Mismatch Order.
Based on the current supply levels and expected demand levels, AGLC's system 
cannot manage the potential excess demand and the operational integrity of 
the system will be threatened. Therefore, it is essential that your 
interruptible customer's demand does not exceed the scheduled supply for your 
interruptible market for each primary pool under the demand mismatch order.
This demand mismatch order carries a potential incentive charge of $30.00/dth 
for under deliveries to AGLC's system.
Each shipper/pooler/marketer is responsible for contacting their 
interruptible customers to curtail demand if necessary to meet this order. 
Marketers/Poolers are responsible for maintaining interruptible customer 
contact information. Any customer contact information in GOS is for AGLC 
internal use and is not intended to be marketers/poolers point of contact for 
curtailments.
If you have any questions regarding the demand mismatch order, please call 
Brad Freeman at 404-584-4993, or Gas Operations at 404-584-4477.

give me your number.  i'll call you in the afternoon, after 3:00, sometime 
this week.

LC

Jim, yes you will need a USGS 

Jim Tucker
12/02/99 01:59 PM
Gentlemen,

Please obtain proper ROW & environmental permits for the attached project.  
It consists of approx 25 ft of 12" pipe and block valve inside the WT1 
Station yard.  There will be a hydrotest.  And there will be minor excavation 
for the supports.

Butch, do I need to send in a USGS map for this?

Thanks Jim

call me after 3.
713.853.9351

LC

http://mis.nyiso.com/public/rtapp/nyiso.html

Gary,

I no longer work on the gas desk.  My replacement is Sherry Pendegraft.  Her 
number is 713.345.3461

LC

SORRY. WON'T HAPPEN AGAIN

Have you deposited the wedding check?  I'm trying to balance my checkbook.

LC

All,
?
You may already be  aware of this, but NYISO staff just revealed in a meeting 
that significant  opportunities exist to purchase in real time from the NYISO 
LBMP market at the  PJM proxy bus (i.e., as an external load), due to the 
impact of ECA 1006B.?  When the tie is import constrained in BME, prices 
there since the 1006 ECAs were  implemented have been as low as -$1000.? In 
this case the BME price would  be used for settlement, and you would be paid 
$1000/MWh to export power there  (as your export would offset inbound 
congestion).
?
As more people begin  to take advantage of this, the BME prices can be 
expected to be less  negative.
?
Caution!? If  you schedule a transaction DA, but it fails the DA checkout, 
when there is  congestion on the ties in BME, you will have to settle the 
difference at the BME  price, and could get hammered.
?
NYISO will probably  issue a bulletin about this later today.
?
Scott

Have you decided what time is good?

I'm free all day.  Give me a time.

Share information about yourself, create your own public profile at
http://profiles.msn.com.

 - Rack1.jpg
 - Rack10.jpg
 - Rack2.jpg
 - Rack3.jpg
 - Rack4.jpg
 - Rack5.jpg
 - Rack6.jpg
 - Rack7.jpg
 - Rack8.jpg
 - Rack9.jpg

KJ

I think its time that we did a maintenace spot check on the White units at 
the above referenced facility, to stay in line with the operating conditions 
of the facility permit.  It  would probably be a good idea to check on the 
emissions status of the Whites at the same time.  

9214 Sanford
77031

steve

send the failure to deliver message you got to my it contact.

daniel.muschar.enron.com

http://ca1.tradewave.com/tradeauth/userReg/SPP/EPMI

call me at home

Larry F Campbell
11/20/2000 12:29 PM
http://ca1.tradewave.com/tradeauth/userReg/SPP/EPMI

I would be honored.  Do we meet there or somewhere else?

Tom May
12/12/2000 12:44 PM
One of you folks should try and listen in on this.

Daniel Allegretti
12/12/2000 07:48 AM
Markets Committee Members:  A meeting of the Working Group of the Markets
Committee has been scheduled for Wednesday, December 13, 2000 from 9:00 a.m.
to 3:00 p.m. at the Holiday Inn in Holyoke, MA.  The meeting's agenda
consists of two items, both of which involve MR 17: (1) Transmission
Congestion Compensation and (2) Structural Screen for OP-4 (bid cap) type of
conditions.

Attached is a file containing two exhibits that provide congestion
information that, hopefully, will aid in the group's discussion on the first
item.  With respect to the second item, we will forward to you any materials
we receive.  If you can not make the meeting in person we have arranged for
a conference call.  The dial-in number is as follows:

Telephone Number:  (212) 293-3100
Passcode:  7837367

Thank you.

Don.

Also, attached is the directions to the ISO which show where the Holyoke
Holiday Inn is located.  As you get off 91 North you will see it on your
left just past the gas station at the corner of Whiting Farms Road and Lower
Holyoke Road.  To your right is Holyoke Mall.  If you should have any
questions, please give Susan Dumond a call at (413) 535-4097.

 <<directions.doc>>  <<Exhib for MC re Congestion Compensation.xls>>

 - directions.doc
 - Exhib for MC re Congestion Compensation.xls

Richard Hrabal@ECT
12/12/2000 10:46 AM
OPEN IN PRIVATE

 - NicoleVanCroft01.jpg
 - NicoleVanCroft02.jpg
 - NicoleVanCroft03.jpg
 - NicoleVanCroft05.jpg
 - NicoleVancroft04.jpg
 - NicoleVanCroft06.jpg

The state of Texas conducted an air quality inspection of the NNG Seminole 
C/S.  There were no deficiencies or violations identified at the facilit 
during the inspection.

The State of New Mexico Air Quality Bureau conducted an inspection of the 
Transwestern Atoka No. 3 C/S.  The Agency conducted a record review and did 
portable emissions testing of 3 of the 5 emissions units at the facility.  
Although fuel use and a natural gas analysis were not available for the units 
tested, emissions exceedances for NOx are expected for the 2 White Superiors 
at the facility.  

The State of New Mexico Air Quality Buureau conducted an inspection of the 
Transwestern Atoka No. 2 C/S.  The agency conducted a portable emissions 
testing of the two turbines and one recip at the facility.  Although fuel use 
and a natural gas analysis was not available at the facility, all units 
tested  appeared to be in compliance with the permit limits.  The agency 
requested sulfur readings from the fuel gas as required under Subpart GG NSPS 
for the last twelve months.  The Artesia team has contacted Gas Control in 
Houston for the for the monthly sulfur values at the facility. 

Leo, my computer has fouled up and I wasnt sure you got this so Im sending it 
again.....
Larry Campbell
01/26/2000 06:14 PM
The state of Texas conducted an air quality inspection of the NNG Seminole 
C/S.  There were no deficiencies or violations identified at the facilit 
during the inspection.

The State of New Mexico Air Quality Bureau conducted an inspection of the 
Transwestern Atoka No. 3 C/S.  The Agency conducted a record review and did 
portable emissions testing of 3 of the 5 emissions units at the facility.  
Although fuel use and a natural gas analysis were not available for the units 
tested, emissions exceedances for NOx are expected for the 2 White Superiors 
at the facility.  

The State of New Mexico Air Quality Buureau conducted an inspection of the 
Transwestern Atoka No. 2 C/S.  The agency conducted a portable emissions 
testing of the two turbines and one recip at the facility.  Although fuel use 
and a natural gas analysis was not available at the facility, all units 
tested  appeared to be in compliance with the permit limits.  The agency 
requested sulfur readings from the fuel gas as required under Subpart GG NSPS 
for the last twelve months.  The Artesia team has contacted Gas Control in 
Houston for the for the monthly sulfur values at the facility. 

Rick, its that time of year again, do your magic and approve the attached 
expense report
 
And thanx again for the Topock consideration, I do appreciate it.....

  

Marc Phillips
01/28/2000 06:59 AM
FYI. Another MACT workshop.

Marc
Marie Gutierrez <marieg@nmoga.org> on 01/27/2000 06:14:12 PM
The attached information is from Deborah Seligman.

 - 2-16-2000MACT.pdf

A. Marie Gutierrez
New Mexico Oil & Gas Association
505.982.2568
505.986.1094 (fax)

If I have sent you an attachment in ADOBE PDF format you will need the free
Acrobat 4 reader from ADOBE to view and print this file. You can visit this
site to get this free software.
http://www.adobe.com/prodindex/acrobat/readstep.html

 - att2.htm

For those teams that have turbines installed after 1990 and/or for those 
turbines which have undergone power  unit changouts, the following 
recordkeeping and monitoring conditions apply:

1) DAILY recordkeeping of nitrogen and sulfur must be taken of the fuel gas 
which supplies the applicable turbine(s). 

2) This recordkeeping consists of electronic recording (gas chromtograph for 
nitrogen and  delmar or equivelant for sulfur) or stain tubes may also be 
used  for sulfur. These DAILY records include measurements on Saturdays and 
Sundays.

3) The measurement must be taken at the location.  An exception to this is 
that the nitrogen and sulfur measurements may be taken upstream or 
downstream  of the applicable turbine facility provided that there are no 
natural gas deliveries into the pipe which would interfere or dilute/increase 
the measurements  for the applicable turbine fuel gas. 

4) Fuel gas records in hard copy form or equivalent  for  the nitrogen and 
sulfur must be maintained at the facility or at a central location for easy 
retrival.  

5) A turbine facility may waiver out of this nitorgen and sulfur daily 
recordkeeping requirement by obtaining a custom fuel monitoring schedule 
(CFMS) from  the EPA.  Approval of a  CFMS allows a greatly reduced 
recordkeeping and reporting for nitrogen and sulfur.  CFMS requests have been 
submitted for the  following facilities:

   P-1 C/S
   Plains Turbine C/S
   Atoka No 2 C/S
   Monument C/S
   Crawford C/S
   Bloomfield C/S
 
Approvals have not as yet been obtained.  Until issuance of a CFMS, an 
applicable facility is required to continue daily sampling for nitrogen and 
sulfur.   
 
Facilities which have received CFMS from the EPA include:

   La Plata C/S
   P-2 C/S

Please be advised that there may be certain reporting requirements that might 
be required for each CFMS.  I would strongly advise that the La Plata and 
Panhandle  teams review their CFMS and include reporting dates into MCS, so 
that the deadlines and reportings are not missed. 

If you have a turbine facility which is subject to the nitrogen and sulfur 
reporting requirements and would like to reduce the reporting burden, contact 
Butch or myself.

The biennial hazardous waste reporting for 1999 for Transwestern Pipeline 
Company was submitted to the states of Texas, and New Mexico.

A meeting was held in Roswell to discuss air permitting activites and the 
recent agency inspection of the TW Atoka No. 3 C/S.  Due to the agenciy's 
portable testing of units at the AToka No. 2 and 3 C/S, A plan was developed 
to address potential actions which may result from the agency testing.  Also 
discussed was NSPS fuel gas monitoring for nitrogen and sulfur and other 
miscellaneous air issues.  

Texaco has initiated soil excavation of an abondoned pit which may be the 
source of groundwater contamination at the NNG Eunice C/S.  An Enron  
contractor is onsite to oversee the activities by Texaco and to assist in the 
results of the investigation.

The 3rd request to Region VI EPA was completed requesting approval of 5 
Transwestern and 1 NNG facilities for custom fuel monitoring schedules.  
Initial requests dating back to 10/8/98 were included with the packet.  A 
phone call to the Regional Administer of Region VI was also completed.  
Pending additional lack of response,   a meeting will be requested to the 
agency requesting action and approval of the requests.

Data requests from Argent Consulting have been distributed to the field for 
the 1999 emissions inventories.

Results of the additional archeological and biological survey's for the 
Gallup C/S power transmission line 7C application have been submitted to 
regualtory affairs in Omaha.  There were no positive concerns or impacts 
identified which would require additoinal actions.     

Bret, per ;you request, presented below is a list of Priority 1 and 2 sites 
in Arizona, New Mexico, Colorado and Texas for which we have running 
horsepower and       emit emissions to the atmosphere.

     ARIZONA 

 Priority 1     Priority 2    

 C/S No. 3
 C/S No. 4
 C/S No. 2
 C/S No. 1

    NEW MEXICO

 C/S No. 7     Atoka No. 2    
 C/S No. 8     C/S N. 5    
 Eunice C/S     P-1
 C/S No. 9     Monument Turbine
 Maljimar C/S     Crawford C/S
       Bloomfield C/S
       Jal C/S
       Atoka No. 1 C/S
       Atoka No. 3 C/S
    COLORADO

       La Plata

    TEXAS

       WT-2 C/S
       Keystone
       P-2 C/S
       Lone Star Valero C/S

On a related note, I spoke to Vector concerning the equipment which was 
suggested for cleaning on the PG&E system.  It is as follows:

 2 scrubbers, some underground C/S piping, filter separator, horizontal tank, 
2-10.84 drip locations

The Vector proposal for mobilization, demobilizataion and cleaning the above 
PG&E equipment will be approx. $ 75, 000.  

I approached Vector about the pipeline cleaning between our M/S and their 
C/S.  They quoted a turn key price of $34,000.  Because this piping belongs 
to Transwestern, we should contract this cleaning ourselves.  If the decision 
is made to address this cleaning, I think we would want to have it done 
during the same time period as the PG&E cleaning activities.  I will also 
need some lead time to notify Vector and determine an appropriate methodology 
to be used.  Vector apparently has an approved methodology for cleaning pipes 
to 36".  

One additional note, apparently PG&E has discovered PCBs in their gas 
compressors.  In wipe samples taken of the internal compressors PCBs were 
found at regulated levels.....

 

Louie, I dont have any plans for a trip to HOuston, except for the Mage tech 
mtg during the last week in Feb. 28, 29, March 1 ,2

02/04/2000 02:23 PM
Louis Soldano
Louis Soldano
Louis Soldano
02/04/2000 02:23 PM
02/04/2000 02:23 PM
audrey - can you check with Steve's folks and see what thier schedules look 
like the next couple of weeks???

larry - any plans to be in Houston soon???

Laura - what does mike's schedule look like???

Steven Harris
02/04/2000 01:08 PM
I think it would be helpful from a legal and environmental standpoint so that 
everyone might better understand our resonsibilities and obligations. Thanks. 
Audrey can set the meeting up for you.

 Steve

02/04/2000 08:52 AM
Louis Soldano
Louis Soldano
Louis Soldano
02/04/2000 08:52 AM
02/04/2000 08:52 AM
Steve 

Do you see any benefit for some of us (maybe Mike Terraso, Larry Campbell and 
I - or some combination thereof) setting up a briefing session for you and 
your staff on PCBs.  We could provide some general information and well as 
Transwestern specific information/history that might make your group better 
equipped to discuss matters with some of our customers - particularly PG&E 
(although Jeff and Lorraine has been a quick study already). Based on Rod 
Boschee's last email they may be looking for us to replace their line 300 
before they entertain any increased flows.

Thgts?

A presentation was given to the Transwestern Marketing Group in Houston over 
the PCB issues affecting sales of natural gas into western markets.  The 
history and future potential impacts of market stratgies were also discussed.

A training session on the Dehy MACT was attended in Santa Fe which was 
sponsored by the state of New Mexico, apprising companies of forth coming 
requirements under Title III.  A request will be sent out ot the field for 
each location which has dehydration to complete a extended gas analysis and 
rich lean glycol samples.  Notification to the staes and EPA is due by June 
17, 2000.

A conference call was attended to discuss the C/S 8 turbine project and its 
fate.  Based upon submitted discussions it was decided to dispose of the 
turbine, compressor and auxillary box as a PCB contaminated waste and move 
the contaminated articles to a PCB landfill.

The quarterly Transwestern/SoCal PCB management committee mtg was held via 
conference call.  Invoices and charges were discussed which So
cal had charged to their management and handling of PCB's on their system.  
At 86%, Transwestern's responsibility was $71,208.61.

Clearances were received from the F&W and SHPO for the additional areas for 
the powerline transmission corridor of the Gallup C/S which is in progress.

A custom fuel monitoring request wqas submitted to Region VI EPA for the 
Transwestern Lone Star Valero C/S.

Installation and testing has been initiated on the precombustion chambers for 
the Superiors at the Atoka No. 3 C/S.   While fabrication is in progress for 
the correct chamber,  temporary Waukesha chambers were installed.  Even 
though the chambers were not of the correct size and configuration, a 12.5% 
fuel savings was achieved and emissions were reduced by over 56%.  The 
correct chambers will be available and installed sometime next week.    

Mike I wanted to give a short update on the latest events related to the PCB 
issue with PG&E.  Transwestern met with PG&E this last Wednesday with an 
agenda that included some sharing of sampling results collected downstream of 
their first C/S (Topock) and on out west toward their main distribution 
areas.  With respect to the most recent sampling data, Low PCB concentrations 
(N.D. to 38 ppm) have been detected in drips and interconnects between Topock 
and Hinckley C/S.  The good news is that PCB's have not been detected 
downstream of Hinckley which is approx. 160 miles from the Topock C/S.  PG&E 
has also initiated construction and installation of some drips and small 
separators at locations where their gas feeds into other lines or directly 
into customers.  the proposed installation date for the large mainline filter 
separators is still on target for 6/1/00.

Now for the bad news.  At the conclusion of the meeting, PG&E has stated that 
they want their Topock C/S decontaminated.  This includes all piping and 
equipment.  I stated to them the impractabibility and zero success rate of 
removing all the PCB's from their system and that there would be no 
quarantees that the deconning would be successful.   The contract PCB 
deconning companies only have permits which would guarantee cleanup to 10 
ug.  They were told that it would be impossible to clean everything and that 
in all probability the PCB concentrations would be showing up as the gas 
continues to move through the system.  Additionally, the better remediation 
approach would be to continue to remove PCB containing liquids at strategic 
locations.  Even with this, they were pretty insistent that their management 
wanted the facility cleaned.  Preliminary $$ estimates range to approx. 3-5 
million.

I think that this is only the "tip of the iceberg".  If they are successful 
with this action, the pipeline system will be next.  Their pipeline is not 
piggable and to make it such would require replacement of pipe, valves etc. 

Ill keep you informed on this,,,,,,,

Michael, our liquids data collections have been pretty lean.  Its only been 
in the last couple of months where we have actually collected any arsenic 
data.  I will send to you what data have have with respect to arsenic, 
including some historic reserch in the Abo field of southeast New Mexico 
where the arsenic is generated from down hole.  The source is not so much 
from what is coming out of the wells (catalyst towers were installed in the 
late 80's to trap the arsenic) as the residual which has collected in the 
pipeline prior to the installation of the catalyst towers.......

Gentlemen:

We should be concluding discssions today with regard to the contracting and
scope of work issues for our project with Penn State.  A number of data
needs have been identified.  Please review available information for the
following:

Larry - Information related to arsenic - analytical/source informaition.
Last three months of analytical on liquids from the pipeline.  We probably
ought to pull together the liquids information from late 1998 to present.
Sampling and lab protocols.  Any Liquids composition analysis.

Earl - Station Three and Four Schematics, Alignment sheets (focus on Section
4 so we do not overwhelm the Professor's team). Gas composition analysis
(primarily Needles).

Eric - please forward this to Ben Asante, Terry Gallassini, Frank Osborne
and cc: Mike Nelson and Rich Jolly.  Remind me to contact Neta on billing
information/format to send to the Professor's team .

Ben and Terry -  what modeling information/software can we share with Penn
State??

Frank - Mike left you a message about contacting the Professor's team on the
method by which we can transfer materials electronically rather than killing
an entire forest for the paper copies.  This is an enginerring facility so
they likely have similar capablities to us.

We will follow up when we return.

Louie S. and David R.

The Professor's phone number is :

Michael A. Adewumi,
Professor of Petroleum & Natural Gas Engineering,
Department of Energy & GeoEnvironmental Engineering,
The Pennsylvania State University,
202 Hosler Bldg.,
University Park, PA 16802
(814) 863-2816
(814) 863-1875 (FAX)

yes. let me know.

what's the final plan.  where? when? where do we meet?

don't worry about the margin call.  it's taken care of.

LC

what are you guys doing for new year's?

work 713.853.9351
home 713.777.0146
pager 800.963.0942

both. you have to schd. all your trades.

As a reminder, the state of Texas requires releases of natural gas greater 
than 119 mscf  to the atmosphere (in a 24 hour period), to be reported to the 
Regional Offices of the TNRCC.  These releases include but may not be limited 
to the following:  ESD's, startups, shutdowns, pipeline ruptures and 
maintenance activities.  Should any of the above activities release natural 
gas in excess of 119 mscf, a written notification should be faxed to the 
Regional Office of the TNRCC  within the following timeframes:

 Unanticipated Upsets- within 24 hours after the discovery of the upset. 

 Maintenance, Startup or Shutdowns- 10 day prior to the expected exceedance.

This reminder is being sent to all ET&S teams within Texas because in the 
last two Northern Natural Gas compressor station inspections conducted by the 
TNRCC,  they specifically requested backup data and reporting documentation 
of the natural gas releases to the atmosphere which were greater than 119 
mscf.  The agency's  inquiry specifically addressed knowledge of compressor 
station venting for ESD, start ups and shutdowns.

It should also be mentioned that there has been inconsistencies in the 
TNRCC's position regarding this issue.  However, until a position has been 
adopted by Enron's GPG, I am recommending that each facility comply and 
report as appropriate.

The fax numbers for the following Regional offices are as follows:

 Midland (915)  570-4795    Included facilities-  Wt-2, Walton, Keystone, 
Lone Star Valero, Spraberry, Seminole

 Lubbock (806)  796-7107  Included facilities-  P-2, Plainview, Brownfield

 San Angelo (915)  658-5431  Included facilities- Reagan Co. 2, Irion Co. 1, 
Eldorado

Reporting forms for the release can be faxed to your location by request by 
contacting me at (505) 625-8022. 

?
 - GRANNYL.MPG

user id: lcampbel
password: megan1

_________________________________________________________________
Get your FREE download of MSN Explorer at http://explorer.msn.com

Lisa Burnett
02/01/2001 12:51 PM
  Public Statement by the Rev. Jesse Jackson

  Due to the great consternation caused by the
  revelation of my act of procreation, I accept my
  obligation to give an explanation to the
  population for my act of copulation.

  I gave in to temptation, for the anticipation of
  sexual gratification, that I could not obtain through
  masturbation, resulted in my fornication.
   I accepted her invitation, and provided her with
  excitation, stimulation, penetration, replication, and
  liberation.

  She provided lubrication (to avoid inflammation) and I
  wore condoms to avoid contamination. She cried  for
  duplication but I insisted upon
  termination, in spite of her fascination with
  variation.

  This has caused me great aggravation, and the
  agitation and provocation of the media has resulted in
  my humiliation, denigration, and
  degradation. My wife is considering castration, which
  would require my hospitalization.

  Pray that this matter will find culmination in my
  sanctification and rehabilitation so that my plans for
  nomination to my ultimate vocation will not result in
  revocation and termination.I hope this proclamation
  has provided illumination and verification and will
  prohibit further provocation (or investigation).

  Sincerely,
  The Rev. Jesse Jackson

  __________________________________________________
  Get personalized email addresses from Yahoo! Mail - only $35

  a year!  http://personal.mail.yahoo.com/

nope.  what's the occasion?

http://ftp.fedworld.gov/pub/irs-pdf/f1040sd1.pdf

http://ftp.fedworld.gov/pub/irs-pdf/i1040sd.pdf

http://ftp.fedworld.gov/pub/irs-pdf/i1040sd.pdf

go to page D-6 for the capital loss carryover worksheet.

http://ftp.fedworld.gov/pub/irs-pdf/f1040sd1.pdf

http://test3.thespark.com/gendertest/

_________________________________________________________________
Get your FREE download of MSN Explorer at http://explorer.msn.com

http://www.quicken.com/investments/news/story/djbn/?story=/news/stories/dj/200
10228/BT20010228006390.htm&symbol=JNPR

Just a short note to let you know that I received a call from Rod Bosche of 
PG&E apprising me of a meeting PG&E will be having with SW Gas this tuesday.  
They will be discussing PCB issues and the sampling results from the PG&E 
system.   From discussions with Louie, a media statement is being prepared by 
them which Louie has a copy of.  The statement is a little harsh and makes 
some statements which are incorrect.  Louie and I are planning to attend this 
meeting in Las Vegas to possibly assist in making some suggestions about 
rewording their statement and provide some additional insight and history on 
the Transwestern system with respect to PCB's.  The results of this meeting 
will be forwarded at a later date.....

Chad Starnes <rrcs_98@yahoo.com> on 03/05/2001 09:29:55 AM
Note: forwarded message attached.

__________________________________________________
Do You Yahoo!?
Get email at your own domain with Yahoo! Mail. 
http://personal.mail.yahoo.com/

_________________________________________________________________
Get your FREE download of MSN Explorer at http://explorer.msn.com

 - aria01 (1).jpg
 - aria04 (1).jpg
 - aria13 (1).jpg
 - aria14 (1).jpg
 - aria19 (1).jpg
 - aria27 (1).jpg
 - aria41 (1).jpg
 - aria45.jpg

Chad Starnes <rrcs_98@yahoo.com> on 03/05/2001 09:29:55 AM
Note: forwarded message attached.

__________________________________________________
Do You Yahoo!?
Get email at your own domain with Yahoo! Mail. 
http://personal.mail.yahoo.com/

_________________________________________________________________
Get your FREE download of MSN Explorer at http://explorer.msn.com

 - aria01 (1).jpg
 - aria04 (1).jpg
 - aria13 (1).jpg
 - aria14 (1).jpg
 - aria19 (1).jpg
 - aria27 (1).jpg
 - aria41 (1).jpg
 - aria45.jpg

https://www.admission.com/html/seatmap.htmI?l=EN&CNTX=23689&C=US

9214 Sanford
 77031

1414 South Dairy Ashford #515
77077

id lcampbel
 password megan1

	
	

Larry,

Here is the NYISO detail for Bid Cost Guarantees for NE-PHYS book.

Rebecca

Megan La <megan.la@aspentech.com> on 04/11/2001 10:28:53 AM
ArdorNY.com-Manhattan's Best Value Apartment Rentals. 
=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=
WEEKLY UPDATE OF OUR LATEST & NOTEWORTHY APARTMENTS.
As selected by our apartment rental specialists on 04/10/2001
=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=
>>>Read at the bottom of this letter how to have your friends SUBSCRIBE to
our FREE weekly updates and SAVE up to $500.00 towards your next apartment
rental !!

>>>EMPLOYMENT OPPORTUNITY!! Do you work in property management in NYC, and
would you like to supplement your income as a R.E. salesperson? We offer
flexible hours and the necessary tools for your success. For more
information visit http://ardorny.com/hiring 

>>>Read at the bottom of this letter if you want to unsubscribe from our
FREE weekly updates.

STUDIOS : 

ID#24111)E89th/2nd Avenue. Mint Elegant Rent Stabilized Studio. Available
5/1, $1125/month. No Pictures available. For more info call 212-794-1330 or
send your email to info@ardorny.com

East 95th between 1st and 2nd. An affordable studio with great light and
separate kitchen area $1200!! View pictures at
http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=24223

East 90's/ 1 ave. DOORMAN, elevator.STUDIO for $1225 Exposed brick. Very
brite. View pictures at http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=24205

E70th. Rent Stabilized, sunny studio in prime location. Renovated kitchen,
spacious bathroom, hardwood floor and near subway. Available immediately.
Rent for only $1500. View pictures at
http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=23986 

W47/6 ave. Great studio for $1550, P/T doorman, very sunny, one block to the
subway. Pictures at: http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=23603

East 78/ York. LARGE studio apartment 500sf. NEW renovation. BIG
kitchen.$1750. View pictures at
http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=24101

Large studio in doorman building with private terrace.$1850.00 Pictures at
http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=24260

East 60's, one floor walk-up. Large renovated with huge terrace.$2095.00
View pictures at http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=24261

>>>NEW FEATURE!! Need to view 100's of other Studios?? Would you like to
receive CUSTOMIZED email, based on your particular apartment search
criteria?? To do so, click or visit
http://www.ardorny.com/apartmentsearch/index.asp  and register as a new
member.

ONE BEDROOMS: 

(ID#24062) 88th/2nd Ave. Really spacious rent stabilized 1BR $1495.
Available 5/1. For more info call 212-794-1330 or send your email to
info@ardorny.com 

90/1Ave All new one bedroom with laundry in building renting for $1500.For
more info and to see pictures click here
http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=22730

East 78/ 1ave. LARGE one bedroom. $1750. EAT-in kitchen. NEW renovation.
View pictures at http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=24006

E75/1Ave. Completely renovated 1br in prime location. Very Bright!! All new
appliances!! See pictures at:
http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=24057

East 10th, 1st ave, renovated one bedroom to see pictures at
http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=23993

W.82nd/CPW. True brownstone one bedroom separate kitchen, fireplace, steps
to Central Park. To view photos click here:
http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=24007

East 51st/3rd ave. Great one bedroom with tons of light on outstanding
midtown block. To view go to:
http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=23138

West 72nd and Broadway. Renovated 1 BR in the heart of the UW side. $1900!!
View pictures at http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=24219

West 21st between 7th and 8th. 1 BR in great Chelsea location with
dishwasher and fireplace. View pictures at
http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=23954

W10th St. One bedroom w/lots of natural light and near subway for $2200.
Pictures at: http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=23005

East 72/2nd. Lots of sun in this lovely 1br/1ba. Charming doorman building!
Large closets and nice kitchen. See pictures at:
http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?=id23509

E54/2. Truly luxury bldg, great one bedroom apt for $2500.00, high floor.
Must see! Pictures at: http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=22545

E40/2. One bedroom apt, lux doorman. You will love it! Sun deck,pool, kids
pool, sauna, incredible view. Only $2550. Pictures at:
http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=22624

Broadway/Rector Doorman Alcove studio with 19 foot ceilings and terrace for
$2550. To view pictures click
http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=24071

77/Lex.Ave All new large one bedroom in prime upper east location for
$2600.For more info and to see pictures click here
http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=22040

East 89th and Park Avenue. Luxury 1 BR over 800 SQ FT!! $2950. View pictures
at http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=24222.

East 75/2nd. Enormous 1br/1ba in Luxurious doorman building. Must see!
Incredible views. $3000. Pictures at:
http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=23509

E80/1st Ave. PENTHOUSE. Furnished one bedroom apartment on a doorman bldg.
$3000.00. Short-time OK! Pictures at:
http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=24210

East 93rd/1st-Fully furnished, 1br with 24hr doorman. panoramic city views,
all utilities incl, health club, can rent for just 1 month! $3300. View
pictures: http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=22937

>>>NEW FEATURE!! Need to view 100's of other 1-Bedrooms?? Would you like to
receive CUSTOMIZED email, based on your particular apartment search
criteria?? To do so, click or visit
http://www.ardorny.com/apartmentsearch/index.asp  and register as a new
member.

TWO BEDROOMS: 

W49/9th Ave. All new rent stabilized real 2BR $1600! More info at
http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=23681

East 75/ 1ave. Brand NEW renovation. Two bedroom. VERY QUIET. $1750 More
info at http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=24055 

East 66th Street between 1st Ave and 2nd Ave. Huge sharable 1BR for $2001.
Very sunny. View pictures at http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=19500

East 94th/off 2nd. A Gut Renovated two bedroom near 96 subway. Only $2400.
View pictures at: http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=24098

West 69th/off Central Park West. A 1 bedroom/convertible to 2 bedroom,
terrace, laundry and dog friendly. Only $2500. View pictures at:
http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=23596

84th/Lexington. Huge two bedroom apartment in great neighborhood with two
minute walk to express trains to view go to:
http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=20057

East 74th/3rd. Outstanding 2 bedroom, 2 bathroom apartment on Great Upper
East Side block. Check out these pictures:
http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=22118

East 88th/1st Ave. Spacious renovated 2 bedroom with jacuzzi and dishwasher.
Available immediately. Rent for only $2850. View pictures at
http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=23316

Sullivan street and Spring street. Brand new 2BR for $2900. Laundry in the
building. View pictures at http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=22829 

WEST 90's/Broadway. PRE-WAR, DOORMAN 2bedroom.All NEW. Excellent condition.
$3500. View pictures at http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=23961

East 34th/off 2nd. A renovated, two bedroom conv, over 1200 sq ft, city
views, dishwasher, and dog friendly. Only $3800. View pictures at:
http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=23549

E.60's. Magnificent carriage house duplex two bedroom with dining room plus
private garden. To view photos at
http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=24226

>>>NEW FEATURE!! Need to view 100's of other 2-Bedrooms?? Would you like to
receive CUSTOMIZED email, based on your particular apartment search
criteria?? To do so, click or visit
http://www.ardorny.com/apartmentsearch/index.asp  and register as a new
member.

THREE BEDROOMS AND OTHERS

E.79/2nd. Elevator converted three bedroom, kitchen with dining area plus
two balconies.$3195. To see pictures click at
http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=22602

82nd and 3rd Ave. Very sunny and very large 3BR for $3200. Great views. See
pictures at http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=23613

East 53rd/3rd. Outstanding 3 bedroom apartment on great block with a two
minute walk to subway. To view go to:
http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=22988

West 80th/off Columbus-Duplex 2 bed/conv to 3. Working fireplace, washer
&dryer, private backyard, all new, over 1100 sq ft and dog friendly! $4000,
Click: http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=22247

Sullivan/Prince All new three bedroom in heart of Soho renting for
$4200.Click here for pictures and info
http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=24004

TRIBEKA/ Warren st. LOFT open space 1700sf. Floor thru. PETS OK. $4900. View
pictures at: http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=21708

>>>NEW FEATURE!! Need to view 100's of other 3-Bedrooms?? Would you like to
receive CUSTOMIZED email, based on your particular apartment search
criteria?? To do so, click or visit
http://www.ardorny.com/apartmentsearch/index.asp  and register as a new
member.

=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=
>>> Have your friends and colleagues SUBSCRIBE to our FREE weekly updates
and receive a $25.00 INTSTANT REBATE off our commission towards your next
apartment rental FOR EACH SUBSCRIBER ($500.00 maximum for 20 or more
referrals) when we act as the principal broker in consummating your rental
deal on any of our exclusive apartments. There is NO expiration date to our
offer! Here is how you do it:
Forward this update to them and ask them to send an email to
info@ardorny.com with the word SUBSCRIBE in the subject line (not the text
body!) of their email. It's that simple!
=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=
>>> To stop receiving our updates, please reply to this email and type the
word REMOVE in the subject line (NOT the text body) of your email. 

Please note: In your reply you must use the same email account used to
receive our updates. Otherwise we will not be able to locate and remove your
information from our database.
=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=
Information contained herein has been obtained from the owner of the
property or from other sources deemed reliable. However, no warranty or
guarantee, either express or implied, is made with respect to its accuracy
All information is subject to change without notice and/or prior leasing.

Steve, you have been given all the written permit history and portable 
analyzer correspondance from myself to and from the State of New  Mexico.  
All of my air permit files were copied and sent to you previously.  If there 
is confusion, I apologize but everything that has been agreed to by the State 
of New Mexico has been made available for review and use.

If I need to sit down with you and or others to go over this, let me know.    

Steve SanMiguel
03/13/2000 08:12 PM

Larry

    This will work just fine, just after the call is made to me concerning a 
NM Audit, please send me a lotus note concerning this request.  
Their have been to misunderstandings and confusion concerning portable 
testing in New Mexico and I need this for my protection.

Again if their are any questions or concerns pertaining to this request, I 
encourage anyone to call.

Office:  1/505/625/8039
Cell:      1/505/626/6208
Page:   1/800/223/9498
Home:  1/505/623/2799 Adults
Kids:     1/505/623/4230

Thank you

Steve San Miguel

Larry Campbell
03/13/2000 10:29 AM
Steve due to New Mexico's new focus on conducting surprise inspections, there 
may not  be the opportunity of advanced notice.  In  the effort to keep 
everyone in the loop,  notification will be made to those individuals when I 
receive a call from the state.

Steve SanMiguel
03/09/2000 08:42 PM

Larry and Butch

         In the future if their is a request for portable testing in State of 
New Mexico, or if the AQB is performing an audit at any facility, I will 
support and go where ever necessary day or night.  

       I would only ask that after the call that this is put in Lotus notes 
for my personal records.

I'm sure you can understand.

If anyone has any questions or concerns please feel free to call.

Office:  1/505/625/8039
Cell:     1/505/626/6208
Page:     1/800/223/9498
Home: 1/505/623/4239

I do appreciate your support.

Thanks

Steve San Miguel

Chad Starnes <rrcs_98@yahoo.com> on 04/18/2001 11:09:24 AM
Note: forwarded message attached.

__________________________________________________
Do You Yahoo!?
Yahoo! Auctions - buy the things you want at great prices
http://auctions.yahoo.com/
CD

> The Teabagging
> The all time classic maneuver of tapping your cock
on her forehead 
whilst
> she is sucking on your balls, and uttering the
timeless phrase 
''Who's
> Your daddy''
>
> The Houdini
> Going at it doggy-style until you are just about to
come,
> then pull out and spit on her back so she thinks
that you
> have. When she turns around a blast is unleashed
into her face and 
she is
> left shocked
> and amazed, wondering how you managed it.
>
> The Angry Dragon
> Immediately after you blow your load in a girl's
mouth,
> smack the back of her head and make it come out her
nose.
> When she gets up she'll look like an angry dragon.
>
> Cum Guzzling Sperm Burping Bitch
> The once in a lifetime act of blowing a hot steamy
load down
> the back of a girl's throat and then proceeding to
give her a large 
cold
> bottle of your favorite carbonated drink, making her
guzzle
> it down. Then, shake her head vigorously back and
forth to
> create the Cum Guzzling, Sperm Burping effect. A
great way to impress
> your friends.
>
> Dirty Sanchez
> A time honored event in which while laying the bone
doggy-style, you
> insert your finger into her asshole. You then pull
it out and wipe it
> across her upper lip, leaving a thin shit moustache.
This makes her 
look
> like someone whose name is Dirty Sanchez.
>
>
> The Donkey Punch
> Banging a girl doggy style and then moments before
you cum, you stick
> your dick in her ass and then punch her in the back
of the neck. The 
blow
> to the neck will stun the muscles in the female's
ass, which will
> constrict the penis and give you a tremendous
orgasmic experience 
when
> you ejaculate.
>
> The Flaming Amazon
> This one's for all you pyromaniacs out there.
> When you're screwing some chick, right when your
about to cum, pull 
out
> and quickly grab the nearest lighter and set her
pubes on fire,
> then...extinguish the flames with your jizz!
>
>
> The Flying Camel
> A personal favorite. As she is lying on her back and
you are 
hammering
> her on your knees, you very carefully move forward
and prop yourself
> (without using your arms) on your dick while it is
still inserted in 
her
> vertical seafood taco. You then proceed to flap your
arms and let out 
a
> long shrieking howl, much like a flying camel.
> Strictly a classy move.
>
>
> The Screwnicorn
> When you get a dyke to put her strap-on dildo on her
forehead and 
proceed
> to go at her partner like a crazed unicorn.
>
>
> The Zombie Mask
> While getting head from your
favorite,unsuspecting,trash-barrel 
whore,
> tell her you want her to look right up at you with
those "pretty 
little
> eyes" when you blow your load. Then, just when
you're ready to spew a
> good week's worth of goo, blast that hefty load in
both eyes. This
> temporary state of blindness will produce the zombie
effect as she
> stumbles around the room with arms outstretched, and
moaning like the
> walking dead.
>

--- Mark Reagan <markreagan@yahoo.com> wrote:
> I just left a message for a guy named freddie
> sanchez.
> This made me laugh. Has anyone seen the list with
> dirty sanchez bitch,donkey punch bitch,or chili dog
> bitch in awhile??That is some funny stuff
> 
> __________________________________________________
> Do You Yahoo!?
> Yahoo! Auctions - buy the things you want at great
> prices
> http://auctions.yahoo.com/

__________________________________________________
Do You Yahoo!?
Yahoo! Auctions - buy the things you want at great prices
http://auctions.yahoo.com/

Larry, Here's my resume.  Please provide a copy to your boss and with a good 
recommendation!

Thanks,
Jesus

Jay Blaine@EES
04/24/2001 06:58 AM
	

Larry, I notice a posting for ENA East Power Service DE position in your 
area.  I would appreciate if you could give me a call concerning the position 
and any insights you may have about the Power Desk.  Also, if you could 
forward my resume to Edwin Coulter, it would be greatly appreciated.  Please 
keep this confidential.  Thanks, Jay

Zarin Imam@EES
05/10/2001 01:26 PM
Larry,

 YOU ARE THE BEST!   Thank you !   Look at it before you give it out!

 

Thanks

Z

i do not know this person.  i think you have the wrong larry campbell.

your resume is good enough b/c i gave it directly to the hiring people.

Don Baughman@ECT
05/16/2001 11:08 AM
 - GirlsEvil.jpg

Don Baughman and Juan Hernandez.  If the listing you saw says Edwin Coulter, 
he no longer is part of the group.

LC

No. thank you

Frank Sosa
03/20/2000 04:18 PM
Sent by: Frank Sosa
Larry. your Emissions fees for Eunice compressor station is in system.    
Thanks

Mike, I spoke to Ralph and he gave me an open week of April 17th in San 
Francisco.  He thought that one day would be more that adequate.  I need to 
have somebody contact the PG&E side for their availablity during that week.  
Should I or someone else contact Rod Bosche or let Louie do this from his end 
with our legal contacting their legal? 

Some of the highlights that I had requested to Ralph for his presentation was 
the following:
 
  PCB's are a contaminant, just as benzene is, which occurs naturally in the 
gas.  Health issues of PCBs in pipeline are not a concern especially from a  
customer and employee standpoint (the name PCB lends itself to public outcry 
of the unknown)

 Removal of PCB's is best accomplished by managing liquids, not deconing

 Fiilter separators are a proven method of PCB removal

 Transwestern's proactive assistance with SoCal on their system to manage 
their PCBs

 Most pipelines on the east coast have PCB's and no adverse environmental 
impacts have occurred

 

Michel Nelson
03/28/2000 09:18 AM

Excellent - If possible, I would wish to attend, as well. I approve the 
expense and hourly rate. Might be the bargain of the century. Mike

Larry Campbell
03/28/2000 08:47 AM
I spoke with Ralph Komai, PCB expert for SoCal, concerning his availability 
to conduct a training session for PG&E and enlighten them on the reality of 
PCB's in natural gas pipelines.  He has stated that he would be available to 
do this as long as Transwestern picks up his expenses and hourly rate  
($200.00/hr).  As per your approval, Louie, I will inform Ralph that we are 
in agreement with his conditions and I will schedule a day when he would be 
available in California to put on the training for PG&E.

Based upon valving constraints and the innaccessability to the inside of the 
pipe between our M/S and the Topock C/S, a decision has been made to postpone 
cleaning of his section of the pipeline.  should cleaning occur of this 
section, it is anticipated that it will not occur untill the installation of 
the filter separator at the PG&E C/S, sometime later this year.  Vector has 
been notified of this change in plans and will adjust their cleaning 
schedule  accordingly. 

A meeting was held with the Roswell Team at C/S No 8 discuss roles and 
responsibilities of the Title V Operating Permit for the Corona C/S.

The sale of the TW Crawford C/S has been cancelled.  A permit revision was 
requested to the Air Quality Bureau to transfer the new permit to the 
existing facility to keep intact the ability to conduct turbine power unit 
replacements without agency notification.

Preparations are in place for the forthcoming meeting between PG&E and 
Transwestern over PCB issues on their mainline.  Analytical shows that the 
PCB's are continuing to move further downstream into their system.  Ralph 
Komai, with SoCal, will make a presentation concerning  SoCal's experience 
with PCBs on mainline and LDC systems and present it during the 4/20 meeting 
in San Francisco.

The annual certification for the Atoka No. 3 C/S was reveiwed for completion 
and submitted to M. Nelson for signature.

 

Michael, we may have to petition the teams for theri analytical 

Hi Larry:
 I have just received this file and I am really very grateful. Thanks for
the efforts. Best Regards,
Michael

Tiny, I have been sending the analyticals to Michael.  I m sorry that they
are not reaching him.  Ill switch to plan B.  I will  have hard copies of
the analyticals he needs when I see you in Gallup on Thursday.  I have
attached my PCB file to this memo for review.

                    (See attached file: Pcb.xls)

David Roensch
04/19/2000 06:22 PM

Please see the attached file and notes on this years pigging activites from
Station 5 through Needles.  This does not include all the analyticals for
this time period but should represent 90% of all pigging activites.  Filter
and scrubber samples may also exist.

Larry can you give a hand with this?  I thought these results were already
forwarded to Penn State weeks ago and being forwarded on an ongoing basis.
They have yet to receive any historical sampling data either.  Please
advise.

(See attached file: 011600.xls)

Rich, this is the public notice for the groundwater remediation at the TW 
North Crawar facility. Because we are emitting emissions to the air from the 
contamination in the groundwater, we had to have a permit.....
George Robinson
04/24/2000 04:17 PM

Larry, the attached file contains a scanned image of a story that was 
published in The Monahans News, a weekly paper, on Thursday, April 20, 2000. 
I've shown the story to Bill, and he suggested that you let Rich Jolly know 
about the story.

Thanks, George

04/24/2000 03:21 PM
Michelle Muniz
Michelle Muniz
Michelle Muniz
04/24/2000 03:21 PM
04/24/2000 03:21 PM
I hope this works.  MM

Larry, as per our conversation, presented below are the emissions factors 
provided by the state of Colorado for the T-7000 Centaur under permit 
97LP0653 :

  PM10   14.000/MMSCF

  TSP   14.000/MMSCF

  NOx   0.100/MMBTU

  CO   0.121/MMBTU

  VOC   0.0348/MMBTU

  Formaldehyde  0.00438/MMBTU

  acetaldehyde  0.00546/MMBTU

As you already know, the emissions factors for the Centaur 50H turbine under 
permit 97LP0885 can be found on page 5 of this permit which was issued on 
October 6, 1999.

Remember, the state has given us until May 19 to have the rolling emissions 
calculations completed for both turbines at the facility.

George/Norm because there is no immediate concern or liability with the 
partially filled excavation, I want us wait for the official letter from the 
tribe before taking it upon ourselves to fill the excavation.  I dont want to 
send  a message to the Lagunas about us taking environmental matters into our 
own hands without involvement from the tribe.  If there is a reason to 
expidite the covering of this open area, then lets  send another  letter 
requesting to do so.  Given the other issues yet to be resolved at the 
station, lets keep the tribe involved and a part of our environmental 
activities.  I want to maintain a good working relationship with these 
people.  

As you may remember, they were a little irritated by Transwestern's neglect 
of not keeping them in the loop previously.  Lets not open that type of issue 
again...... 

George Robinson
05/05/2000 02:00 PM

Norm:
Per our telephone discussion this afternoon, I suggest you go ahead and 
backfill what remains of the open excavation that was created when the diesel 
UST was removed. A closure report was submitted to Ms. Bernacik of the Laguna 
Pueblo Environmental Department in January. We have not received a formal 
response from the Pueblo yet, but in a phone conversation, Ms. Bernacik 
indicated that they would have to take a closer look at the report before 
making a decision. Regardless, I don't think we need to wait on an approval 
of the closure report before backfilling the excavation. 
Thanks, George

will do....

Rich Jolly on 05/15/2000 10:25:38 AM
Have fun and let me know how Tracey comes out.

Larry Campbell
05/15/2000 10:01 AM
Tracy, Ill meet you at the bloomfiled C/S at 8:00 am on May 25 for the 
verification process.

Team San-Juan
05/15/2000 10:13 AM
Larry Rick Smith sent you my Environmental Two that Butch Russell signed me 
off on. I need to know when we can get together so that you can verify it.
                                                            Tracy Kuehl

1. Status of Mainline Filter Separator Project.

Earl Chanley has indicated that the June 1 target date for in service is on 
schedule.  There will be 2 mainline separators for each mainline system.  
PG&E is also on schedule for June 5 & 7 pipeline tie ins to each bank of 
separators.  The only outstanding issue is an air permit for the 1200 gallon 
tank at the separator installation site.  This is a PG&E issue and will not 
create a delay of the in-service date.  All other permits and approvals, 
according to PG&E, are in place.

PG&E has stated that after operation of the separators, they will want to 
discuss maintenance issues with ET&S.

Post construction of the separators will result in 2-50 ft joints of 34 in. 
pipe.  PG&E will perform wipe tests on each piece to determine reuse and or 
disposal.  If the pieces test  to be regulated by state and federal, PG&E 
will consult their legal group to determine whether they will decon or 
dispose as a PCB regulated material.  If the decision is to decon, PG&E has 
indicated that they will seek another contractor other than Vector to reduce 
costs associated with cleaning the pipe.

2. Review Test Results of Ongoing Gas Sampling. 

Update since last sampling discussion in San Francisco.  Good news is that at 
MP 353 (kettleman C/S), latest sampling showed non detect.  The third round 
of sampling taken at this location is not available.  All other samples 
collected at suspected liquids locations areas showed PCB liquids results to 
be decreasing  toward Hinkley C/S.  Line 311 is a 12 in. line which travels 
north to Ridgecrest, Ca  also feeds  IMC Chemical Plant.  Previous testing 
showed non detect.  Most recent sample showed 22 ppm.   Second sample has 
been collected but results are not available.  Samples are proposed to be 
collected at the IMC Chemical Plant.  There is a potential for the IMC Plant 
to be PG&E's biggest single commercial customer and therefore, this site is 
considered to be a sensitive area relating to PCB's.

Kern River Station continues to show PCB concentrations  of 1-3 ppm.   The 
gas from this location feeds into a portion of the Southern California Gas 
Co.  system which is PCB free.

3. Discuss Future Sampling Process and Frequency. 

West end of the PG&E system has not been sampled.  The east end of the system 
has at least 2 rounds of sampling conducted.  Sampling frequency for these 
locations is once every two weeks.  When a sampling location is shown  to 
have liquids, it is resampled two weeks later and is included into the 
sampling program.  
Transwestern has requested to PG&E to increase the collection reservoirs 
under the meters and valves to allow greater removal liquids from the 
pipeline system.  At the present time a small nipple is inserted into the 
bottom of the valve and meter body  for the liquids collection.  By 
increasing the nipple size,  a greater collection container will be produced.

It was mutually agreed that until installation and operation of the two the 
separators, PG&E will continue to sample each location once every two weeks.

4. Review Criteria Used to Determine Need for Tap Filter/Separators.

Originally 29 locations were identified to receive the small filter 
separators.  These locations were considered Priority 1 sites.  The 
determination of a Priority 1 site is based upon the following criteria:  1) 
a location where liquids were collected twice and 2)  ppm concentration of 
the liquids collected was > 1.0 ppm.
Based upon these criteria, Ridgecrest and Bakersfield (Kern River Station) 
have been added to the list of Priority sites.  Flow through at the Kern 
River location is 300-500 mmscf/day.  Samples collected at this location have 
shown PCB's in the range of 1-4 ppm.  PG&E's agreement with SoCal at this 
location is <1.0 ppm PCB's in the liquid phase.   PG&E has indicated that 
there is some sensitivity at both of these locations due to the large volume 
of gas deliveries.

PG&E and Southwest Gas have been in discussions concerning 5 additional 
filter separators on the Southwest Gas system due to substantial customer 
load at these locations.  Southwest Gas feels it needs additional protection 
at these sites.  PG&E has stated that Southwest Gas is beginning to express 
additional concern for PCB's at their interconnect locations.

5. Review and Discuss List of Proposed Tap Filter/Separators.

 a. Siting, Design and Engineering

 b. Cost Estimates 

PG&E passed out a booklet pertaining to 9 small filter separator sites, plus 
an additional sheet for 16 sites with back-up to be produced in the next 
week. .  Four of these separators have been installed.  A total of 45 filter 
separators may be proposed for installation.  

The cost estimates for the additional small volume  F/S up to the 29 
indicated at the last meeting is 1.2 to 1.3 million.  The sampling costs have 
not been included in this number. Estimates are being reviewed on a per sites 
basis as PG&E presented.

One PG&E customer, a cement plant, has inquired about PG&E deconning portions 
of their plant that has PCB's.  PG&E is in discussions with the cement 
company.   PG&E has informed the cement plant that it will evaluate the 
success of the filter separators to be installed on the line feeding the 
cement plant prior to committing to any action.  If the deconning occurs, it 
will be a 2001 project.

6. Ongoing Consideration of Additional Customer Protection.

Compressor Oil Control.  The majority of liquids collected at strategic 
sampling locations is compressor oils.  Transwestern has requested access to 
the PG&E C/S to study lube oil systems.  There are 22 compressors at the 
Topock and Hinkley C/S's.  Transwestern will conduct a  study of technologies 
to assist in reducing oil from entering the pipeline system.  Earl will 
coordinate site visits with Glen Riddle.

7. Other Issues or Concerns.

Earl requested additional information on invoices submitted after January, 
2000.  rod will send back up and support data of existing invoices sent to 
Transwestern.  

PG&E is considering increasing gas receipts from Transwestern to 250-300 
mmscf/day cap by May 15.  Over time PG&E will look into their C/S 
configurations to handle the increased gas flows to 450 mm scf/day.  

8. Next Steps.

The next meeting was proposed in 45 days.  This time period will allow 
inspection and operation of the mainline filter separators and collection   
additional sampling data at new and suspected sampling sites.  The location 
of the next meeting was tentatively scheduled for Flagstaff AZ on July 13 as 
some of the PG&E meeting attendees will be in Flagstaff during that week on 
other business.  

Thanx George for the update.  

Norm would you mind visiting with Ms. Bernacik and explaining to her the 
difference between the excavation area where the underground tanks were 
removed and the landfarm area?  If need be we can write her another letter 
requesting the closure and backfilling of the underground storage tanks.

George Robinson
05/25/2000 04:12 PM

I called Ms. Bernacik this afternoon regarding several issues. 
1.)  Ms. Bernacik indicated that the POEP has formed a Superfund division 
which is lead by a fellow named Mr. Rizvi. Mr. Rizvi had contacted Ms. 
Bernacik and requested the opportunity to be present at the site during the 
next semiannual sampling event. This event is tentatively scheduled for the 
week of June 19th. I am to notify Ms. Bernacik when we have set a firm date 
for sampling. 
2.)  Ms. Bernacik asked if we had received an extension to the off-site 
access permit from the Pueblo so that we could install the three additional 
wells. I indicated that I believe the extension was issued and Norm had 
picked it up but I wasn't certain. I followed-up with Norm and he has picked 
up the permit. Drilling activities are scheduled for the week of June 5th.
3.)  I asked Ms. Bernacik about our request for no further action on the UST 
removal. Ms. Bernacik indicated that Norm Moreno at the POEP had responded to 
her with comments on the request and recommended against closing the issue. 
Ms. Bernacik said that she would send us a copy of Mr. Moreno's letter. At a 
minimum, the Pueblo will require continued monitoring. This does not change 
our monitoring plan since we had already proposed continued monitoring of the 
UST area wells as part of our facility wide groundwater monitoring program. 
However, Ms. Bernacik also indicated that the Pueblo may require one or two 
additional monitor wells in the former UST area.
4.)  I asked Ms. Bernacik about backfilling the former UST excavation area. 
Ms. Bernacik indicated that her office had already issued an approval of TW's 
request to close the landfarm. I asked again about backfilling the excavation 
but was having difficulty communicating my interest was backfilling the 
excavation rather than closure of the landfarm. I reviewed the letter from 
Ms. Bernacik regarding closure of the landfarm and it does not specifically 
address backfilling the excavation. I believe that Ms. Bernacik is under the 
impression that her office has already approved backfilling the excavation, 
if we still want to get this in writing, it may be best for Norm to visit 
with Ms. Bernacik at her office in order to better explain what we need.

Received the "permit by rule" approval for the turbine power unit changeout 
for the Keystone C/S.

The emissions testing results for the Plains Turbine Station was submitted to 
the TNRCC.

Discharge renewal applications for C/S No. 9 and Monument Turbine C/S were 
submitted to the OCD.

Notification to the New Mexico AQB was given for the power turbine changeout 
at the Atoka No. 2 C/S.

One employee was skill verified for level II environmental 

During the routine weekly sampling of the PG&E system, it was discovered that 
approx. 3 oz of liquid had collected in the new filter separator in the PG&E 
C/S yard.  A request was made to analyze the liquid for not only PCB's but 
also pH to determine if the liquids resulted from the caustic and water 
cleaning of the upstream portion of the pipe leading into the PG&E C/S .  
This is the first occurance of liquids at this location since this new filter 
separator was installed and put inot service.

The Title V air permit for C/S No. 4 has been issued. There are some 
requirements and conditions under this permit that the team should be aware 
of and will be required to comply with.   I would like to visit with the team 
at their safety meeting in June or july to go over the conditions of the 
permit.  Please give the the dates in June and July when your next safety 
meeting is.  This Title V presentation should last about 3 hours.

Thanx

Guys, I received Harrell's memo concerning the fuel use for the turbine and 
the fact that you had to reduce gas producer speeds to comply with the 
permits fuel use requirements.  My question is, how does the fuel use compare 
with what Solar says the fuel use should be?  If we can get Solar to provide 
written guarantees and "UP" the fuel use value for the turbine, we can up the 
fuel value on the permit.  The state of Colorado perceives increased fuel use 
beyond manufacturers values as the turbine not operating correctly and in 
need of mechanical adjustment.  From their eyes, this would be a strong 
indication of excess emissions, and I think there evaluation would hold some 
merit.  Anyway, I dont want to send up a red flag to the state of Colorado.  

Would you contact Solar and compare their fuel use values with what the 
monitors say the turbine is burning at La Plata? 

Then let me know.  If worse gets to worse, I may be able to use another 
tactic, but only as a last resort.

During the quarterly conference call with SoCal in which we discuss PCB costs 
on the SoCal system, for which Transwesten is 86% responsible, Ralph Komai, 
SoCal's PCB person provded some addtional information with respect to what is 
going on with the PCB activities on the SoCal system.  As a result of the 
PG&E press release, SoCal management directed additional sampling to be done 
at their interconnect with Transwestern and downstream of this interconnect.  
Ralph reported that a number of liquid samples came back at around 7 ppm, 
however one sample at their Kelso Station, near Barstow,  came back at 77 
ppm. 

Ralph had indicated that there has been an increase in the PCB's coming into 
their collection locations in the Needles area as evidenced by the following:

 Based upon 1997 data, almost no liquids greater than 50 ppm were revcovered

 Data collected in 1998 showed that approx. 8% of the liquids were greater 
than 50 ppm

 Data collected in 1999 showed that approx. 9% of the liquids were greater 
than 50 ppm

Based upon this, Ralph had stated that SoCal would be collecting additional 
sampling information and possibly entering into an internal montoring 
program, somewhat like PG&E is currently doing now.

I had informed Ralph that our Needles M/S facility had seen almost no liquids 
in the last 5 years, other than a recent accumulation of a one time pigging 
in early 2000 when a small volume of liquids (less than 55 gallons) had been 
collected.   We discussed that the accumulations seen on the SoCal system 
were probably from existing liquids on their system which had collected in 
low points in their pipeline and were moving downstream due to the increased 
flows from TW into SoCal.  

Ralph gave the impression that there were no immediate management tensions 
resulting from the recent "hits".  He just indicated that they would be 
watching their system and sampling at a more frequent basis.

Atttended the NMOGA meeting in Farmington, NM.  It appears that the BLM will 
implement its own noise criteria in areas within New Mexico that are deemed 
sensitive by the BLM.  The proposed noise threshold will be 48.6 DBA(A).  
There are no Transwestern facilities in the Farmington resource area which 
will be impacted by this proposed level, however the potential exists for 
several Transwestern locations in southeast New Mexico to be impacted.  

A meeting was held with the president of Del Mar, concerning the issues 
associated with the lead in their lead acetate tape for monitoring sulfur 
concentrations in the natural gas.  A  request  was made to the company to 
determine the feasability of recycling the tape and eleviate the management 
and disposal issues associated with the tape as a hazardous waste.  

The quarterly SoCal Transwestern PCB conference call was held this week.  
Transwesten's share (86%) of SoCal's PCB management activities was approx. 
$79,000.  Due to the press release  by PG&E concerning the increased 
occurance of PCB's into their system, SoCal has initiated increased sampling 
activities on their system and will be proposing to do additional monitoring 
to track liquids from Transwestern's M/S into the SoCal system.  Preliminary 
sampling results at strategic liquids locations on the SoCal system has 
revealed hits of PCB's in the range of 7-10 ppm, although, a  hit of 77 ppm  
was discovered.  

As a result of an isolated hit of PCB's into the new filter separator at the 
PG&E C/S in excess of regulated levels, a  conference call was held the ET&S 
VP to determine forthcoming activities with PG&E.  A meeting has been 
scheduled at the PG&E C/S next week to reveiw sampling on the PG&E system and 
discuss the recent hit of PCB's in the F/S and what forthcoming activities 
will be conducted at the site.

A meeting was held in Laughlin, Nv with PG&E to discuss the liquids which 
were received and analytical result of 505 ppm which occurred at the PG&E 
F/S.  Additional discussions centered around the latest migration of PCB's 
into the PG&E system and control technologies to stop additional migration of 
PCB's into PCB free portions of their distribution system.

Annual emission fees were paid to the ADEQ for C/S No. 1, Kingman in the 
amount of  $31,145.26

Annual hazardous waste fees were paid to the DTSC for the facilities that 
operate in the state California

A  meeting was held in Albuquerque to discuss and apprise involved parties of 
histoirc and proposed activities for 2000 for the 10 groundwater remediation 
projects currently being conducted in Texas and New Mexico.

Received a call from the TNRCC about an air quality inspection at the Irion 
Co. No. 1 C/S on 6/30.  the team was notified and preparations are currently 
being completed to ensure that all recordkeeping, permits and monitoring 
reports are onsite during the inspection.

Leo, for my weekly report please use the following:

Provided environmental oversight and sampling for the cleaning and 
decontamination of the filter separator at the PG&E C/S.

Assisted the San Juan team in preparing for the forthcoming consolidated 
audit in July.

Witnessed the post noise surveys for the Gallup and Bloomfield C/S's which 
were FERC requirements under the 7C certificate for construction.    

Leo Nichols
06/27/2000 06:07 AM

I have a meeting Thursday morning at 10:30 until whenever.  Please have your 
weekly report to me by 9:00 that day.  If you cannot make it by then, please 
send a copy directly to Marlene for inclusion into the weekly to Cates.

Leo

As a result of the latest meeting with PG&E over the greater than 500 ppm PCB 
liquids collection at the PGE Topock C/S filter separator (F/S), presented 
below is a summary of the deconning and sampling activity which occurred 
6/29/00.

Vector was instructed to use a high caustic detergent (Cimclean) as the 
cleaning agent for removing PCB's from the Topock F/S (50:50 Cimclean:water 
mixture).  Diesel was not used in the deconning process.  The only equipment 
cleaned by Vector was the PG&E F/S.  Transwestern's filters in its separator 
were replaced,  but no cleaning or deconning was perfromed to this unit.   
The filters were also replaced in the PG&E separator.

The following samples were collected during this project:

On the Transwestern side:

 1. Wipes (3) of the interrior body of our filter separator after the filters 
were removed.  Large areas were wiped to determine presence/absence of   
PCB's.  (Not 100 sq. cm. sample)

 2. A composite sample of a used filter removed from the upstream separator 
at the Selexol Plant.  The filters appeared to be exceptionally clean 

 3. Composite sample of the fine powdery rust  which had collected in the 
bottom of the F/S.   Approximte volume one cup.  
 
 4. Composite sample of the used filters from the F/S. Visible appearance of 
the filters removed from this vessel showed them to be clean and    virtually 
unstained.  A small discoloration was present on the ends of each filter 
confirming that the filters were sealed properly in the F/S. 

 5. A sample of an unused clean stocked filter.  This was a control sample. 

On the PG&E side:

 1. A liquids sample of the residual in the upstream leg of the Topock filter 
separator prior to deconning.  Approx. volume one cup

 2. Sample of the solids (fine, blackened, powder) which had collected in the 
F/S.  An estimate of the volume of this material removed form the F/S   prior 
to deconning was approximately one gallon.

 3. Wipe samples (3) of the interrior of the F/S prior to deconning (not 100 
cm sq. wipe)

 4. Used filter media from the F/S.  The operation of the F/S filters are 
designed to be a twice pass through of the same filter.  Composite samples   
were collected of the upstream and downstream portions of the filters.

 5. Wipes (3) of the deconned filter separator interrior walls. 

The only inconsistency observed during the cleaning and inspection process 
was the volume and  buildup of the black fine powdery hydrcarbon material 
which was present in the F/S at the Topock C/S and conspicuously small amount 
of rust colored material which was present  in Transwestern's F/S .  As 
previously mentioned, samples were collected of  both materials.  The only 
difference between the two locations was the color of the materials and the 
volume.  It is suspected that the deconning activity conducted in August of 
99 loosened hydrocarbon solids present in the 1850 feet of pipe which had 
over time moved and collected in the PG&E F/S.  The small amount of rust 
materials observed in the Transwestern F/S is the result of the pigging 
activity from the Selexol Plant into the Transwestern F/S.  I will have 
reprensentataive samples of both materials.  

Photographs  were also taken of the cleaning and inspection activities and 
will be available for review at the forthcoming meeting in Flagstaff with 
PG&E.
on the 13th of July.  Analytical results will also be completed at this time.
        

When we do the emissions testing at C/S No. 3, Luepp, we should be aware of 
the positives and negatives.  The positives being the information which Steve 
and company will collect.  This appears to be a  very useful tool.  There is 
also is no permit emission limits associated with the permit at this 
facility.  There also exists the potential to pay lower emissions fees should 
this investigation show that the emissions from the units to be significantly 
lower than what was placed into the permit application.  The downside to this 
effort is that the data we collect may in fact show that our emissions fees 
which we have been paying actually under estimate those submitted in our 
application and we would more than likely be held accountable for the 
difference (1996 to the present).  Additionally, enforcement action could 
result by the Navajos.  I say this to apprise everyone of the positive and 
negative potentials involved in completing this study.  From the emission 
estimates which were placed into the permit application we included a 
defendable buffer or excess of emissions to account for variations in the 
temperature, humidity, engine age and poor engine mechanics should they 
exist.  

And finally, we have the unknown of not knowing what the three units actually 
emit.  These units have never been tested.  This uncertanty in itself may be 
the driver to know so as not to have a situation which was similar to what 
happened at Atoka No. 3 several months ago. 
     

 

A meeting was held with the Eunice Team to assign roles and responsibilities 
for the newly issued Title V air permit for the NNG Eunice C/S.  The permit 
is similiar to the other title V permits issued to New Mexico faciliites.

Assisted the Gallup Team with the preparation, completion and submittal of 
the Title V semi anual compliance monitoring report and annual certification 
report.

The state of New Mexico Air Quality Bureau conducted an inspection of the 
Wt-1 C/S.  This inspection is interesting in the fact that all combustion 
equipment has been removed and dismantled and replaced by electric units.  
Written notification was submitted to the agency several months ago and a 
written reply was received from the agency that the facility is exempt from 
any and all permitting requirements.

A meeting was held with the Artesia Team to assign roles and responsibilities 
for the newly issued Title V air permit for the Atoka No. 3 C/S.  Also 
discussed was the permitting approach which will be followed for the approval 
to install micro pre combustion chambers on two White units which were found 
to be out of compliance with the air permit emissions limits when the New 
Mexico Air Quality Bureau conducted a surprise inspection at the facility. 

I received a call from Ralph Komai, PCB engineer with SoCal, about a pipeline 
liquids collection SoCal wants to take at our Needles facility.  Ralph said 
that SoCal will be undertaking a study on their pipeline to determine why the 
concentration and liquids volume of PCB's has reduced into their system in 
the past couple of  years (97-2000). I shared with Ralph and up until this 
year, we have not had liquids at the Needles facility since 1994.  He stated 
that they have seen reduced concentrations and are curious as to why this 
trend is occurring (sounds like good news to me).  He said that their data 
shows the following:

 1998 liquids concentrations  only 1% regulated at the federal level

 1999 liquids concentrations only 8% regulated at the federal level

Ralph has requested that SoCal be allowed to collect a  liquids sample at the 
Needles M/S and I have contacted the Needles team about assisting SoCal with 
the collection.

I would expect that this may have implications with respect to slight 
increased billing for analytical charges that SoCal will be charging us for 
and we reveiw on a quarterly basis with them.

Louie/John, this memo summerizes the results of the environmental due 
diligence which was performed on the Texas Panhandle and Cortez, Colorado 
portions of Equilon pipline system for which EOTT may be interested in 
purchasing.  This memo presents those environmental issues which may be or 
were identified as a potential environmental concern.  

Lefors (Texas Panhandle Segment)

Assets on this portion of the system which may have environmental  issues 
were the following:  1-80,000 bbl. liquids product storage tank, 41 small 
tank batteries consisting of 1-3 product storage tanks each.  Average tank 
size is 210 bbl.  Approximately 15 tank locations are within 1/4 mile of an 
existing waterway.  There are stream and river crossings included in this 
package.  The pipeline crossings viewed appeared to have sufficient  soil 
coverage and did have block valves on the upstream and downstream portions of 
the pipeline crossings.  

1. Clean Air Act.  There were no records kept at any office or location which 
would assist in the determination of compliance with Title III, or Title V.  
The  following documents were not present:  emissions inventories and or 
records of fees paid, O&G MACT compliance (HAP's),  operating permits.  NSPS  
Supart Kb compliance could not be determined also.  The 80,000 bbl tank 
construction date was in the 1930's and has a fixed roof.  It has a concrete  
bottom and the  tank has never been emptied for inspection.  No  Railroad 
Commission 653 inspection has ever been conducted.

2. Clean Water Act.  Although soil berm and containments were present around 
all tanks that were inspected, SPCC plans were not available at any 
location.   Interviews with the Equilon personnel stated that there had never 
been a reportable release from this tank.  In addition, location Texaco MB  
Davis pump  station had a small 3'x4' UST which received liquids from leaking 
packing material which had overflowed and visible soil staining was present.  
At this  location a T-stand pipe had been constructed into the soil berm to 
allow discharge of rainwater from the containment area.  This water 
discharged into  an ephermal arroyo which ultimately collects into the North 
Fork of the Red River, a perennial stream.

3. NESHAPS.  At the Lefors Station, there exists several joints of new and 
used pipe which is suspected of having external coating and pipe wrapping   
containing asbestos.

4. NORMS.  A NORM survey has not been conducted on any portion of the assets 
which are identified in the bid package.

5. Soil Staining.   There was minor soil staining at all locations inspected.

6. There is one active groundwater remediation in progress identified as the 
"10 mile hole".  Equilon will retain ownership of this issue.  There had been 
two  pipeline remediation projects for which Equilon had reported to the TRRC 
and had remediated the site.

7. TSCA.  One electrical transformer was discovered at the Lefors Station.   
It had been tested and determined to not have PCB's.

8. Safe Drinking Water Act.  There was an abandoned drinking water well at 
the Lefors Station.  It had not been in service for an undetermined period of 
time. 

9. RCRA.  There was an abandoned out of service Fox boro meter at the Lefors 
Station.  Status of the potential releases of mercury could not be visibally  
determined.

Bug-Patterson Gathering System (Cortez, Colorado)

This system includes the following:

 Lady Bug Station  minor incidental equipment at this location. 

1. There were no environmental issues at this site from assets owned by 
Equilon.  Adjacent to this site was a producer site which had been blowing   
hydrocarbon liquids into an earthern unlined pit.  There was historic use of 
this pit.  Although surface contamination from this pit was present, it was 
not  known whether subsurface soil and groundwater conditions underlying the 
Equilon assets had been impacted.

 Patterson Station 1-10,000 bbl floating roof steel product storage tank with 
fiberglass bottom, installation date 1981, one propane driven waukesha F817GU 
engine horsepower unknown,  

1. Clean Air Act.  There were no records kept at any office or location which 
would assist in the determination of compliance with Title III, or Title V or 
the  construction permit notification process administered by the Colorado 
Department of Public Health and Environment.  The  following documents were 
not  present:  emissions inventories and or records of fees paid, O&G MACT 
compliance (HAP's),  operating or construction permits.  NSPS subpart Kb   
compliance could not be determined.   Determination of the permitting status 
for the six cylinder Waukesha could not be determined. 

2. Clean Water Act.  Although soil berm and containments were present, an 
SPCC plan was not available at this location.  Interviews with the Equilon   
personnel stated that there had never been a reportable release from this 
tank.  Rainwater which collected into the containment was discharged into an  
ephermal arroyo by a pipe constructed into and through the dirt containment.

3. NORMS.  A NORM survey has not been conducted on any portion of the assets 
which are identified in the bid package.

4. Minor soil staining was present around the 10,000 bbl tank.

5. Adjacent to this site was a producer site which had been blowing  
hydrocarbon liquids into an earthern unlined pit.  There was historic use of 
this pit.   Although surface contamination from this pit was present, it was 
not known whether subsurface soil and groundwater conditions underlying the   
Equilon assets had been impacted.

Patterson Junction  1-10,000 bbl floating roof steel product storage tank 
with fiberglass bottom installation date 1987. Electrical pumps were present 
to transfer liquids from the 10,000 bbl tank to the truck loading facilities. 

1. Clean Air Act.  There were no records kept at any office or location which 
would assist in the determination of compliance with Title III, or Title V or 
the  construction permit notification process administered by the Colorado 
Department of Public Health and Environment.  The  following documents were 
not  present:  emissions inventories and or records of fees paid, O&G MACT 
compliance (HAP's),  operating or construction permits.  NSPS subpart Kb   
compliance could not be determined.   Determination of the permitting status 
for the six cylinder Waukesha could not be determined. 

2. Clean Water Act.  Although soil berm and containments were present, an 
SPCC plan was not available at this location.  Interviews with the Equilon   
personnel stated that there had never been a reportable release from this 
tank.  Rainwater which collected into the containment was discharged into an  
ephermal arroyo by a pipe constructed into and through the dirt containment.

3. NORMS.  A NORM survey has not been conducted on any portion of the assets 
which are identified in the bid package.

4. Minor soil staining was present around the 10,000 bbl tank and transfer 
pumps.

5. A small bucket had been placed into the ground, below ground surface to 
collect liquids from meter.  

Cortez Office.  In the office yard, several environmental issues were present 
and are listed as follows:

 old spent 12 volt batteries
 empty drums
 open buckets containing oil and oilfield sludge

The  pipeline stream crossing at the Montezuma Creek  showed the pipeline to 
be exposed in the bottom of the creek for a distance of approx. 12 feet.  
There were block valves on the upstream and downstream segments of this 
crossing.

 

and the equipment in the Cortez office building.

I want to bring interrested parties up to date on the issue of replacing the 
fuel mixers with carbuerators at  the Spraberry Plant.  It seems that this 
replacement was performed ONLY as a fuel savings activity and that there 
would be no increase in emissions or horsepower as a result.  According to 
the TNRCC, they will allow this activity provided that the above is true and 
that we prove that emissions and horsepower will not increase.  To do this 
they have requested that we conduct an emissions test on one of the units 
with the mixer on and then with the carbuerator on as a condition of their 
approval.  IE before and after testing.  I am going to request that we be 
allowed to do the testing with a portable emissions tester, which has been 
verified in side by side testing on New Mexico units as opposed to bringing 
in a third party referenced testing company.  Contractor testing runs about 
$3-5,000.  

A condition of all permitting issues is that the carbs are not supposed to be 
installed on the units (preconstruction) until approval has been given by the 
agency.  In this case, we will be allowed to install a carbuerator on the one 
unit to be tested but not on all units.  Should testing show other 
exceedances (emissions or Hp) in addition to fuel savings, this will trigger 
actions requiring perimtting.  Under the circumstances, I think it would be 
in the best interest of NNG to know for certain that we have not violated the 
grandfather status of the units and that if our activity requires permitting, 
we comply immediately.

I am sending out the letter request to the TNRCC today.  If approved, we 
should test ASAP.  Remember, that sampling ports in the exhaust stack of the 
unit to be tested will need to be constructed prior to testing.  Let me know 
if the Team will need a diagram showing the sampling port locations.

Approval was received from the Texas Railroad Commission to discontinue 
groundwater monitoring at the Pucket Plant.  As you may remember, 
Transwestern constructed a permitted landfill to dispose of the entire 
facility near Ft. Stockton.  Groundwater montioring activities have been 
ongoing since aprox. 1988.  A permit condition states that if three years of 
groundwater sampling data confirms that the groundwater protection standard 
has not been exceeded, the groundwater monitoring activities can be 
terminated.  A letter from Leslie Savage granting this approval was received 
on July 14, 1999.  

Ken Gray, all other conditions of the permit are still in effect (noxious 
weed and mesquite control, monthly site inspections recordkeeping etc.....).  
Continue to keep the records accurate and up to date.  I anticipate that we 
will be required to monitor  and conduct housekeeping activities at the site 
indefinately.

A phase I due diligence was completed for EOTT on two liquids pipeline 
segments in the Texas Panhandle and in Northwestern Colorado.  The assets are 
owned by Equilon Pipeline Company.  A copy of the findings have been 
submitted to Legal.  There were some deficiencies and potential liabilities 
discovered as a result of this activity.

Assisted the Roswell team in the preparation and completion of the 6 month 
and 12 Title V certification reports for the Roswell C/S.  No deficiencies or 
non compliance issues were identified for this 12 month period.

Annual certification reports were submitted to the TNRCC for 3 Transwestern 
and 8 Northern Natural Gas C/S in west Texas.  There wer no deficiencies or 
non compliance issues identified for any of the 11 facilities during this 12 
month period. 

The TNRCC reviewed the emissions testing report for the NNG Plains C/S and 
requested modification to the original report submitted.  The testing 
contractor was contacted and  a revised report was submitted to the agency.

  

I received word from the TNRCC that they will allow a portable emissions test 
at the Spraberry C/S to confirm that the replacement of the fuel mixers with 
carbureators will not cause an increase in emissions.  I will send out the 
letter today to the TNRCC reqesting written approval to do the testing.  I 
would strongly recommend that the Spraberry Team have the sampling ports 
installed on the unit that they select to be tested and have this testing 
completed ASAP.  Remember, the unit selected must be tested with the fuel 
mixer on and then remove the mixer and conduct a test with the carbureator 
on.  Whoever performs the portable emissions testing will need to ensure that 
we follow a portocol that I will submit to the state.

Max, I spoke to Pete Metzner of METRIC Corporation about the status of the 
environmental assessment you need for the above project and he said that he 
has received the packet you sent him but he needs to have additional 
clearification on some items which are pertinant for completing the EA.  Mr. 
Metzner was concerned that he would not be able to complete the EA by the 
specified time unless he discussed these issues with you.  METRIC has 
extensive experience with environmental assessments, but is not familiar with 
pipeline terminology and pipeline actions proposed uder the agreement with 
the Office of Pipeline Safety.

When you get a chance, would you please contact Pete at (505) 828-2801.

Thanks.   

Particpated in a Consolidated audit of two facilities on the Northern Border 
Pipeline system.  Very few items of concern were identified.

Submitted to the state of Texas Fish and Wildlife Service annual blanket 
renewal requests.

Submitted to the state of Arizona Shpo annual blanket renewal requests.

Submtted to the state of New Mexico Shpo and Fish and Wildlife Service annual 
blanket renewal requests.

A natural gas relase of 1.57MMscf was reported to the state of New Mexico and 
Houston GPG for a line lowering in an agricultural area.

 The quarterly Transwestern SoCal PCB conference meeting was held.  
Transwestern's share of PCB activities on the SoCal system at 86% was 
$122,867.

George, Ive read through your stuff on the Gomez remediation and need some 
help.  Why are we collecting so much groundwater.  Im concerned that charges 
for twice weekly disposal may be perceived as excessive, even though the 
costs are reasonable.  Are we trying to dewater or what?  Other than that, I 
dont mind ensuring the protection of the upstream spring and think we should 
get busy on the well installations.  Do you think this will do it with 
respect to no more wells needed.  Id like to get to that position as quickly 
as possible. 

Dennis, see attached

   

    

Dennis Howell
10/04/2000 02:17 PM

Larry,

Could you take a look at the attached file's, and answer question concerning 
Environmental Permit / Survey at Keystone.  I am not to sure about some of 
these questions. 

Many Thanks,

Dennis

This is a message from Kerry. 

I just converted and moved Larry Campbell (lcampbe) to the W2K server.  He 
uses ESIS.  I successfully converted the tables and have the links corrected 
(logged in as kgramse), however Larry cannot use the system.  I received a 
message while logged in as Larry stating that the data/application was 
"Read-Only" when I attempted to re-link the tables.  

Please check the permissions on GTROS-FS01P\APPSRW 

Thanks,

Kerry

I received a call from a permit engineer with the Arizona Dept. of 
Environmental Quality (ADEQ) concerning the issue of notification of 
mechanical activities at C/S 2  Flagstaff and a mandatory 7 day wating period 
for agency review and approval.   Due to the urgency of the C/S 2 work being 
performed, I had written a notification to the agency friday evening 
requesting approval to initiate the activities detailed in the scope of work 
which was included with the letter.  On Monday, the engineer called and said 
that he had read the letter and had no problems with the activity proceeding 
at the C/S.  After we had discussed this issue at some length, I posed the 
question to him of whether it was necessary to notify the agency of 
mechanical and maintenace activities which  will not impact or change a 
combustion units throughput, fuel use, emissions, horsepower, or cause a 
change in design.  After some discussions I informed him that Transwestern 
will probably inundate the agency with notification letters, he stated that 
as long as the engines operating parameters would not change, ( horsepower, 
emissions, throughput, fuel use etc), and the burden of responsibility will 
rest on Transwestern to ensure that no permit conditions are violated, he 
stated that we may proceed with these types of activities in Arizona without 
any notification to the agency.   

The only hitch being, that when Transwestern does a major mechanical 
activity, which would cost more than  25-30% of the cost of replacing a unit, 
that we provide them a courtesy notification.  I told them we would apprise 
them of such an activity.....

 

Lorraine, I dont have a problem with continuation of this sampling, but we 
better hear from our conservative tight fisted attorney first....

Lorraine Lindberg
11/10/2000 02:02 PM
I am in the process re-negotiating PNM's FT on TW.  PNM has requested that TW 
continue to sample for contaminants at Rio Puerco, Belen and Ft. Wingate on a 
semi-annual basis during the term of the new contract which could be as long 
as five years out from 10/01.  Are we planning on continuing to sample these 
points in the East of Thoreau area?  Are there any objections to agreeing to 
this sampling?

Thanks for your quick reply.

Lorraine

Bill, Just a short note to let you know whats going on at Bakersfield.  I 
have spoken to the agency inspector about one of the NOV issues and have been 
told that EOTT will definately receive a an NOV and fine for failure to 
conduct the emissions testing on a heater that apparently should have been 
tested approx. 6 months ago.  With repsect to the other NOV issue, Rick 
Suderman had a testing company in to perform emissions testing on another 
heater which was required to be tested by today.  As the testing contractor 
began his testing, an 02 issue developed with the equipment the testing 
company was using and a miscommunication on the part of the testing 
contractor was directed to Rick.  As a result,  the  the inspector observed 
elevated CO readings from the heater that  Rick had made adjustments in the 
heater set points (based upon recommendations from the contractor) causing 
the elevated CO readings to result.  The inspector stated that the facility 
would receive another NOV for this exceedance.   In any event this isssue was 
NOT Rick's fault and was due to some bad communication on the part of the 
contractor.  We have sent the testing company home and will be bringing in 
another testing company (AEROS) on thursday.  This is the contractor who has 
done the majority of the previous emissions testing for the facility to 
complete the heater testing and substantiate the innaccuracy of the first 
testing company's data.  With this new data, we shold be able to demonstrate 
inaccuracy in the first testing company's QA/QC.

It should also be mentioned that we have identified other environmental 
issues which we should discuss at your convenience.  Butch and I will have 
completed the permit compliance investigataion and be available for 
discussions on friday. 

William Kendrick
01/10/2001 07:53 AM

Rich/Ed---

Larry Campbell is going to Bakersfield this  week to address the situation.  
I have asked him to put together a compliance calendar for the Bakersfield 
facility outlining regulatory deadlines required by the permits and 
regulations.  He has discussed the testing due on one of the heaters this 
week with the regulators and there does not appear to be an issue.  It is my 
understanding that the heater will be performed this week.  Larry will look 
into the best course of action necessary to address the engine testing that 
was apparently missed last year.  He will be discussing the matter with 
Gary.   Please call with any questions.

Thanks, Bill
713.646.7644 

Rich Jolly
01/09/2001 05:24 PM
Ed thanks for the information. Bill Kendricks from Houston has asked Larry 
Campbell to work with Rick on getting this resolved. I talked with Larry 
today and he was going to give Rick a call.

Rich

Edward_Attanasio@eott.com on 02/23/2000 12:53:54 PM
     I just spoke with Gary Fuller who informed me that we have been
notified by the Air District that we are getting an NOV for missing a
source test in December (apparently on one of our IC engines.)  Now, while
this is not the end of the world, we put ourselves at potential risk if we
do not follow up properly -- especially given the history of this plant
with this Air District (that is, the Koch troubles that resulted in a
criminal investigation from some relatively minor problems, really.)

     In fact, I believe that if we act promptly and conduct the source test
now we stand a very good chance of having this NOV rescinded.  But we must
act.  I am please to see that we still have Gary on the job, and I hope he
can follow through with this.  I have asked him to do so, and also to
handle reporting of the soil contamination at NCL that we have all
discussed at length.  I have done so because delay works against us on both
of these issues.  Gary, though, is somewhat reluctant to act without
instruction directly from ETS (which is understandable, given that ETS runs
things.)   He seems to feel that he should be getting direction from Cutty
Cunningham, although I must confess I don't know enough yet about the
structure of ETS to know why this is the case.

     In any event, I asked Gary to talk to whomever he needed to, but these
matters needed to be handled in the short run.  Obviously, we will discuss
next week what is to be done for the long run.  In the meantime, I would
greatly appreciate whatever you folks can do to help grease the wheels to
make Gary feel he has authority to act to get these more immediate problems
addressed.  Thanks a bunch.

A 2:00 pm central  time conference call has been scheduled to discuss the 
most recent PCB analytical results for the Topock Lateral.  Your attendance 
is requested.   The dial in number is   877-795-3687.  Access code is 
395119.  Bob Iverson has been notified by phone and will be in attendance.  

I wanted to present this summary of the meeting Transwestern had with 
representatives of the Laguna Pueblo concerning the status of the PCB 
remediation activities by TW.  On the Laguna side were members of the Laguna 
pueblo, the PEOP a  technical oversight group that provides expertise and 
assistance on technical issues for all of the 19 pueblos in New Mexico 
(ranging from UST to superfund), and members of ETS ( 5 members of the Laguna 
team, Butch Russell, Rick Smith  (advisor for the Laguna team), myself)  and 
George Robinson.   This is the third meeting we had in the last year and a 
half with this group since the Lagunas have started showing renewed interest 
in environmental activities on their pueblo.

The meeting centered around two issues at the site: the closure of the UST 
and the PCB remediation activity.  With respect to the first, concensus was 
reached that we would continue monitoring and collecting groundwater samples 
at the two downstream well locations from the UST site on a quarterly basis, 
and send the results to POEP for review. 

With repsect to the PCB remediation issue, things were a little different.  
The POEP representatives expressed concern on behalf of the Laguna tribal 
Coucil that the progress of the remediation activities Transwestern is 
presently using to bring closure to the site is not showing positive goals 
toward  achieving cleanup at the site and that the data submittals to the 
Lagunas have verified this.  They indicated that that have been patient with 
Transwstern's attempts to allow natural attenuation to reduce the PCB 
contamination, but based upon the historic sampling results, that this 
technology is not proving to be very successful, in fact the results have 
shown stagnant results  (Im using their words).  They would like to see 
Transwestern implement other more proactive technologies to arrive at cleanup 
and closure of this site.   Members of the Laguna pueblo, who work for the 
POEP,  expressed concern that the PCB contamination could negatively impact 
future generations of Lagunas members and that it was the responsibility of 
Transwestern to clean up the contamination which they brought onto their 
lands.   One member of the Laguna pueblo called the contamination a "cancer"  
with potential to spread.   A comment was made by the POEP that there was a 
major potential of increasing the magnitude and spread of the contamination 
if we continue to just maintain  our present approach of just monitoring the 
site and installing additional wells..

A member of the POEP has been in contact with a consortum of individuals from 
North Dakota State University, (Energy and Environmental Research Center) who 
claim to be experts in reclamation of contaminated sites which are considered 
difficult to remediate (this site would certainly fall into this category due 
to the presence of the sandstone bedrock which has numerous cracks and 
channels present which direct  the PCB containing liquids present at the 
site).  Although the POEP was not recommending Transwestern utilize their 
service, they did strongly suggest that we should at least discuss this site 
with them.

It shold also be mentioned that Syed Risvi, the POEP Superfund representative 
was at this meeting.  He had mentioned that the  POEP has been in discussions 
with EPA Region VI concerning potential classification of the site on the 
CERCLIS list of sites for inclusion on the NPL..  He had indicated that he 
did not want to see this site included on the list, but stated that 
Transwetern needed to update and show postive results in our remediation 
efforts and that it was the tribal councils opinion that this was not being 
done.

At the conclusion of the meeting, I informed the POEP that Transwestern's 
internal remediation group  would contact the NDSU group and discuss the site 
characteristics with them and we would reprot back to them the results of our 
discussions.  This seemed to satisify the  POEP and they were content with 
this. 

John, I would like to schedule a conference call with the above list of 
people and discuss this issue.  A couple of things I want to bring out.  
First, we will be undergoing ROW and Compressor Station renewals with the 
Lagunas in the near future.  Second, on the Laguna tribal lands, they have 
experienced other releases of contimation and are currently very sensitive to 
this whole  contamination problem.  Although we are considered by the POEP as 
proactive up to this point  and very easy to work with (direct quote from the 
POEP)   they are wanting a more proactive and measurable effort from 
Transwestern to clean up the PCBs. 
Please get back with me on this.

This is a short note to apprise those that the before and after emissions 
testing for the fuel valves and carbuerator at  the Spraberry C/S has been 
submitted to 
t he TNRCC.   The data showed fuel savings, as we had hoped it would and we 
also received an emissions reduction benefit.  According to the agency, this 
replacement activity will not require an amendment to the permit, which will 
be a plus for the company.  

My compliments to all involved for the retesting and efforts it took to make 
this happen.  I will forward the response from the TNRCC as it is received. 

Rick, Terry had informed me that Solar had trouble with this unit in making 
its emissions guarantees, prior to shipping it to La Plata.  I was not aware 
of this when I permitted the unit.a couple of years ago. In an attempt to 
solve the problem, in November,  I had submitted a modification to the permit 
to the state of Colorado  requesting additional emissions as it appears the 
unit exceeds its permitted levels during the colder months.  I received a 
call form the state of Colorado and they said they are hesitant to approve of 
more emissions for us.  We reached an agreement with the state that they 
would remove the pound per hour limit and keep the ton per year requirement 
in an attempt to give us more operating room (the higher emissions months 
would be balanced by the warmer months which produce less emissions.  
However, after Terry went through the calculations we were still exceeding 
the permitted emission limits when we calculated yearly limits.  I dont know 
if Solar might have sold us a bill of goods but based upon emisisons 
calculations, the unit cant stay under the emissions guarantees that Solar 
promised.   We have notified the state of Colorado, as the permit requires 
and Im sure they will be following up on this.   Let me know what Solar 
says.......

Team San-Juan-LaPlata

01/24/2001 11:08 AM

Rick, the A-102 unit at LaPlata is at a point, using calculated rolling 
averages, that it is exceeding the tons per year emissions level of NOX, CO, 
and VOC. If we continue to run at these points it could mean an NOV. The 
numbers that we used on the permit are the guranteed emission numbers from 
Solar Turbines (per Larry Campbell). We were wondering if you could approach 
Leon O'Brien and/or Ernie Roberts on what Solar could do to remedy this 
problem. We feel that a communication coming from you and Rich might carry a 
little more weight then the LaPlata Gang could muster. Larry Campbell 
suggested that we try to remedy this through Solar Turbines first, before we 
pursue other avenues. Let us know if we can help in any 
way.                       Tnanks, Terry

see attached  save for thursday

       

Ed the 6" project you are talking about is a small project independant of 
Rogas where a 6"line will be constructed from North Coles and run above 
ground, if possible, to a tie in approx. 1 mile away.  We will need a waiver 
for this.  There  wont be any by pass crossing concerns and  only ocal 
notifications due to the efforts to run the pipe above ground.  The reason 
for constructing above ground is to minimize surface disturbance.  Im sure 
that one of the conditions of the approval for this construction actiivty is 
that EOTT wil be required to maintain integrity of the pipeline to ensure no 
releases.....inspections, reporting etc....  Ill keep you in the loop on 
this.....

Thanks for the update.

I can indeed confirm that we have the 2081 in place.  (But, to be precise, it 
was not ARCO Energy's 2081; it was a 2081 that was issued in the first 
instance to Koch that was assigned to us.  So, make sure the 2081 you are 
working off of is the Memorandum of Understanding between fish and game and 
Koch, and not a permit issued to Arco.)

Also, according to Kenny M, West Coast Environ is working on some other 
permit for the 6-inch line (I don't recall exactly what it is, but Kenny can 
tell you.  Unfortunately, the handoff from Gary to you folks seems to have 
left us in a bit of disarray, so it'll all have to be tracked down this 
way.)  Pehaps you can crack the whip on West Coast re this also?  Thanks. 
--ETA

	Larry Campbell@ENRON
	02/01/01 10:39 AM
		
With respect to the environmental clearances and permits for the Rogas 
project, here is where we presently stand.

2081 State Fish and Game Permit.  According to the North Coles facility, Ed 
Attanasio has a letter from Koch authorizing transfer of the ARCO Energy 2081 
permit to EOTT.

10A1B Federal US Fish and Wildlife Permit for EOTT.  I have checked on the 
status of this permit  which will be issued to EOTT by  the USFWS and am in 
the process of trying to push it along.  The wheels of govt. sometime move 
pretty slow.  We are waiting for written approval from USFWS to the Kern 
Water Bank approving of EOTT using the KWB 10A1B permit  use for the Rogas 
project only.  this letter is expected by the end of next week.   I will keep 
everyone updated.   

The biologist is ready and waiting for a start date to begin her surveys and 
has stated that the cold temperatures may cause her to delay her sampling and 
survey work as mandated by the Department of Fish and Game.  

The issue of the water by pass channel crossing is still in progress.  We 
will need approval under 404 Nationwide Permit, 1603 streambed alteration 
notification approval and State Reg Board Authorization.  I have contacted 
the consultant Gary has been using for assistance with these applications and 
they are sending  applications to my attention.  The signed and completed 
packets  will be going out fed-x tomorrow.  I would expect a 30 day waiting 
period before these documents are signed by the agencies, however, because 
these approvals apply only to the by pass channel feature, this should not 
delay initial construction of the project .

I have prepared the stormwater permit application for construction activities 
which are required for construction activities greater than 5 acres.    

Matt Hughes
01/31/2001 08:29 AM

Kenny_Maltby@eott.com on 01/30/2001 08:09:53 PM
1) We have the permit and drawing for boring the Kern County Water Agencies
Cross Valley Canal. I will also contact Helt Engineering for the canal
profile and Soils Engineering for the soil analysis.

2) Permits for Hwy 43 and Interstate 5 are state Permits through Caltrans,
at this time we have not received the permits. Helt Engineering has
repeatedly made calls but are having difficulty getting anyone to answer
the phone. I have asked them to notify Caltrans of who is the contractor
for the project. Alan if you can provide me with the name of the boring
contractor I will provide that information at the same time. If I do not
have an answer soon I will make a trip to Fresno and see what I can find
out. Matt, Floyd Little is the contact for Caltrans, you probably remember
the problems you had when you tried to contact him.

3) Gary Fuller put West Coast Environmental in charge of obtaining a permit
for crossing the Kern River By-Pass channel from the Army Corp of
Engineers. As we discussed last week the application for the permit had not
been filed. Larry Campell with the environmental department has been asked
to contact West Coast Environmental for the status of the permit
application. I will provide the drawing, permit and permit requirements
when we receive them.

4) I will gather copies of the conditions and requirements from the water
districts and provide that to Alan.

5) We have not received the Fish and Games approval at this time. When we
receive it and have final approval from our environmental and legal
departments I will provide the Permit to Alan.

As you know we are at the States mercy on obtaining these permits. We are
shooting for the two week starting date as mention earlier. I will keep you
informed.

                                                                              
           
                    
Matt.Hughes@e                                                        
<KevinS@kensmall.com>,                          
                                         Edward.Attanasio@enron.com           
           
                                         Subject:     Re: No. Coles Levee to 
Rogas       
                                         Interconnect - Permit & Property 
Owner R        
                                         
equirements                                     
                                                                              
           

Once we secure all these permits and schedule work, we will provide copies
to you.

Kenny/Ed--
Are we still on track to start in <= 2 weeks?

Matt,

In order for Ken Small Construction to plan and schedule the work in the
most economic manner we would like the following information in hand prior
to starting field construction work.

1) Copy of permit from Kern County Water Agency for the Cross Valley Canal
with the drawing that was submitted for permit application.

2) Copy of permit from Kern County for the Enos Lane crossing with drawing
that was submitted for permit application, also I need to get KSCI listed
as
contractor on permit.

3) Copy of permit from Caltrans for the I-5 crossing with drawing that was
submitted for permit application, also I need to get KSCI listed as rider
along with bore contractor.

4) Copy of permit from Army Corps of Engineers for the Kern River crossing
with drawing that was submitted for permit application, along with any
conditions required.

5) Copy of Fish & Game, Kern Water Bank Authority, Buena Vista Water
Storage
and West Kern Water requirements or conditions for construction of the
pipelines.

Your help in letting KSCI know the status of the above permits as soon as
possible will also help to set up a workable schedule that we can utilize
for our construction purposes.

Alan R. Hart
Senior Estimator
Phone (661) 391-2139
Pager (661) 329-7691
Fax (661) 393-0651
email: ahart@kensmall.com

John, I had asked Randi to complete an annual report for the F&G 2081 permit, 
as I did not want to have this hang over our head when EOTT's 2081 
application was reviewed.  This may be the annual report that were talking 
about.  As you remember, the 2081 requires an annual report for activities 
conducted for the prior year and it is due by Jan 10th of every year.  It was 
not been submitted for 1999 or  2000.  Because Randi has been personally 
involved in all construction activities at the North Coles Levee facility, I 
thought she would be the prime person to complie the reports for us and then 
we would submit.  If this is the annual report everyone is talking about, 
then, yes, I instructed her to do these, primarily, because she has been 
involved since the get go and she has the information.  She has also promised 
the reports to me by 2/15 for sumibttal to the F&G.  

John Shafer
02/05/2001 04:09 PM

What would it hurt to ask her?  Primarily she is working under your direction 
now as you implement various work through Scott Jones.  John

Larry Campbell
02/05/2001 03:43 PM
John, it s my understanding that Randi did only biology issues related to 
construction and monitoring.  I was not aware of Gary giving her permission 
to do waste surveys for the company.  Do you want me to ask her about this?  
One of the issues  that most people had with Gary was that he employed every 
contractor in California to do his work.  It may be that he had Randi working 
on this, I really dont know.....

John Shafer
02/05/2001 11:22 AM

Larry,
Does this meet with your understanding of what Randi is doing?  Are we all on 
the same page?  John

Scott_Jones@eott.com on 02/06/2001 12:12:02 PM
John, As per your request I contacted Randy McCormick (Bio Resources
Consulting) on the annual reports that are due. Randy informed me that she
had previously done a draft-report for 1999, which she had given to Gary
Fuller. She also told me that she believed that Gary had not finalized nor
turned in this report. Randy has committed to providing us with a 2000
Draft-Annual Report within two weeks for our review. I will inform you when
I receive the draft report.

Thanks,
                Scott

If you need to contact Randy directly, you can reach her at:
OFF:  (661) 589-4065
CELL:  (661) 619-0372

John, this is a short note to let you know where we stand on the  7 mile 
pipeline construction Rogas Project with respect to environmental  permitting 
and approvals.

The following documents and applications have been submitted to the agencies:

 California fish and game 1603 application

 Kern County Floodplain Management Agency-encroachment application

 US COE 404 Nationwide permit- preconstruction notification

 Reclamation Board- encroachment application

 Califonia State Fire Marshall-waiver to install aboveground pipeline

 Office of Pipeline Safety-waiver to Install aboveground pipeline

I am checking to see what state requirements there are for SHPO clearances 
for this project.  I would suspect that they would  want us to do a field 
survey prior to construction.  It seems that every Califonia state and county 
agency is a candidate for notification or approval.   Ill keep you 
apprised......

John, I have attached the site characteristics for the 4 locations in Az. 
where Transwestern plans to install the four RB211's.  With this information 
please provide emissions quarantees for each location (sta. 1-4).  We will 
use the same gas quality for each location.  I have a meeting with the agency 
on the 26th of Feb. and would greaatly appreciate the guarantees prior to 
this date.  If possible, I am going to try and permit each site for 45 ppm 
NOx as opposed to the 25 ppm NOx number, so I would appreciate your 
assistance in this also.  

Date-Time: 02/15/01 11:09  Analysis Time:   230  Cycle Time:   240
Stream: 1  Mainline        Mode: ANLY      Cycle Start Time: 11:05
Analyzer: Ndl - 8501       Strm Seq:1                                       
Company: Enron Transportation & Storage           
SN: 385247                                        

    Component        Mole    BTU    Relative
       Name        Percent  Gross   Density
 C6+ 50/50/00       0.0422     2.17   0.0014
 PROPANE            0.4186    10.56   0.0064
 i-BUTANE           0.0631     2.06   0.0013
 n-BUTANE           0.0930     3.04   0.0019
 NEOPENTANE         0.0000     0.00   0.0000
 i-PENTANE          0.0290     1.16   0.0007
 n-PENTANE          0.0235     0.94   0.0006
 NITROGEN           0.6117     0.00   0.0059
 METHANE           95.3741   965.47   0.5283
 CARBON DIOXIDE     1.5388     0.00   0.0234
 ETHANE             1.8061    32.03   0.0188
 TOTALS           100.0000  1017.44   0.5885

'*' indicates user-defined components

Compressibility Factor (1/Z) @ 14.73000 PSIA & 60.0 DEG.F= 1.00213 

Base Pressures              14.73000
     sta. 1  sta. 2  sta. 3  sta.4

Elevation    5164  7240  5000  7334

ambient temperature range  10-115F  -10-115F 0-105F  -10-100F

loading range    40-100% 40-100% 40-100% 40-100%

humidity range    31-97%  16-80%  20-90%  30-97%

John, Lou, Cutty, Bill, I want to bring this issue back up for your 
attention, as I know that everyone is very busy.  During the EPA Title V 
inspection at the Laguna C/S this past week, Barbara Bernacek, the Laguna 
environmental person was present.  She had been asked to be there by the 
EPA.  During our tour of the facility, she casually asked if any progress or 
decision had been made by Enron management towards remediation assistance in 
the groundwater issue at the Laguna C/S.  I had informed her that we were 
still actively discussing this issue and would contact her in the near future 
concerning management's decision.  I would appreciate it very much if each of 
you would revisit my memo below and  then lets discuss what should be done 
and the approach we should take in addressing the Laguna's concern about a 
proactive approach to reaching cleanup and closure.  
Larry Campbell
01/24/2001 10:07 AM
I wanted to present this summary of the meeting Transwestern had with 
representatives of the Laguna Pueblo concerning the status of the PCB 
remediation activities by TW.  On the Laguna side were members of the Laguna 
pueblo, the PEOP a  technical oversight group that provides expertise and 
assistance on technical issues for all of the 19 pueblos in New Mexico 
(ranging from UST to superfund), and members of ETS ( 5 members of the Laguna 
team, Butch Russell, Rick Smith  (advisor for the Laguna team), myself)  and 
George Robinson.   This is the third meeting we had in the last year and a 
half with this group since the Lagunas have started showing renewed interest 
in environmental activities on their pueblo.

The meeting centered around two issues at the site: the closure of the UST 
and the PCB remediation activity.  With respect to the first, concensus was 
reached that we would continue monitoring and collecting groundwater samples 
at the two downstream well locations from the UST site on a quarterly basis, 
and send the results to POEP for review. 

With repsect to the PCB remediation issue, things were a little different.  
The POEP representatives expressed concern on behalf of the Laguna tribal 
Coucil that the progress of the remediation activities Transwestern is 
presently using to bring closure to the site is not showing positive goals 
toward  achieving cleanup at the site and that the data submittals to the 
Lagunas have verified this.  They indicated that that have been patient with 
Transwstern's attempts to allow natural attenuation to reduce the PCB 
contamination, but based upon the historic sampling results, that this 
technology is not proving to be very successful, in fact the results have 
shown stagnant results  (Im using their words).  They would like to see 
Transwestern implement other more proactive technologies to arrive at cleanup 
and closure of this site.   Members of the Laguna pueblo, who work for the 
POEP,  expressed concern that the PCB contamination could negatively impact 
future generations of Lagunas members and that it was the responsibility of 
Transwestern to clean up the contamination which they brought onto their 
lands.   One member of the Laguna pueblo called the contamination a "cancer"  
with potential to spread.   A comment was made by the POEP that there was a 
major potential of increasing the magnitude and spread of the contamination 
if we continue to just maintain  our present approach of just monitoring the 
site and installing additional wells..

A member of the POEP has been in contact with a consortum of individuals from 
North Dakota State University, (Energy and Environmental Research Center) who 
claim to be experts in reclamation of contaminated sites which are considered 
difficult to remediate (this site would certainly fall into this category due 
to the presence of the sandstone bedrock which has numerous cracks and 
channels present which direct  the PCB containing liquids present at the 
site).  Although the POEP was not recommending Transwestern utilize their 
service, they did strongly suggest that we should at least discuss this site 
with them.

It shold also be mentioned that Syed Risvi, the POEP Superfund representative 
was at this meeting.  He had mentioned that the  POEP has been in discussions 
with EPA Region VI concerning potential classification of the site on the 
CERCLIS list of sites for inclusion on the NPL..  He had indicated that he 
did not want to see this site included on the list, but stated that 
Transwetern needed to update and show postive results in our remediation 
efforts and that it was the tribal councils opinion that this was not being 
done.

At the conclusion of the meeting, I informed the POEP that Transwestern's 
internal remediation group  would contact the NDSU group and discuss the site 
characteristics with them and we would reprot back to them the results of our 
discussions.  This seemed to satisify the  POEP and they were content with 
this. 

John, I would like to schedule a conference call with the above list of 
people and discuss this issue.  A couple of things I want to bring out.  
First, we will be undergoing ROW and Compressor Station renewals with the 
Lagunas in the near future.  Second, on the Laguna tribal lands, they have 
experienced other releases of contimation and are currently very sensitive to 
this whole  contamination problem.  Although we are considered by the POEP as 
proactive up to this point  and very easy to work with (direct quote from the 
POEP)   they are wanting a more proactive and measurable effort from 
Transwestern to clean up the PCBs. 
Please get back with me on this.

Bill,  the baseline noise surveys, which have been completed, were performed 
by Hoover and Keith out of Houston, Tx.  I have a meeting scheduled with the 
permit engineers from state of Arizona on Monday to discuss the permitting 
for the two C/S on state lands.  Ive dealt with these individuals before, but 
the ADEQ has gone through some reg changes and I want to visit with them on 
that.  After that meeting, I will decide who should do the applications.  I 
have  calls in to the person I deal with in the EPA in San Francisco for the 
two locations on the Navajo lands.  Pending the outcome of each  meeting, I 
will decide who to use.  Ive used Argent in the past for both Arizona permits 
and Indian lands permits, and they would probably be my first choice.    

I am keeping Mr. Ayers involved in the permitting process and all changes or 
activities that impact the permits for Arizona.  One thing that I shold 
mention is that I spoke with Phil Lowery about his desires for this project.  
He has requested that the existing units at each station maintain operations 
for six months after the turbines have been installed to act as a backup in 
the event that the turbines temporary fail or to iron out any potential 
kinks.  Based upon the reduction in emissions from the existing mainline 
units, which will be permitted for a six month period, there will still be an 
overall  major emissions decrease.  After the six month period, the existing 
units will be abandoned in place and not be operated again.    Also, my 
intent is to permit these turbines at 45 ppm NOx as opposed to the lower 25 
ppm NOx number to eleminate the problems that were originally encountered on 
the Northern Border system.  If this was a new station, I probably wouldnt be 
allowed to use the 45 number, but seeing as how there will be a major 
decrease in emissions from shutting off the recips and using the turbine, 
this should be easy to do.  The differrence in emission between 45 and 25 is 
not that great and it will allow the facilities in Az a larger range of 
operation comfort as opposed to the 25 ppm number that Rolls says they can 
do, but has had trouble reaching.  One thing that has complicated the 
permitting is the elevation and temperature extremes at the locations.  By 
permitting at 45 ppm, this will greatly help this.     Ill share the 
emissions numbers with you, when I receive them from Rolls and the emissions 
info I have from the existing units. 

I have spoken to Terry Hacket about doing the F-1 document for the FERC 
submittal, and have been feeding him data and supporting information for the 
report.  Based upon the scope of work for the turbine installation, the F-1 
report will be completed by March 1.    

Is there something Ive missed?

William Kendrick
02/19/2001 04:44 AM
Larry--

Who will be the air permit management team, consultants and internal.

Bill

Larry Campbell
02/15/2001 09:25 AM
Thanks John, I was assisted by the reg floks in Omaha and Earl Chanley about 
who the PM was.  In anticipation of the fast track nature of this project 
(nowadays everything seems to be of this sort)  the noise surveys for the 
FERC application have been completed at each station, the F-1 document for 
the is in preparation for the turbine installations, and I have a meeting 
with the state of Arizona on the 26th to go over permitting issues relevant 
to the air applications for C/S 1 and 2.   I  have contacted Region IX EPA 
about discussing the permitting for the two stations on Navajo lands, but 
have not heard from them.  We're on our way........

John Shafer
02/14/2001 07:07 PM

This what's happening.  John

I just realized that I did not let everyone know who the Project Manager is.  
Arnold Eisenstein will be the PM.

We are working on the kickoff documents, and will have them ready soon to 
present in a kickoff meeting.  You will be advised of this meeting.

Thanks,
Jerry

Approval has been given to proceed with preliminary activities to accomplish 
an expansion on the TW System on a "Fast Track".  The option which has been 
approved is Option #1 (38,000 hp turbine at Stations 1, 2 3 and 4.)  At this 
time you should prepare a Work Order authorization for $350,000 to capture 
those preliminary cost.  I assume that negotiations with a compressor 
manufacturer will result  in a requirement to commit to an order within the 
next 60 days.  Before a final order (with a cancellation schedule) can be 
executed we will need additional approval authorization.  When you have 
determined the Project Manager for this project please inform all the 
interested individuals.  We look forward to reviewing a project timeline in 
the very near future.

A 2:00 pm central time conference call has been scheduled to discuss the most 
recent analytical results from the Topock Lateral PCB sampling.  Your 
attendence is requested for this call.  the dial in number is 877-795-3687. 
Conference code 395119.  Bob Iverson's name could not be found in tha Lotus 
directory but has been contacted via phone and will be in attendence.

John Shafer
02/19/2001 08:23 PM

Kathy,
Please set up a conference call (possibly Thursday of this week) with the 
above referenced folks to discuss this issue in Larry's email.  Anyway, as 
soon as we can all be on the telephone at the same time will do.  John

Larry Campbell
02/16/2001 09:56 AM
John, Lou, Cutty, Bill, I want to bring this issue back up for your 
attention, as I know that everyone is very busy.  During the EPA Title V 
inspection at the Laguna C/S this past week, Barbara Bernacek, the Laguna 
environmental person was present.  She had been asked to be there by the 
EPA.  During our tour of the facility, she casually asked if any progress or 
decision had been made by Enron management towards remediation assistance in 
the groundwater issue at the Laguna C/S.  I had informed her that we were 
still actively discussing this issue and would contact her in the near future 
concerning management's decision.  I would appreciate it very much if each of 
you would revisit my memo below and  then lets discuss what should be done 
and the approach we should take in addressing the Laguna's concern about a 
proactive approach to reaching cleanup and closure.  
Larry Campbell
01/24/2001 10:07 AM
I wanted to present this summary of the meeting Transwestern had with 
representatives of the Laguna Pueblo concerning the status of the PCB 
remediation activities by TW.  On the Laguna side were members of the Laguna 
pueblo, the PEOP a  technical oversight group that provides expertise and 
assistance on technical issues for all of the 19 pueblos in New Mexico 
(ranging from UST to superfund), and members of ETS ( 5 members of the Laguna 
team, Butch Russell, Rick Smith  (advisor for the Laguna team), myself)  and 
George Robinson.   This is the third meeting we had in the last year and a 
half with this group since the Lagunas have started showing renewed interest 
in environmental activities on their pueblo.

The meeting centered around two issues at the site: the closure of the UST 
and the PCB remediation activity.  With respect to the first, concensus was 
reached that we would continue monitoring and collecting groundwater samples 
at the two downstream well locations from the UST site on a quarterly basis, 
and send the results to POEP for review. 

With repsect to the PCB remediation issue, things were a little different.  
The POEP representatives expressed concern on behalf of the Laguna tribal 
Coucil that the progress of the remediation activities Transwestern is 
presently using to bring closure to the site is not showing positive goals 
toward  achieving cleanup at the site and that the data submittals to the 
Lagunas have verified this.  They indicated that that have been patient with 
Transwstern's attempts to allow natural attenuation to reduce the PCB 
contamination, but based upon the historic sampling results, that this 
technology is not proving to be very successful, in fact the results have 
shown stagnant results  (Im using their words).  They would like to see 
Transwestern implement other more proactive technologies to arrive at cleanup 
and closure of this site.   Members of the Laguna pueblo, who work for the 
POEP,  expressed concern that the PCB contamination could negatively impact 
future generations of Lagunas members and that it was the responsibility of 
Transwestern to clean up the contamination which they brought onto their 
lands.   One member of the Laguna pueblo called the contamination a "cancer"  
with potential to spread.   A comment was made by the POEP that there was a 
major potential of increasing the magnitude and spread of the contamination 
if we continue to just maintain  our present approach of just monitoring the 
site and installing additional wells..

A member of the POEP has been in contact with a consortum of individuals from 
North Dakota State University, (Energy and Environmental Research Center) who 
claim to be experts in reclamation of contaminated sites which are considered 
difficult to remediate (this site would certainly fall into this category due 
to the presence of the sandstone bedrock which has numerous cracks and 
channels present which direct  the PCB containing liquids present at the 
site).  Although the POEP was not recommending Transwestern utilize their 
service, they did strongly suggest that we should at least discuss this site 
with them.

It shold also be mentioned that Syed Risvi, the POEP Superfund representative 
was at this meeting.  He had mentioned that the  POEP has been in discussions 
with EPA Region VI concerning potential classification of the site on the 
CERCLIS list of sites for inclusion on the NPL..  He had indicated that he 
did not want to see this site included on the list, but stated that 
Transwetern needed to update and show postive results in our remediation 
efforts and that it was the tribal councils opinion that this was not being 
done.

At the conclusion of the meeting, I informed the POEP that Transwestern's 
internal remediation group  would contact the NDSU group and discuss the site 
characteristics with them and we would reprot back to them the results of our 
discussions.  This seemed to satisify the  POEP and they were content with 
this. 

John, I would like to schedule a conference call with the above list of 
people and discuss this issue.  A couple of things I want to bring out.  
First, we will be undergoing ROW and Compressor Station renewals with the 
Lagunas in the near future.  Second, on the Laguna tribal lands, they have 
experienced other releases of contimation and are currently very sensitive to 
this whole  contamination problem.  Although we are considered by the POEP as 
proactive up to this point  and very easy to work with (direct quote from the 
POEP)   they are wanting a more proactive and measurable effort from 
Transwestern to clean up the PCBs. 
Please get back with me on this.

This is a gentle reminder, and Im sure that most are aware, but under no 
circumstances is there to be any construction activiy initiated for the 
turbine installation at the four mainline compressor stations, until the air 
construction permits are issued by the applicable air agency.  Construction 
activity is defined, but is not limited to roads, trenching activity, 
buildings, electrical poles etc.  The state and federal agencies take a very 
dim view on initiating any attempts to initiate construction prior to 
approval.  This approval is considered to be the air permit authorizing 
construction of the proposed activity.  Your assistance in this compliance 
issue will be greatly apprecaited.   Data generation and agency consultations 
are now in progress to expidite the permit submittals.  Should you need 
further clarification, give me a call (505) 625-8022 or via e-mail.  

Thanx, George.  Please let us know what their initial reaction and evaluation 
is of the conditions at Sta. 6.  Im interested in what their thoughts are 
with respect to the remediation of  the sandstone fractures and movement of 
condensate with PCB's..

George Robinson
02/21/2001 01:46 PM

Larry,
I contacted Norm Moreno at the POEP this afternoon. He said that he would 
contact Ed Steadman, Associate Director at the EERC, and pass along my name 
and number so that Ed could contact me. Norm said that he would prefer to do 
it this way rather than to have us initiate the first contact. The other day 
I found the web site for the research center (www.eerc.und.nodak.edu). 

Rich, thanx for the sampling update.  Ill pass it along to the apropriate 
parties.  A cursory look at the data shows it to be inconsistently up and 
down, as expected, with no glaring increases.  Anything urgent we need to 
discuss?
 <<Line 300 Liquid Sample SummaryFeb01TW.xls>>

Hi Larry,

Here is an updated pipeline liquid testing summary (as of late January -
early February) for the Hinkley and Kettleman areas, including the Filter
separator units at Mohave.

Hope things are going well!

Rich

Rich McCurdy
PG&E
California Gas Transmission
Gas System Maintenance & Technical Support
Co. Phone: 583-4079
Outside No: (925) 974-4079
Pager (510) 720-2424
Fax (925)974-4232

 - Line 300 Liquid Sample SummaryFeb01TW.xls

I wanted to let everyone know that the meeting between Southwest Gas and 
SoCal concerning presence of PCBs on the Southwest Gas system will be this 
tuesday.  I had an opportunity to speak with Ralph Komai today during the PCB 
quarterly management conference call  that Transwestern has with SoCal to 
discuss PCB related invoices.  As a brief summary, Southwest has had isolated 
hits of PCB in liquids (232 and 132 ppm) and in wipe tests (10-100 ug/wipe)  
in regulators on their system and they have asked Ralph if he would assist 
them in the management and disposal of PCBs on their system.  He wil also be 
providing thoughts on how and why PCBs move in a gas pipeline.

I had asked Ralph not to mention about Transwestern's agreement with SoCal 
for which Transwestern pays SoCal for 86% of their PCB costs.  I had asked 
him to only focus on the Southwest system.  Apparently Southwest is not up to 
speed with the PCB regualtions, however, enough so that they do realize that 
the mega rule will impact their operations and Ralph will probably provide 
input for that as well from an LDC standpoint. 

I asked Ralph whether Southwest seemed excited or worried about the PCB 
discovery on their system and he indicated that they were more concerned 
about compliance with the PCB regulations.  Ralph said he will let me know 
the results of the meeting.

Mr. Stewart, as per you voice mail request to me on Feb. 20, 2001, attached 
is the correspondance concerning the reqeust to replace the mixing valves 
with carbuerators at the Northern Natural Gas, Spraberry Plant.   The players 
in this activity included Jon Fields of Argent Consulting.  Due to the fact 
that the pre testing data for the emissions from the mixing valves and the 
post testing data for emissions from the carbuerators were received in hard 
copy only, I am not able to provide this as an attachment.  This data was, 
however, sent to you via fed-x on January 24, 2001.  If needed, I can 
resubmit the results of the data for your review.   As expected, the 
emissions levels did decrease when the carbs were installed. 

Please reveiw the attached correspondance concerning the request to replace 
the mixing valves at the Spraberry Plant (TNRCC account No. ML-0022-W) with 
carbuerators without requiring involvement of a permitting activity.  Thank 
you for your consideration in this issue.

   

Jon, Here's the latest comment from Jim:
don't see why a test before the change and after the change using the same
analyzer would not demonstrate no increase in emissions.
DFS

>>> Jon Fields <jfields@argentinc.com> 08/29/00 08:38AM >>>
Duncan,
Ok.  We'll test an engine.  This project involves 5 identical engines.  We
want to test just one - will you accept that?  Will you accept portable
analyzer test results?  These analyzers have been certified by the state of
New Mexico to be plus/minus 3% from full trailer tests.
Thanks,
Jon

FYI
>>> Jim Linville 08/28/00 02:21PM >>>
IF there is no increase in emissions, this is probably not a modification
and the Grandfathered status would remain.  They would need to demonstrate
that there is no change.  This could require testing before and after the
change.
>>> Duncan Stewart 08/28/00 01:43PM >>>
What say you all?

Hi Jon,
This is a joint Duncan - Jim Linville reply.
First, for all intents and purposes, expect GF status to go away when the
legislature comes back to town.  With that in mind, what exactly is
happening with this engine.  Does the carburetor replace the mixer valves?
 If so, this must be one ancient engine!  And unlikely to get in under VERP
or any other program designed to end GF status.  Tell us more.
Duncan
>>> Jon Fields <jfields@argentinc.com> 08/22/00 11:05AM >>>
Duncan,
I have some grandfathered gas compressor engines in west Texas.  We are
going to change out the old mixer valves and install carburetors on the
units as a maintenance activity.  Horsepower and emissions will not
increase.  I can maintain my grandfathered status, correct?  We will of
course document this activity and provide copies to the regional office.
Thanks,
Jon Fields
Argent Consulting

Mr. Stewart, as per your voice mail request on Feb. 20, 2001, attached find 
the correspondance relating to the request of replacing the existing mixing 
valves with carburetors at the Northern Natural Gas, Spraberry Plant.  In 
this discussion, Jon Fields of Argent Consulting was involved.  I have 
attached for your review the letter requests from Northern to you and the 
e-mails which were traded back and forth from yourself and Argent.  The 
results of the pre testing emissions with the mixing valves on and the post 
testing of the emissions with the carburetors on were mailed to you on Jan. 
20, 2001.  The testing results were compiled in hard copy form and are not 
included with this submittal, but can be resubmitted if requested.  Your 
favorable request in this replacement activity is requested.

  

 
Hi Jon,
This is a joint Duncan - Jim Linville reply.
First, for all intents and purposes, expect GF status to go away when the
legislature comes back to town.  With that in mind, what exactly is
happening with this engine.  Does the carburetor replace the mixer valves?
 If so, this must be one ancient engine!  And unlikely to get in under VERP
or any other program designed to end GF status.  Tell us more.
Duncan
>>> Jon Fields <jfields@argentinc.com> 08/22/00 11:05AM >>>
Duncan,
I have some grandfathered gas compressor engines in west Texas.  We are
going to change out the old mixer valves and install carburetors on the
units as a maintenance activity.  Horsepower and emissions will not
increase.  I can maintain my grandfathered status, correct?  We will of
course document this activity and provide copies to the regional office.
Thanks,
Jon Fields
Argent Consulting

Jon, Here's the latest comment from Jim:
don't see why a test before the change and after the change using the same
analyzer would not demonstrate no increase in emissions.
DFS

>>> Jon Fields <jfields@argentinc.com> 08/29/00 08:38AM >>>
Duncan,
Ok.  We'll test an engine.  This project involves 5 identical engines.  We
want to test just one - will you accept that?  Will you accept portable
analyzer test results?  These analyzers have been certified by the state of
New Mexico to be plus/minus 3% from full trailer tests.
Thanks,
Jon

FYI
>>> Jim Linville 08/28/00 02:21PM >>>
IF there is no increase in emissions, this is probably not a modification
and the Grandfathered status would remain.  They would need to demonstrate
that there is no change.  This could require testing before and after the
change.
>>> Duncan Stewart 08/28/00 01:43PM >>>
What say you all?

 

Arnold, I think I will pass on the meeting.  Please apprise me of anything I 
may need to know from the meeting.  To bring you up to date on the 
environmental events of the turbine approvals in Arizona,  I received the 
rough draft of the baseline noise survey and you were copied.  As discussed, 
we should address changes to the documents as the contractor has made some 
obvious conclusions and asumptions which are not valid or representative of 
what we would like to do or not do.  I was contacted by the Navajo Nation and 
they have requested that we do onsite surveys at the C/S on the reservation 
(C/S 3 and 4)  for T&E plants and animals and archeology.  I have contacted a 
contractor and they will be on site to do the surveys at both stations.  I am 
planning on having the entire C/S facility surveyed at both locations as 
there has not been a pin point location established as yet for all the 
construction and ground disturbance which will take place.  In the event 
there might be changes after the survey is completed, surveying the entire 
facility will keep us from having the new distrubance areas surveyed after 
the original survey was completed.  The F-1 environmental document for the 
FERC application will be submitted to Donna by this friday.   The air permit 
applications for C/S 1 and 2 have been started.   I have a meeting with EPA 
in San Francisco to discuss permitting the C/S facilities on the reservation 
on 3/20.  Im going to try and move this meeting up if possible.  After the 
meeting, I should be able to have an application in front of the Navajo air 
permitting agency and the EPA within a week.  Based upon experience with the 
state of Arizona, EPA and the Navajo Nation, expect permit approval within 
5-7 months after submittal of the application.

entirely your option......we can tie you in if you want.   This is mostly a 
review of their quotation and to get a firm production schedule.

Larry Campbell@ENRON
03/05/2001 12:25 PM
Arnold, do you want me in on this meeting?

We plan to meet with RR on Monday 3/12

Bryan K Kendig <bryan.kendig@rolls-royce.com> on 03/02/2001 06:22:12 PM
Dear Arnold:

Thanks for your time today. This note is to confirm my understanding of
our discussion:

1- Our John March  is to receive some additional operating points next
week.  John will also receive advice about the CO requirement at part
load.  John will then run compressor and GT performance data at those
points.  He will indicate our method for achieving the CO requirement at
the specified points, as well as, at other part  loads.
2- Furthermore,  John will advise our method of ensuring that the engine
will not exceed the required CO concentration at part loads.   We may
utilize a bleed system to achieve the required CO, and also a control
algorithm that precludes the engine from dipping below a certain load
level.
3-  Items 1 and 2, will be topics of a meeting to be held in Houston
during Monday, 12-March.  Scope of supply, delivery committment, spare GG
pricing, and RR hold of a spare PT will also be topics for the meeting.

As a new point,  I'd like to confirm our interest in showing you how the
6761 will achieve your needs at the meeting in Houston.

I was just informed by the Navajo Nation that prior to receiving approval 
from the agency fo rthe installation of the turbines, an archeology survey is 
to be performed at each compressor station site.  Be advised that an 
archeologist will be present at sta. 3 on 3/ 9 this friday in the am and at 
sta. 4 on 3/12 monday also in the am to conduct the required surveys.  Please 
have someone from each team present at each location during the surveys and 
allow access to the facility by the archeologist.  The survey should only 
last 3-4 hours.  

Donna, I spoke to the Navajo Nation about expiditing the report submittal 
once the archeological surveys have been completed and the Nation  said that 
under their current regulations, assuming that there are no cultural 
resources identified at either location, they are allowed 30 days to review 
the findings before they are required to issue the final report.  She didnt 
think it would take this long, but said that due to existing surveys back 
logs, and personnel, it might.  Ill keep the pressure on.

The Navajo Nation F&W has not returned my call about what they might 
require.  Birds of a feather...  Ill be persistent here also.......and let 
you know when I find out something..........  

Bill, things have pretty much quieted down on Rogas as compared to the last 
couple of weeks, but heres whats new:

A meeting has been scheduled on 3/16 with the California Fish and Game to 
discuss the following issues:  1)presentaiton of the 1999 and 2000 annual 
reports which are required by the facility's 2081 permit. 2) developing an 
agreement with F&G as to how the 41 acre credits held by EOTT will be managed 
to ensure compliance with requirements of the F&G. 3) Presentation of the 
results relating to surveys conducted in the path of construction for the 
Rogas project.

The waiver to lay pipeline above ground for the Rogas constsruction was 
approved by the Offfice of the State Fire Marshall, Pipeline Safety 
Division.  There were 8 city, county, state and federal agencies notified by 
application for approval to construct the 9 mile pipline system consisting of 
3 piplines.  This is the only agency approval received as yet.

Acre credits were obtained from Aera for the construction of the Rogas 
pipeline.  Aera is an oil company with major holdings of acreage available 
for purchase.  It was felt that due to the time constraints for initiating 
this project and the concern with not receiving the credits from the F&G that 
EOTT would purchase Aera credits to ensure procurement of the necessary 
acreage for the Rogas project.  This is a major plus for the project.

	he did not.  but he did predict your homosexual preoccupations.

Did Nostradamus predit PoP Music being so popular. Justin Timberlake is
soooo..... dreamy :)

_________________________________________________________________
Get your FREE download of MSN Explorer at http://explorer.msn.com/intl.asp

	Amy,

	John Kinser and I will be attending.

		
	Larry

10-4.  I saw a picture of Dustin's deer, pretty nice.  someone from BLM told me a deer came in from the sandhills east of town that was 29" and non typical.  I also heard of some deer that were taken north of town that were pretty nice also (16-24"). Dont you think it s funny that we spend all kinds of money and time traveling to all our secret spots and the big ones are right in our back yard?

 Im planning on taking some time off for the holidays, so If I dont hear from you have a wonderful Christmas and keep your focus on the Lord, He's our only salvation.  So often we look to other things to give us security and joy and we so often forget, that for those that love Him and have confessed Him as our Savior He is our strength and hope of a future eternal glory.....May God be your source of strength, Merry Christmas...

Thanks this will help us.
Rich, concerning the environmental liabilities which may impact Transwestern if Duke should direct the liquids from their 8" line into the pipeline liquids tank at Wt-1, I have a concern.  

The liquids that are generated in the 8" line are exempt from hazardous waste regulations (RCRA) as long as they stay in the Duke line and are not transfered and collect in a mainline tank.  Because WT-1 is a mainline compressor station, any chemicals or compounds which are regulated under Subtitle C of RCRA  become the responsibility of the owner of the mainline tank.  Within the past few years, we have experienced the collection of regulated liquids at Wt-1 which were not placed there by Tranwestern.  Chemicals which producers and processing, upstream of Wt-1, have placed downhole to enhance gas production and other agents such as corrosion inhibitors and pipeline solvents have found their way into our tank and we have paid for the disposal.  Unfortunately, there is no way to segregate the bad materials from the good recycleable materials.

Based upon this, I would recommend that we not allow Dukes pipeline liquids to collect into our tank.   

Charlie, when Butch had Getman's wife count the number of people using the water at Station 5, did the number of users not equal the public water system numbers (ie 25 people daily at least 60 days per year?)  I though we were always a public water system at Station 5?   We better discuss this, as we could be in some trouble if we do service 25 people and are not doing the sampling.....  

LARRY
     WHY DO I HAVE TO SEND STATION 5 MONTHLY WATER SAMPLES TO DANNY COLLIER. WE NEVER DID THIS BEFORE. THE ONLY ONE I WAS SENDING HIM WAS STATION 4.    THANKS CA
Stations 3,4 and 5.  I spoke with Danny Collier of the EPA today, Friday, November 30, 2001 and he has instructed me that the EPA is to receive copies of all monthly water well sampling for C/S 3,4, and 5 in addition to sending the monthly sampling results to Yolanda Barney of the Navajo Nation. Although Yolanda is the primary recipient, the EPA becomes secondary as they have the responsibility for oversight of Indian Lands environmental issues.  Danny said that the EPA would eventually phase themselves out of the Navajo's business but until they do, he is requesting copies of all sampling data.  I asked him if we could fax him the monthly reports and he indiacted that it would be OK to do so.  His fax number is (415) 947-3549.  I will keep you apprised of any future changes in the distribution of the water sampling reports. 

I HAVE submitted all receipts for the expense reports submitted to you.  I will resend them again.

Employee Name: Lawrence Campbell
Report Name:   lc110101
Report Date:   11/2/01
Report ID:     396C58FDCFDF11D59287
Submitted On:  11/21/01

You are only allowed 2 reports with receipts outstanding.  Your expense reports will not be paid until you meet this requirement.

David, I got hte same message from Don.  I found out he became a believer about a couple of months ago and I have been spending a little time sharing Christ with him.  Im sure hes going through a tough period now.  If you saved his address you may want to congraulate him into the family.  Thanks for the prayers.  Its funny, but Im not too shook up about this.  what ever happens happens and I know I cant do anything about it.  It must the the Spirit within me, but Im relatively calm about the whole situation.  I find that when I hang aroundthe guys in the office and we start gripping, I loose my focus and start looking like a carnal Christian.  So Im better off away from the troops and just trnding to business.  Bill Kendrick seems to be pretty focused also. Im glad for that.  I know hes under a lot of stress.     

It seems the people tied to the pipeline assets are the safest.  If it is a business unit with income coming in, Enron wants you.  The gossip and garbage going around about what and how Enron is going to do to bail itself out is rampant.  I just know that there arent too many people loyal to Enron right now. Many fortunes and retirements have been lost and many of those who had retired in the last several months are trying to get back on with the different companies.   Someone said 4500 people in Enron Houston were given pink slips.  This is a bad time for all with Christmas around the corner, but then maybe, just like September 11, maybe its another wake up call for people to understand that the things in this world arent very stable and reliable.  I hope that this turns many to Jesus.  Another one of those Romans 8:28 passages which seems to have direct relevance right now.  If you can, say a prayer for those that arent employeed anymore and feel like they have lost everything.  

Hope your holidays will be blessed with some of your family coming in. Do you have plans to do any downhill skiing in Quatar over Christmas....   

Larry,

I'm sure things are nuts around there but when you can, let me know how you
are doing.  I heard from Don Stevens that he had been severed but that he
thought all the pipeline folks were spared.  You and your family are in our
prayers.

David

I received this message

This is a test.  Please reply if you receive this message.

Thanks,
Francisca

This user was converted to Outlook the week of Novmeber 26 and now cannot receive mail.  All are being rejected.  Can you find out why?

Thanks,

Kerry
Delivery Failure Report

Your document:	Test	
was not delivered to:	Larry Campbell/ENRON@enronxgate	
because:	The message reached the recipient's e-mail system, but delivery was refused.  Attempt to resend the message.  If it still fails, contact your system administrator. [MAPI Reason Code: 0, MAPI Diagnostic Code 38]	

What should you do?
You can resend the undeliverable document to the recipients listed above by choosing the Resend button or the Resend command on the Actions menu.  
Once you have resent the document you may delete this Delivery Failure Report.
If resending the document is not successful you will receive a new failure report
Unless you receive other Delivery Failure Reports, the document was successfully delivered to all other recipients.

/o=ENRON/ou=NA/cn=Configuration/cn=Connections/cn=NAHOU-GW1-LME-NOTES, ENE-NS03/Enron, NAHOU-LNMAI16/Enron

________________________

Test

Cute, Mr. McMinn.  HOws things in Santa Fe?

>
>
>
>
>
>
>
>   A True Sign Your Computer Is Upset With You!
>
>
>
>
>

Im on vacation till Jan. 2.  If you want to discuss this, give me a call at the house (505) 624-0353.

 

Larry, We will be digging up the lead lines going to the old pumps at the Ozona Station in order to install skillets. We plan to start next week. Sorry for the short notice. Would you please give one of us a call when you approve this? 
Thanks, Big Lake
Ricky  cell - 915.638.5160
pager - 1.800.511.5386
 << File: EnvMatOzona.doc >> 

Bill Ive got an "I pay it" notification for some Argent invoices for EOTT that keeps coming to my mailbox.  Im pretty sure that you have allready paid these.  I keep getting notifications and dont know how to notify the system that these have been taken care of.  To let you know which EOTT invoices Im speaking of, Ill forward them to your attention. 

Please forward to All DES's.

Please forward all EOTT Pipeline (not fleet) invoices for work performed at your direction to Bill Kendrick.

Thanks

I received this message

This is a test.

Thanks,
Janette Oquendo
Enron Global Messaging

There was once a man who didn't believe in God, and he =20
didn't hesitate to let others know how he felt about religion and =20
religious holidays, like Christmas. His wife, however, did=20
believe, and she raised their children to also  have faith in=20
God and Jesus, despite  his disparaging comments.  =20
=20
One snowy Christmas Eve, his wife was taking  their children=20
to a Christmas Eve service in the farm  community in which they=20
lived.  She  asked him to come, but he refused. =20
=20
"That story is nonsense!" he said. "Why would  God lower=20
Himself to come to Earth as a man?  That's ridiculous!" So=20
she and the children left,  and he stayed home.  =20
=20
A while later, the winds grew stronger and the  snow turned=20
into a blizzard.  As the man  looked out the window, all he=20
saw was a blinding snowstorm.   He sat down to relax before =20
the fire for the evening. Then he heard  a loud thump.  =20
Something had hit the window. Then another  thump. He  =20
looked out, but couldn't see  more than a few feet. When the=20
snow let up a little, he ventured  outside to see what could=20
have been beating on  his window.  In the field near his=20
house he saw a flock of wild geese. Apparently  they had been=20
flying south for the winter when they got  caught in the snowstorm =20
and couldn't go on. They were lost and  stranded on his farm, with no=20
food or shelter. They just flapped  their wings and flew around the field=
=20
in low circles, blindly and  aimlessly. A couple of them had flown into=20
his window, it  seemed.=20
=20
The man felt sorry for the geese and wanted to  help them. The barn=20
would  be a great place for them to stay,  he thought. It's warm and safe;=
=20
surely they could spend the night  and wait out the storm. So he walked ove=
r to=20
the barn and  opened the doors wide, then watched and waited, hoping they =
=20
would notice the open barn and go inside. But the geese just  fluttered aro=
und=20
aimlessly and didn't seem to notice the barn or  realize what it could mean=
=20
for them.  The man tried to get  their attention, but that just seemed to s=
care=20
them and they  moved further away. He went into the house and came with  so=
me=20
bread, broke it up, and made a breadcrumbs trail leading to  the barn.  The=
y=20
still didn't catch on.=20
=20
Now he was getting frustrated. He got behind  them and tried to shoo them=
=20
toward the barn, but they only got more scared  and scattered in every=20
direction except toward the barn. Nothing he  did could get them to go into=
=20
the barn where they would be warm  and safe. "Why don't they follow me?!" =
=20
he exclaimed.  "Can't they see this is the only place where they  can survi=
ve=20
the storm?" He thought for a moment and realized  that they just wouldn't f=
ollow=20
a human. "If only I were a  goose, then I could save them," he said out lou=
d. =20

Then  he had an idea. He went into barn, got one of his own geese, and carr=
ied it  in his  arms as he circled around behind the flock of  wild   geese=
.  He then released it. His goose flew through the flock and  straight into=
 the barn--and one by one the other geese followed it to  safety.  =20

He stood silently for a moment as the words he  had spoken a few minutes ea=
rlier replayed in his mind: "If only I were  a goose, then I  could save th=
em!" Then he thought about what he  had said to his wife earlier. =20
=20
"Why would God want to be like us? That's  ridiculous!"  =20
=20
Suddenly it all made sense. That is what God  had done. We were like the=20
geese--blind, lost, perishing. God had His Son  become like us so He could=
=20
show us the way and save us. That was  the meaning of Christmas, he realize=
d. =20

As the winds and blinding snow died down, his soul became quiet =20
and pondered this wonderful thought. Suddenly he understood what  Christmas=
 was=20
all about, why Christ had come.    Years  of doubt and disbelief=20
vanished like the passing storm. He fell to his knees in the snow, and  pra=
yed his first  prayer: "Thank You, God, for coming in human form to  get me=
 out of the storm!"
=20
---Author unknown

	thanx dude.

http://www.jcrew.com/promos/F01/friendsandfamily/friendsandfamily.jhtml

_________________________________________________________________
Get your FREE download of MSN Explorer at http://explorer.msn.com/intl.asp

David, the next matrix yousend in, please provide information in box D where is asks for location of activities.  station yard, right of way, tandk farm etc...

(See attached file: Chevron Marks.doc)

Thanks, Celestine, everything appears to be working fine.....

Larry,

I am testing your email address.  We received all the required information Will Dodd.

celestine

John, Im in the office for a few hours cleaning out email and stomping out some minor fires.  The two RMEF persons we met with are Dan Walker and Allen Kerby.  Allen is the regional director for NM and TX.  Dan was the guy we picked up at the airport from Montana.  I think his title was VP of business operations?  His number is 1-800-225-5355.  Allen's number in Las Vegas NM is 505-454-9390.  Hope that all is well with you and the family.   

Larry,
I need to speak to one of the key contacts that we met with in Albuquerque.  Do you have their names and phone numbers?  John

thanks, Danny for sending out this heads up

Due to uncertainty and proposed changes to the ETS safety/env conference that is to be held next spring it has been decided to pospone the conference call scheduled for Wednesday, until we are better informed as to the direction we will be required to go (i.e. there is a good chance the conference may be a shortened version held in Houston).  Until some of those decisions are made by upper management, it will be difficult to do a very good job of planning.  I will be glad to set up another conference call when conditions warrent.

DQ

Steve, what I have on my board is that when cubix did the test for 703 the engine load was 89%.  If Cubix is willing to provide us a report that shows the load on 703 to be greater than 90%, we've satisified the compliance testing for 703.  Id like to have a copy of the revised report to submit to the Air Quality Bureau for their records and the facility should also have copy.  My records show that the ceiling for using unit 702 is 68% load.  Under our agreement with the AQB, we can operate unit 702 ONLY UP TO A 68% LOAD.  Above this, we need to bring in Cubix or have a portable test completed to raise the ceiling of operation.  One other thing, there seem to be some confusion about which units are required to be tested at station 7.  I have a copy of the approval from the AQB about allowing us to test units 702 and 703 instead of 701 and 702.  Ill pass a copy of this letter on to anyone who needs it.

    Update:  

      I have communicated with Rick Stallings (Cubix Corp) about an hour ago and Rick recalls our past conversation concerning the horsepower & load discrepancies for unit 703.  Rick no longer has the data in his data base, but will be glad to make the necessary adjustments with attached explanations for our records in case their are any questions.

     The corrected torque load should have been 96 %.
    
Larry Wayne will this work for you?

Steve

    

David got your voice mail last week.  Sorry about not getting to talk with you, but I am taking the month of December off so as not to give Enron my vacation.  Im not going to give it away anymore.  I would have liked to talked to you.  Things are somewhat stressful around here.  Probably worse in Houston.  Enron is screening  e mails so everyone is a little tense. Lots of things are going on with Enron trying to bail itself out of this mess.  As you may have heard, they severed about 4500 people so far, Joe Kolb and Don Stevens were among those.  Ive kept a low key on the daily news reports about what is going on, so I really dont know much.  This was a good time to take my vacation.  This whole thing doesnt seem to be bothering me, as I am relying on Jesus, my higher power and that has been my strength and comfort. Its a good feeling to know that whatever happens, my family and I will be just fine.

Hows Christmas in the desert? Were you able to find an acceptable substitute for a tree?  this was a good time for you to stretch your wings.

David, I hope you and everyone in the Ayers household has a very merry Christmas.  I think of you much and hold you in my prayers.  When we stop and reflect upon all that man has done to warp the meaning of our Savior's birth, it becomes hard to focus on the real meaing.  I pray that you are a wonderful witness to a lost and twisted people  in Katar and remember the love of Christ that was revealed to us in his cruxificion.  I am thankful for our Great High Priest who has opened up the doors of heaven for us and by His Spirit has given us the opportunity to peek through the veil and know the Holies of Holies.  May God bless each of you and continue to show you wonders of His love and grace.

Merry Christmas, Your brother in Christ 

Mark, this is correct

Just had a voice mail from Larry Campbell and he is on vacation, but in contact with ADEQ.  Latest update is the ADEQ has received expediting payment and mailed the permits to Larry at Roswell office.  As of this email Larry still does not have in hand, but He expects to receive them this week.

Mark Lavine
Enron Transportation Services
Phn : 713-345-5588
Fax : 713-646-8032
mark.lavine@enron.com

David I got your test

test

 Adel, please send this blank matrix to the project manager and have them complete the title information amd items A through E in the upper box on the first page, then send it to me. This will greatly  assist me in determining what permits, plans and other regulatory documents will be requried.

thanks

Good Morning - 

Attached are two PAF for a retire and install a by pass valve on Unit #9 at Spraberry.

 << File: PAF Plug valve.xls >>  << File: PAF Plug valve ret.xls >> 

These projects are completed.  Do you mind filling out an environmental matrix for this project.  We need to send the matrix in with the completion package. We are ready to send the package to Houston.

Thanks for your help

Adel

Guys, with respect to the above, as you know, WGR was responsible for all compliance submittals during the time that we owned and they operated.  I know in the past, prior to their taking over ownership, I would remind them each year that a particular document was requried.  I figured that when they became owners, they didnt need me anymore.  Louie, you are right, Phil Moyer was the environmental contact for WGR and he was the one I would contact and apprise.  It just so happens that I have copies of previous annual submittals from WGR for the Gomez facility  when the facility was under our ownership, their responsibility.  I even have a copy of the Title V Permit.  When I was told that we no longer owned the faclity, I sent all information I had to WGR, but kept copies of the stuff I had, just in case.  I can send it one more time if you want me too.  Let me know.....

	please remove me from all future distributions.

scheije@selectenergy.com writes to the NYISO_TECH_EXCHANGE Discussion List:

When it is sorted out would the ISO please plan on explaining the SCD
failure on the 16th in necessary detail?

Thanks

Jim

MIke attached is my PEP with the revised changes.  This is being faxed to Bill

 

Attached are the interim evaluations.  We will have the call at 3:00 pm CST.

 << File: MRiedel Evaluation.doc >>  << File: LLoveless Evaluation.doc >>  << File: LCampbell Evaluation.doc >> 
 
In order to meet the timeline established for final performance reviews, please follow the following schedule.

INDIVIDUAL REVIEW
?	Complete review of individuals by team members and capture feedback on the PEP evaluation form provided by John Shafer/Bill Kendrick
?	Attach copy of individuals major accomplishments and individual objectives (if applicable)
?	Have team members sign forms and send to Bill Kendrick for Dec. 28th delivery.

TEAM REVIEW
?	Update common based objectives and team accomplishments and provide to Bill Kendrick by Dec. 28th
?	Director will use individual reviews, common based objectives and other feedback to finalize team performance forms. 	Teams that wish to complete their team evaluation form submit to the Director can do so.  I will modify the forms based on my feedback on team performance.
?	Individual and Team performance will be communicated by Jan. 15, 2002

 << File: Final Evaluation - Exempt.doc >> 

http://www.msnbc.com/news/646084.asp

http://home.enron.com/updates/mergerQA.html

	please remove from distribution list

Alert Posted: 10:20 PM Saturday, October 20, 2001: GOS Problems Resolved
The technical support team resolved the problems in GOS.  Everything is operational.  We are sorry for any inconvenience this may have caused.  Thank you.

	yes, increase it.

Hello Everyone,

	Well, this week was no doubt a tough week for us all picking the winners. Approximately 10 of the NFL games were won by the underdogs this week. Many people missed the Pittsburgh/Tampa Bay game, also the Carolina/Washington game, Baltimore/Cleveland, New England/Indy game; Atlanta/New Orleans, Denver/San Diego and Green Bay/Minnesota game. Back on Thursday, Buffalo was only picked by one person over Jacksonville. In the college games, just about everyone missed the North Carolina/Clemson game, while the Wisconsin/Illinois and USC/Notre Dame games were missed by about half the people. 

	Through all that, Larry Campbell is the current leader with only 7 wrong, while George Phillips is the only other person still in contention with 8 wrong. Larry picked the Giants tonight with 39 total pts, while George picked the Eagles with 32 total points. Therefore, if the Giants win, Larry will win outright, if the Eagles win and there is 36 or more total pts, then Larry will also win. George will win with a Philly victory and 35 or fewer total points scored. There were 31 entries this week, therefore the prize is $62. 

	There is another Thursday night NFL game this week, therefore we will make this week's picks due Thursday afternoon. I did have a few requests for making each entry $3 this week, to increase the money you could win. Therefore, please email me back if you would like to see the entry fee at $3 instead of $2. If we get more than 20 people who would not mind a $1 increase in the entry fee for a bigger prize, then we will go with it. I do not want to go more than $3 for now. Therefore, if we can keep the 30-35 people each week, the prize will be closer to $100, instead of $60-70 dollars. This is not my idea to have some people give up more money, but just a suggestion I got from a few people. 
Below are the number of games missed by each person this week. 

										Andy

Larry Campbell		7
George Phillips		8
Carter Ellis		8
Joe Brewer		9
Daniel Muschar		9
Andy Pace		9
Rob Benson		10
Valerie Ramsower	10
Daniel Jenkins		10
Ashish Mahajan		10
Miguel Garcia		11
Diana Allen		11
Thomas Lowell		11
Rick Broussard		11
Gautam Gupta		11
Kayne Coulter		11
Robert Vargas		12
Larry Jester		12
Mike Grubbs		12
Gerald Gilbert		12
Bryce Schneider	12
Todd DeCook		12
Dean Laurent		12
Joe Quenet		12
Steve Pan		12
Reagan Mathews	12
Joe Step		13
Jaime Gualy		13
Joe Capasso		13
Pat Hanse		14
Ryan Williams		14

				

	please remove from distribution list.

Today FERC issued the following draft orders:

NYISO TEP and Bid Cap (ER01-3001):  Commission granted NYISO's request to extend the currently effective $1000/MWh Bid Caps on certain NYISO adminstered markets, and to extend its Temporary Extraordinary Procedures for Correcting Market Design Flaws and Addressing Transitional Abnormalities, until the Northeastern RTO is operational.  The Commission ordered NYISO to narrow the scope of the TEP, and to file tariff sheets doing so within 30 days.  

NYISO proposed virtual bidding procedures (ER01-3009; ER01-3153):  Tariff changes to implement virtual bidding were approved.  The changes would allow market participants to bid non-physical generation and load into the day-ahead market and settle the bids in the real-time market.  Also accepted were NYISOs Market Mitigation Measures to address gaming or market power strategies that might emerge as a result of the virtual bidding.

NYISO - Cost responsibility for new interconnections.  (ER01-2967):  Tariff changes allocating cost responsibility for interconnection facilities.  The provisions allocate to developers 100% of the cost of facilities necessary to physically interconnect the project.  Additionally, developers are allocated the coswts for transmission system upgrades that would not have been made "but for" the interconnection, minus the cost of any facilities that the NYISO's regional plan dictates would have been necessary anyway for load growth and reliability purposes.  

ISO-NE - Interim Bid Caps (ER01-3086):  Commission approved extension of bid caps until the Northeastern RTO is operational.

Calpine v. ISO-NE (EL01-124):  Commission granted complaint by Calpine and Mirant, finding that ISO-NE has amended Market Rule 5 to exclude external contracts from setting the energy clearing price, in violation of a Commission order.

If you need further information, please let me know.

Susan Lindberg
x30596

Title them anyway you want.

Tram's:

Wasn't me
spin spin
barbie girl
look at us now
ecstasy
silence-----delirium
everything but the girl
one and one-------speed it up
fable
put me in heaven with your touch-------dj penetrate
one more time
angel

Mine:

silence-----delirium---all 4 versions
put me in heaven with your touch-------dj penetrate
heart-------pet shop boys
i wanna know------joe
stronger-------brittany spears 
one and one-------speed it up
fable
everything but the girl
sexual------amber
i see stars
 

Amber's phone number	281 2?6-822?

Title whatever you want.  Just one cd.

mac daddy---ask me about this one
back in my life---alice dj?
nothing compares 2 u---sinead o'connor
men in black---will smith
don't leave me this way------it's a disco song
i will survive---gloria gaynor
here with me----dido
take your time(do it right)---sos band
circle in the sand-----belinda carlisle
in the air tonight---phil collins
what's love got to do with it----tina turner
rock steady---the whispers

	please remove from list.

	thank you.

ArdorNY.com-Manhattan's Best Value Apartment Rentals.
=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=
WEEKLY UPDATE OF OUR LATEST & NOTEWORTHY APARTMENTS.
As selected by our apartment rental specialists on 07/18/2001
=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=
>>>To subscribe to our FREE weekly updates, please send a blank email to subscribe@ardorny.com  Please, make sure to tell your friends and colleagues about our FREE weekly updates!

>>>To have your email address removed from our email list, please visit http://www.ardorny.com/apartmentsearch/unsubscribe.asp and follow the online instructions.

>>>To comment on the quality of our service or on our agents, please visit http://www.ardorny.com/Comments/index.asp

>>>EMPLOYMENT OPPORTUNITY. ArdorNY.com is now hiring apartment rental and listing agents. To find out how to achieve a six figure income during your first year with us, while working flexible hours, please visit http://ardorny.com/hiring or simply call 212-531-5901

STUDIOS :

E82nd Sunny rent stabilized studio with separate kitchen. Available August 1. Rent is $1179.05 Pictures at http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=48783

E85th and York Ave. Brand new sunny studio with a small balcony for $1250. Laundry in the building. View pictures at http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=47997

W96/WEA. Spacious studio in this charming brownstone bldg. Excellent location. $1395! Pictures at: http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=48771

East 80's \2nd ave Bright New studio, large closet all new kitchen Bath has skylight$1400 to View pictures at:  http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=47461

E88th/1_Ave. Sunny rent stabilized studio available August 1. Separate kitchen, hardwood floor. Rent is $1473.82  http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=47432

East 83, 2nd Ave, Large studio with lots of light, Sep kit divided with French doors, 2 good closets.$1600. View digital pictures at:  http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=46200

20's 9th ave Large studio with a sleeping loft HWF, fireplace newly renovated view pictures at http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=45131

West 71st and Amsterdam. Studio in an elevator building with eat-in-kitchen for $1650/mo!! View pictures at http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=48017

45th between 8th and 9th. Rent Stabilized, Alcove, Doorman, all new renovation, great light for $1800!!!! Don't wait on this one. To view go to  http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=46534

W63rd St. Furnished studio in a part time doorman building. Apartment is exceptionally clean and bright. $1800 View pictures at: http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=45240

W40's/10th. Gorgeous studio in a modern doorman bldg. It has everything you need! $1825. Pictures at: http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=48203

E46 & 2nd; Large studio in luxury building. Sleeping alcove, hardwood floors, Great place for $2150 see pictures at: http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=48548

E46 & 2nd; Great studio in doorman building. Bright and clean. A must see at $2175 View pictures at http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=48549

20/6ave.Big studio in elevator build, good light, dressing alcove,for $2195 To view apartment call Spero 917-806-2468 View pictures at http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=47366

East 20's modern studio with private terrace. Breathtaking rooftop views of the city. Won't last at $2495. To view, click at: http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=48732

>>>NEW FEATURE!! Need to view 100's of other Studios?? Would you like to receive CUSTOMIZED email of newly listed apartments and PHOTO presentations , based on your particular apartment search criteria?? To do so, visit http://www.ardorny.com/apartmentsearch/register.asp

ONE BEDROOMS:

E78/York Rent stable 1 bedroom new appliances a deal at $1495 View pictures at http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=48015

E90th St. Cozy studio with a sep sleeping alcove. Rent stab, hardwood floors. Available immediately. Rent for $1538.46 View pictures at: http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=46266

Vandam between Varrick/McDougle. One bedroom, rent stabilized, all new reno, basement apartment,in heart of Soho for $1562.27! To view- http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=47841

E60's/2nd Ave. Spacious Rent Stabilized Studio.Available immediately.$1595.View Pictures at: http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=47593

Avenue A and 10th Street. Brand new 1Br for $1650. High ceilings, french doors. Laundry in the basement. View pictures at http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=47910

E85th and 2nd. Affordable 1 BD in great Upper East location priced at $1650. To view: http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=48867

78 & First Ave, 1 bed apt. TONS of space! All new reno, Lots of closet space, great sunlight! $1700! Pictures at http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=48748

W20/8th Ave Newly renovated studio in rent stabilized building. Available immediately. $1721 Pictures at: http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=48667

91st Street/2nd Ave. Sunny 1 bedroom apt. Full size kitchen. Rent stabilized. Available immediately. $1725. View pictures at http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=48742

East 70th/1st. One bedroom. Features Include hardwood floors, marble bathroom, Large bedroom, high ceiling. $1750. View pictures at: http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=47269

W.10th. West Village, one bedroom in lovely building for $1800. Sunny and has built-in loft already in bedroom. Vie pictures here: http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=41914

80's East Furnished 1BR Jewel ! Clean quiet building. Lots of closet space,$1800. View pictures at: http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=24482

E. 96th Park/Lex - Beautiful 1 Bedroom with hardwood floors renovated kitchen/bath for $1850 to view http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=48128

E80's/3rd Ave. One bedroom Rent Stabilized apartment. Available immediately.$1895.View pictures at: http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=48718

W80/broadway Large 1br/1bth in Brownstone, New paint job, wood floors a deal at $1900 View pictures at http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=48750

East Village. Newly renovated one bedroom apartment in a completely renovated building. $1995. For pictures and more info. please go to: http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=47498

W.87th- C.P.W./Columbus Aves. Charming Brownstone 1bd/1bth, Great space, close to everything! Must see for $2000.- Av. 8/1. View pics at http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=48234

88th West. Gut renovated large one bedroom off Bway/Columbus. $2100. To view Pictures click here http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=22680

W40's/6th Ave. $2000 Bright and spacious 1 bedroom in doorman building. D/W. Near all transportation. View Pictures at: http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=48079

Mulberry St./Broome St. One bedroom duplex in SOHO. Available immediately.$2295.View pictures at: http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=47878

W4/7th Avenue Renovated one bedroom in great location. Rent $2300 View pictures at http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=48542

Charlton/6th Av. Large 2 room studio-separate living/dining area/possible conv. to 1BR. Corner apt. Great SOHO location $2395View pictures at http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=48684

Water/Wall St. Beautiful, furnished 1BR; Doorman bldg in the heart of the Wall St area. Steps to NYSE. Underpriced at $2400 View pics at http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=48185

West 60's-Central Park West & Col. A fabulous, 1br with exposed brick, deco fireplace, laundry. Cats & Dogs o.k. Only $2500. View at: http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=48182

W46, NYC's Hottest area, All new spacious 1 bedroom, beautifully finished, $2500 Pictures: http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=24798

W/40's/10TH Ave. Luxury! Clean and spacious terrace apartment. Central A/C. Pool, Fitness, Parking. Views! $2683. Pictures: http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=46375

E30's/5th Ave. One bedroom luxury apartment in a white glove doorman building. Available immediately.$2700.View pictures at: http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=48232

3rd ave/86th Large One bedroom in excellent Upper Eastside location. Great Views! Bright Apartment! $3200 View digital pictures at: http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=47397

63rd/Bwy Large, sunny 1 BR F/S doorman bldg w/onsite health club. New appliances and bathroom. $3250 View pictures at: http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=48325

20's 9th av 1brm 2 bath duplex HWF, A/C, 2 fireplaces large terrace in Chelsea $3400 view pictures at http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=47347

87th/York X-Large 1 Bedroom $4300 Full Service Doorman Bldg - Modern Kitchen, AC/Fireplace/Balcony Pictures at http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=47053

>>>NEW FEATURE!! Need to view 100's of other 1-Bedrooms?? Would you like to receive CUSTOMIZED email of newly listed apartments and PHOTO presentations, based on your particular apartment search criteria?? To do so, visit http://www.ardorny.com/apartmentsearch/register.asp

TWO BEDROOMS:

Astoria 30th Ave Brand new 2BR for $1495. 2 skylites. Lots of closets. Separate kitchen. View pictures at: http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=48725

E96 St. Renovated 2 bedroom, hardwood floors, exposed brick wall, marble bathroom, good closet space. $1900. View pictures at: http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=47928

90's WEA 1brm elevator building HWF, laundry, lots of closets $2195 view pictures at http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=47021

E.92nd/Off 2nd.Ave- Gut Renovated 2bd/1bth, Sunny and Mint; Av. IMMED, REDUCED to $2350!- View pics at http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=48745

E77/York. Furnished or unfurnished 2 Bedroom. Great Value at $2350! Secure building on nice block. Flexible lease. Friendly manager. To View: http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=47849

e14/8th ave. Large REAL 2br for just $2375. Separate kitch w/ all new appliances. View pics at http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=48051

West 70th/Columbus-A SUPER, 2 BR IN AN EXCELLENT LOCALE! Large, living room, huge kitchen & pet friendly. Only $2400! View apt at: http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=48587.

58/1ave. Huge one bedroom with eat in kitchen, very bright apt. great location, good apt. for shares. $2400. View pictures at: http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=46630

E. 92/2nd ave Bright 2 Bedroom, EIK, Exp Brick, DW, Storage, Beautiful Bldg, quiet street $2450 to view http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=48744

Mott&Hester Little Italy location with great light ,eat in kitchen is new. Nice size bdrm, big living room for $2500 View pictures at: http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=47240

84th St and 2nd Ave. Extra large sunny 2BR for $2500. New renovation. Near express trains. View pictures at: http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=47745

Upper East 90s. Rare Stabilized real two bedroom apt in full service Doorman building, River views $ 2925 others. View Pictures at: http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=48390

Charles St./W4 Two bedroom apartment in SUPERB WEST VILLAGE location. View Pictures at: http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=47305

W60's-Central Park West & Col. **A STEAL DUPLEX, 2 BR** w/ patio, modern kitchen, air on both floors, minutes to Central Park. $3100. View at: http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=48754

W100/Riverside Dr. Extra Large two-bedroom in a prime upper west side location. All new in/out for $3500.View pictures at http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=46124

90's-Upper West side luxurious 2 bedroom. Huge rooms, mix of old and new. $3900. To view, click on the link: http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=46877

John str.Huge 2 bdrm,2 bath ,full kit,all renov, A/C , terrace, great light all for $4350 View Pictures at: http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=46928

East 91 Street. Two bedroom two bathroom apartment in a doorman building. Available imm., $5500. For more info and pictures please go to:  http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=48334

>>>NEW FEATURE!! Need to view 100's of other 2-Bedrooms?? Would you like to receive CUSTOMIZED email of newly listed apartments and PHOTO presentations, based on your particular apartment search criteria?? To do so, visit http://www.ardorny.com/apartmentsearch/register.asp

THREE BEDROOMS AND LOFTS

Lexington Ave/E27 Spacious loft apartment, high ceilings, decor. fireplace. $1850 Pictures at http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=48543

E46 & 2nd Ave; large studio with sleeping alcove in luxury building. Must see! To view pictures: http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=48553

W123. DUPLEX. Beautiful apt for share up to 4 people, 2 full bathrooms, renovated & private backyard. $2450. Pictures at: http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=47622

E14/2nd ave 2/conv. 3br for just $2500/month. Large separate kitchen. Lots of windows and sunlight. View pics at http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=48785

East 82nd and York. Huge 3 BR that is brand new renovation for $2700/mo!! View pictures at http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=48451

Clinton and Houston. Lower East side 3 BR available in modern building for great price of $2800/mo. View pictures at http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=48036

East 96/Park. Extra Large Renovated 3bedroom with marble bath > near subway.$2800 View photos at http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=46441

Sullivan St/Houston St. Three bedroom apartment in SOHO. View pictures at: http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=47328

89th between 1st and York Ave. 3 bedrooms with, huge living room, entrance, dining room, new reno. Incredible deal for $3300. To view go to http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=48763

E66 between 1st and 2nd Ave. Large sunny 3BR for $3400 in a prewar building. Newly renovated. View pictures at http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=48588

Armonk/Windmill Beautiful four bedroom Colonial 2.5 bath with 2 car garage $4000 To view: http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=46201

E.2/ 2Ave. Spacious & Sunny, Gut Reno 3bd/2bth w/ huge private roof deck. Mint, Rare Gem. New to market. Av. Immed. $4500.- View pictures at http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=47754

E88th and 2nd. Brand new 4BR Penthouse with 2 of the most amazing terraces in NYC priced at $5500. To view: http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=48866

West 34th and 10th. Amazing 2500 sq ft loft with 3 separate bedrooms priced at $6000. To view: http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=46751

Delancey Street (off Allen). Four bedroom, 2.5 bathroom apartment in a completely renovated elevator building. $6500. For pictures: http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=48224

Carnegie Hill and Park ave Luxurious 4 bedroom 3 bath in Doorman build. incl. maid service and health club. $10000. View pictures at: http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=46750

Tribeca loft with 3 bedrooms, 2 1/2 bath. Over 5500 sq.ft. priv. roof terrace, jacuzzi, 150k kitchen. $15k/month. View pics at http://www.ardorny.com/public/view.asp?id=47020

>>>NEW FEATURE!! Need to view 100's of other 3-Bedrooms?? Would you like to receive CUSTOMIZED email of newly listed apartments and PHOTO presentations, based on your particular apartment search criteria?? To do so, visit http://www.ardorny.com/apartmentsearch/register.asp

=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=
Information contained herein has been obtained from the owner of the property or from other sources deemed reliable. However, no warranty or guarantee, either express or implied, is made with respect to its accuracy All information is subject to change without notice and/or prior leasing.

	i agree.

Hey Larry,

I made some changes to 7-19...

695979.1 & 695995.1 - had extra hour (HE 23) - I zeroed this hour out (NYISO 5081505)
694766.1 - missing HE 11&12 per PJM & NYISO - I added these two hours in

Please check these changes and let me know if you do not agree with them.

Thanks,
Michael
x35098

	Dave,

	Could you send me a hard copy of the transactions in question.  I tried to pull them up on the website but i guess it doesn't keep records that far back.

	Larry
	1-800-349-5527

	who r u? r u a friend of Chi's?

Just in case you are having some downtime.  This game will test how well you
know yourself and your fellow Asians.  I hope that it doesn't offend anyone
- no, it's not lewd, it's kinda funny. Enjoy!

http://www.geocities.com/fobionaire/Fobionair.html

J

	you can reach me on my cell phone from now on. 713.628.0674.  call me. i lost all your phone numbers.

 WINDAS 98 BROOKLYN Edition 
 
Dear  Consumas: 
     It has come ta our attention dat a  coupola copies of the WINDOWS 
98/BROOKLYN EDITION may have accidentally bin  shipped outsida Broooklyn. If 
ya got one a dese, you may need some help  understandin' da commands. 
     Da Brooklyn edition may  be recognized by da unique openin' screen. 
It reads: "WINDAS 98," wit a  background picture of Grand Army Plaza.  When 
you start da program,  instead of da usual "harpy, stringy" music, you hear da 
teme from da  Godfadda. It is also shipped wit a Sopranos screen sava. 
Please also  note: 
Recycle Bin is labeled "Staten Island." *
My Computer is called  "My Friggin' Computa." 
The Inbox is referred to as "Da Trunk." 
Deleted  Items are referred to as "Wacked," "Erased," or "Rubbed Out." 
Dial up  Networking is called "Da Bar." 
Control Panel is known as the "Da Bosses."  
Performin' an "illegal operation" is known as "enhancin' the family  
business" 
and will actually maximize da program instead of shuttin' it  down. 
Hard Drive is referred to as "Da BQE Rush Hour." **
Instead of  an error message a "You ain't gonna friggin' believe dis!" 
pops 
up.  
CHANGES IN TERMINOLOGY IN DA BROOKLYN EDITION:  
      OK...................Sure ting  
      Cancel...........Fugetaboutit  
      Reset.............Start Ova  
      Yes.................Yeah  
      No...................Nah  
      Find................Put a contract out on  
      Browse..........Get a looksee  
      Back...............U toin  
      Help................(Help ain't available  -yous  
                            don't need nostinkin'help) 
       Stop.................Knock it off 
       Start.................Move it! 
       Settings..........Here's d' Rules 
 
   Also note dat any  voice recognition software run 
on da BROOKLYNEDITION platform don't  recognize da 
ledda  "R." 
 
Some programs and udder  accessories dat are 
exclusive to WINDAS 98: 
      Typa................A word processin' program 
      Printa...............Printer 
      Calculata..........Calculator 
      Solitare.............Seven Card Stud 
 
We regret any inconvenience  it may have caused if you 
received a copy of da BROOKLYN EDITION. You may  
return it to Microsoft for a replacement version 
 
Yeah so, Yous  got a problem wit dat?
NON-BROOKLYNESE DICTIONARY
* Staten Island is  where all of NY dumps it's garbage. The garbage now looks like a small Mountain  Range with seagulls always in attendance.
** BQU = Brooklyn/Queens Expressway  - The place where you take your life into your hands by entering from the "on  ramp". You have to reach the speed of 60 mph to have any hopes of entering and  you have to have breaks that can stop on "a dime" when your hopes of entering  are dashed by a 18 wheeler barreling down on your position.

	no problems.  i enjoyed the game.

Hi,

I'm Chi's cousin.  We grew up in Palacios together.  I used one of her email
list to send this out because I recognized most of them. I apologize if I
caused any problems.

     who r u? r u a friend of Chi's?

    -----Original Message-----
   Just in case you are having some downtime.  This game will test how well
   you
   know yourself and your fellow Asians.  I hope that it doesn't offend
   anyone
   - no, it's not lewd, it's kinda funny. Enjoy!

   http://www.geocities.com/fobionaire/Fobionair.html

   J

Hi,

I'm Chi's cousin.  We grew up in Palacios together.  I used one of her email
list to send this out because I recognized most of them. I apologize if I
caused any problems.

     who r u? r u a friend of Chi's?

    -----Original Message-----
   Just in case you are having some downtime.  This game will test how well
   you
   know yourself and your fellow Asians.  I hope that it doesn't offend
   anyone
   - no, it's not lewd, it's kinda funny. Enjoy!

   http://www.geocities.com/fobionaire/Fobionair.html

   J

This is so funny.
 
 - Vibrator Recall.mp3 

	he's adorable...must take after his mom.

Here are some pictures of Nicholas.

Hope everything is fine with you.

Joanie
832-668-1235

 - YT playgnd2.jpg << File: YT playgnd2.jpg >> 
 - YT & Nick1.jpg << File: YT & Nick1.jpg >> 
 - Nicolas1.jpg << File: Nicolas1.jpg >> 

 - Been Laden.jpg 
 - AFGHAN2_1.JPG 

http://eastpower.dev.corp.enron.com/portal/default.aspx?_PageIndex=0

http://www.iso-ne.com/cgi-bin/hourly_clearing/show_prices

	You must be really bored to be e-mailing me about that.  Just name the time and place.

I thought by now you would have offered to let me drive that new car.

	change per Settlement's request.

Larry:

HE 13 EDT - Original deal made for 50 MW @ $82.20 - Hourly P&L notes deal was cut at 12:15 and therefore only 13 MW flowed as confirmed by PJM data - Tag review indicates flow started at 12:15 and ended at HE 13  (38 MW flow) - Settlements is requesting this be revised back to 50MW @ $60/MW - I need input from you regarding this deal to determine the action required.  Please provide any helpful info you have as soon as possible.

HE 10 EDT - Just an FYI that the purchase price was changed to $41/MW from $42 at the request of Exelon to our Settlements group.  I went ahead and changed it due to the low value and because it is in our favor.  If you disagree with this or have any questions, please let me know.

Thanks,
Marci

	Pre-Star Trek?(the original)

want to see an advanced copy of the script for the UPN show "Enterprise"?
Reads pretty good.

_________________________________________________________________
Get your FREE download of MSN Explorer at http://explorer.msn.com/intl.asp

Larry, Here's my resume.  Please provide a copy to your boss and with a good recommendation!

 

Thanks,
Jesus

Jay Blaine@EES
04/24/2001 06:58 AM
 		

Larry, I notice a posting for ENA East Power Service DE position in your area.  I would appreciate if you could give me a call concerning the position and any insights you may have about the Power Desk.  Also, if you could forward my resume to Edwin Coulter, it would be greatly appreciated.  Please keep this confidential.  Thanks, Jay

 

Zarin Imam@EES
05/10/2001 01:26 PM
Larry,

	YOU ARE THE BEST!   Thank you !   Look at it before you give it out!

	 

Thanks

Z

i do not know this person.  i think you have the wrong larry campbell.

your resume is good enough b/c i gave it directly to the hiring people.

	are you still working on your resume? 

> > >  Please be aware...................
> > >
> > > WORST EVER VIRUS (CNN announced)
> > >
> > > A new virus has just been discovered that has been classified by
> > > Microsoft as the most destructive ever! This virus was discovered
> > > yesterday
> > > afternoon by McAfee and no vaccine has yet been developed. This virus
> > > simply
> > > destroys Sector Zero from the hard disk, where vital information for it
> > > functioning are stored. This virus acts in the following manner:
> > > It sends itself automatically to all contacts on your list with the
> > > title "A Virtual Card for You." As soon as the supposed virtual card is
> > > opened, the computer freezes so that the user has to reboot. When the
> > > ctrl+alt+del keys or the reset button are pressed, the virus destroys
> > > Sector
> > > Zero,
> > > thus permanently destroying the hard disk. Yesterday in just a few hours
> > > this virus caused panic in New York, according to news broadcast by CNN.
> > > This alert was received by an employee of Microsoft itself.
> > > So don't open any mails with subject: "A Virtual Card for You."
> > > As soon as you get the mail, delete it.
> > > Please pass this mail to all of your friends. Forward this to
> > > everyone in your address book.
> > > I would rather receive this 25 times than not at all. Also:
> > > Intel announced that a new and very destructive virus was
> > > discovered recently.
> > > If you receive an email called "An Internet Flower For You," do not
> > > open it. Delete it right away! This virus removes all dynamic link
> > > libraries
> > > (.dll files) from your computer.
> > > Your computer will not be able to boot up !!
>
> __________________________________________________
> Do You Yahoo!?
> Get email alerts & NEW webcam video instant messaging with Yahoo! Messenger. http://im.yahoo.com

Don Baughman@ECT
05/16/2001 11:08 AM
 - GirlsEvil.jpg 

Don Baughman and Juan Hernandez.  If the listing you saw says Edwin Coulter, he no longer is part of the group.

LC

	i fixed it. until further notice PJM to NY deals will have a trans. id of 5062820,5064308,or 5064505.  NY to PJM trans id is 5042199.
	lc

5/16 - Trans Id. 5062820 shows 1033 mw R/T but we do not show this in EnPower.  However, deal 613492 in EnPower for 1270 mw does not go with anything with NY. The comments are not helping in identifying what transaction it goes with. Could you please advise.

Thanks,
Jim Cashion

	try to get it done by tommorow.

Good morning Larry.....I was curious where you are at with the bid cost guarantee for May.  Any idea when you might have them done?

Thanks, 
Jim Cashion

send me the resume

Larry, 
Do you know if Enron is hiring for IS people?  My brother in law just  graduated with a degree in MIS and is looking for a job after the summer.   He is finishing up with his classes this summer.
 
He was saying he wanted to work with ERP...whatever that means.  And  People Soft, whatever that is too.
 
Can you help me out please.

	For the 100mw, use 622332.  For the 622285, use 5062820

Larry,
     5/22 - deal 622285 is showing 1078 mw for hrly but NY does not show anything.
Also for 5/22 NY trans id 5069939 and 5069624 are showing 100 mw apiece but there is nothing in enpower.
Could you please advise.

Thanks,
Jim

	I changed enpower.

Larry, 
   5/24 - NY trans id 5070253, deal 622338, enpower is showing 1100 mw compared to NY which is showing 600 mw.  Could you please advise.

Thanks,
Jim

	its in.  626911

Larry, 
  5/26 - NY trans id 5070487 100 mw missing in enpower.
also 5/26 NY trans id 5070822 300 mw missing in enpower.

	5069624 & 5069939

Also, for 5/22 - deal 622332 for 210 mw in enpower does not show in NY.

		I need the 14,15,21 & 22 off.
		

		Thanx.

	Hi,

	Have you had a chance to talk with Kevin or Dana about my moving over to scheduling.
	If not, should I approach them with my request.

	Larry

	The mws are accepted on their website.  You might have to dispute this.

6/8 - DEAL 642593 FOR 468 MW,  NY DOES NOT SHOW THIS.

	I just put it in.

6/10  NY TRANS ID 5071111 FOR 4 MW IS MISSING IN ENPOWER.

	it's in there.  642595

6/9 - NY TRANS ID 5071111 FOR 2696 MW MISSING IN ENPOWER

	Entered.
6/11 - NY TRANS ID 5065940 FOR 3 MW MISSING IN ENPOWER.

6/11 - NY TRANS ID 5062820 FOR 4 MW MISSING IN ENPOWER.

	thanx.

[IMAGE]
Just a quick note to say Happy Birthday!  I love you! Cathy

 - sunbannA.gif << File: sunbannA.gif >> 
 - Sunflower Bkgrd.jpg << File: Sunflower Bkgrd.jpg >> 

	WHICH HR IS DIFFERENT?

6/13 - DEAL 648796, NY TRANS ID 5062820, NY IS SHOWING 826.67 MW WHILE ENPOWER IS SHOWING 900 MW.

	i'll change it in enpower

6/18 - DEAL 652525, NY TRANS ID 5065940, ENPOWER SHOWS 200 MW HE 3 - 5. NY SHOWS 100 MW HE 3 - 5.

	I just found out the group is fully staffed.  Going forward, they would only consider applicants with heavy experience.
	

	LC 

Larry,
	Thanks for the info. Please forward to the appropriate individuals.   If there are any further questions or requests of me regarding this issue, please feel free to contact me.  Thank You
		Adrian Woolcock
713-781-7456 HM
713-853-6084 WK
713-562-1832	CEL
877-713-1206	BP
awoolco@enron.com
 << File: ResumeII.doc >>  << File: 2001 YTD Accomplishments_Adrian Woolcock.doc >>  << File: Final 2000 Accomplishments_Adrian Woolcock.doc >> 

>
>

 - Houston Flood June 2001.pps 

	u have my permission to change it 

6/19 - NY TRANS ID 5071111, DEAL 654632 HE 6 ENPOWER IS SHOWING 300 MW AND NY IS SHOWING 233.39 MW.  I LOOKED ON THE NY WEB SITE AND IT IS SHOWING 231 MW.

Could you also forward this to JD for me?  Does he still remember me?  --Thy

 - invitation.gif 

	going forward, go by the settlement report

ok, which one do I change it to?  233.39 or 231?

	u have my permission to change it 

6/19 - NY TRANS ID 5071111, DEAL 654632 HE 6 ENPOWER IS SHOWING 300 MW AND NY IS SHOWING 233.39 MW.  I LOOKED ON THE NY WEB SITE AND IT IS SHOWING 231 MW.

	i'm in for the night stuff.  just tell me when and where.

Content-Transfer-Encoding: 7bit
Return-Path: <topt@chevron.com>
Received: from  rly-yd02.mx.aol.com (rly-yd02.mail.aol.com [172.18.150.2]) by air-yd03.mail.aol.com (v78_r3.8) with ESMTP; Wed, 27 Jun 2001 11:58:44 -0400
Received: from  hou281-wss1.chevron.com (hrpat01.chevron.com [208.32.172.21]) by rly-yd02.mx.aol.com (v79.20) with ESMTP id MAILRELAYINYD23-0627115755; Wed, 27 Jun 2001 11:57:55 -0400
X-Server-Uuid: 26fe3e76-19dd-11d3-be09-0008c7b1f151

HB is Dying.....

Tom Tran
Logistic & Trade Accounting
Chevron Financial Center(CFC)
Phone 713-754-4737
E-mail  Topt@Chevron.com

	i changed it

6/26 - DEAL 664367, NY TRANS ID 5071111, NY SHOWING 2,963.82 MW WHILE ENPOWER IS SHOWING 2,679 MW

Travis,

Count me in on Cozumel.

LC

http://www.quicken.com/investments/news/cbsmw/notemplates/frame.dcg?symbol=ENE&ntlink=/relocate/co=quotes_cbs;http://cbs.marketwatch.com/news/intuit/story.asp?guid=%7B9490A893%2D4795%2D4A61%2D9B4B%2D268C6F0C34DC%7D&siteid=intuit&dist=intuit&793136649

	I AM NOT THE LARRY CAMPBELL YOU'RE LOOKING FOR.
	I'M LARRY F. CAMPBELL.

Alert!
You are receiving this message because you have an unresolved invoice in your iPayit in-box that is past due.  It is critical that you login to iPayit and take immediate action to resolve this invoice.

Remember, you play an important role in ensuring that we pay our vendors on time.

Tip!:  You must login to the system to forward this invoice to another user.

To launch iPayit, click on the link below:
http://iPayit.enron.com
Note:  Your iPayit User ID and Password are your eHRonline/SAP Personnel ID and Password.

First time iPayit user?  For training materials, click on the link below:
http://isc.enron.com/site/doclibrary/user/default.asp

Need help?
North America: ISC Call Center at (713) 345-4727.
Europe: European Accounts Payable at +44-20-7783-7520.
Asia-Pacific: Sydney Accounts Payable at +61-2-9229-2336

	THANJ YOU.

Hey Larry,

SOCO and JEA deals in Excel were checked with all upstream and downstream counterparties using OATI.  They all saw what we saw.

brant

John/TXU
Brad/TEA
Jack/JEA
Todd/Soco
Joe/Morgan

	THANK YOU.

Campbell,

We had a discrepancy with WESCO on our checkouts for 9/23/2001.  WESCO shows all 100 MW with the following path:

SCEG-SCEGW135074F50/50-SCEG-DYPMI - WESCO ---E--- MORGAN  - SOCO-SOCOW/S

WESCO does not recognize the schedule with the following path for 25MW:

MDU-CARGILL-MAPPW-AMRNW-TVAW-CARG-SCEG-DYPMI - WESCO ---E--- MORGAN  - SOCO-SOCOW/S  

We both agree that 100 MW should sink at SOCO, however, they show all 100 coming from SCEG into SOCO, and we show 75 from SCEG to SOCO and 25 from MDU to SOCO.  Let me know if I need to make any changes.

Thanks,

Jason Berlin
(I'm using Reese's email)

	

	Lewis Eugene Adkins
	9214 Sanford
	Houston, TX 77031

	DL# 04165772

	Larry's cell 713-628-0674

	THANK YOU

Pls call Marshall Brown

Lisa Shoemake
East Power Trading
EB3125a
Off. 713-853-9194
Fax 713-646-8272

		Scheduling Issue:	

	1024	MIRANT(Rala) told me that they could not schedule anymore transactions with me.
		She confirmed they were defaulting on their contracts.

	1050	Informed DYPMI(Katherine) that MIRANT was defaulting on their contracts thus preventing
		me from fulfilling my obligation to DYPMI.

	1200	Russell spoke to the DYPMI trader to discuss LD protocol.

		Option Issue:

	904	MIRANT(Blake Mason) would not accept my exercising of an option.  He confirmed they 
		were defaulting on a firm LD product.

	1051	Told WESCO(Sherry) that MIRANT's defaulting prevented me from fulfilling my obligation  
		to them.

	1200	WESCO(Sherry) informed me WESCO was going to LD ENRON. 

	No.  His e-mail is physics123@yahoo.com and home number is 7-662-3006

Do you have Mike's new address?
~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~
Karen  
~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~

gfnbfgnf

John, in response to you questions below, im da man.  Ill call you today or tomorrow concerning  your possible suggestions and recommendations for dinner, blocking the rooms and the time for the event....the group had originally planned on blocking out 70 rooms.  Enough for the field DES's, safety specialists, env. and safety group in Houston, Danny Pribbles direct reports, Rich Jolly and his advisors, plus guests and speakers.......anyone else? 

John.Shafer.enronXgate@enron.com on 10/29/2001 09:52:44 AM
Meeting Planning Team,
This like it is on target at this point.  You should probably circulate the
draft to Pribble, after you are comfortable with it, to get his preliminary
buy-in.  Now, I do have a few questions.  Is someone talking with the
Little America Hotel in Flagstaff and blocking out enough rooms for our
meeting?  When can we get some preliminary dates (How about the week of
April 22, 2002?)???   If that week is not good, then go to the second week
in May as I will have serious conflicts with the first week of May.  Also,
who will be in charge of planning the evening dinners?  I would like to
talk with that person as I have a couple of "fun" ideas to offer about
where we might go for dinner.  Thanks to both the North Safety Team and the
SW Environmental Team for taking a lead role in this.  John

    -----Original Message-----
   Hi all,
   Attached is a rough draft of the spring Flagstaff Safety and
   Environmental meeting. Please feel free to comment, the second page are
   notes from our meeting with assignments.

                                << File: Flagstaff agenda.doc >>

   andy
   402 398 7183 office
   402 616 3438 cell

Bill as per your request, presented below is a status of the air permitting=
 activity by the agencies as of today 11/01/01.

Stations 1 and 2. The EPA has completed is review of these state permits an=
d has sent them back to the ADEQ for comment.  I have spoken to Shudeish, t=
he permit engineer for the ADEQ, and he is reviewing EPA's comments as this=
 e mail is being written.  He will give me a call when his review is comple=
te, but he does not anticipate any major issues which cant be resolved prio=
r to the public hearing.  These permits went out for public notice on Octob=
er 15 and 16, which means that the comment period ends on Nov. 15 and 16.  =
The ADEQ plans on holding the public hearing for both permits on monday Nov=
. 19 in Williams AZ. at 7:00 pm.  I plan on being there.  Williams is locat=
ed approx. 30 miles west of Flagstaff, AZ.  The address for the hearing is =
the Council Chambers located at 113 south 1st street.  So far, there have b=
een no responses submitted to the ADEQ by the public.  In EPA's review proc=
ess, they  had a problem with methodology proposed by Transwestern for meas=
uring sulfur in the fuel gas.  We had proposed stain tubes in the custom fu=
el monitoring schedule, they wanted us to do wet chemistry.  We convinced t=
hem otherwise (Byron, because of this, you wont need to order a sulfur anal=
yzer for the Needles facility.  This should save you about $40K).  There wa=
s also an issue with manufacturers quarantees regarding particulate matter =
emissions from the turbine and catepillar.  This has been resolved also.

Stations 3 and 4.  I received a call from Roger Kohn, the permit engineer f=
or the EPA.  He is satisified with the permit application contents and has =
also approved stain tubes for the sulfur measurement at these locations.  T=
here are no outstanding issues on these permits from the EPA.  The public c=
omment period for the Station 3 and 4 permits ends Nov.  3.  After this dat=
e, it will take 1-2 weeks for the Regional Administrator of the EPA to sign=
 off on the permits  and then he will have them issued to Transwestern.  As=
 of this date, there have been no comments submitted to the EPA for the per=
mits for station 3 and or 4.

Ill keep everyone apprised of future events.

The third quarter PCB meeting with Southern California Gas Company was held this morning.  SoCal presented a third quarter invoce of their PCB management and disposal activities for which Transwestern is responsible for $120,602.19.  All charges were appropriate and considered normal operating expenses for PCB activities in California.

The public hearing was held in Williams, AZ for the Kingman and Flagstaff air permits under the Redrok Expansion.  There were no comments or concerns brought up at the meeting as no individuals came to the meeting.  An email was received from the ADEQ presenting the minor additions which will be added to each permit.  Each comment and addition will not impact or change the draft permits which were received earlier this month.  The permits for Klagetoh and Luepp were received from the EPA last week.  The permits from the ADEQ for the Kingman and Flagstaff C/S will be issued the later part of this week. 

Attended the incident investigation and technical writing workshop in Omaha.

Assisted the Mountainair team with the semiannual Title V compliance monitoring report  for C/S No.7.

A meeting was held in Phoenix, Az with PG&E to review charges and invoices by PG&E for PCB management and disposal activities on their system for the last several months.   Also discussed was recent liquids sampling results and proposed PCB activities on the PG&E system for 2002. 

Charlie, can you take care of this?  Please respond and let me know your thoughts...

Please respond to Mr. Campbell,

Based on the recent information acquired from Solar the Keystone turbine is
not subject to GG.  Argent has revised the renewal application to change the
GOP index # to a negative applicability code.  Since the GOP was revised
last year to add the GG code, this is classified as a revision to the GOP.
The following pages were revised;
1. OP-2 form Table 1
2. OP-REQ1 form pages 9 and 12
3. OP-UA11 form
4. Process description was revised to add a paragraph explaining the reason
for the revision
5. Add Appendix G: Solar Turbine Documentation
6. Revised Table of Content to add the Appendix G
7. Revised the matrix table changing the "Notes" entry for unit 3 from
"Subject to 40 CFR 60 GG" to "40 CFR 60"

Attached are the affected files.  Th eleven renewals for your area were hand
delivered to Mr. Child yesterday (November 27).  If Mr. Child has access to
Microsoft Word and an Adobe reader version he can replace the revised pages.
You can request that Mr. Child replace the revised pages or Argent can send
him another copy of the renewal.  Please let me know your preference.

Jon E. Fields, REM
Argent Consulting Services, Inc.
Ph: (281) 953-1008
Fx: (291) 759-9656

 - op-2.pdf << File: op-2.pdf >> 
 - op-req1.pdf << File: op-req1.pdf >> 
 - OPUA11.pdf << File: OPUA11.pdf >> 
 - TitleVreport.doc << File: TitleVreport.doc >> 

Go for it

Please respond to Larry,

Gumaro Rodriguez is working the Crane Title V issue for us.  He is going to
need the following items;
1.  A change of ownership letter.  Was one already submitted?  Gumaro shows
no record of one.
2. OP-CRO2 form for change of RO;
3. O-CRO1 form.

I can generate this stuff for you.  Let me know if you find a change of
ownership letter.

Jon E. Fields, REM
Argent Consulting Services, Inc.
Ph: (281) 953-1008
Fx: (291) 759-9656

Teams, Danny Collier, Region IX, EPA in Sanfrancisco,  has requested that we fax to him at 415-947-3549 the water well coliform bacteria reports for the Leupp and Klagetoh C/S for October and November.  Please send this to him at your earliest convenience.  

who cares

make your changes in a new colour to identify your revisions..

Peter

 

Ed I have been busy in Az and have neglected your email.  Sorry about that.  Is there a one page form that I can submit that will say that nothing has changed at a faility in the last 5 years for the below facilities?  Either that or I can write a one page letter stating this fact and reqeust that the OCD renew the permit again.  Which is best for you?
Here's a listing of the permits expiring over the next year or so:

	GW-90		Portales C.S.		Expires 2/27/02
	GW-89		Corona C.S.		Exprers 3/9/02
	GW-95		Laguna C.S.		Expires 3/9/02
	GW-109	Carlsbad C.S.		Expires 5/18/02
	GW-110	Mountainair C.S.	Expires 5/18/02
	GW-113	Eunice C.S.		Expires 6/19/02
	GW-283	Jal C.S.			Expires	6/24/02
	GW-285	Bisti C.S.		Expires 9/24/02

As you know, if you get your renewal applications in 120 prior to the
expiration date, the permit will not expire on the dates above, but will
extend until all paperwork is done on my end.

We need to go out and look at all of these at some point in time, but I will
get back with you to set up a schedule.

Take care and have a good Thanksgiving.

Ed

FYI
> > > > > >FW: The below is a true story -- It was on TV and in the
> > > > > > > > >Readers Digest
> > > > > > > > >Importance: High
> > > > > > > > >
> > > > > > > > >
> > > > > > > > >> > > The 26-year-old mother stared down at her son who was
> > > > > > > > >> > > dying of terminal leukemia. Although her heart was
> > > > > > > > >> > > filled with sadness, she also had a strong feeling of
> > > > > > > > >> > > determination. Like any parent she wanted her son to
> > > > > > > > >> > > grow up and fulfill all his dreams. Now that was no
> > > > > > > > >> > > longer possible. The leukemia would see to that. But
> > > > > > > > >> > > she still wanted her son's dreams to come true. She
> > > > > > > > >> > > took her son's hand and asked, "Billy, did you ever
> > > > > > > > >> > > think about what you wanted to be once you grew up?
> > > > > > > > >> > > Did you ever dream and wish what you would do with
> > > > > > > > >> > > your life?"
> > > > > > > > >> > > "Mommy, I always wanted to be a fireman when I grew
> > > > > > > > >> > > up." Mom smiled back and said, "Let's see if we can
> > > > > > > > >> > > make your wish come true." Later that day she went
> > > > > > > > >> > > to her local fire department in Phoenix, Arizona,
> > > > > > > > >> > > where she met Fireman Bob, who had a heart as big as
> > > > > > > > >> > > Phoenix. She explained her son's final wish and
> > > > > > > > >> > > asked if it might be possible to give her six-year-
> > > > > > > > >> > > old son a ride around the block on a fire engine.
> > > > > > > > >> > > Fireman Bob said, "Look, we can do better than that.
> > > > > > > > >> > > If you'll have your son ready at seven o'clock
> > > > > > > > >> > > Wednesday morning, we'll make him an honorary fireman
> > > > > > > > >> > > for the whole day. He can come down to the fire
> > > > > > > > >> > > station, eat with us, go out on all the fire calls,
> > > > > > > > >> > > the whole nine yards! "And if you'll give us his
> > > > > > > > >> > > sizes, we'll get a real fire uniform for him,
> > > > > > > > >> > > with a real fire hat-not a toy one-with the emblem
> > > > > > > > >> > > of the Phoenix Fire Department on it, a yellow
slicker
> > > > > > > > >> > > like we wear and rubber boots. They're all
> > > > > > > > >> > > manufactured right here in Phoenix, so we can get
them
> > > > > > > > >> > > fast."
> > > > > > > > >> > > Three days later Fireman Bob picked up Billy, dressed
> > > > > > > > >> > > him in his fire uniform and escorted him from his
> > > > > > > > >> > > hospital bed to the waiting hook and ladder truck.
> > > > > > > > >> > > Billy got to sit on the back of the truck and help
> > > > > > > > >> > > steer it back to the fire station. He was in heaven.
> > > > > > > > >> > > There were three fire calls in Phoenix that day and
> > > > > > > > >> > > Billy got to go out on all three calls. He rode in
> > > > > > > > >> > > the different fire engines, the paramedic's van, and
> > > > > > > > >> > > even the fire chief's car. He was also videotaped
> > > > > > > > >> > > for the local news program.
> > > > > > > > >> > > Having his dream come true, with all the love and
> > > > > > > > >> > > attention that was lavished upon him, so deeply
> > > > > > > > >> > > touched Billy that he lived three months longer
> > > > > > > > >> > > than any doctor thought possible. One night all of
> > > > > > > > >> > > his vital signs began to drop dramatically and the
> > > > > > > > >> > > head nurse, who believed in the hospice concept that
> > > > > > > > >> > > no one should die alone, began to call the family
> > > > > > > > >> > > members to the hospital.
> > > > > > > > >> > > Then she remembered the day Billy had spent as a
> > fireman,
> > > > > > > > >> > > so she called the Fire Chief and asked if it would be
> > > > > > > > >> > > possible to send a fireman in uniform to the hospital
> > to
> > > > > > > > >> > > be with Billy as he made his transition.
> > > > > > > > >> > > The chief replied, "We can do better than that. We'll
> > be
> > > > > > > > >> > > there in five minutes. Will you please do me a favor?
> > > > > > > > >> > > When you hear the sirens screaming and see the lights
> > > > > > > > >> > > flashing, will you announce over the PA system that
> > there
> > > > > > > > >> > > is not a fire? It's just the fire department coming
to
> > see
> > > > > > > > >> > > one of its finest members one more time. And will you
> > > > > > > > >> > > open the window to his room? About five minutes later
a
> > > > > > > > >> > > hook and ladder truck arrived at the hospital,
extended
> > > > > > > > >> > > its ladder up to Billy's third floor open window and
16
> > > > > > > > >> > > firefighters climbed up the ladder into Billy's room.
> > > > > > > > >> > > With his mother's permission, they hugged him and
held
> > > > > > > > >> > > him and told him how much they loved him.
> > > > > > > > >> > > With that Billy looked up and said, "Chief, am I
really
> > > > > > > > >> > > a fireman now?" Billy, you are, and the Head Chief,
> > Jesus,
> > > > > > > > >> > > is holding your hand." The chief said. With those
> > words,
> > > > > > > > >> > > Billy smiled and said, "I know, He's been holding my
> > hand
> > > > > > > > >> > > all day, and the angels have been singing." He closed
> > > > > > > > >> > > his eyes one last time.
> > > > > > > > >> > > My instructions were to send this to four people that
I
> > > > > > > > >> > > wanted God to bless and I picked you. Please pass
this
> > > > > > > > >> > > to four people you want to be blessed as well as the
> > person
> > > > > > > > >> > > who sent it to you. This story is powerful and there
is
> > > > > > > > >> > > nothing attached, please do not break this pattern;
> > > > > > > > >> > > uplifting stories are one of the best gifts we
receive.
> > > > > > > > >> > > There is no cost but a lot of rewards, let's continue
> > to
> > > > > > > > >> > > uplift one another. God bless you and have a nice
day!
> > > > > >

Thanks, I needed that

Thought you could use a laugh!

Ever have one of those days?

(keep an eye on his foot)

Stations 3,4 and 5.  I spoke with Danny Collier of the EPA today, Friday, November 30, 2001 and he has instructed me that the EPA is to receive copies of all monthly water well sampling for C/S 3,4, and 5 in addition to sending the monthly sampling results to Yolanda Barney of the Navajo Nation. Although Yolanda is the primary recipient, the EPA becomes secondary as they have the responsibility for oversight of Indian Lands environmental issues.  Danny said that the EPA would eventually phase themselves out of the Navajo's business but until they do, he is requesting copies of all sampling data.  I asked him if we could fax him the monthly reports and he indiacted that it would be OK to do so.  His fax number is (415) 947-3549.  I will keep you apprised of any future changes in the distribution of the water sampling reports. 

Bill, I have this outstanding bill notice which I keep getting form iPayit.  There are about 5 invoices from Argent for EOTT work which they did in 2001. It was for the Midland EOTT compliance stuff. I dont know how to let the system know that these invoices have been taken care of.  Is there someone you know of who can let iPayit know that these invoices have been taken care of?   

Alert!  
You are receiving this message because you have an unresolved invoice in your iPayit in-box that is past due.  It is critical that you login to iPayit and take immediate action to resolve this invoice. 

Remember, you play an important role in ensuring that we pay our vendors on time. 

Tip!:  You must login to the system to forward this invoice to another user. 

To launch iPayit, click on the link below:
http://iPayit.enron.com
Note:  Your iPayit User ID and Password are your eHRonline/SAP Personnel ID and Password.

First time iPayit user?  For training materials, click on the link below:
http://isc.enron.com/site/doclibrary/user/default.asp

Need help?
North America: ISC Call Center at (713) 345-4727.
Europe: European Accounts Payable at +44-20-7783-7520.
Asia-Pacific: Sydney Accounts Payable at +61-2-9229-2336

Scott, it seems that the letter we received from Danny is otherwise.   In the process of having the Navajo EPA take over the drinking water program for the Tribe, the EPA as overseer wants to be kept in the loop for a little while longer.  In light of this, we need to not only send to the EPA all monthly sampling reports for drinding, but also to the Yolanda Barney of the Navanl Nation.  I spoke with Danny about this and he said that the EPAs involvement would start  to deminish in the future but he didnt when.

Larry-
Do we or do we not have send analysis results to Danny every month?  I thought you said to only send them to Navajo Nation EPA (Yolanda Barney) so that's what I was doing.

Scott

Randy, I tried to send you a note about a week ago about my elk hunt but it came back undelivered.  I thought you might have changed your address.  Guess I typed it in by mistake. (age does that to you sometimes).  Yes, things are stressful, but as you eluded to God doesnt give His kids a spirit of fear, but confidence that He is in control.  I never thought I d see the Enron empire tumble, but when you torture and strangle a corporation hard enough and long enough, eventually it gives up and surrenders.  There is a push underway to isolate the pipelines from the Enron umbrella and make all business units with money making assets separate from the rest of Enron.  Transwestern is definately a money making asset, and that is what may keep me afloat.  Well see.  Anyway, as long as I keep my focus on Jesus and keep reminding myself of that which is important (family and health) I know Ill come through all of this.

Sorry to hear that there is the word "reorganization"  in Hess.  this kind of stuff generally never does anything but upset employees and create a period of time when nobody is productive.  I hate this kind of stuff. I know that change is inevitable, but so disruptive.  Ill keep you in prayer. Isnt it great to have the confidence and assurance that we serve a big enough God, that He can handle all our problems?  Keep the faith......my friend and focus on the eternal.  Just like Peter wrote, were just pilgrims in a foregin land, waiting for the trip home and promise of Christ's return.        

Larry, 
I have been thinking of you a lot with all of the Enron stuff going on.  You
and your family are in my prayers because I know what a strain this kind of
uncertainty can put on a person.  We are also facing layoffs this coming
January.  We have a new president and are going through a restructuring.  So
we are all uncertain if we will have a job this coming February.  Keep me
posted on how things are going with you.  I will be praying for you.  At
least we have the knowledge that God is in control and that nothing happens
to us that is not first filtered through His everlasting love.

Your brother,
Randy

Thought you might like this...
 
 
 
"It's God's Responsibility to forgive Bin Ladin . . .
It's our responsibility to arrange the meeting"
-United States Marine Corps

You know I used to work for a director in ETS that always gave 103%, now I know how he did it, not really, just kidding....

This is what happened to Enron!!!!!!!!!!!!

> << > > > How do you give 103%
> > > >
> > > > We have all been to those meetings where
> someone wants more than 100%.
> > > >
> > > > Well, here's how you do that. Here's how you
> can achieve103%.
> > > >
> > > > First of all, here's a little math that might
> prove helpful in the
> > future.
> > > >
> > > >
> > > > How does one achieve 100% in LIFE?
> > > >
> > > > Begin by noting the following:
> > > >
> > > > IF:
> > > >     A = 1
> > > >     B = 2
> > > >     C = 3
> > > >     D = 4
> > > >     E = 5
> > > >     F = 6
> > > >  G = 7
> > > >     H = 8
> > > >      I = 9
> > > >      J = 10
> > > >     K = 11
> > > >      L = 12
> > > >     M = 13
> > > >      N = 14
> > > >  O = 15
> > > >      P = 16
> > > >      Q = 17
> > > >       R = 18
> > > >       S = 19
> > > >       T = 20
> > > >       U = 21
> > > >       V = 22
> > > >       W = 23
> > > >        X = 24
> > > >        Y = 25
> > > >        Z = 26
> > > >
> > > > Then:
> > > >                   H A R D W O R K
> > > >      8+1+18+4+23+15+18+11 = Only 98%
> > > >
> > > > Similarly,
> > > >                    K N O W L E D G E
> > > >                   11+14+15+23+12+5+4+7+5 =
> Only 96%
> > > >
> > > > But interestingly (and as you'd expect),
> > > >
> > > >                   A T T I T U D E
> > > >      1+20+20+9+20+21+4+5 = 100%...
> > > >                   This is how you achieve 100%
> in LIFE.
> > > >
> > > > But even more important to realize:
> > > >
> > > >    B U L L S H I T                        
>>>>>>  2+21+12+12+19+8+9+20 = 103%
> > > >
> > > > So now you know what all those high-priced
> consultants, upper
> > > > management,and motivational speakers really
> mean when they
> > > > want more than 100%! >>
> 
> 

__________________________________________________
Do You Yahoo!?
Buy the perfect holiday gifts at Yahoo! Shopping.
http://shopping.yahoo.com

this is cute,  things like this help during difficult times

> RETIREMENT IN A TRAILER  PARK THRU THE EYES OF A
> CHILD This is just too
> cute! 
> 
> After a spring  break, a teacher asked her young
> pupils how they  spent
> the holidays. One  child wrote the following: 
> 
> "We always used to spend the holidays with Grandma
> and Grandpa. They used
>  to live here in a big brick house, but Grandpa got
> retarded and they
> moved  to Arizona.    
> 
> Now they live in a  place with a lot of other
> retarded  people.  They
> live in a tin box  and have rocks painted green to
> look like grass.  They
> ride around on big tricycles and wear name tags
> because they don't  know
> who they are anymore.  They go to a building called
> a wrecked center, but
> they must have got it  fixed, because it is all
> right now. They play
> games and do exercises  there, but they don't do
> them very well. There is
> a swimming pool too,  but  they all jump up and down
> in it with their
> hats on. I guess they don't know how to swim.   
> 
> At their gate, there is a doll house with a little
> old man sitting in it.
>  He watches all day so nobody can escape. Sometimes
> they sneak out.  Then
>  they go cruising in their golf carts. 
> 
> My Grandma used to bake cookies and stuff, but I
> guess she forgot how. 
> Nobody there cooks, they just eat out. And they eat
> the same thing every 
> night, "Early Birds. "  Some of the people can't get
> past the man in the 
> doll house to go out. So the ones who do get out
> bring food back to the 
> wrecked center and call it pot luck. 
> 
> My Grandma says Grandpa's worked all his life to
> earn his retardment and 
> says I should work hard so I  can be retarded
> someday too. When I earn my
>  retardment I want to be  the man in the doll house.
> Then I will let
> people  out so they can visit their grandchildren. "
> 
> 

__________________________________________________
Do You Yahoo!?
Buy the perfect holiday gifts at Yahoo! Shopping.
http://shopping.yahoo.com

Title them anyway you want.

Tram's:

Wasn't me
spin spin
barbie girl
look at us now
ecstasy
silence-----delirium
everything but the girl
one and one-------speed it up
fable
put me in heaven with your touch-------dj penetrate
angel

Mine:

silence-----delirium
put me in heaven with your touch-------dj penetrate
heart-------pet shop boys
i wanna know------joe
stronger-------brittany spears 
one and one-------speed it up
fable
everything but the girl
sexual------amber
i see stars
 

Amber's phone number	281 2?6-822?

Don I am sorry about your loss, mostly because those in the family of God h=
ate to see pain hit a family member.  Even under the most dire and seemingl=
y impossible situations, God is in control.  Its His promise that He will n=
ever leave us nor forsake us.  That in itself, is a real comfort and securi=
ty knowing we have His eternal and loving spirit with us at all times.  Whe=
n you get some time, read Romans 8:28 and then meditate on it.  So many tim=
es we confuse our wants for our needs and that are promised by Him. Because=
 he desires to conform us inito the image of His Son, sometimes He has to e=
mpty us of worldly understandings and unrighteousness so that He can fill u=
s with blessings that glorify Him. Once we make a heart commitment and His =
spirit sets up residence within us, God's promise in Romans is to work ever=
ything, including a job loss to His glory.  If we are eternally minded and =
understand that our citizenship and home is in heaven, then life on earth b=
egins to look less important and we see the worldly goods as being very tem=
porary.  I will pray for you and your family that you see a manifestation o=
f God's work in your life and that you are brought even closer unto Him in =
your Christian walk.  I will keep my ears open for any employment opportuni=
ties. =20

When you're feeling down and discouraged, drop me a line.  Sharing Christ w=
ith someone always seems to help me through the day in difficult situations=
.  In Hebrews were told  to encourage the brethren.  I would consider it an=
 honor to hear form you again....keep the faith...  its all we have........=
.   =20

As you all know, Enron has suffered incredible losses in the last few days.=
  Due to this several thousand of us have been severed from the company.  M=
y new contact numbers are:

7002 Cool Water Court
Sugar Land, TX  77479
(Home) 281-565-2219
(Mobile) 713-569-1480
(E-mail) auggie@alltel.net

By the way, if any of you know of any environmental positions, let me know.

Don E. Stevens
Enron Corp.
Environmental Manager
713-345-5664

Thanks Randy, Ive heard him on the radio

I came across this web site and knew you would enjoy it... 
 
It's called realFamilies and has really interesting articles about parenting and marriage. You can check them out at http://www.realfamilies.com

It features a funny and insightful psychologist named Dr. Kevin Leman, and he also has a TV show that you can watch online too.

Randy King

Sta. 3 and 4, I am sending to you via regular mail, the new air permits for the Redrock Expansion.  I will be contacting you in the near future about coming out and going through the permits to assign responsibilities between you and me.  If you get some time, I would suggest that you look over each permit as there is additional recordkeeping and reporting above that which is on your existing permit.  the old permit will expire when the facility begins operation of the turbine.  For Station 4, if a turbine is not installed at your location, this new permit wont apply.  But in the event it happens, you have the permit.

Bottom line, you need to keep this permit at each location.    

Thanks, Roger.  Im on board with this. 

Larry,

Just wanted to confirm what I told you on the phone this morning.  The
recent permit mods have no effect on when your annual compliance
certifications are due.  Those are always based on initial permit
issuance, which was April 25.

Roger Kohn
USEPA - Air Division (AIR-3)
75 Hawthorne Street
San Francisco, CA  94105-3901
Phone 415-972-3973

Rich, concerning the environmental liabilities which may impact Transwestern if Duke should direct the liquids from their 8" line into the pipeline liquids tank at Wt-1, I have a concern.  

The liquids that are generated in the 8" line are exempt from hazardous waste regulations (RCRA) as long as they stay in the Duke line and are not transfered and collect in a mainline tank.  Because WT-1 is a mainline compressor station, any chemicals or compounds which are regulated under Subtitle C of RCRA  become the responsibility of the owner of the mainline tank.  Within the past few years, we have experienced the collection of regulated liquids at Wt-1 which were not placed there by Tranwestern.  Chemicals which producers and processing, upstream of Wt-1, have placed downhole to enhance gas production and other agents such as corrosion inhibitors and pipeline solvents have found their way into our tank and we have paid for the disposal.  Unfortunately, there is no way to segregate the bad materials from the good recycleable materials.

Based upon this, I would recommend that we not allow Dukes pipeline liquids to collect into our tank.   

Thanks Michael for the brief update.  it sounds encouraging.  I am looking forward to putting the model into motion.  No problem with signing the no cost extension for the project, send it my way. 

Dear Larry:
It was good hearing from you a few days ago. We are wrapping up a progress
report on the project but I can tell you briefly what we have accomplished
so far. We have finished the PCB model development/modification to
incorporate most of the main ideas that we talked about when you, John and
your crew visited us. Specifically, we have been able to extend the model
significantly to include flow regime impact on cleanup efficiency and the
amount of solvent that will be required. We have looked at the issue of
contact time and contact area. These two and some of the other salient
issues turned out to be more challenging to handle than we had originally
anticipated but we have now nailed them. In fact, the new program finally
worked well and debugged only about 2-3 weeks ago. Since then we have been
doing shake-down testing and all is well so far. The results are exciting as
you would see in the report. There are two tasks that we would now embark
on. Now that the model has all the principal mechanisms incorporated, we are
now planning a comprehensive production runs where we will give you cleanup
options, etc with critical evaluations of those. That will probably take us
until the end of January. This is where I will need to talk to you very
often to determine what options make most sense to run so that we do not
just run millions of options.
	Along this line, we will need another no-cost extension letter from
you so as to continue the work beyond December. We can talk about how long
if you want so as to determine what you would really like to be the
concluding point. So, I will call you after sending the report, which should
be by Monday next week. Thanks and best regards.

          Michael
Michael A. Adewumi, PhD
Professor & Chair of Graduate Program 
   in Petroleum & Natural Gas Engineering
Quentin E. and Louis L. Wood University Endowed Fellow
The Pennsylvania State University
202 Hosler Building
University Park, PA 16802
Tel.: (814) 863-2816
Fax: (814) 863-1875
Email: michael@pnge.psu.edu

FYI from Penn State on the progress of the model to remove PCB's from Transwetern's pipeline.

Dear Larry:
It was good hearing from you a few days ago. We are wrapping up a progress
report on the project but I can tell you briefly what we have accomplished
so far. We have finished the PCB model development/modification to
incorporate most of the main ideas that we talked about when you, John and
your crew visited us. Specifically, we have been able to extend the model
significantly to include flow regime impact on cleanup efficiency and the
amount of solvent that will be required. We have looked at the issue of
contact time and contact area. These two and some of the other salient
issues turned out to be more challenging to handle than we had originally
anticipated but we have now nailed them. In fact, the new program finally
worked well and debugged only about 2-3 weeks ago. Since then we have been
doing shake-down testing and all is well so far. The results are exciting as
you would see in the report. There are two tasks that we would now embark
on. Now that the model has all the principal mechanisms incorporated, we are
now planning a comprehensive production runs where we will give you cleanup
options, etc with critical evaluations of those. That will probably take us
until the end of January. This is where I will need to talk to you very
often to determine what options make most sense to run so that we do not
just run millions of options.
	Along this line, we will need another no-cost extension letter from
you so as to continue the work beyond December. We can talk about how long
if you want so as to determine what you would really like to be the
concluding point. So, I will call you after sending the report, which should
be by Monday next week. Thanks and best regards.

          Michael
Michael A. Adewumi, PhD
Professor & Chair of Graduate Program 
   in Petroleum & Natural Gas Engineering
Quentin E. and Louis L. Wood University Endowed Fellow
The Pennsylvania State University
202 Hosler Building
University Park, PA 16802
Tel.: (814) 863-2816
Fax: (814) 863-1875
Email: michael@pnge.psu.edu

Ray, Kay had mentioned that your team was having an OCD inpsection this week (Wednesday?).  Ive tried to contact you a couple of times to see if you might need some help, but was unsuccessful.  Is there something wrong with your phone?  Give me a call if you feel uncomfortable about any issue prior to their visit. I will be in the office on wednesday but gone from 11:30 am-1:45 pm.  Let me know how the  inspection went....... 

Thanks John, Ill keep you posted.  Hows your pulse?   Doing OK?

Thanks Larry for passing this along.  This is good news, if in fact the good doctor has isolated the solvent contact time (so the solution has maximum effectiveness as the entrained pigs apply it to the walls of the pipe).  That was one of the issues that bothered me most about the effectiveness of an application.  Would the solvent be uniformly applied and in the proper timeframe so that the PCB's would be absorbed and transported to an pre-determined extraction point?  It sounds like the model is ready.  After you receive the report and if you agree, I would be willing to discuss with Louie another no-cost extension.  John 

FYI from Penn State on the progress of the model to remove PCB's from Transwetern's pipeline.

Dear Larry:
It was good hearing from you a few days ago. We are wrapping up a progress
report on the project but I can tell you briefly what we have accomplished
so far. We have finished the PCB model development/modification to
incorporate most of the main ideas that we talked about when you, John and
your crew visited us. Specifically, we have been able to extend the model
significantly to include flow regime impact on cleanup efficiency and the
amount of solvent that will be required. We have looked at the issue of
contact time and contact area. These two and some of the other salient
issues turned out to be more challenging to handle than we had originally
anticipated but we have now nailed them. In fact, the new program finally
worked well and debugged only about 2-3 weeks ago. Since then we have been
doing shake-down testing and all is well so far. The results are exciting as
you would see in the report. There are two tasks that we would now embark
on. Now that the model has all the principal mechanisms incorporated, we are
now planning a comprehensive production runs where we will give you cleanup
options, etc with critical evaluations of those. That will probably take us
until the end of January. This is where I will need to talk to you very
often to determine what options make most sense to run so that we do not
just run millions of options.
	Along this line, we will need another no-cost extension letter from
you so as to continue the work beyond December. We can talk about how long
if you want so as to determine what you would really like to be the
concluding point. So, I will call you after sending the report, which should
be by Monday next week. Thanks and best regards.

          Michael
Michael A. Adewumi, PhD
Professor & Chair of Graduate Program 
   in Petroleum & Natural Gas Engineering
Quentin E. and Louis L. Wood University Endowed Fellow
The Pennsylvania State University
202 Hosler Building
University Park, PA 16802
Tel.: (814) 863-2816
Fax: (814) 863-1875
Email: michael@pnge.psu.edu

Me too. Thats what Im doing.  Staying away from the gossip and grip sessions.  Its nice to know that He's a big enough God to handle all problems and concerns, even the ones in Enron.....

OK, just working hard and keeping my head down.  This is our only chance to survive.  Do our job better than anyone else and keep our nose clean.  I'm just making it a matter of prayer.  John

Thanks John, Ill keep you posted.  Hows your pulse?   Doing OK?

Thanks Larry for passing this along.  This is good news, if in fact the good doctor has isolated the solvent contact time (so the solution has maximum effectiveness as the entrained pigs apply it to the walls of the pipe).  That was one of the issues that bothered me most about the effectiveness of an application.  Would the solvent be uniformly applied and in the proper timeframe so that the PCB's would be absorbed and transported to an pre-determined extraction point?  It sounds like the model is ready.  After you receive the report and if you agree, I would be willing to discuss with Louie another no-cost extension.  John 

FYI from Penn State on the progress of the model to remove PCB's from Transwetern's pipeline.

Dear Larry:
It was good hearing from you a few days ago. We are wrapping up a progress
report on the project but I can tell you briefly what we have accomplished
so far. We have finished the PCB model development/modification to
incorporate most of the main ideas that we talked about when you, John and
your crew visited us. Specifically, we have been able to extend the model
significantly to include flow regime impact on cleanup efficiency and the
amount of solvent that will be required. We have looked at the issue of
contact time and contact area. These two and some of the other salient
issues turned out to be more challenging to handle than we had originally
anticipated but we have now nailed them. In fact, the new program finally
worked well and debugged only about 2-3 weeks ago. Since then we have been
doing shake-down testing and all is well so far. The results are exciting as
you would see in the report. There are two tasks that we would now embark
on. Now that the model has all the principal mechanisms incorporated, we are
now planning a comprehensive production runs where we will give you cleanup
options, etc with critical evaluations of those. That will probably take us
until the end of January. This is where I will need to talk to you very
often to determine what options make most sense to run so that we do not
just run millions of options.
	Along this line, we will need another no-cost extension letter from
you so as to continue the work beyond December. We can talk about how long
if you want so as to determine what you would really like to be the
concluding point. So, I will call you after sending the report, which should
be by Monday next week. Thanks and best regards.

          Michael
Michael A. Adewumi, PhD
Professor & Chair of Graduate Program 
   in Petroleum & Natural Gas Engineering
Quentin E. and Louis L. Wood University Endowed Fellow
The Pennsylvania State University
202 Hosler Building
University Park, PA 16802
Tel.: (814) 863-2816
Fax: (814) 863-1875
Email: michael@pnge.psu.edu

I have currently taken over the COMED power market and was needing to recieve 
access to Enron Online.  My ext. # 6203.

Thanks,

Michael Carson

go cougars!

Mike
Are you there today??? I need to close the loop with you on directions to
the Pentagon City -- repeat "Pentagon City" Metro station / shopping mall...
Chuck and I agree, this is the best place to head to and park the car (6
story parking garage -- about 1/2 mile from pentagon).   From there -- take
the metro over to the "Pentagon Station" which is the pentagon....

Ken

are you guys still in for dinner tonight.......6:30 at our place!    give me 
a call @ worrk 713-853-6203

Terri Clynes@ECT
06/07/2000 04:50 PM
Matt and Mike,

Here is the annual Comed picnic that you have heard so much about.  You both 
should try to go.  

Terri
SFletcher@edisonmission.com on 06/07/2000 03:31:30 PM
(See attached file: Picnic1.ppt)   (See attached file: picnic opening.doc)  
(See
attached file: picnic directions1.doc)

Edison Mission Marketing and Trading
Office Phone: (949) 798-7455
Cell Phone: (714) 337-9474

 - Picnic1.ppt
 - picnic opening.doc
 - picnic directions1.doc

are you staying with brit's parents??

I think you left your watch at my house on Friday night..... You can come by 
and pick it up any time this week... Also,,,, we need to figure out where to 
watch the Cats this Saturday???

MC

hey, did you go out fri?  thanks for calling-punk!  we're all getting
together for a going away for gina, clay, chris j and myself this thurs. at
chuys on westheimer so try to make it.  jeannie is going and of course,
heather is invited as well.  i'll see you there?!

sorry I have not had a chance to call you back ... will call you this wk end!

MC

Big Mack,,,,  Just give me call when you are coming down for the DUKE 
interview ..... Our Department head wants to go out to lunch with you ......  
casual lunch type thing.... they were very impressed with your resume!  I 
also played you up like you da man!!!

MC

mackle's # is 781-639-2752

I will have to get into meather's planner tonight...... but I think I can get 
it...... I will try to give it to you this wk end

MC

I'll take two ,,, if possible

BBQ pork...... let me think???????  Oh yeah ! we're in!

Please change my book from "Short Term Main" to "Short term SERC"

Thankyou,

Mike Carson
X6203

4114 riley
Houston, TX 77005

giddty up!

give me a call 713-853-6203

what is your #??

what is Mansfield's #at work??

Heather and I just want to thankyou for the Air force book you sent us.   We 
love it!  Heather sat down, and read the whole thing last week end... She 
can't believe you used to fly a C-5.
Anyway ,,, thankyou so much.

MC

7:00 Saturday,,,2633 cason in West U

Mike Carson
09/07/2000 10:56 AM
7:00 Saturday,,,2633 cason in West U

--n
7:00 Saturday,,,2633 cason in West U

Mike Carson
08/04/2000 10:22 AM
Some friends of my wife and I are throwing a little bash on the evening of 
September 9th for my upcoming baby BOY.   I would like to invite you all to 
attend.  I believe there will be a margarita machine....

If you want to come,, please reply by sending me your address.  You will then 
recieve an invitation by mail.

Hope to see you there,,

Mike

DAUNTE CULPEPPER

EDDIE GEORGE
ANTOINE SMITH

ANTONIO FRREMAN
PEERLESS PRICE
TONY GONZALEZ

M GRAMATICA

GIANTS DEF

where are you at???

give me a call today!!

713-853-6203

MC

http://www.oklahoman.com/cgi-bin/show_article?ID=547605&pic=none&TP=getarticle

carson@us.ibm.com on 09/11/2000 02:21:17 PM
http://www.oklahoman.com/cgi-bin/show_article?ID=547605&pic=none&TP=getarticle

Chuck Carson  IBM Americas PISC Dallas (1) 817-962-6933
7 Campus Circle  MS 01-02-40
Roanoke, TX 76262

Chuck Carson
09/11/2000 02:14 PM

Chuck Carson  IBM Americas PISC Dallas (1) 817-962-6933
7 Campus Circle  MS 01-02-40
Roanoke, TX 76262

Chuck Carson
09/11/2000 02:13 PM

Thanks - I will send to Ken, Mike and Susan  - they have been there also.

Chuck Carson  IBM Americas PISC Dallas (1) 817-962-6933
7 Campus Circle  MS 01-02-40
Roanoke, TX 76262

Please respond to <scarsonpro@pga.com>

Chuck, good article about Theop's fish farm in the Oklahoman this morning.
I can save it for you or you can get it off the oklahoman web site. I am
still considering hockey tickets but if I wait too long its ok. I will let
you know real soon. Web site is www.oklahoman.com
Thought you might take a lood.
Steve

what are you doing in Denver???

PBRT*2
MC

> A Kansas State Wildcat fan used to amuse
> himself by scaring every
> >  >  Nebraska fan he would see strutting down the side of the road in
their
> >  >  obnoxious red and white colors. He would swerve his van as if to hit
> >  >  them, and then he would swerve back on the road just before hitting
> >  > them.
> >  >
> >  >  One day, as the van driver was driving along, he saw a priest. He
> >  >  thought he would do a good deed and pulled the van over. He asked
the
> >  >  priest, "Where are you going, Father?" "I'm going to give Mass at
St.
> >  >  Joseph's  Church, about five miles down the road," replied the
priest.
> >  >
> >  >  "No problem, Father! I'll give you a lift. Climb in!" The priest
> >  > climbed
> >  >   into the passenger seat, and the van continued down the road.
> >  > Suddenly,
> >  >  the driver saw a Nebraska fan strutting down the road, and
> >  > instinctively,
> >  >  he swerved as if to hit him. But, as usual, just in time, he swerved
> >  > back
> >  >  to the road, narrowly missing the guy.
> >  >
> >  >  Even though he was certain he missed the guy, he still heard a loud
> >  >  "THUD." Not understanding where the noise came from, he glanced in
> >  >  his mirrors, but he didn't see anything.
> >  >
> >  >  He then remembered the priest, and he turned to the priest and
> >  >  said, "I'm sorry, Father. I almost hit that Nebraska fan." "That's
> >  >  OK,"  replied the priest. "I got him with the door."

yeah I know,,,, it has been a while.... the baby boy is due in mid 
October(about a month)!!!  We are really excited.....what school are you 
going to out there... and what are you majoring in???      You are lucky to 
be out there in colo  ,,, it is stilll 100 degrees down here!

MC

Are you in 
Dallas yet??   what is your company e mail??

MC

NO problem///   we need to get together sometime..........

the kid!

Beebe James <Sjbeebe@donohue.ca> on 08/31/2000 04:31:10 PM
 <<Resume_JamesBeebe.doc>>

 - Resume_JamesBeebe.doc

QB --bledsoe

RB--E. George,jj johnson

rec--antonio freeman, k lockett, tony gonzalez

k-- m. gramatica

def-- giants

did I tell you about our trip to Mexico a month ago.... we did some cenote 
dives(cave dives).... it was awesome!!!!!

QB--culpepper

RB -- E .George
RB -  A sMITH

rec- ANTONIO FREEMAN
REC--JERRY RICE
REC-T. GONZALEZ

K- M GRAMATICA
 DEF- NY GIANTS

GREG WOULFE@ENRON COMMUNICATIONS
10/04/2000 06:18 PM

RIBFEST IV

Mike Paradise produced an unparalleled performance last year managing to=20
dominate the lowest ranking of all the contestants by a considerable margin=
=20
for the second year in a row!  Additionally, the judges showed tremendous=
=20
wisdom picking the winner.  However, the nagging question remains; how good=
=20
does the perfect rib taste?  Thus, as the artist must pursue beauty, the=20
fourth annual celebration of the Baby Back Rib must take place.
=20
This event involves many of the things you need for a perfect weekend day:=
=20
eating a lot of ribs, imbibing libations, enjoying an autumn day, and=20
watching some football.  This year, the contestants will be cooking an absu=
rd=20
amount of ribs, allowing the crowd to voice their opinion on the "people's=
=20
choice" along with the official judging of the champion.  Cooking technique=
s=20
are hotly debated, and the insults are legion, but within a month, most=20
people are able to speak to each other again.
=20
If you think you=01,re going to make it please call Greg or Martha (713)=20
861-2766, we need to know how much to stock up on.  Kids are definitely=20
welcome, we are renting an inflatable moon-walk, and we'll have someone the=
re=20
to help watch the kids.

Details:

Date: Saturday, Nov 4, 2000

Time:  We start the grills around 12:00, the first judging will occur aroun=
d=20
3:30.  Most people don't have the emotional wherewithal (myself especially)=
=20
to make it much past 7:30.

Where:  1443 N. Oxford Street (in the Heights)=20

 From I10=20
 If you are coming from the West and driving East, exit at Studemont.  Take=
 a=20
left at Studemont heading north, and take it up to 14th street (there=01,s =
a=20
Fiesta Grocery on the corner).  Turn left on 14th.  The first street you ca=
n=20
make a right is Oxford.  Turn right on Oxford, one block up, we=01,re the s=
econd=20
to the last house on your left.

 From the inner-loop:
 Get on Montrose and head North.  As you cross under I10, Montrose changes =
to=20
Studemont then to Studewood.  Keep heading North until you get to 14th Stre=
et=20
(there=01,s a Fiesta Grocery on the corner).  Turn left on 14th.  The first=
=20
street you can make a right is Oxford.  Turn right on Oxford, one block up,=
=20
we=01,re the second to the last house on your left.

will do........ heard sweaty "a" will be trading ENT

QB -- D. Culpepper
RB-=- E. Georrge
            A. Smith

REC--A. Freeman
 J Rice
 P. Price

K -- M. Gramatica

d- Giants

no attachment

http://espn.go.com/ncf/rankings/ap.html

Susan Carson <Susan@metronet.com> on 10/11/2000 03:44:27 PM
How is Heather feeling. I have a 20% off coupon for Babies R Us. I was
looking on the gifts listed in Heather's registry with them. Is there
anything in particular, that you don't already have, that you need. This
coupon is burning a hole in my pocket.

Love,
Mom

screw blair!

QB -- Culpepper
RB-- E. George
RB --  JR Redmond
REC -- A Freeman
REC -- J Rice
REC -- T Gonzalez
K -- D. Brien
DEF -- NY Giants

Good stuff!!    Looks like it is going to be a GREAT game!

very excirted,,,,,

MC

perge!

what is up.... are you up for beers on saturday??

This # is not working???

cjackson@txuenergy.com on 10/13/2000 10:50:56 AM
Carson,

Call me when you get a chance...214 975-9806...I don't have your office
number...

Jackson

713-853-6203

	
	

Sent by: John Zufferli@ECT
Jessica and I are having a farewell party.  We hope that we get to see you 
before we move to Canada.  Please attend a get together at our house on 
Saturday November 4 at 7:00 for fajitas and drinks.  The address is:
        4915 Kelvin Dr
        Houston, TX 

The closest major intersection is Kirby and Sunset.  We are located 1 street 
south of Sunset and 1 street east of Kirby.

Please RSVP with the number of attendees to Jessica Zufferli at work via 
e-mail or at X31915.

Looking forward to seeing you.

Hey dude ,,,,, I actually just got back to work today.. had a 8 lb baby boy!

Actually not going to the game this wk end because of the new tike.....  
don't actually know my schedule for the game but let me know what you are 
doing ......  Also ,,, we do need to go to dinner sometime as well

MC

Our little bundle of joy!  He said to tell you that he misses you and can't
wait for you to get home and change his dirty diaper!  I'll save it for you.

Hugs and Kisses,
Me
> Hi kids!  Here are some of the pictures I took on "the night".  Hope you
> three are doing well.  Love you!
>
>
 - Dcp00850.jpg
 - Dcp00852.jpg
 - Dcp00853.jpg

I can't view any of your pics??

>
>
>
 - Dcp00851.jpg
 - Dcp00859.jpg
 - Dcp00864.jpg

>
>
>
 - Dcp00855.jpg
 - Dcp00856.jpg
 - Dcp00857.jpg

>
>
>
 - Dcp00862.jpg
 - Dcp00866.jpg
 - Dcp00867.jpg

Our little bundle of joy!  He said to tell you that he misses you and can't
wait for you to get home and change his dirty diaper!  I'll save it for you.

Hugs and Kisses,
Me
> Hi kids!  Here are some of the pictures I took on "the night".  Hope you
> three are doing well.  Love you!
>
>
 - Dcp00850.jpg
 - Dcp00852.jpg
 - Dcp00853.jpg

WK # 713-853-6203
HOME#713-807-7507
PAGER#877-306-6979  <--- BEST way to get me!!!!
CELL#281-381-7332

get Druuuuuuuunnnnkkkkkkkk!

mc

Can I pick up kimble anders of the chiefs???

QB -- Culpepper
RB -- E George
RB -- K Anders
REC -- A Freeman
REC -- Jerry Rice
REC -- T Gonzalez
K -- M Gramatica
DEF -- Giants

QB--Daunte Culpepper
RB -- Eddie George
RB -- k anders
REC-- Antonio Freeman
REC-- Jerry Rice
REC-- Tony Gonzalez
K --M. Gramatica
DEF -- Giants

I believe ,,I am 7 & 2

Hey guys ,,,, thankyou very much for the baby outfits... Heather and I both 
loved them......  We can't wait for you guys to meet him.......  We took him 
to the doctor today for his two week chk up and he weighed 9.5 lbs.  That is 
up over a pound....  he eats like a horse and is very healthy.... the next 
goal is to get him to sleep at night!

Mike and Heather

perge!

I still believe I am 7 &2 NOT 6 &3...  look at the week by week

GREG WOULFE@ENRON COMMUNICATIONS
11/03/2000 07:52 AM
As the chaplain said in Caddyshack, "The good Lord would never ruin the=20
greatest game of my life", and Mr. Murray, "I don't think the heavy stuff i=
s=20
coming down for quite some time yet."

Hopefully the weather-guys didn't flip the coin correctly this time=20
(weather.com says, "isolated T-storms, 81H, 66L).  Rain or shine though, th=
e=20
ribfest will go on.

RIBFEST IV

Mike Paradise produced an unparalleled performance last year managing to=20
dominate the lowest ranking of all the contestants by a considerable margin=
=20
for the second year in a row!  Additionally, the judges showed tremendous=
=20
wisdom picking the winner.  However, the nagging question remains; how good=
=20
does the perfect rib taste?  Thus, as the artist must pursue beauty, the=20
fourth annual celebration of the Baby Back Rib must take place.
=20
This event involves many of the things you need for a perfect weekend day:=
=20
eating a lot of ribs, imbibing libations, enjoying an autumn day, and=20
watching some football.  This year, the contestants will be cooking an absu=
rd=20
amount of ribs, allowing the crowd to voice their opinion on the "people's=
=20
choice" along with the official judging of the champion.  Cooking technique=
s=20
are hotly debated, and the insults are legion, but within a month, most=20
people are able to speak to each other again.
=20
If you think you=01,re going to make it please call Greg or Martha (713)=20
861-2766, we need to know how much to stock up on.  Kids are definitely=20
welcome, we are renting an inflatable moon-walk, and we'll have someone the=
re=20
to help watch the kids.

Details:

Date: Saturday, Nov 4, 2000

Time:  We start the grills around 12:00, the first judging will occur aroun=
d=20
3:30.  Most people don't have the emotional wherewithal (myself especially)=
=20
to make it much past 7:30.

Where:  1443 N. Oxford Street (in the Heights)=20

 From I10=20
 If you are coming from the West and driving East, exit at Studemont.  Take=
 a=20
left at Studemont heading north, and take it up to 14th street (there=01,s =
a=20
Fiesta Grocery on the corner).  Turn left on 14th.  The first street you ca=
n=20
make a right is Oxford.  Turn right on Oxford, one block up, we=01,re the s=
econd=20
to the last house on your left.

 From the inner-loop:
 Get on Montrose and head North.  As you cross under I10, Montrose changes =
to=20
Studemont then to Studewood.  Keep heading North until you get to 14th Stre=
et=20
(there=01,s a Fiesta Grocery on the corner).  Turn left on 14th.  The first=
=20
street you can make a right is Oxford.  Turn right on Oxford, one block up,=
=20
we=01,re the second to the last house on your left.

Here are some pics of my new son, Mckennan Harris Carson, 8lbs 7oz, born on 
10/19/00.

>

 - Dcp00850.jpg
 - Dcp00852.jpg
 - Dcp00853.jpg

Mike Carson
11/06/2000 10:48 AM
Here are some pics of my new son, Mckennan Harris Carson, 8lbs 7oz, born on 
10/19/00.

>

 - Dcp00850.jpg
 - Dcp00852.jpg
 - Dcp00853.jpg

what is devin's new e-mail

I just heard the best value beer at the new stadium is the "Half-Yard"!  I'll 
take dos.

MY RECORD SHOULD BE 8 AND 2

give me a call @ 3-6203

QB--D. culpepper
RB--E. george
RB-- K anders
REC--A. Freeman
REC--T. Gonzalez
REC--K Lockett
K--M Gramatica
DEF--NY Giants

I'm in on Key West!

looks good!

QB-- D. Culpepper
RB-- E. George
RB-- K. Anders
REC-J. Rice
REC-- T Gonzalez
REC-- A Freeman
K -- Gramatica
DEF-- NY Giants

	
	

Sent by: Enron Announcements
OPEN ENROLLMENT 2001 DEADLINE EXTENDED

Due to a very heavy, last minute influx of employees trying to make elections 
and/or changes to their 2001 benefits, the open enrollment 2001 deadline has 
been extended until 5pm Central Time on Friday, November 17th.  

Please continue to access the web at www.enron.benefitsnow.com or the IVR at 
1-800-425-5864.  

You must have your 2001 open enrollment personal worksheet that contains your 
personal identification number (PIN - located in the upper right hand corner 
of your worksheet) in order to access the web or IVR.

4114 riley
houston, tx 77005

Artist_Outreach_ <Artist_Outreach_.xqc3jrk.n@my.cdnow.com> on 11/18/2000 
01:00:52 PM
Saturday November 18, 2000

Dear Michael,

The Beastie Boys are ready to explode out of your TV with their
new DVD Video Anthology.  Get to CDNOW and advance order your copy
of this new 2-disc set, which features classic videos, remixes,
and rare footage of the band - a must-have for any fan.

To get your copy of the Beastie Boys DVD Video Anthology, go here:

http://p04.com/t.d?OEW_qdKe=/cdnow.com/bboy_2anthology/from=rex:x:cdn:1117bboy
b

Plus, now's the time to get your favorite Beasties albums for less!
From Friday, November 17, 2000 through Monday, November 20, 2000,
you'll save 30% on every domestic (U.S.) Beastie Boys title in the
store.

Choose from "Paul's Boutique" ($8.38), "Check Your Head" ($8.38),
"Hello Nasty" ($12.58), and more at great prices!

To save 30% on the Beastie Boys at CDNOW, go to:

http://p04.com/t.d?HEW_qdKe=/cdnow.com/beastie_2boys/from=rex:x:cdn:1117bboyb

Hurry -- CDNOW's Beastie Boys Sale ends Monday, November 20, 2000
at 11:59 p.m., EDT. Shop today and save!

Enjoy!

Mike Krupit
President and Chief Executive Officer of CDNOW

P.S. Keep the holidays merry this year. Shop hassle-free at CDNOW's
new Holiday Gift Center. There are no lines, no crowds and no rude
salespeople. Just great gifts for everyone on your list.
Shop now at:

http://p04.com/t.d?IkW_qdKe=/cdnow.com/giftcenter/from=rex:x:cdn:1117bboyb

AOL Keyword: CDNOW
.....................................................
The prices of the items featured in this email were accurate
at the time the email was sent, but may be subject to change.

You received this email because you are an account holder at CDNOW.
If you'd prefer not to receive this Artist Outreach message in the
future, click on the link below:
http://cdnow.p0.com/click.dyn?p=2&i=546315735&s=5iV7

Or, if you'd like to receive different information from us, you can
always update your music preferences by simply going to the MY CDNOW
Preferences page at:
http://p04.com/t.d?BEW_qdKe=/cdnow.com/prefs

For questions regarding your account, order status or to contact our
Customer Service department, please visit our Help Desk.
http://p04.com/t.d?akW_qdKe=/cdnow.com/helpdesk

Or you can write to them at the following address:
CDNOW, Attn: Customer Service, 1005 Virginia Drive,
Fort Washington, PA 19034

FA:8015327

Dis we get a rental also??

Hey what's up??!

How's the baby squirrel??  How big is he now?

My sister is going to start popping out kids here pretty soon....she is 
getting married in KC on Dec. 16.

Wow...I feel old.....

I am not having babies anytime soon.....I just got out of a 1.5year 
relationship, and am not really having too much luck with any other women, so 
I may just move to Nepal and become a monk.....

my address is:
P.O. Box 3394
Avon, CO 81620

Later,
Cody

Cody Downard
Vail/Beaver Creek Training & Development Dept.
970.845.2484
email: cdownard@vailresorts.com

>>> <Mike.Carson@enron.com> 11/20/00 08:14AM >>>
What is your address??

Matt Besch <m_besch@yahoo.com> on 11/20/2000 08:32:23 PM
po box 4962
key west, fl 33040

why??

--- Mike.Carson@enron.com wrote:
> What is your address??
>

__________________________________________________
Do You Yahoo!?
Yahoo! Shopping - Thousands of Stores. Millions of Products.
http://shopping.yahoo.com/

QB-- culpepper
rb --e. george
rb-- k anders
rec-- a freeman
rec -- t gonzalez
rec-- k lockett
k-- m gramaica
def --giants

Yes, it's true!!!? ESPN gameday will be broadcast from Arrowhead on  Saturday
starting at 10:00am.? They will be in Lot D, on the southeast  corner of the
stadium.? Gates 1 and 2 will be opened at 8:30am giving  fans an opportunity
to be a part of the audience, for those of you who will  be going.

K-State holds the "Gameday" unofficial live audience  record, which the
Wildcats set this season as 15,587 fans were present at KSU  Stadium on Oct.
14 prior to the KSU/OU game.

GO  CATS!

Matt Besch <m_besch@yahoo.com> on 11/30/2000 02:10:37 PM
hello all...just to let you know, my cell phone number
has changed.

The new number is:
305-923-5687

Take care,

matt

__________________________________________________
Do You Yahoo!?
Yahoo! Shopping - Thousands of Stores. Millions of Products.
http://shopping.yahoo.com/

What is up ?? What do you think about the cotton bowl??? Are you going??

give me a call at work about tonight.......713-853-6203

http://dailynews.yahoo.com/h/nm/20000411/bs/utilities_enron_1.html

got it!!!!!

Oh yea!!  what is up/////  Are you going back to Manhattan for PIG??  I hear 
Kalberg is going to streak aggievile, lose his glasses, puke on himself, then 
piss in his bed!   
Anyway,,, I was just out your way snowboarding in beaver Creek.... it was 
awesome!   
Where is Besch at anyway,,,, did he move or something??

got it,,,, thanks!

got it

GOOD STUFF!!!! 

Please give me access to execute on EOL for the Short-Term Main book.

Thanks,

Michael Carson

Did you guys need me to make a hotel reservation for you guys??(Holiday Inn 
sound good??).....

MC

carson@us.ibm.com on 04/26/2000 10:43:44 AM
Sounds great -- Sat night --   thanks

Mike,

Could you look in the paper and see what Lone Star Ford has for an AD for a
2000 Expedition Eddie Bauer v8 4.6 -- they were running about 30,800 there
which may be better than I can do here

Thanks

Chuck Carson

Mike.Carson@enron.com on 04/26/2000 04:28:34 PM

Did you guys need me to make a hotel reservation for you guys??(Holiday Inn
sound good??).....

MC

Your confirmation # is 67192516, Holiday Inn Saturday night.....

mc

http://www.lonestarford.com/newcars/expedition/expedition_main.htm

not much ,,,, just got back from chicago (visit to comed),,,,,, drank enough 
to kill a mule!  that town is awesome!   what have you been up to??  have 
been out with darren yet.... it ain't pretty!   

the kid!

I am going to try to make it up for pig, or I should say the drinking done 
during PIG,,,,, I know Vogel and Besch are going too!  What have you been up 
to??

MC

Just thought I would drop everyone a note to let them know that my 
wife(Heather),,,,, is Pregnant!!!!!!!...... We've known for a while, but 
decided to wait till after the first tri-mester to tell..... We are both VERY 
excited!    She is due mid October....Also,  we just purchased a house..... 
our new address is:

Mike & Heather Carson
4114 Riley
Houston, TX 77005

giddy up!

MC

have not moved yet...... so still the same....713-807-7057

Here is the name of an apartment finder in the Kingwood Area,,,,,, 

All-Apartment Locating  281-446-3600

Hope to see you Saturday!

MC

> > >Dear Abby,
> > > >
> > > >I am a sailor in the United States Coast Guard.
> My
> > > >parents live in the suburb of Philadelphia and
> one of
> > > >my sisters, who lives in Bensonhurst is married
> to a
> > > >transvestite. My Father and Mother have
> recently been
> > > >arrested for growing and selling marijuana and
> are
> > > >currently dependent on my other two sisters,
> who are
> > > >prostitutes in Jersey City. I have two
> brothers, one
> > > >who is currently serving a non-parole life
> sentence in
> > > >Attica, for the rape & murder of a teenage boy
> in
> > > >1994, the other currently being held in the
> Wellington
> > > >Remand Center on charges of incest with his
> three children.
> > > >
> > > >I have recently become engaged to marry a
> former Thai
> > > >prostitute who lives in the Bronx and indeed is
> still
> > > >a part-time "working girl" in a brothel,
> however, her
> > > >time there is limited as she has recently been
> > > >infected with an STD.
> > > >
> > > >We intend to marry as soon as possible and are
> > > >currently looking into the possibility of
> opening our
> > > >own brothel, with my fiancee utilizing her
> knowledge
> > > >of the industry working as the manager. I am
> hoping
> > > >my two sisters would be interested in joining
> our
> > > >team. Although I would prefer them not to
> prostitute
> > > >themselves, at least it would get them off the
> streets
> > > >and, hopefully, the heroin.
> > > >
> > > >My problem is this: I love my fiancee and look
> forward
> > > >to bringing her into the family, and of course
> I want
> > > >to be totally honest with her.
> > > >
> > > >Should I tell her about my cousin who graduated
> from
> > > >KU?
> > > >
> > > >Signed,
> > > >Worried about my reputation
> > > >
> > > >
> >
> >
> >
> >
> >
>
>

__________________________________________________
Do You Yahoo!?
Send instant messages & get email alerts with Yahoo! Messenger.
http://im.yahoo.com/

*******************Internet Email Confidentiality Footer*******************

Privileged/Confidential Information may be contained in this message.  If
you
are not the addressee indicated in this message (or responsible for
delivery
of
the message to such person), you may not copy or deliver this message to
anyone.
In such case, you should destroy this message and kindly notify the sender
by
reply email. Please advise immediately if you or your employer do not
consent to
Internet email for messages of this kind.  Opinions, conclusions and other
information in this message that do not relate to the official business of
my
firm shall be understood as neither given nor endorsed by it.

COMED is always SLOW...........

the kid!

mjmoreland@aep.com on 05/22/2000 09:23:47 AM
Rusty Parks <r.parks@jmiinc.com> on 05/18/2000 09:47:50 AM

Dear Abby,
I am a sailor in the United States Coast Guard. My parents live in the suburb 
of
Philadelphia and one of my sisters, who lives in Bensonhurst is married to a
transvestite. My Father and Mother have recently been arrested for growing and
selling marijuana and are currently dependent on my other two sisters, who are
prostitutes in Jersey City. I have two brothers, one who is currently serving 
a
non-parole life sentence in Attica, for the rape & murder of a teenage boy in
1994, the other currently being held in the Wellington Remand Center on 
charges
of incest with his three children.
I have recently become engaged to marry a former Thai prostitute who lives in
the Bronx and indeed is still a part-time "working girl" in a brothel, 
however,
her time there is limited as she has recently been infected with an STD.  We
intend to marry as soon as possible and are currently looking into the
possibility of opening our own brothel, with my fiancee utilizing her 
knowledge
of the industry working as the manager.  I am hoping my two sisters would be
interested in joining our team.  Although I would prefer them not to 
prostitute
themselves, at least it would get them off the streets and, hopefully, the
heroin.
I love my fiancee and look forward to bringing her into the family, and of
course I want to be totally honest with her.  This is my dilemma:  Should I 
tell
her about my cousin who graduated from RICE University?

Signed, Worried about my reputation

what is up!!  did you move or something??  How is the BBQ place going??

mc

I've gotten this joke for every school ,,,,,, I  thought the KU one was  a 
lot more funny of course!

Life is all about a "Six pack and a Sun-tan!"

MC

I love my house....Are you coming to Oklahoma in June with your Dad??  We 
were thinking about going fishing!!!

Mike

KenRCars@aol.com on 05/20/2000 07:48:11 AM
 <A HREF="http://www.radio-stations.net/index.php3">Click here: Radio
stations from around the world</A>

This is a good site to quickly find worldwide radio stations on the
internet....can sort any way first by continent then by news, talk, type of
music etc.   Can be very interesting to "tune in" to say a world hot spot
when something is happening.  I go to KOMA and Bob Brinker and Guam from
here.   For instance, there was some news on a possible military takeover on
the island of Fiji this morning...i went to a Fiji news station.

Kenny

I am trading power still ... but with a lot bigger "BAT" to play with I 
guess!   We are doing fine ... actually we are trying to buy a house.....and 
oh yeah ..... Heather is pregant!

mc

Where are you at now???

Did you come in town this wk end..... My new number at our house is : 
713-668-3712...... my cell # is 281-381-7332

the kid

When is your big day again?????  keep me informed!!

First of all I can't believe you have a girlfriend.......  does she shave her 
legs???

MC

Just give me a call when you want to go!    713-807-7507

mc

dirty!!!!!

what time are we meeting at your place tonight???

Heather and I just had the sonogram yesterday,,,, and it is a boy!!!!   He is 
due in October....

MC

NO can do on the 23rd....I thought you said the 17th...... heather's 
grandparents 50th anniversary is the 23rd!

MC

I'm in!!!!   I really need a beer!

MC

Any plans for the "green holiday"??????

I think we are going to name the baby after your new boss at 
KOCH......."Uday"!!!!!!!!

MC

Yes ,,,, still trading at ENRON.... very big company but it seems very 
strong.....   when were thinking of having a party for Michaelis??

my wife will be out of town,,,,, but that means more beer for me!

give me a call at work sometime.....713-853-6203

Heather's b-day is june 24th

please send this info to Rob Benson as well

Just got your voice mail at the house this wk end.... We have just moved into 
our house and had not checked that # for a couple days.......  I had wondered 
why I never got a reply from you on the e-mails I sent......  I guess we know 
now!

Update...... if you did'nt already know ,,,, Heather and I are having a baby 
boy due in October.... We are both very excited!!!!!   

Got to go....stay in touch

MC

perge!

Michael Carson
4114 Riley
Houston, TX 77005

FYI---  Kenny's girl friend is throwing him a surprise party tonight at 
Cadillac Bar(7:00)...... call me for info....713-853-6203 or cell: 
281-381-7332

MC

Heather

So,,,, will you guys be up for a few brewskies on Friday??

what time and when do we get the pork????

Saturday sounds good!!

Doug Towns <dttowns@swbell.net> on 06/13/2000 08:08:04 AM
Any pork loins?  If not, bring on the chops.  If you bring them by on Sat AM
I will marinate them for the grill.

any lips and a-holes with that??

rlmichaelis@hormel.com on 06/13/2000 10:58:03 AM
No need to marinade.  The tenderloins will be delivered by the
pork man, already marinated and always tender ... guaranteed

Ryan

what is up with you??  the baby is doing great!   Are you still at Power with 
smelly hands??  

still partying like a rock-star

CARSON!

It's a boy...........and he is hung like a horse!

WHAT IS THE CROSS STREET ON RICHMOND??

Are you guys up for a little guys night out tonight?? Call me 713-853-6203  
or leave a message for me at home 713-668-3712.

MC

And it is on!

It's all about the he said, she said bullshit

Are you guys up for a little guys night out tonight?? Call me 713-853-6203
or leave a message for me at home 713-668-3712.

MC

WHAT IS YO # @ WK??

what is up?? ..... we need to have a beer sometime!

MC

give me a call: at home 743-807-7507,,,,,,mobile: 281-381-7332......

giddy

mc

are you up for golf saturday or sunday??

got us a tee time at Hermann @ 11:17am saturday morning...anyone else want to 
play??

Go vote for the Cats!!!!!? 

http://sportsillustrated.cnn.com/football/college/index.html 

SORRY...just got the email this morning...i was out of town''''

giddy-up

MC

what is the id and password??

http://espn.go.com/ncaa/clubhouses/2306.html

total damage for the wk end is $170.00

MC

I'm coming up on the 8th for the ceremony.... I got the air tickets 
yesterday.... I am arriving in Baltimore at noon and driving down to DC...... 
I need directions from BWI to the air base I guess.   As far as 
accomidations,,, just let me know????

giddy up!

MC 

You guys are coming down the 29th of July????  right?   

Did you get your B-day present??

yes

Are you the ex-avista employee party coordinator or something??  

Joh,Rogers and Mike,
The attached details a fishing trip we would like to invite the three of you
to.  We need to reserve boats and hotels soon so check and let me know if
you can make it.

Thanks
Chris and Buck

 - Fishing trip 81500.doc

can i sleep on your lawn??

Chad Starnes@ECT
07/19/2000 12:21 AM
This Saturday I am having an informal gathering at my house for those of you 
that are free to attend. People should start arriving around 8:00, so stop by 
whenever you want.

Directions: We live off Memorial
Coming from 610 towards downtown stay on Memorial, go
past the Park and take a Left onto Detering. You will
go through a stop sign then you take a right on a
street called Floyd. Floyd will end directly into our
complex. Our house is in the back left. The address
is:
662 Lester
Houston Tx 77007

Thanks!
 

LOVE YOU MY LITTLE POD!!

YBGF

mc

Wus up!!   Just wondering if you give me directions from BWI to our 
accomidations on the base??  I will be arriving at BWI @ 12 noon.  I rented a 
car ,and I am driving down to DC.   I will then take a cab from the base to 
the pentagon ,,,, I guess.    Can't wait to see you , Jan , and the kids!

MC

perge!

I will be taking a vacation day on August 8th, and a half day on the 9th.

thanks,

mike carson

http://www.thebuzz.com/

Some friends of my wife and I are throwing a little bash on the evening of 
September 9th for my upcoming baby BOY.   I would like to invite you all to 
attend.  I believe there will be a margarita machine....

If you want to come,, please reply by sending me your address.  You will then 
recieve an invitation by mail.

Hope to see you there,,

Mike

comed sucks!

713-853-6203

i'm in!!!!

 GOLF THIS WEEKEND ANYONE??

Some friends of my wife and I are throwing a little bash on the evening of 
September 9th for my upcoming baby BOY.   I would like to invite you all to 
attend.  I believe there will be a margarita machine....

If you want to come,, please reply by sending me your address.  You will then 
recieve an invitation by mail.

Hope to see you there,,

Mike

bring the kids.... but they can't have any booze!

Mike Carson
07/31/2000 04:22 PM
Some friends of my wife and I are throwing a little bash on the evening of 
September 9th for my upcoming baby BOY.   I would like to invite you all to 
attend.  I believe there will be a margarita machine....

If you want to come,, please reply by sending me your address.  You will then 
recieve an invitation by mail.

Hope to see you there,,

Mike

what is your address??

What is your address??

Cesar is at Tractebel  ........   Him and Jason Armenta together ,,,,,,, what 
a combo!

Here it is....

 

yep

Is it going to Melissa again
Doug Sewell

I will be out Friday 8/24/01 to attend a wedding.  Paul Schiavone will be running my products.

Thanks,

MC

Cell: 281-381-7332
Page: 877-306-6979

http://www.sportsline.com/b/page/pressbox/0,1328,4200089,00.html

It looks like they may be wavering a bit.  The only catch is that the redir=
ect must be done 2 days ahead of time..  Also, there must be firm transmiss=
ion available on the redirected path.  Currently, in the short term at leas=
t, there is no firm transmission to any place of value,,,,ie SOCO, AMRN, TV=
A.  Entergy is still, unfortunately, LONG JAIL...
If you guys read this notice any different, please let me know.

CARSON

Does this mean Ent is wavering on the firm point-to-point argument?  maybe =
pressure being felt through the RTO process?

RH

Date:=09August 21, 2001

Effective 10:00 AM, Wednesday August 22, 2001, Entergy will begin accepting=
 partial term REDIRECTS on a firm basis.  Entergy believes the guidelines l=
isted below are necessary to manage the redirects on a firm basis, and succ=
essfully allow the recalled portion of the original reservation to become a=
vailable for other customers to purchase. If you have any questions, please=
 call David McNeill at 870-541-3931 or Cameron Warren at 870-543-5497.

Section 22.2 - Modification on a Firm Basis

a) As available, Entergy's transmission customers may modify the source/sin=
k or POR/POD of confirmed firm point-to-point service on a firm basis at no=
 additional cost per section 22.2 and Attachment 'M' of the OATT.

b) Requests to modify on a firm basis will be treated as a new request for =
firm service.

c) Requests to modify on a short-term firm basis must be submitted via OASI=
S using the REDIRECT function no later than 12:00 noon two days prior to th=
e start of the redirected service. Requests to modify on a long-term firm b=
asis (twelve months or longer) will be processed according to the current b=
usiness practices for original long-term firm service.

d) Request to modify on a firm basis must be pre-confirmed.

e) The REDIRECT request must include the assignment number of the original =
request in the related reference field.

f) Requests to modify on a firm basis must specify the exact same capacity =
as the original request.

g) Requests to modify on a firm basis must not be for an interval of the or=
iginal reservation in which a previously submitted schedule exists.

h) Requests to modify on a firm basis may be submitted in daily, weekly, mo=
nthly, or yearly service increments.

i) Requests to modify on a firm basis must be within the time interval of o=
riginal reservation (the REDIRECT cannot start before the original start da=
te or end after the original end date).

j) Upon acceptance of a REDIRECT request, the customer loses their rights t=
o the redirected interval of the original request and Entergy will release =
the original reserved capacity back to the market. If the customer wishes t=
o revert back to the original path they must submit another REDIRECT subjec=
t to the same guidelines as all other new REDIRECT requests.

k) When applicable, rollover rights will be given on the original reservati=
on only.

Actually I am going to his wedding this wk end in Nebraska.......Here is his email: WentaPB@phoenix-cement.com

I'll have to come and visit!

What up Mike!  Did I send you the email that I am moving to San Fran., well
if I didn't, here it is.  Yes, CJ is going to live in Homoland, but it's
better than Spokane!  Anyway, is Wenta still in Sacramento?  Shoot me his
email and # if you have it.  Hope everything is going well.  CJ

_________________________________________________________________
Get your FREE download of MSN Explorer at http://explorer.msn.com/intl.asp

JCS is a K_Stater!!!

MC

HE MAKES US  PROUD!
 
You should be proud to know that General Richard  Meyers '65 has been nominated by President Bush to the post of Chairman of the  Joint Chiefs of Staff.  Mitzi Frieling, Alumni Office, has forwarded this  website address to read more about the General.  http://www.dtic.mil/jcs/core/vcjcs.html 
 
DON'T FORGET THE HAPPY HOUR!
 
The last Happy Hour of the KSU Alumni Club for the 2001 season  will be this Thursday, August 30, from 6 to 8 pm.  The Happy group gathers  at the Champps American in Uptown Park near the Galleria.  Hope you can be  there to say goodbye to summer and hello to football season!
 
HELLO  FOOTBALL!!
 
All of us folks in Houston may not realize it, but fall is  almost here!  And what does that mean?  Football!! Football!! and More  Football!!   KSU is ranked high again this year so let's get out to  our Watch Parties to cheer the team on!  First Watch Party is on Saturday, September 8, at 5:30 pm  when KSU defeats the mighty USC team.  Where are the Watch Parties?  At the new  SRO in Northwest Mall at 290 and 610 West intersection.  It's a great new  location with wonderful tv's and sound.  If you can't go to California for  the game, this is the next best thing!  We have a great time!  New  shirts for sale!  Other surprises!  GO CATS!
 
FALL  BARBECUE
 
October 14 is the date to remember.  That is our club's  4th annual bbq and scholarship dinner.  Your invitation should be placed in  your mailbox by around September 13.  Mark it down now.  It's a fun  event and also helps us raise money for our club's scholarship given  annually.  
 
Check our website for more information on all the above events  sponsored by the Houston Alumni Club and the Kansas State University Alumni  Association.
 
What is our website address?   houalum.zk-state.com
 
EVERY MAN A  WILDCAT!
 
Joyce and Ken Nesmith
Co-chairmen of Houston Alumni Club
281 444-5361j.nesmith@prodigy.net 
 
 

K-Stater ,, as the CJS ,,,, What is the world coming to????

MC

HE MAKES US  PROUD!
 
You should be proud to know that General Richard  Meyers '65 has been nominated by President Bush to the post of Chairman of the  Joint Chiefs of Staff.  Mitzi Frieling, Alumni Office, has forwarded this  website address to read more about the General.  http://www.dtic.mil/jcs/core/vcjcs.html 
 
DON'T FORGET THE HAPPY HOUR!
 
The last Happy Hour of the KSU Alumni Club for the 2001 season  will be this Thursday, August 30, from 6 to 8 pm.  The Happy group gathers  at the Champps American in Uptown Park near the Galleria.  Hope you can be  there to say goodbye to summer and hello to football season!
 
HELLO  FOOTBALL!!
 
All of us folks in Houston may not realize it, but fall is  almost here!  And what does that mean?  Football!! Football!! and More  Football!!   KSU is ranked high again this year so let's get out to  our Watch Parties to cheer the team on!  First Watch Party is on Saturday, September 8, at 5:30 pm  when KSU defeats the mighty USC team.  Where are the Watch Parties?  At the new  SRO in Northwest Mall at 290 and 610 West intersection.  It's a great new  location with wonderful tv's and sound.  If you can't go to California for  the game, this is the next best thing!  We have a great time!  New  shirts for sale!  Other surprises!  GO CATS!
 
FALL  BARBECUE
 
October 14 is the date to remember.  That is our club's  4th annual bbq and scholarship dinner.  Your invitation should be placed in  your mailbox by around September 13.  Mark it down now.  It's a fun  event and also helps us raise money for our club's scholarship given  annually.  
 
Check our website for more information on all the above events  sponsored by the Houston Alumni Club and the Kansas State University Alumni  Association.
 
What is our website address?   houalum.zk-state.com
 
EVERY MAN A  WILDCAT!
 
Joyce and Ken Nesmith
Co-chairmen of Houston Alumni Club
281 444-5361j.nesmith@prodigy.net 
 
 

When  you have 5 minutes you have to read this e-mail about shitting at work.  It  is the funniest thing I have ever read.
                     Larry Martin 
  
1999 SURVIVAL GUIDE FOR TAKING A DUMP AT WORK. 
ESCAPEE 
Definition: 
  A fart that slips out while taking a leak at the urinal   or 
forcing poop in a stall. This is usually  accompanied by a sudden wave 
of panic/embarrassment.  This is similar to the hot flash you receive 
when  passing an unseen police car and speeding. If you release an 
escapee, do not acknowledge it. Pretend it did not happen. If you  are 
standing next to the farter at the urinal, pretend  that you did not 
hearit. No one likes an escapee, it  is uncomfortable for all involved. 
Making a joke or  laughing makes both parties feel uneasy. 
JAILBREAK (Used in conjunction with escapee) 
Definition: When forcing poop, several farts slip out at a machine  guns 
pace. This is usually a side effect of diarrhea  or a hangover. If this 
should happen do not panic,  remain in the stall until everyone has left 
the  bathroom so to spare everyone the awkwardness of what just occurred.  
COURTESY FLUSH 
Definition: The act of  flushing the toilet the instant the nose cone of 
the  poop log hits the water and the poop is whisked away to an 
undisclosed location. This reduces the amount of air time the poop  has 
to stink up the bathroom. This can help you avoid  being caught doing the 
WALK OF SHAME. 
WALK OF SHAME 
Definition: Walking from  the stall, to the sink, to the door after you 
have  just stunk-up the bathroom. This can be a very uncomfortable moment  
if someone walks in and busts you. As with all farts, it is  best to 
pretend that the smell does not exist. Can be  avoided with the use of a 
COURTESY FLUSH. 
OUT OF THE CLOSET POOPER 
Definition: A  colleague who poops at work and is damn proud of it. You 
will often see an Out of the Closet Pooper enter the bathroom with   
newspaper or magazine under their arm. Always look  around the office for 
the Out of the Closet pooper  before entering the bathroom. 
THE POOPING FRIENDS NETWORK (PFN) 
Definition: A group of coworkers who band together to ensure  emergency 
pooping goes off without incident. This  group can help you to monitor 
the whereabouts of OUT  OF THE CLOSET POOPERS and identify SAFE HAVENS. 
SAFE HAVEN 
Definition: A seldom used  bathroom somewhere in the building where you 
can least  expect visitors. Try floors that are predominantly of the 
opposite sex. This will reduce the odds of a pooper of your sex  entering 
the bathroom. 
TURD BURGLAR 
Definition: A pooper who  does not realize that you are in the stall and 
tries  to force the door open. This is one of the most shocking and 
vulnerable moments that occur when taking a dump at work. If  this 
occurs, remain in the stall until the TURD  BURGLAR leaves. This way you 
will avoid all  uncomfortable eye contact. 
CAMO-COUGH 
Definition: A phony cough  which alerts all new entrants into the 
bathroom that  you are in a stall. This can be used to cover-up a 
WATERMELON or to alert potential TURD BURGLARS. Very effective when  used 
 in 
conjunction with  an ASTAIRE. 
ASTAIRE 
Definition: A subtle toe-tap  that is used to alert potential TURD 
BURGLARS that you  are occupying a stall. This will remove all doubt that 
the stall is occupied. If you hear an ASTAIRE, leave the  bathroom 
immediately so the pooper can poop in  peace. 
WATERMELON 
Definition: A turd that  creates a loud splash when hitting the toilet 
water.  This is also an embarrassing incident. If you feel a WATERMELON  
coming on, create a diversion. See CAMO-COUGH. 
HAVANA OMELET 
Definition: A load of  diarrhea that creates a series of loud splashes 
in the  toilet water. Often accompanied by an escapee. Try using a 
CAMO-COUGH with an ASTAIRE. 
UNCLE TED 
Definition: A bathroom user  who seems to linger around forever. Could 
spend  extended lengths of time in front of the mirror or sitting on the  
pot. An UNCLE TED makes it difficult to relax while on the  crapper, as 
 you 
should  always wait to drop your load when the bathroom is empty.This 
benefits you as well as the other bathroom attendees. 
FLY BY 
Definition: The act of scouting  out a bathroom before pooping. Walk in, 
check for  other poopers. If there are others in the bathroom, leave and 
come back again. Be careful not to become a FREQUENT FLYER.   People may 
become suspicious if they catch you  constantly going into the bathroom. 
CRACK WHORE 
Definition: A crapper that  has seen more ass than a Greyhound Bus. 
Tell tale  signs of a CRACK WHORE include hairs, stains and streaks. 
Avoid CRACK WHORES at all cost. Try finding out when the janitor  cleans 
each particular bathroom. Don't forget with a  good cleaning,a CRACK 
 WHORE 
can become a SAFE HAVEN.  

give me a ring today or tomorrow.  713-853-6203

Mike:

Please send me your resume or call me. I have senior position that I would like to discuss.

Regards,

Craig Jefferies
President
CKB Energy, Inc.
(917) 445 1189

Mike:

Please send me your resume or call me. I have senior position that I would like to discuss.

Regards,

Craig Jefferies
President
CKB Energy, Inc.
(917) 445 1189

Doug we have another deal at the Houstonian today.... could you take care of this again.

thks

MC

I have a UBS orientation meeting this morning.  So if you could make sure the wire is completed, it would help me out.  Also, send the wire confirmation email to :  melissa.beckett@entergykoch.com

Her Ph # is 713-544-5618(Please call to confirm she got it)

Thanks

MC

I know things have been crazy, and you have had alot on your mind.  I just
wanted you to know Steph and I have thought alot about Heather and yourself,
and if there is anything we can do please let on know.  You know I am always
happy to help.  Hang in there, and when you get a chance give me a shout.
Take care.
DG
(W)713-544-5447
(H)713-783-8626

 

Mike, here is the copy of the invitation. Sure hope you can come. Meredith
Rall is having a tough time with their first pregnancy. If Heather would,
Meredith could use a call, especially from someone who has been there.
Charles
Charles E. Ruehl
St. Paul's United Methodist Church
Minister of Finance and Administration
Houston, TX
713-528-0527
> Brian Long has invited you to "First Thursday's Christmas Party".
>
>
> Note from Brian Long:
> Hi Everybody,
>
> We just wanted to send a quick email to invite everybody to the First
Thursday's Christmas party on Wednesday, December 5th--yes, that's
Wednesday, not Thursday.  Please click on the evite below and let us know if
you will be coming and what dish you would like to bring.  So far we have we
have the following:
>
> Charles & Phoebe - Honey Baked Ham
> Mitch & Tassy - Asparagus Casserole
> Rame & Rusty - Baked Beans
> Mike & Marci - Fruit Salad
> Thanh - Rolls
> James & Jeannie - Pie & Corn Casserole
>
> We are looking forward to seeing everybody on the 5th!
>
> Brian & Lori
>
>
> Click below to visit Evite for more information about the event and also
to RSVP.
> http://www.evite.com/r?iid=BUFVYXGQNZOJHNOWFBSG
>
>
>
>
> This invitation was sent to you by Brian Long using Evite. To remove
yourself
> from this guest list please contact us at support@evite.com
>
>
> This Evite Invite is covered by Evite's privacy policy*.
> To view this privacy policy, click here:
> http://www.evite.com/privacy
>
>
> *********************************
>
>
>
> *********************************
>
>
>
>
>
>
>
>
>
> HAVING TROUBLE?
> Perhaps your email program doesn't recognize the Web address as an active
> link. To view your invitation, copy the entire URL and paste it into your
browser.
>
>
> If you would like further assistance, please send
> email to support@evite.com
>
> * Updated 03/15/01.
>

Dear Friends,
Just a note to remind you that we will be meeting on Wednesday  this week instead of Thursday. We will have our Christmas Party at Brian and  Lori Long's home in Pearland. I discovered  today that some names were on  my e-mail list and not the database list that I sent to Brian and Lori to work  from. So if you can come, and have not indicated so, please let me know.  We would love to see all of you. For those of you who can't be with us, we will  miss you. See all of you in January.Here is the invitation website: http://www.evite.com/r?iid=BUFVYXGQNZOJHNOWFBSG  It has  the address, time and directions. Hope to see you then. Lori and Brian have  worked hard on the plans. I know we will have a wonderful time in their home.  
Charles
Charles E. Ruehl
St. Paul's United Methodist  Church
Minister of Finance and Administration 
Houston,  TX
713-528-0527
 - Rev. Charles Ruehl (E-mail).vcf 

Thanks for the note,,, I'll be in touch,,,, Do you have any Hourly openings,,,Tacos Por toros!!!!!!!!  Just kidding...

Anyway,,, Heather and I were thinking about throwing Ken and Jaime a engagement party in March,,,, would you guys be interested in helping plan it???

MC
713-668-3712Hm
713-853-6203Wk(could be temporary)

I know things have been crazy, and you have had alot on your mind.  I just
wanted you to know Steph and I have thought alot about Heather and yourself,
and if there is anything we can do please let on know.  You know I am always
happy to help.  Hang in there, and when you get a chance give me a shout.
Take care.
DG
(W)713-544-5447
(H)713-783-8626

Still here ,,,, for now,,,,  Just waiting around to see if our trading operation gets purchased...  It has been a rollercoaster!

Anyway ,,, How is th enew married life?  Have you moved to Colorado yet??

MC

Mike - you still working?  Let me know what is up with you through all
of the Enron BK fallout.........pbw

Phillip Wenta
Sales & Business Development
Phoenix Cement Co.
916.677.1711 (office)
916.677.1811 (fax)

New proposition!

Looks like fiedler has got to score over 32 tonight.....He's never done that before has he??

Lets say 70/30 split now (Me with the 70%),,,, no matter who wins,,, I believe this gets you an extra $100 or so... Not such a bad deal when you look at the odds!  Give me a shout and will discuss....

MC

713-853-6203

 
Mike
 
It looks  like it could be very close............I'll go 50/50 with you right now for the  whole pot...no matter who wins!!
 
What do  you think.....let me know!
 
DeWayne
 

I have a UBS orientation meeting this morning.  So if you could make sure the wire is completed, it would help me out.  Also, send the wire confirmation email to :  melissa.beckett@entergykoch.com

Her Ph # is 713-544-5618(Please call to confirm she got it)

Thanks

MC

We got some good shots of Harris this weekend --

here's a sample

__________________________________________________
Do You Yahoo!?
Make a great connection at Yahoo! Personals.
http://personals.yahoo.com
 - Harris-10-21-01.jpg 

I just thought you would like another

__________________________________________________
Do You Yahoo!?
Make a great connection at Yahoo! Personals.
http://personals.yahoo.com
 - Harris-Sit-10-21-01.jpg 

  

Here are some picures of my little guy.........

MC

713-668-3712

I just wanted to drop you a note to let you know how sorry I am for forgetting about the Saturday move.  I really have no excuse,, I just out-right forgot....Hopefully I can make it up to guys in some way.

Mike C

	                NUMBER:
>30202245464
01/22/02    NON-CHECK FINANCIAL DATA FOR REF. #    30202245464
ACCOUNT: 40781075      ENRON CORP-ECT CASH SVC
            AMOUNT      POST DATE  VALUE DATE   CODE      BATCH/TRACK       DUP
        195,600.00       01/22/02    01/22/02    479     650000000571         1
TRANSACTION DESCRIPTION
SAME DAY DR TRANSFER
         GID:LCT20221518600
         FED20020122B1Q8024C004654
         USER REF:TWS000379500
         REF:      TWS000379500
         ORDER:    ENA CASH SERVICES
         CR BK ID: 021000021
         CR BK:    JPMORGAN CHASE BANK FORMERLY CHASE
          MANHATTAN BANK,N.A NEW YORK, NY 10004
         BENEF:    323009980 ENTERGY KOCH TRADING
         DETAILS:PRE PAY FOR JANUARY POWER
         INSTRUCT DATE:01/22/02 ADVICE TYPE:MAIL

I will be taking vacation days March 13-15.

Twist
3-6203

This $27,880 will be subtracted from tomorrows wire(Tuesday 1/22/02).  This amount reflects the
$250,000 prepay from last Friday(1/18/02) for the power purchased on Monday(MLK 1/21/02) for delivery Tuesday.  
 

 

Fed # 6187

Cathy

                 UMBER:
>30201845449
01/18/02    NON-CHECK FINANCIAL DATA FOR REF. #    30201845449
ACCOUNT: 40781075      ENRON CORP-ECT CASH SVC
            AMOUNT      POST DATE  VALUE DATE   CODE      BATCH/TRACK       DUP
        287,520.00       01/18/02    01/18/02    479     650000000571         1
TRANSACTION DESCRIPTION
SAME DAY DR TRANSFER
         GID:LCT20180832800
         FED20020118B1Q8023C002328
         USER REF:TWS000379255
         REF:      TWS000379255
         ORDER:    ENA CASH SERVICES
         CR BK ID: 021000021
         CR BK:    JPMORGAN CHASE BANK FORMERLY CHASE
          MANHATTAN BANK,N.A NEW YORK, NY 10004
         BENEF:    323009980 ENTERGY KOCH TRADING LP
         DETAILS:PRE PAY JANUARY POWER
         INSTRUCT DATE:01/18/02 ADVICE TYPE:MAIL

ENTER  (1) YESTERDAY    (2) TODAY        (3) SEARCH       (4) SERIAL
       (5) REFERENCE    (6) HISTORICAL   (7) TRANS FLOAT  (8) BACK VALUE
       (9) LAST V

There is NO Tuesday markets available today.  We can not wire cash on Monday due to the holiday.  So, Koch will allow us to make to them an "estimate payment",,, aprox $250,000.  We will cover the postions on Monday.  The difference in actual will be netted out of Tuedays payment.

Michael Carson
3-6203

Please forward further wire confirmations to Ken Merideth, as well as to myself and Doug Sewell:

ken.merideth@entergykoch.com

Thankyou,

Mike Carson
3-6203

I was trying to get on some of the USAF Base sites.  They seem to all be down.  Have they shut them off for security reasons??

MC

 - layletter.pdf 

Wrong # the first time....
 3-6203

713-668-3712

Just throwing out some spots for Ken's BP......what do you think about Miami ???  Go'n to Miami,,,Miyamy yamy yamy!

Carson

01/17/02            FINANCIAL STATUS FOR     01/17/02  11:44         PAGE   2
ACCOUNT:  40781075      ENRON CORP-ECT CASH SVC

30201745436 SAME DAY DR TRANSFER                  272,760.00
            GID:LCT20170907200
            FED20020117B1Q8024C002368
            USER REF:TWS000379039
            REF:      TWS000379039
            ORDER:    ENA CASH SERVICES
            CR BK ID: 021000021
            CR BK:    JPMORGAN CHASE BANK FORMERLY CHASE
             MANHATTAN BANK,N.A NEW YORK, NY 10004
            BENEF:    323009980 ENTERGY KOCH TRADING LP
            DETAILS:PREPAY FOR JANUARY POWER
            INSTRUCT DATE:01/17/02 ADVICE TYPE:MAIL

ACCOUNT:  40781075      ENRON CORP-ECT CASH SVC

30201545410 SAME DAY DR TRANSFER                  227,980.00
            GID:LCT20151018600
            FED20020115B1Q8023C002525
            USER REF:TWS000378672
            REF:      TWS000378672
            ORDER:    ENA CASH SERVICES
            CR BK ID: 021000021
            CR BK:    JPMORGAN CHASE BANK FORMERLY CHASE
             MANHATTAN BANK,N.A NEW YORK, NY 10004
            BENEF:    323009980 ENTERGY KOCH TRADING LP
            DETAILS:PREPAY FOR JANUARY POWER
            INSTRUCT DATE:01/15/02 ADVICE TYPE:MAIL

The KOMP Horticultural contract for the maintenance of leased floor plants has been cancelled.  Plant maintenance is not being performed on the leased plants in the Enron Building on floors 3 through 49.  Rather than removing the plants from the building, KOMP Horticultural has chosen to offer the plants to Enron employees for sale.  On January 16th from 11:00 AM to 2:00 PM, KOMP will have a table on the south side of the plaza, by the up escalator, for those employees interested in purchasing a plant. At the time of purchase, KOMP will give a special sticker to place on the container of the sold plant (do not bring plants to the plaza for purchase).  Plants will not be allowed to be removed from the building unless they have the KOMP sold sticker on the container.

The following guidelines must be followed:
?	Plants will be priced at $30 plus tax for floor plants; $10 plus tax for desk-top plants.
?	Only potted plants in black plastic containers are for sale.  Plants in chrome, bronze, clay or any other outside containers are not for sale. 
?	Employees must remove all plants from the building themselves.  Building Services cannot make pick-ups or deliveries.  
?	Security will be inspecting plants to assure they have the appropriate sticker when they are removed from the premises. 
?	Payment must be in cash or a personal check made out to KOMP Horticultural.    

If you have any questions please contact Richard Hensch at ext. 35522.

The amount of 209,139.52 has been sent and the fed reference number is 1876.  Please let me know if you have any questions.

Thank you,
Ramona Rodriguez
57323

    01445398
01/14/02    NON-CHECK FINANCIAL DATA FOR REF. #    30201445398
ACCOUNT: 40781075      ENRON CORP-ECT CASH SVC
            AMOUNT      POST DATE  VALUE DATE   CODE      BATCH/TRACK       DUP
        209,139.52       01/14/02    01/14/02    479     650000000571         1
TRANSACTION DESCRIPTION
SAME DAY DR TRANSFER
         GID:LCT20141113900
         FED20020114B1Q8021C001876
         USER REF:TWS000378430
         REF:      TWS000378430
         ORDER:    ENA CASH SERVICES
         CR BK ID: 021000021
         CR BK:    JPMORGAN CHASE BANK FORMERLY CHASE
          MANHATTAN BANK,N.A NEW YORK, NY 10004
         BENEF:    323009980 ENTERGY KOCH
         DETAILS:PREPAY JAN POWER
         INSTRUCT DATE:01/14/02 ADVICE TYPE:MAIL

ENTER  (1) YESTERDAY    (2) TODAY        (3) SEARCH       (4) SERIAL
       (5) REFERENCE    (6) HISTORICAL   (7) TRANS FLOAT  (8) BACK VALUE

Fill out and last guy forward to Steve Luong

Thanks,
Jeff

 

Ken Merideth @ KOCH 713-544-5362

Doug Sewell, takes spreadsheet to cash committee, 713-853-6337

Reginald Hart, Gets wire confirm#, 713-853-6653

On the email you send out include:

Evelyn Aucoin
Corry Bentley ?
Larry Cash
Jason Choate ?
Mark Confer
Patrick Hanse ?
Elsie Lew
Don Miller(Asset Mktg)
Stepen Plauche
Paul Racicot
Chip Schneider
Doug Sewell
Carl Tricoli
Gwendolyn Williams

I Will Send you the "Wire Confirmation" later.

MC

 

http://www.bol.ucla.edu/~rahjr79/ninja.htm

ACCOUNT:  40781075      ENRON CORP-ECT CASH SVC

30201145381 SAME DAY DR TRANSFER                  255,800.00
            GID:LCT20110819600
            FED20020111B1Q8021C001787
            USER REF:TWS000378237
            REF:      TWS000378237
            ORDER:    ENA CASH SERVICES
            CR BK ID: 021000021
            CR BK:    JPMORGAN CHASE BANK FORMERLY CHASE
             MANHATTAN BANK,N.A NEW YORK, NY 10004
            BENEF:    323009980 ENTERGY KOCH TRADING LP
            DETAILS:PRE PAY FOR JANUARY POWER
            INSTRUCT DATE:01/11/02 ADVICE TYPE:MAIL

 

fill this out and pass it along. last guy send it to steve luong.

pjb 

please fill out and forwrd to NE group..... then, last guy sends it to Steve Luong

Please email to Steve Luong each day after updating the curves.

Thanks,
Jeff

 

Please see attached for the fed reference number is 2586 in the amount 210,872.00

                  
01/10/02    NON-CHECK FINANCIAL DATA FOR REF. #    30201045370
ACCOUNT: 40781075      ENRON CORP-ECT CASH SVC
            AMOUNT      POST DATE  VALUE DATE   CODE      BATCH/TRACK       DUP
        210,872.00       01/10/02    01/10/02    479     650000000571         1
TRANSACTION DESCRIPTION
SAME DAY DR TRANSFER
         GID:LCT20100928100
         FED20020110B1Q8023C002586
         USER REF:TWS000378042
         REF:      TWS000378042
         ORDER:    ENA CASH SERVICES
         CR BK ID: 021000021
         CR BK:    JPMORGAN CHASE BANK FORMERLY CHASE
          MANHATTAN BANK,N.A NEW YORK, NY 10004
         BENEF:    323009980 ENTERGY KOCH TRADING LP
         DETAILS:PREPAY FOR JANUARY POWER
         INSTRUCT DATE:01/10/02 ADVICE TYPE:MAIL

ENTER  (1) YESTERDAY    (2) TODAY        (3) SEARCH       (4) SERIAL
       (5) REFERENCE    (6) HISTORICAL   (7) TRANS FLOAT  (8) BACK VALUE
       (9) LAST VIEWED
>

ACCOUNT:  40781075      ENRON CORP-ECT CASH SVC

30200845342 SAME DAY DR TRANSFER                  248,600.00
            GID:LCT20081021800
            FED20020108B1Q8022C001910
            USER REF:TWS000377716
            REF:      TWS000377716
            ORDER:    ENA CASH SERVICES
            CR BK ID: 021000021
            CR BK:    JPMORGAN CHASE BANK FORMERLY CHASE
             MANHATTAN BANK,N.A NEW YORK, NY 10004
            BENEF:    323009980 ENTERGY KOCH TRADING LP
            DETAILS:PREPAY FOR JANUARY POWER
            INSTRUCT DATE:01/08/02 ADVICE TYPE:MAIL

hopefully not at work,,, we don't have those water basins on the back of our toilets.... so,,, he would just be taking a shit on the handle(kind of messy)!!!!!!

KID

Do you mean he will being doing the credit trades or that he will be doing
the "upper-deck"?

John Suarez will be doing this tomorrow!  His # is 713-853-5267.

 

John Suarez will be doing this deal tomorrow (1/9/02).  His extension is 3-5267.

 

I called ,,,, give me a shout when you get back form your 3 hr lunch!

MC
3-6203

John D. Suarez
(713) 853-5267 work
(713) 443-5267 mobile
(877) 597-0646 pager 
email: john.suarez@enron.com

ACCOUNT:  40781075      ENRON CORP-ECT CASH SVC

30200745336 SAME DAY DR TRANSFER                  270,040.00
            GID:LCT20071072900
            FED20020107B1Q8024C002634
            USER REF:TWS000377578
            REF:      TWS000377578
            ORDER:    ENA CASH SERVICES
            CR BK ID: 021000021
            CR BK:    JPMORGAN CHASE BANK FORMERLY CHASE
             MANHATTAN BANK,N.A NEW YORK, NY 10004
            BENEF:    323009980 ENTERGY KOCH TRADING LP
            DETAILS:PRE PAY FOR JANUARY POWER
            INSTRUCT DATE:01/07/02 ADVICE TYPE:MAIL

give me a call 3-6203

Have we had any difficulty with Koch paying us for deliveries?

 << File: KOCH01072002.xls >> 

EPMI needs you to buy:
700 CIN
100 COMED
50 off-peak CIN

EPMI needs you to sell:
100 ENT

ACCOUNT:  40781075      ENRON CORP-ECT CASH SVC

30200445319 SAME DAY DR TRANSFER                  348,808.00
            GID:LCT20040998600
            FED20020104B1Q8023C002754
            USER REF:TWS000377434
            REF:      TWS000377434
            ORDER:    ENA CASH SERVICES
            CR BK ID: 021000021
            CR BK:    JPMORGAN CHASE BANK FORMERLY CHASE
             MANHATTAN BANK,N.A NEW YORK, NY 10004
            BENEF:    323009980 ENTERGY KOCH TRADING LP
            DETAILS:PREPAY FOR JANUARY POWER
            INSTRUCT DATE:01/04/02 ADVICE TYPE:MAIL

 

01/03/02            FINANCIAL STATUS FOR     01/03/02  10:43         PAGE   3
ACCOUNT:  40781075      ENRON CORP-ECT CASH SVC

30200345304 SAME DAY DR TRANSFER                  522,520.00
            GID:LCT20030592400
            FED20020103B1Q8021C001257
            USER REF:TWS000377236
            REF:      TWS000377236
            ORDER:    ENA CASH SERVICES
            CR BK ID: 021000021
            CR BK:    JPMORGAN CHASE BANK FORMERLY CHASE
             MANHATTAN BANK,N.A NEW YORK, NY 10004
            BENEF:    323009980 ENTERGY KOCH TRADING LP
            DETAILS:PREPAY FOR JANUARY POWER
            INSTRUCT DATE:01/03/02 ADVICE TYPE:MAIL

Terri Clynes # 713-621-1123

Are you live?  I apologize for not calling you on my way down...didn't end
up coming to Houston until Friday morning...Shorter slated me as his
substitute for a Thursday evening event...How was your Christmas and NYE?
Do you have IM?

 

 

Tacos por Todos!

MC

I used to be able to get Nymex Access Natural Gas Quotes off of your Web Site.  This Function does not seem to be working any more.  Have you discontinued this product?

Mike Carson
mike.carson@enron.com

Fellow students,,,,here is the format I used ...... It doen't have all the info yet, but this should work.  So, just delete my data and fill in yours......

 
The KID!

Right here baby!  Just came in to check e_mails, ect...   I had a Great holiday season!!!  Sorry you couldn't make it down for golf... maybe next time....Give me a shout any time @ work,,,, I am trying to come in more as D-day approaches....

MC(thekid)
713-853-6203

Are you live?  I apologize for not calling you on my way down...didn't end
up coming to Houston until Friday morning...Shorter slated me as his
substitute for a Thursday evening event...How was your Christmas and NYE?
Do you have IM?

305-293-7029

--- Mike.Carson@enron.com wrote:
> do you have machart's phone # ???
>
>     -----Original Message-----
__________________________________________________
Do You Yahoo!?
Send your FREE holiday greetings online!
http://greetings.yahoo.com

Here are some recent pics of the "little man"....

 
 - blueshirtFenOrgReT.jpg 
 - HappyHarris122101.jpg 

do you have machart's phone # ???

do you happen to know fun phils email address?

__________________________________________________
Do You Yahoo!?
Send your FREE holiday greetings online!
http://greetings.yahoo.com

It is WentaPB@phoenix-cement.com

Did you have a good Christmas???

MC

do you happen to know fun phils email address?

__________________________________________________
Do You Yahoo!?
Send your FREE holiday greetings online!
http://greetings.yahoo.com

I will try to get some... I am having troubles with my computer today.....

Have a Happy Holiday!

MC

Mike,

Do you have any pictures of Harris that you could email me?  Laura and I
would like to see if he has his dad's good looks (ha ha).

Devin

Mike,

Thanks for the note, it was good to hear from you.  Quick update on us,
Laura and I bought a house in late September.
Our new address is 14501 W. 86th Street, Lenexa, KS, 66215.  Our house is
located in the Cedars development just off
of 87th St. and Lackman Rd.   Is this close to where you used to live?  All
of our family is doing well, we've  been getting
ready for Christmas (tree, lights, etc.).

I hope everything goes well with your work!

Devin
Yeah,  it has been a little hectic as of late.  I am still at Enron(for
now).  I have been retained as part of the trading organization to stay
with this entity to see if it sells.  We go to auction on Monday and will
see what happens??  I guess the interested parties are UBS Warburg and
Citigroup.  Good companies, but I will have to see what the $offer$ is for
me personally.  Anyway, the family is doing GREAT and is looking forward to
Christmas.  Harris is about 14mos now, so he kind of understands the whole
presents thing, which should be fun!

Have a happy holiday!

MC

    -----Original Message-----
   Mike,

   I haven't heard from you in a while and I was wondering how the
   bankruptcy
   has affected you.  Please send me a note or call me at work(816)
   218-1606
   or at home (913) 642-9758.  Hope you're doing well!

   Devin
   ----------------------------------------------------------------
   The information transmitted is intended only for the person or entity to
   which it is addressed and may contain confidential and/or privileged
   material.  Any review, retransmission, dissemination or other use of, or
   taking of any action in reliance upon, this information by persons or
   entities other than the intended recipient is prohibited.   If you
   received
   this in error, please contact the sender and delete the material from
   any
   computer.

Yeah,  it has been a little hectic as of late.  I am still at Enron(for now).  I have been retained as part of the trading organization to stay with this entity to see if it sells.  We go to auction on Monday and will see what happens??  I guess the interested parties are UBS Warburg and Citigroup.  Good companies, but I will have to see what the $offer$ is for me personally.  Anyway, the family is doing GREAT and is looking forward to Christmas.  Harris is about 14mos now, so he kind of understands the whole presents thing, which should be fun!

Have a happy holiday!

MC

Mike,

I haven't heard from you in a while and I was wondering how the bankruptcy
has affected you.  Please send me a note or call me at work(816) 218-1606
or at home (913) 642-9758.  Hope you're doing well!

Devin

What are your guys plans for the USC game this Wk end??   Cold Beers sound GOOOOOOOOOOOOD!

MC

Evidently,  there is a NEW SRO over by the old one ,,,, where they are having the watch party.... all new Tv's ect...,,,, same cold beer(what matters).... what do ya think about that??

MC

see attch below---->

Hey - Cat Fans
 
Only 5 days until the first game and the first  watch party of the year for the KSU Wildcats!   An event that we all  have been eagerly awaiting!  
 
Good luck to all of you that are going to  California.  Bring back a victory!  For those of us staying here in  soggy Texas, don't forget to come to the SRO in the Northwest Mall at 5:30 this  coming Saturday to watch the game!!  Northwest is located at the  intersection of the Highway 290 and 610 Loop West.  The SRO opens directly  into the parking lot facing north.  Check our web site for more information  houalum.zk-state.com.  As we have said  before,  this new SRO has outstanding new televisions and a great sound  system.  The whole place is new and quite spiffy.  However, they still  have the same outstanding hamburgers!  
 
Our new Houston Alumni Club polo shirts are in and will be on  sale Saturday.  Price is $35.00 and these shirts are really sharp!   Purple of course, with black collar and cuffs with a white stripe.    Shirts are perfect for casual business wear and you can boast about Kansas State  at the same time!  We have a limited amount so come early to get your  shirt!  We have ordered new purple tee shirts but have not yet received  them.  They should be here by Saturday and the price will be  $15.00.
 
SEE YOU SATURDAY!  GO CATS!
 
Joyce '85 and Ken' 57  Nesmith

I'm all up in it, do you have any soup?

What are your guys plans for the USC game this Wk end??   Cold Beers
sound GOOOOOOOOOOOOD!

MC

I Can help, if Rachel can watch Harris.......Heather is out of town on Sat.....My Fee for moving Ties is pretty steep though!  ...... 3 COLD BEERS!!!!!!!

MC

And it is on.  I smell bacon, do you smell bacon?  I have do some work on
early Sat. for the house, then it's go time.  Do you have any experience
moving railroad ties??

Evidently,  there is a NEW SRO over by the old one ,,,, where they are
having the watch party.... all new Tv's ect...,,,, same cold beer(what
matters).... what do ya think about that??

MC

see attch below---->

Hey - Cat Fans

Only 5 days until the first game and the first  watch party of the year for
the KSU Wildcats!   An event that we all  have been eagerly awaiting!

Good luck to all of you that are going to  California.  Bring back a
victory!  For those of us staying here in  soggy Texas, don't forget to
come to the SRO in the Northwest Mall at 5:30 this  coming Saturday to
watch the game!!  Northwest is located at the  intersection of the Highway
290 and 610 Loop West.  The SRO opens directly  into the parking lot facing
north.  Check our web site for more information  houalum.zk-state.com.  As
we have said  before,  this new SRO has outstanding new televisions and a
great sound  system.  The whole place is new and quite spiffy.  However,
they still  have the same outstanding hamburgers!

Our new Houston Alumni Club polo shirts are in and will be on  sale
Saturday.  Price is $35.00 and these shirts are really sharp!   Purple of
course, with black collar and cuffs with a white stripe.    Shirts are
perfect for casual business wear and you can boast about Kansas State  at
the same time!  We have a limited amount so come early to get your  shirt!
We have ordered new purple tee shirts but have not yet received  them.
They should be here by Saturday and the price will be  $15.00.

SEE YOU SATURDAY!  GO CATS!

Joyce '85 and Ken' 57  Nesmith

    -----Original Message-----
[mailto:IMCEANOTES-+22Pape+2C+20Travis+22+20+3Ctpape+40satake-usa+2Ecom+3E+4
0ENRON@ENRON.com]

   Sent:   Tuesday, September 04, 2001 12:50 PM
   I'm all up in it, do you have any soup?

   -----Original Message-----
   What are your guys plans for the USC game this Wk end??   Cold Beers
   sound GOOOOOOOOOOOOD!

   MC

   **********************************************************************
   This e-mail is the property of Enron Corp. and/or its relevant affiliate
   and
   may contain confidential and privileged material for the sole use of the
   intended recipient (s). Any review, use, distribution or disclosure by
   others is strictly prohibited. If you are not the intended recipient (or
   authorized to receive for the recipient), please contact the sender or
   reply
   to Enron Corp. at enron.messaging.administration@enron.com and delete
   all
   copies of the message. This e-mail (and any attachments hereto) are not
   intended to be an offer (or an acceptance) and do not create or evidence
   a
   binding and enforceable contract between Enron Corp. (or any of its
   affiliates) and the intended recipient or any other party, and may not
   be
   relied on by anyone as the basis of a contract by estoppel or otherwise.
   Thank you.
   **********************************************************************

de nada

Boys, 

I'd be delighted to gather and format all of the information for a "nice and pretty" presentation. I would just ask that you e-mail me your info by the end of Wednesday, Feb. 6. 

Gracias,
Maria

All,

The unofficial word on the street is that deal closing is slated for Feb 7 and UBSWenergy launch is Feb 11.  Our intention is to launch financial products only for our regions beginning with Summer '02 through Cal '03.  As we are successful in signing up counterparties to reach a critical mass, we'll be adding products that are closer to the front of the curve (less correlated to NG.)  We need to do this to protect ourselves from "ambushes" by single parties when we don't have a critical mass of players that we can lay risk off with.

Please note that, as a result, we may "only" have a couple of more weeks to play with in terms of studying up and refreshing ourselves on the fundamentals in our respective regions.  Therefore, I'd like each of you to fill-in the information listed on the attached document for the region listed by your name.  Feel free to use any resources you need (fundies, etc.) and have them finished by next Thurs. (2/7).  Someone please nominate yourself to format each paper in the same manner and have them all put together in one binder nice and pretty.  Have a goodie.

Flet

	ECAR (Cinergy) - Krugh
	MAIN (ComEd) - Ave'
	SERC (TVA) - Jackie
	SERC (SOCO) - Twisty
	SPP (ENT) - New Boy

and,,,,,, I love every minute of it!

like you read about!

like you read about!

Craig Enderlin has created an on-line Fantasy Football
league using the CBS SportsLine.com Fantasy Commissioner -
and YOU have been invited to join! To accept this
invitation and join the league, click the link below (or cut
and paste the link into your browser's address field:)

http://football244.fantasy.sportsline.com/mp/j?league=btusux&o=b79bc2ca7cf5864a

Fantasy Football puts you at the helm of your own team of
NFL stars. The CBS SportsLine.com Fantasy Commissioner allows
Craig Enderlin to make all your league's rules and run
your league in virtually any way possible.

You'll enjoy the convenience of a private web site which
stores all your team's data and updates the statistics and
standings daily. You can customize your team's site to
display all the information you need in the way that works
best for you.

You can also set up your team's site to send you e-mail
reports every morning, with updated league standings, news
about your players, and much more. Your site can even
notify you, via wireless text messaging, of breaking
league news.

What better way to usher in another football season than to
live out the ultimate football fantasy - running your own
team!

We hope you enjoy the CBS SportsLine.com Fantasy Commissioner.
Have a great season.

        The Staff

Sent: Thursday, September 13, 2001 11:34 AM
Content-Transfer-Encoding: 7bit
Return-Path: <rebeccab@nol.net>
Received: from  rly-yd04.mx.aol.com (rly-yd04.mail.aol.com [172.18.150.4]) by air-yd05.mail.aol.com (v80.17) with ESMTP id MAILINYD59-0912235130; Wed, 12 Sep 2001 23:51:30 -0400
Received: from  mail.nol.net (nol.net [206.126.32.1]) by rly-yd04.mx.aol.com (v80.21) with ESMTP id MAILRELAYINYD46-0912235127; Wed, 12 Sep 2001 23:51:27 -0400
Received: from Default (56K-HouTX-040-155.NOL.NET [206.126.40.155])	by mail.nol.net (8.9.3/8.9.1) with SMTP id WAA23382;	Wed, 12 Sep 2001 22:52:07 -0500 (CDT)

> Scary?
> > >
> > > Nostradamus' prediction on WW3:
> > >
> > > "In the year of the new century and nine months,
> > > From the sky will come a great King of Terror...
> > > The sky will burn at forty-five degrees.
> > > Fire approaches the great new city..."
> > > "In the city of york there will be a great collapse,
> > > 2 twin brothers torn apart by chaos
> > > while the fortress falls the great leader will
> > > succumb
> > > third big war will begin when the big city is
> > > burning"
> > >
> > > - NOSTRADAMUS
> > >
> > > He said this will be bigger than the previous two.
> > > 2001 is the first year of the new century and this
> > > is the 9th
> > >  month.
> > > New York is located at the 41st degree Latitude.
> > >
> > >
> > >
> > >
> > >
> > >
> > >
> > >
> > >
> > >
> > >
> > >
> > >
> > >
> > >
> > >
> > >
> > >
> > >
> >
> >
> > __________________________________________________
> > Do You Yahoo!?
> > Get email alerts & NEW webcam video instant messaging with Yahoo!
> Messenger
> > http://im.yahoo.com
>
>

Sent: Thursday, September 13, 2001 11:34 AM
Content-Transfer-Encoding: 7bit
Return-Path: <rebeccab@nol.net>
Received: from  rly-yd04.mx.aol.com (rly-yd04.mail.aol.com [172.18.150.4]) by air-yd05.mail.aol.com (v80.17) with ESMTP id MAILINYD59-0912235130; Wed, 12 Sep 2001 23:51:30 -0400
Received: from  mail.nol.net (nol.net [206.126.32.1]) by rly-yd04.mx.aol.com (v80.21) with ESMTP id MAILRELAYINYD46-0912235127; Wed, 12 Sep 2001 23:51:27 -0400
Received: from Default (56K-HouTX-040-155.NOL.NET [206.126.40.155])	by mail.nol.net (8.9.3/8.9.1) with SMTP id WAA23382;	Wed, 12 Sep 2001 22:52:07 -0500 (CDT)

> Scary?
> > >
> > > Nostradamus' prediction on WW3:
> > >
> > > "In the year of the new century and nine months,
> > > From the sky will come a great King of Terror...
> > > The sky will burn at forty-five degrees.
> > > Fire approaches the great new city..."
> > > "In the city of york there will be a great collapse,
> > > 2 twin brothers torn apart by chaos
> > > while the fortress falls the great leader will
> > > succumb
> > > third big war will begin when the big city is
> > > burning"
> > >
> > > - NOSTRADAMUS
> > >
> > > He said this will be bigger than the previous two.
> > > 2001 is the first year of the new century and this
> > > is the 9th
> > >  month.
> > > New York is located at the 41st degree Latitude.
> > >
> > >
> > >
> > >
> > >
> > >
> > >
> > >
> > >
> > >
> > >
> > >
> > >
> > >
> > >
> > >
> > >
> > >
> > >
> >
> >
> > __________________________________________________
> > Do You Yahoo!?
> > Get email alerts & NEW webcam video instant messaging with Yahoo!
> Messenger
> > http://im.yahoo.com
>
>

Sent: Thursday, September 13, 2001 11:34 AM
Content-Transfer-Encoding: 7bit
Return-Path: <rebeccab@nol.net>
Received: from  rly-yd04.mx.aol.com (rly-yd04.mail.aol.com [172.18.150.4]) by air-yd05.mail.aol.com (v80.17) with ESMTP id MAILINYD59-0912235130; Wed, 12 Sep 2001 23:51:30 -0400
Received: from  mail.nol.net (nol.net [206.126.32.1]) by rly-yd04.mx.aol.com (v80.21) with ESMTP id MAILRELAYINYD46-0912235127; Wed, 12 Sep 2001 23:51:27 -0400
Received: from Default (56K-HouTX-040-155.NOL.NET [206.126.40.155])	by mail.nol.net (8.9.3/8.9.1) with SMTP id WAA23382;	Wed, 12 Sep 2001 22:52:07 -0500 (CDT)

> Scary?
> > >
> > > Nostradamus' prediction on WW3:
> > >
> > > "In the year of the new century and nine months,
> > > From the sky will come a great King of Terror...
> > > The sky will burn at forty-five degrees.
> > > Fire approaches the great new city..."
> > > "In the city of york there will be a great collapse,
> > > 2 twin brothers torn apart by chaos
> > > while the fortress falls the great leader will
> > > succumb
> > > third big war will begin when the big city is
> > > burning"
> > >
> > > - NOSTRADAMUS
> > >
> > > He said this will be bigger than the previous two.
> > > 2001 is the first year of the new century and this
> > > is the 9th
> > >  month.
> > > New York is located at the 41st degree Latitude.
> > >
> > >
> > >
> > >
> > >
> > >
> > >
> > >
> > >
> > >
> > >
> > >
> > >
> > >
> > >
> > >
> > >
> > >
> > >
> >
> >
> > __________________________________________________
> > Do You Yahoo!?
> > Get email alerts & NEW webcam video instant messaging with Yahoo!
> Messenger
> > http://im.yahoo.com
>
>

 <A
HREF="http://www.governmentguide.com/research_and_education/govsite.adp?bread=

*Main*research_and_education.adp?id=16101928*Research%20and%20Education*usflag

.adp*U.S.%20Flag&url=http%3A//www.governmentguide.com/ams/clickThruRedirect.ad

p%3F55109965%2C22579529%2Chttp%3A//www.pueblo.gsa.gov/cic_text/misc/ourflag/ti

tlepage.htm">Click here: Government Guide:
http://www.governmentguide.com/ams/clickThruRedirect.adp?55109965,22579529,
</A> 

#1 These guys can't even trade on EOL because they don't have an EEI in place with us.  #2 ,,,all the legs of cal02 are out there.  Tell them to add them all up, and divide by 12.

MC

Mike,

An inquiring customer ...
If you want me to call Brent I'll be happy to. 
Let me know if you want to share your reasons for pulling J-D02..

Thanks. ...T

Teresa, I have noticed that the Entergy Jan-Dec02 contract has not shown up
on EOL since 9/4.  Is this because no one is trading it anymore, and have
lost interest? 

Thanks,

Brent D. Skinner
Power Trader
Entergy Solutions, Ltd.
(713) 544-5204
BSkinne@Entergy.com 
www.entergy-solutions.com

College Game day on ESPN will be in Norman, OK for the game Saturday!!!  Be sure to watch....

Well, I will tell you this has been discussed in our defense circles for
sometime now......unfortunately.....it may be time.
Kenny

2

We are in the process of confirming that all traders are set up correctly and ready to trade when the system goes live. 

We need to make sure that your Stack Managers are accessing the correct database. In order to do this, we need to know how you access Stack Manager:

1) Through Terminal Server (the one that opens up a desktop within a desktop and it actually appears that you have two Start buttons). 
or
2) By opening the Stack Manager directly from your "native" desktop.

Please reply to this message with either a corresponding "1" or a "2" in the subject field.

If you're not sure which one you have, please contact myself x39673, Teresa Mandola x39807 or Jennifer McQuade x53614 and we'll come by your desk to help you.

Thank you,

Dan Diamond

From one jail to another most likely!  the Astros just got their sphincters riped off!!!!  Go Sox!

When are you coming to H-Town to have a cocktail??

MC

Hey:

What's you're Q4/Q5 associated-Craig, Co. off peak spread offer.  Just
kidding.  I see you're branching out of entergy jail.  Giddy up.  Hope all
is well.

mjb

>From one jail to another most likely!  the Astros just got their sphincters
riped off!!!!  Go Sox!

When are you coming to H-Town to have a cocktail??

MC

    -----Original Message-----
   Hey:

   What's you're Q4/Q5 associated-Craig, Co. off peak spread offer.  Just
   kidding.  I see you're branching out of entergy jail.  Giddy up.  Hope
   all
   is well.

   mjb

This looks fun!  I'll be in the moonwalk!

The World Wide RibFest "celebration of the Rib" is coming up.  This will be the 5th annual ribfest, and John Mee has his work cut out for him to defend the title he won last year (for the second time).  I believe he will have a tough time, as the competition looks increasingly focused on unseating the former Bostonian from his Throne.

For those of you who haven't been to a ribfest in the past, it's a barbeque competition where 5 to 7 cooks compete to see who can produce the best Baby Back Ribs (if you want those Fred Flintstone beef ribs, you ain't getting them here).  A blind-judging takes place to determine the winner, but often the crowd gets up in arms and nominates a "peoples choice" (though this is not officially recognized by the sanctioning body).  

Every year, my wife asks the following: 	"So, besides Ribs, beer and margaritas, what else will be served?"
			          I reply:	"Nothing comes to mind."	
		               She replies:	"No." 

As you might expect, she wins this discussion year in, year out.  So, appetizers, sides, desserts and food & drink for the kids are also served.  The competition around the grills gets a little rough, so I recommend that the young and faint-of-heart maintain a safe distance while the cooking and competition is taking place.  The appropriate College football games will be broadcast, so you don't have to worry about missing any games.

There are a couple of changes to this year's competition:
The competition will be held at the John Mee/Laura Benjamins compound in Bellaire
Mike Paradise (who won the very first ribfest) has stepped out of the competition this year citing "personal reasons"

Date & Time
Saturday November 3rd.  We fire the grills up around 12:00, and the judging takes place between 3:00 and 3:30.
		
Where
4807 Elm Street in Bellaire

Directions (from John Mee himself)
From downtown, take 59s to 610s. The first exit is the Bissonette//Fournace exit. Take this exit and go through the light, noting the gouging in the lamppost from that freak cherry-picker accident from last April. Before the Bisonette light, there is a big Chase Bank Building. Right before that building is Elm Street. Take a right on Elm Street exactly 236 yards to 4807 Elm Street. Go inside and ask for directions there, cause I really don't have a clue...
KIDS
Bring 'em!  We'll have the Moonwalk set up for them again this year, and we'll have hot dogs, burgers, popcorn and drinks for them.  The more kids the better.

What you need to bring
Nothing, except maybe some attitude to heckle the cooks while they try to concentrate.

RSVP
Call 	John and Laura  713 839 8700 -or-
	Greg and Martha 713 861 2766
We need to make sure we stock up enough ribs to go around.

 

just got this note,,, I was out of town..... will send you a detailed message manana!

MC

Whats up Mike?  Just thought that I would drop you a line and see how things
were going.  Hows the wife and kid?  San Fran. is cool, don't worry, I
haven't meet a boyfriend yet!  Drop me a line sometime and let me know what
you are up to.  CJ

Send me Phil's number and email, thought I would look him up since he only
lives an hour away,

_________________________________________________________________
Get your FREE download of MSN Explorer at http://explorer.msn.com/intl.asp

It looks GREAT!   Thank you so muck for taking them..... I can't wait to see the rest

We got some good shots of Harris this weekend --

here's a sample

__________________________________________________
Do You Yahoo!?
Make a great connection at Yahoo! Personals.
http://personals.yahoo.com
 - Harris-10-21-01.jpg << File: Harris-10-21-01.jpg >> 

I recieved this from an OU fan!

what is the attire for the rehearsal dinner????

what is the attire for the rehearsal dinner??

MC

Doing good.... My division  (Wholsale Energy Trading) just got sold to UBS Warburg, a swiss investment bank....  I will start work for them in about two weeks or so.   Other than that every thing is cool,,, Heather and I are getting ready for a trip to Aspen  in next couple weeks and the "Little Man" is still growing like a weed!

How are things in KC??

MC

Mike,

I was wondering how your job was going.  I've obviously heard all the media
hype surrounding your company.  Please send me a email with an update.

Thanks,

Devin

[Carson, Mikew  [Carson, Mike]  w hat is the attire for the rehearsal dinner??

MC

strong!

Mike,

If you have any trouble finding the restaurant, I've included directions
below:

To Chapel Hill from RDU Airport:

Take  I-40 West and proceed to exit 273 B which is
highway 54 West.

Proceed on 54 West which turns into Raleigh Road. Do not exit on 54-15-501
Bypass. At Country Club Road turn right. This is 3.9 miles from I-40.

Drive on Country Club Road for .4 mile and turn right on Raleigh Street.

Drive .2 mile on Raleigh Street to Franklin Street ( this is the main
street that runs through downtown Chapel Hill) and turn left on Franklin
Street.

Proceed west on Franklin Street and you will see  University Presbyterian
Church on your right  .3 mile and then continue another .4 mile and you
will see Michael Jordan's 23 on your right.

If you have any trouble, please call my cell (913) 481-4632.

Thanks,

Devin

Mike,

Business casual will be fine.

Thanks,

Devin
     [Carson, Mikew  [Carson, Mike]  w hat is the attire for the
rehearsal dinner??

> MC

Here you go... Let me know what you think????

MC

http://www.theknot.com/co_pwpa.html?coupleid=00717134457&TaRAnELSON&pHILLIPwENTA

Hi Carson,
It was so good to see you over the  weekend.  I am a little tired today.  Our flight home was much  smoother then our flight to NC.  Hope yours was as well.  Will you  send me that sight we discussed.  I'd like to check it out.
 
Keep in touch.
Kristen

I did get them ,,,, and they were GREAT!  I especially liked the one of tity-mariny!!

MC

Did you get my picture attachments?  I just want to make  sure.  They were to good for you to miss.
:)
kristen

SHE WOULD LOVE IT!

Mike,
I would like to get Heather a gift certificate for her birthday. Does
she still shop at Ann Taylor? Or if you have a suggestion, please let me
know. Look forward to seeing you Saturday. Thanks.

Mom.

Me , my wife ,and my son(8mo old ) will be attending!

MC

Dana Davis would like you and your spouse/significant other to join the Northeast Group for a weekend away at Barton Creek in Austin on July 20th - July 22nd.  Enron has arranged for morning golf on the Crenshaw Cliffside Course and relaxing afternoon Spa Services.  All accommodations, activities, and meals have been arranged, however, you will need to provide your own transporation to and from Austin, Texas. 

Please let me know by Friday, July 6th if you will be able to attend.

Thanks and hope to see you there,

Tjae

Me , my wife ,and my son(8mo old ) will be attending!

MC

Dana Davis would like you and your spouse/significant other to join the Northeast Group for a weekend away at Barton Creek in Austin on July 20th - July 22nd.  Enron has arranged for morning golf on the Crenshaw Cliffside Course and relaxing afternoon Spa Services.  All accommodations, activities, and meals have been arranged, however, you will need to provide your own transporation to and from Austin, Texas. 

Please let me know by Friday, July 6th if you will be able to attend.

Thanks and hope to see you there,

Tjae

Coat- 44R
Waist- 36R
Out Seam - 42
Neck - 16 1/2
Sleeve - 35
Shoes - 10

The KID!

Gents - Would you please do me the favor of getting me your tux sizings
ASAP.  I need to get the order in for the wedding this week.  Thanks
Guys.....pbw

Phillip Wenta
Sales & Business Development
Phoenix Cement Co.
916.677.1711 (office)
916.677.1811 (fax)

Stop by my desk any afternoon after 4:00pm...3116a

Mike

Mike,

Let me first introduce myself -- I have responsiblity for a couple of sites in Louisiana as part of the Generation Development Group.  We are trying to determine if we should continue to develop these sites (permitting and interconnection) or just sit on the land options.  Obviously there is more cost associated with the permitting and interconnection activity and we are at a critical juncture in both activities (whether to proceed or stop).  I would like to discuss at your earliest convenience.  The sites are located in Calcasieu and St. Charles Parishes.  

Please call me x.39298.  Thanks, Ron Tapscott.

Greetings from Xcel Energy,

Just a reminder to let you know that there are still hole sponsorships and
spaces available in the 3rd Annual SPP Energy Traders Golf Tournament to be
held in Kansas City at the Tiffany Greens Golf Club this September.  Please
contact me (or Wayne Reed at 303-308-6148) to obtain information regarding
hole sponsorships - there is a limited number available so the sooner the
better!

To enter the tournament, just complete the attached entry form and send it
to either Wayne or myself.

Looking forward to seeing you there!

 <<SPP golf invitation.pdf>>  <<SPP golf sponsor solicitation.pdf>>

Mike Martin
Xcel Energy, Inc.
600 South Tyler, Suite 2501
Amarillo, Texas 79101
806-378-2376
PAGER: 800-733-9460
FAX: 806-378-2517

 - SPP golf invitation.pdf=20
 - SPP golf sponsor solicitation.pdf

     /02    NON-CHECK FINANCIAL DATA FOR REF. #    30202545504
ACCOUNT: 40781075      ENRON CORP-ECT CASH SVC
            AMOUNT      POST DATE  VALUE DATE   CODE      BATCH/TRACK       DUP
        257,721.12       01/25/02    01/25/02    479     650000000571         1
TRANSACTION DESCRIPTION
SAME DAY DR TRANSFER
         GID:LCT20251018400
         FED20020125B1Q8023C002614
         USER REF:S053022000155878
         REF:      S053022000155878
         ORDER:    ENA CASH SERVICES
         CR BK ID: 021000021
         CR BK:    JPMORGAN CHASE BANK FORMERLY CHASE
          MANHATTAN BANK,N.A NEW YORK, NY 10004
         BENEF:    323009980 ENTERGY KOCH TRADING, LP
          20 E GREENWAY PLZ HOUSTON, TX US 77046
         DETAILS:WT0125 ENTERGY PREPAY FOR JAN PO
         WER S053022000155878
         INSTRUCT DATE:01/25/02 ADVICE TYPE:MAIL

ENTER  (1) YESTERDAY    (2) TODAY        (3) SEARCH       (4) SERIAL

Are you going to Phil's wedding???

Carson

Phil's wedding is Thursday Aug 23..phil had ask me if you were coming???........I have a room in York, Nebraska where the wedding is,so you can crash there,, no wife, and no kid ,,, on this trip,,, so let the games begin!

hope you can make it!

MC

Hey what's up?!
When is it? He told me about it, but I can't remember when it is.

Are you going?

How's everything going?  Wife, kid--good?  Not much here...I'm have started selling photos to a few magazines and to some realtors.  I am getting some prints made to try and get into some galleries around here(and to sell on the side).  No girlfriend, not going out very much at all, doing alot of mtn. bike races, climbing alot of mtns., taking alot of photos, and enjoying life in the mtns.--that's pretty much what's been happening in my life.

Talk to you later,
Cody

ps, use codydownard@hotmail.com
since I don't work in HR anymore, it's kinda hard for me to check this email address regularly.
>>> "Carson, Mike" <Mike.Carson@ENRON.com> 07/30/01 15:07 PM >>>
Are you going to Phil's wedding???

Carson

Are you going to the happy hour tonight @ Sherlocks???

MC

Have you decided whether you are going to the wedding??

MC

"Wayne" is my middle name.  Are you getting nervous yet.... not too much longer!!!  I am looking forward to meeting your bride,,,,,   See you in two weeks!

MC

Mike - what is your middle name?...I need to know asap
please.........pbw

Phillip Wenta
Sales & Business Development
Phoenix Cement Co.
916.677.1711 (office)
916.677.1811 (fax)

Actually not going to be there till friday afternoon...but to compensate for not coming on Thursday, I plan to "tie one on" Friday night!!!

What are your arrival plans.  We have a golf tourney on Friday.  Are you
coming in on Thursday night?......pbw

Phillip Wenta
Sales & Business Development
Phoenix Cement Co.
916.677.1711 (office)
916.677.1811 (fax)

"Wayne" is my middle name.  Are you getting nervous yet.... not too much
longer!!!  I am looking forward to meeting your bride,,,,,   See you in
two
weeks!

MC

    -----Original Message-----
[mailto:IMCEANOTES-+22Wenta+2C+20Phillip+22+20+3CWentaPB+40phoenix-cemen
t+2Ecom+3E+40ENRON@ENRON.com]

   Sent:   Sunday, August 12, 2001 6:43 PM
   Mike - what is your middle name?...I need to know asap
   please.........pbw

   Phillip Wenta
   Sales & Business Development
   Phoenix Cement Co.
   916.677.1711 (office)
   916.677.1811 (fax)

I get into Lincoln at about 1:30... so should be in York by 3:pm.....ready to rock!

MC

You will be there for rehearsal RIGHT?  Are you flying into Lincoln (45
min) or Omaha (1:45)?  And at what time?  Rehearsal is at 5pm just so
you know.  Can't wait to see you.  It's been WAY too long.  Bring a
current picture of Your family w/ you since you're not bringing
them.........pbw

Phillip Wenta
Sales & Business Development
Phoenix Cement Co.
916.677.1711 (office)
916.677.1811 (fax)

Actually not going to be there till friday afternoon...but to compensate
for not coming on Thursday, I plan to "tie one on" Friday night!!!

    -----Original Message-----
[mailto:IMCEANOTES-+22Wenta+2C+20Phillip+22+20+3CWentaPB+40phoenix-cemen
t+2Ecom+3E+40ENRON@ENRON.com]

   Sent:   Monday, August 13, 2001 10:10 AM
   What are your arrival plans.  We have a golf tourney on Friday.  Are
you
   coming in on Thursday night?......pbw

   Phillip Wenta
   Sales & Business Development
   Phoenix Cement Co.
   916.677.1711 (office)
   916.677.1811 (fax)

    -----Original Message-----
   "Wayne" is my middle name.  Are you getting nervous yet.... not too
much
   longer!!!  I am looking forward to meeting your bride,,,,,   See you
in
   two
   weeks!

   MC

       -----Original Message-----
[mailto:IMCEANOTES-+22Wenta+2C+20Phillip+22+20+3CWentaPB+40phoenix-cemen
   t+2Ecom+3E+40ENRON@ENRON.com]

      Sent:   Sunday, August 12, 2001 6:43 PM
      Mike - what is your middle name?...I need to know asap
      please.........pbw

      Phillip Wenta
      Sales & Business Development
      Phoenix Cement Co.
      916.677.1711 (office)
      916.677.1811 (fax)

Just let me know when I need to do the tux thing....  I'll wait for you guys ,,,, if you don't mind....

MC

Great!  Just go to the Hotel and check in.  We should be back at the
hotel at about 3pm.  Call Tara's parents house (Scott & Gaye) @
402.362.7591 if you need anything.  You will need to go down to the tux
shop and try on your tux that evening sometime.  Hopefully right when
you get in.  We might just all do it at 3:30pm......pbw

Phillip Wenta
Sales & Business Development
Phoenix Cement Co.
916.677.1711 (office)
916.677.1811 (fax)

I get into Lincoln at about 1:30... so should be in York by
3:pm.....ready
to rock!

MC

    -----Original Message-----
[mailto:IMCEANOTES-+22Wenta+2C+20Phillip+22+20+3CWentaPB+40phoenix-cemen
t+2Ecom+3E+40ENRON@ENRON.com]

   Sent:   Monday, August 13, 2001 10:34 AM
   You will be there for rehearsal RIGHT?  Are you flying into Lincoln
(45
   min) or Omaha (1:45)?  And at what time?  Rehearsal is at 5pm just so
   you know.  Can't wait to see you.  It's been WAY too long.  Bring a
   current picture of Your family w/ you since you're not bringing
   them.........pbw

   Phillip Wenta
   Sales & Business Development
   Phoenix Cement Co.
   916.677.1711 (office)
   916.677.1811 (fax)

    -----Original Message-----
   Actually not going to be there till friday afternoon...but to
compensate
   for not coming on Thursday, I plan to "tie one on" Friday night!!!

       -----Original Message-----
[mailto:IMCEANOTES-+22Wenta+2C+20Phillip+22+20+3CWentaPB+40phoenix-cemen
   t+2Ecom+3E+40ENRON@ENRON.com]

      Sent:   Monday, August 13, 2001 10:10 AM
      What are your arrival plans.  We have a golf tourney on Friday.
Are
   you
      coming in on Thursday night?......pbw

      Phillip Wenta
      Sales & Business Development
      Phoenix Cement Co.
      916.677.1711 (office)
      916.677.1811 (fax)

       -----Original Message-----
      "Wayne" is my middle name.  Are you getting nervous yet.... not
too
   much
      longer!!!  I am looking forward to meeting your bride,,,,,   See
you
   in
      two
      weeks!

      MC

          -----Original Message-----
[mailto:IMCEANOTES-+22Wenta+2C+20Phillip+22+20+3CWentaPB+40phoenix-cemen
      t+2Ecom+3E+40ENRON@ENRON.com]

         Sent:   Sunday, August 12, 2001 6:43 PM
         Mike - what is your middle name?...I need to know asap
         please.........pbw

         Phillip Wenta
         Sales & Business Development
         Phoenix Cement Co.
         916.677.1711 (office)
         916.677.1811 (fax)

give me a shout if you get this before 5pm....713-853-6203

Dude,

What is up???  I've got lots of news for you...let's see...I'm recently
engaged...work is going well...traveling a bit and enjoying Dallas though I'm a
true Houstonian...And you?

Jackson

WHAT IS YOUR # AT WORK??

I left early so I'll try you later today...

Mike.Carson@enron.com on 08/15/2001 04:06:31 PM

give me a shout if you get this before 5pm....713-853-6203

    -----Original Message-----
[mailto:IMCEANOTES-+22Chris+20Jackson+22+20+3CChris+5FJackson+40txu+2Ecom+3E+40ENRON@ENRON.com]

   Sent:   Wednesday, August 15, 2001 11:20 AM
   Dude,

   What is up???  I've got lots of news for you...let's see...I'm recently
   engaged...work is going well...traveling a bit and enjoying Dallas
   though I'm a
   true Houstonian...And you?

   Jackson

David,

I think this point is moot for the time being because (as of last Tuesday) we 
are not dealing with Bidder D.

I think it is ok legally to go this way -- although there is potential 
liability under the WARN Act (the plant closing law).  We probably can 
schedule around that exposure, though, by giving everyone who possibly may be 
affected 60 days' notice. 

Practically, however, this would not be my favorite approach.  I'd prefer it 
if we could have the ability to compete for top performers, but we should be 
able to manage that by working through the persons who we identify and 
present for possible hiring by the buyer.  

I would like more information about what is meant by "ENA does not interfere 
with" the offers made by the buyer.  Does that mean no counteroffers? 

To answer the question of whether we can bind all of Enron, I would say that 
it is unlikely, unless we want to ask.  It is easier to commit only the 
wholesale group, rather than ask Corp., EES, Broadband, etc.  whether they 
will abide by the agreement, so I would recommend limiting it to that group, 
if possible.  We may be able to include the pipelines, given that they have 
been involved in this transaction.

Let me know if you have any questions.

Michelle

David Oxley
11/26/2000 06:50 PM
What's your view?
Timothy J Detmering
11/15/2000 07:32 PM
With respect to bidder D we are being asked not to compete with them for 
those employees they would like to hire.  i.e. we have to sever them and 
bidder D gets to hire them if they want to (in which case the severed 
employees get no severance payment if they turn DFS down).  I would like to 
propose something like the following:

 1.  We provide Bidder D with a list of all Designated Employees, their 
position, historical compensation.
 2.  Bidder D covenants to make offers to ___% of certain pools of Designated 
Employees e.g. commercial, operations, engineering, trading, etc.
 3.  Bidder D covenants to make offers that will not allow Designated 
Employees to successfully claim constructive dismissal under our severance 
plan.
 4.  Between signing and closing, Bidder D provide us with a list of Offerees 
- Designated Employees to whom Bidder D intends to make offers of    
employment.
 5.  ENA covenants that we will not interfere with Bidder D's offers (can we 
bind all of Enron?).
 6.  If an Offeree turns down the offer (in writing) then ENA is free to 
continue to employee Offeree.  However, if we do not continue to employ the 
Offeree, no   severance is owed.
 
The intent of the above is to encourage Offerees to take the offers - they 
give up severance rights if they don't - but provide us the opportunity to 
continue to employee anyone who is bold enough to turn it down and that we 
want to keep.  Also it caps our severance obligation by requiring Bidder D to 
specify how many offers must be made.  Bidder D is certain to want more than 
this but I am uncomfortable saying we can't continue to employee any of the 
Offerees.

Please advise.

Was Clonch deposed?  What did he say?   Michelle

Michelle,

 Yesterday, counsel for Richard Clonch called, requesting January
dates for the Enron depositions.  He provided me with the following dates
possible dates; 1/3, 1/4, 1/5, 1/8, 1/9, 1/10, 1/11, 1/12, 1/22, 1/23, 1/24,
1/25, 1/26.

 I told him that I would forward these dates to Enron.  I will send
counsel for Richard Clonch availability dates for Enron Officials as soon as
I hear from you.

 Thanks

Tim C. Carrico
Spilman Thomas & Battle, PLLC
email: tcarrico@spilmanlaw.com
phone:             (304)-340-3856
cell phone:       (304)-549-2681
fax:                  (304)-340-3801
address:           300 Kanawha Blvd., East
                       Charleston, W.Va. 25301

I haven't heard anything, but I would suggest that you have them stand down 
for the meantime.  Michelle

Michelle,
?
Further to my voicemail, should we advise the actuaries to  cease their due 
diligence work on the Celgar pension plans? They have just  called me to 
advise about some further liabilities under the supplementary plan  for 
non-union employees. Thanks.

Richard, My thought is that the first sentence is ok, but not the second, and 
Bonnie is conveying that to McConville's lawyer.  MHC

Bonnie White@ENRON
12/12/2000 04:59 PM
McConville's counsel has asked us for language in addition to a mere 
representation that the Enron Milford certificate of incorporation applies to 
ENA to the effect that we will cooperate or at least not unreasonably oppose 
Kevin's making a claim for indemnification should the situation arise.  I 
have drafted language along the lines of what I think he is asking for.  Is 
this something that we would consider agreeing to?

Bonnie J. White
Enron Litigation Unit
1400 Smith St., Suite 4824
Houston, TX  77002
Ph:  (713) 853-7244
Fax: (713) 853-6576 

Hello, everyone.

No need to work on Canary any more -- it is off.  I would suggest that you 
save your work in the event that it is revived, but it doesn't look like it 
is going to happen any time soon.

Michelle

My understanding is that the deal is dead -- stop the presses.  

Thanks for all of your help on this -- I appreciated your efforts and 
explanations.  Perhaps we will work together again in the future. 

Michelle

Michelle,
?
Further to my voicemail, should we advise the actuaries to  cease their due 
diligence work on the Celgar pension plans? They have just  called me to 
advise about some further liabilities under the supplementary plan  for 
non-union employees. Thanks.

Molly,

Let's schedule interviews with Bechel with Mark Haedicke, Elizabeth Sager, 
Sheila Tweed, Dan Lyons, and Lisa Mellencamp.

Thanks a lot.

Michelle

re Mariner

Mark,

As you requested, below is a list of my major accomplishments for the year.  

1. Resolution/management of pre-litigation and litigation matters, 
including:  Dwayne Hart/Utilicorp; Satterwhite; Barrington; Race/Statoil; 
Ross Malme; Rick Blandford; West Boettcher; Anita Suson; Charlie Weymms; 
Steven Cuneo; others.

2.  Efficient management of drafting, negotiating, revising, and completing 
several types of contracts in numerous different jurisdictions (e.g., almost 
200 employment agreements, 35 separation agreements, and 30 consulting 
services agreements).

3. Lead attorney on Project One (which involves issues surrounding the 
OFCCP's "glass ceiling" audit of ENA and all of Enron).

4. Labor and employment transactional support, including:  East Coast Power, 
Ecogas, CGas, Project Hurricane, Columbia, Project Grizzly, Las Vegas Cogen, 
and other acquisitions that involve the transfer or hiring of personnel. Many 
of these transactions require extensive legal support relating to personnel 
matters after closing.

5. Legal support on labor (union) matters, including successful closing of 
project labor agreements for the construction of generation assets (e.g., 
Pittsburg, 2000 peakers, Pastoria), Unfair Labor Practice matters, training 
on union-related issues in M&A's.

Let me know if you need any more information, and thanks for your support!

Michelle

Greg, we live very close to you!  We have to get together soon.  I have sent 
you an invitation to our New Year's Day party, and I hope you can come.  

By the way, congrats on all the success and good press on Fusion.  It is well 
deserved!

Merry Christmas!

Michelle

Michelle:

I just got your voicemail and I was on a conference call.  However, I'm
running late to another meeting.  I will try to call you later today.  I
hope that the family is doing well and that you guys are having a wonderful
Holiday Season.  Here's our information:

Greg, Cynthia and Sidney Phillips
2711 S. Glen Haven Blvd.
Houston, TX 77025
713-660-7880

I will talk to you later.

GLP
 

Gary, would you please send me by email the telecommuting policy and the 
agreement for telecommuters?

Thanks a lot.

 Michelle

Jeff, here is information from Jon Chapman.  Let's discuss when you have a 
chance to review it.  Michelle

Michelle,

Further to our discussion on Tuesday , I am very happy to proceed on the 
basis of Jeff Dodd's draft Agreement ( and draft Data Protection Policy) . 
Can you ask him to prepare a final version and let us have it , please. 

The EU "Data Exporter" entities are as follows:-

UK

Enron Europe Limited (also Italy )
Enron Power Operations Limited
Enron Teesside Operations Limited
Enron Direct Limited
Enron Engineering Services
Caxios Limited

Norway and Sweden

Germany

Enron Energie GmbH

Finland

Enron Finland Energy OY

Spain

Enron Espana Energia S.L.

Note that Norway is not a member of the EU but , as a member of the European 
Economic Area , should be treated as an EU member for these purposes.

I look forward to hearing from you.

Thanks.

Jon

Thanks, Dan.  We will work to accommodate your schedule.

Daniel Reck
11/28/2000 04:31 PM
I'm out the first week of January, but have nothing else scheduled.  I 
reserve the right to reschedule anything at anytime if there is a commercial 
need.

--Dan

Michelle Cash
11/28/2000 03:50 PM
Hello, everyone.  Please let me know which of these dates works best for 
you.  It would be most helpful if you give me a range of available dates for 
both preparation and the deposition itself.  That way, I can find overlapping 
dates on which you all are available.  

Thanks a lot.

Michelle

Michelle,

 Yesterday, counsel for Richard Clonch called, requesting January
dates for the Enron depositions.  He provided me with the following dates
possible dates; 1/3, 1/4, 1/5, 1/8, 1/9, 1/10, 1/11, 1/12, 1/22, 1/23, 1/24,
1/25, 1/26.

 I told him that I would forward these dates to Enron.  I will send
counsel for Richard Clonch availability dates for Enron Officials as soon as
I hear from you.

 Thanks

Tim C. Carrico
Spilman Thomas & Battle, PLLC
email: tcarrico@spilmanlaw.com
phone:             (304)-340-3856
cell phone:       (304)-549-2681
fax:                  (304)-340-3801
address:           300 Kanawha Blvd., East
                       Charleston, W.Va. 25301

Twanda, would you please save these to my form directory and print them out 
for me?  Thanks a lot.  Michelle

LeAnne Chumley
01/07/2000 11:51 AM
 See below two documents:

         
Gary Buck
01/07/2000 11:43 AM
LeAnne,

Please attach the forms for telecummuting that I asked you to modify recently 
and send them to Michelle Cash.

Thanks,
Gary
Michelle Cash
01/07/2000 11:22 AM
Gary, would you please send me by email the telecommuting policy and the 
agreement for telecommuters?

Thanks a lot.

 Michelle

Twanda, please make this a form and save.  Thanks a lot.  Michelle

Dolores Lenfest@ENRON
01/04/2000 05:43 PM
Patrick,

Attached is our standard HR due diligence list.  See you tomorrow.

Thank you,
Dee

Danny, I received another call from the lawyers interested in learning 
information about Chapparro.  Any information?  Michelle

Jeffrey,

Thanks for the "thanks."  Also, thanks to you for the big wine bucket.  We 
used it at our New Year's Day party, and it worked great.  I must admit, 
though, that I still don't understand the purpose of the round thing that 
goes in the bottom.

I heard that Nathan took 30 steps the other day.  That is awesome!!  I know 
that you are thrilled.

Cameron's birthday party will be March 18 at 3:30 at Gymboree.  If your kids 
will be able to attend, let me know.

Talk to you later -- gotta go now.

Michelle

Michelle-

Thanks for all the great Christmas gifts... I was thinking about you because
last night I was showing a friend Sim City, this morning I awoke to the
little portable clock, and was reading Texas Monthly in our library (you can
guess!).  The boys specially like the clock.  They've figured out how to
turn on the back lighting by pressing the snooze button.

We went to Shiner for the new year.  The Lewis' invited 3 other couples and
their kids.  We stayed up until about 2am playing cards and drinking
champagne (although I only had two glasses).

Nathan is getting more and more stable in his walking.  He took 10 steps
yesterday, the most ever.  He also stands for several minutes at a time,
learning how to balance himself.  He's at 19 months, 17 months adjusted.
Kiera walked at 16 months.  We will be very happy if he is walking soon,
given where he started.

Thanks again for the great gifts.

JP

Jeff Hoogendam
President & CEO - SmartPrice.com, Inc.
110 Wild Basin Road, Suite 280
Austin, TX 78746
P: 512-437-7950
F: 512-437-7925

Richard, have you been involved in this?  Robert Knight asked about it.  
Thanks a lot.  Michelle

Michelle,

Have you had a chance to work on the policy letter?  We are running out of 
storage space in our safe and need to destroy old tapes.

Thanks,  Robert

I have asked Michelle Cash in legal to provide a new policy letter.  I think 
they are going to change to 4 months.

   

This is what I want to send to Lucy, so we start the deletion process on our 
DAT tapes.

Lucy, It is Enron's Retention Policy that all audio tapes be destroyed that 
are older than six months.  This policy was lifted when the East Power 
Marketers had a brief inflation of electricity pricing during the summer 
months of 1998.  That retention policy is now back into affect and therefore, 
all audio tapes older than six months at the start of each month will be 
physically destroyed.

I understand that there is some litigation going on because of the price 
inflation during that time frame, so I need to know what time period we 
should keep until all litigations are completed.

Please respond back as soon as possible.

Thanks,
Darren Adamik

Mark,

Unfortunately, I do not know anything about EcoElectrica.  I contacted 
Michelle Blaine at the former EI (thinking that there was some confusion 
between Blaine and Cash).  Her assistant contacted me and said that, 
apparently, Coralina Rivera at the former EI has information about Eco 
Electrica in Puerto Rico.  I have left Coralina a message indicating that you 
are looking for information about EcoElectrica and requesting that she 
contact you directly.

Let me know if I can do anything further on this matter.

Michelle

Mark Evans
01/17/2000 09:12 AM
Jeff,

do you know yet to whom at V&E Houston these docs should be sent? We would 
like a copy in the UK so we may ask your Houston office to do the honours and 
copy their set over to us.

Thanks.

       Mark

Thanks for the consideration -- I did not expect much.  Also, I have faxed 
you my comments on response to Malme's motion to extend time to designate 
experts.  The comments should be self-explanatory.  Call me with any 
questions -- or have Tim call me.  

Thanks.

Michelle

Kerry,

Based upon your review of the attached, is there any way that one of our=20
subsidiaries could decline to include bargaining unit personnel in receipt =
of=20
this benefit?  Let me know asap.

Thanks a lot!

Michelle

On Wall Street, people are talking about Enron.  At Enron, we're talking=20
about people...our people.  You are the driving force behind every success=
=20
that our company has experienced, including our high-performing stock price=
,=20
which surpassed the $50 mark only a few days ago. You made it happen!

To show our appreciation for your hard work and commitment to Enron=01,s=20
continued success, eligible regular full-time and regular part-time employe=
es=20
who were on the payroll of a wholly-owned Enron company at Dec. 31, 1999 wi=
ll=20
receive 50 Enron stock options.  A special stock option award certificate a=
nd=20
a copy of the stock plan will be sent to you in the next few weeks.

About the stock options grant:
? The grant was effective Jan. 18, 2000, therefore, the option grant price =
is=20
$55.50.
? Options will have a seven-year term, which means you must exercise these=
=20
options before seven years have passed.
? Options will vest 25 percent on Feb. 28, 2000 and 25 percent each=20
subsequent January 18th thereafter until fully vested, as long as you are a=
n=20
employee of Enron.  This means you may exercise 25 percent of these options=
=20
as early as Feb. 28.
? This grant is made in accordance with the terms and provisions of the Enr=
on=20
Corp. Stock Plans and the award documents, which you will receive in the=20
coming weeks.=20

Due to varying international restrictions and legalities, Enron employees i=
n=20
certain international locations will receive some other form of recognition=
. =20
Your local management and human resources representative will communicate=
=20
further details.

Visit home.enron.com for additional information.  There you can access a li=
st=20
of frequently asked questions regarding stock options.  And you can view a=
=20
special message from Ken Lay.  To access the special message, you must have=
=20
IP-TV and a sound card. If you are not able to view Ken=01,s message, a=20
transcript is available.  If you encounter any technical difficulties, plea=
se=20
contact your PC Help Desk.

Again, thank you for all you do to make Enron a successful global energy an=
d=20
broadband services company and a great place to work.=20

=20

FYI.  Michelle

Kate, here is the latest on Elektro.  Michelle

The 18-2-99 spreadsheet is the one you want to see.
	Enron International
	

FYI
Ap?s troca de informa??es com Edson Pavao da ENRON e J.P.Morgan, segue em 
anexo planilhas referente a composicao do Capital Social relativas a cada 
evento relevante na data da realiza??o dos mesmos:

31/12/98 - Posi??o no fechamento do balan?o, conforme informa??o da Veirano 
Advogados e Arthur Andersen.
18/01/99 - Posi??o para notas explicativas das DFs, p?s transferncia do ?controle Capital Votante.?29/01/99 - Posi??o p?s compra de a??es do CESPINVEST.?18/02/99 - Posi??o atual, a ser confirmada depois da liquida??o financeira do ?direito de preferncia da CESP em 12/03/99.

Favor atentar para o titulo de cada planilha no cabe?alho das mesmas, para 
n?o confundir nas respectivas datas de relat?rios.

Grato,

Mauro

 - Capital_ONE.xls

Thanks, Felicia.  The same information appeared in today's DLR.  Michelle

   

Thought you might find this article on gender wage gap and wage 
discrimination interesting.  "It's more about choices" has been my theory all 
along, nice to see a government employee (though not the DOL) confirm this!  

http://www.stls.frb.org/publications/re/2000/d/pages/economic-backgnd.html

Twanda, please get this on my calendar.  Michelle

Felecia Acevedo@ENRON
02/03/2000 03:25 PM
Drew Lynch has asked that I coordinate a project to determine if we have 
employees in the correct companies (for U.S. companies) and do we know the 
ownership structure of both domestic and foreign companies.  We will approach 
this in three phases as below:

Phase I - On our payroll system - do we have employees in the correct 
companies in EPC and do we know which ones are wholly owned by Enron;

Phase II - Not on our payroll but in the U.S. -  do we know who the employees 
are, what companies they work for and how our ownership is structured;  

Phase III - Not on our payroll and outside the U.S. - do we know who the 
employees are, what companies they work for and how our ownership is 
  structured.

I would like to schedule a meeting next Wednesday.  I will have some 
preliminary work completed and would like to review it at that time.  Christa 
Aguilar will be contacting each of you to coordinate a date and time.  If you 
are not able to attend I would like for you to send a representative.  Please 
call me at ext. 39815 is you have any questions.

Felecia

TWanda, please calendar and then make a file entitled "Employees in Right 
Company" and give to me on the date of the meeting.  Thanks a lot.  MHC

A meeting has been scheduled for Thursday, February 10th, from 10:00 a.m. to 
11:00 a.m. in conference room EB15C1.  Please confirm with me 
through e-mail or voice mail (3-5911) by Wednesday, February 9th.   Please 
see below for a brief description on the meeting from Felecia Acevedo.

Thank you,
Christa

Phase I - On our payroll system - do we have employees in the correct 
companies in EPC and do we know which ones are wholly owned by Enron;

Phase II - Not on our payroll but in the U.S. -  do we know who the employees 
are, what companies they work for and how our ownership is structured;  

Phase III - Not on our payroll and outside the U.S. - do we know who the 
employees are, what companies they work for and how our ownership is 
  structured.

 I will have some preliminary work completed and would like to review it at 
that time.  

Felecia

Attached is a memo that I am currently working on with Rick Johnson.  Please 
review and provide me with any comments.
Rick will be in the Houston office for the next two days.

Thanks

Twanda, could you please check to see if we have this?  Thanks.  Michelle

Angeline Poon
02/09/2000 08:51 PM
Hi Michelle

I'm not sure if the Employment Agreement matter with JG Hong has now been 
completed.   We do not seem to have a copy of the same in the file.  Could 
you fax a copy to me at (65) 734-2868?

thanks and regards
Angeline

Anita Fam
08/19/99 09:31 AM
Thanks for your note, Michelle.  

Yes, I think that we should put in your additional suggested language.

Regards,
Anita

TWanda, we need an amendment to this agreement.  Would you please do the 
form?  Thanks.  Michelle

Michelle,

The consultant we were talking about this morning is Dan Garbez.  We signed a 
6 month consulting agreement with him about 8 or 9  months ago.

Let me know if you have further questions.

Thanks.

John,

Would you confirm (via a new email that I can print for my files) you have 
had the conversations with Dan Bruce, etc. about Entelligence that I scripted 
for you in a prior email?

Thanks a lot.

Michelle

FYI.  Michelle

FMackin@aol.com on 01/24/2000 12:16:23 PM
Michelle,

While I think that "Enron" discourages entering into agreements for services
directly with non-employee contractors, there are times when a business
decision is made to do so on a very limited basis.  Aside from other legal
issues, one single issue that has received a lot of attention in recent years
is the issue addressed by the Microsoft case involving the question under
what circumstances are individuals designated as independent contractors
entitled to employee benefits provided by  an employer to its employees.

While we have amended the various employee benefit plans to address this
issue, another place where it can be effectively addressed is in the contract
for services.

Recently, I was involved with a project to develop provisions to be included
in such a service agreement with non-employee contractors who will not be
entitled to employee benefits.  I thought you might have an interest in this,
so I have attached the contract provisions that were developed for this
circumstance along with an analysis.

I wonder if there are other attorneys who design and draft such agreements
who would be interested in receiving this information?

Regards,

Pat

 - Benefit Waiver 1.doc

Ok, you told me nothing, so I am clueless as to what is creating the 
distress.  Maybe we can chat later.

We will not be in Austin in the next few months.  We are going to San Antonio 
the first weekend in March, as well as the first week in April.  The first 
trip is for a wedding between two friends of Trey from Rice MBA who are 
marrying each other.  The other is for the Enron law conference, which is 
Wed.-Friday.  We are not taking Cameron on either of those trips (party 
time!!), so we will be rushing back to Houston right afterwards.

I am working with Butch Hayes at F&J.  I haven't been too involved in the 
matter because it is not an Enron subsidiary, but from what I can tell, I 
like him.  Any additional insight, if necessary, would be great.

Too bad you weren't in Houston a couple of weeks ago.  But, it probably would 
have been a sad time for all of you, and it sounds like you don't really need 
that right now.  If you visit us, we promise to be cheerful and frivolous if 
you need it -- not that acting that way is too much of a chore for me.  Plus, 
Cameron acts like a 2-year-old, which is a delight.  He started at a new 
school a few weeks ago (The Post Oak School -- a Montessori school about a 
block from our house), and he is really coming into his own.  It is amazing 
how much my world has both grown and shrunk since he was born.  Little things 
like seeing a squirrel in the back yard have become major events (don't even 
get me started on helicopters).  On the other hand, I feel this enormous 
responsibility and desire to make sure that all is right with the world.  
Quite an awesome sense of obligation and discovery combined.  

Enough waxing philosophical.  I've got to get out of here at some point, so 
I'd better get back to work.

Later.  M

mstewart@bmoh.com on 02/15/2000 03:01:03 PM
Hi Michelle!
Thanks for your message and update.

Yes, January was a tough month, and I guess I got pretty distracted by it all.
Nothing has been resolved but I've gotten over the initial shock and sadness
for my brothers. We were pretty worried about Joe for a while there because
Myra is (was?) the love of his life and he is so vulnerable. I can't remember
how much I told you over the phone (?)

Good to hear from you! We haven't been to Houston in a long time and are due
for a visit. We almost came the weekend of Feb 5-6 because a group was getting
together to go to Jay's gravesite in honor of his Feb 10th birthday. (But work
kept me here that weekend.) Hopefully sometime soon I can get over there and
see you & Trey & Cameron. Any plans to come this way? I'd love to see you.

For V-Day, we went out to eat at the Hula Hut. I picked up my brother Ed from
the airport (he had been in Santa Fe with Joe for a long weekend - we are
taking turns) and Ed came with us for our nice "romantic" dinner. Later Rog
and I went for coffee and dessert as a special treat. We still have a great
time together just talking about stuff and catching up on the day's
happenings.

Hope all is going well with the investigation - it sounded like you were in
good hands with the Fulbright lawyer. (Who is it? - Brian Grieg? Butch Hayes?)
If I can be of any help in any way, please let me know - I would love to work
with you! But, truly, I would  like to just see you again - to catch up and 
have some
laughs! mms

>>> "Michelle.Cash@enron.com" 02/15/00 02:33PM >>>

Maria,

I got your voice mail a couple of weeks ago.  It sounded like you were a bit
on
the stressed out side.  I hope things have improved, and that you had a nice,
romantic Valentine's Day yesterday.  Trey and I went to the opera on Sat.
night
for our V-Day event.  We saw the Elixer of Love, which is a very light, cute,
happy-ending opera (no screeching).

I think we got the referrals taken care of on the Austin investigator issue.
Thanks for your input.

Take care, and I'll catch you later.

Michelle

                                                                              
                                                                              
                                                                              
                                                                              
                                                                              
                                                                              
                                                                              
                                                                              
                                                                              
                                                                              
                                                                              
                                                                              
                                                                              
                                                                              
                                                                              
                                                                              
                                                                              
                                                                              
                                   

Kate and Felicia -- that org chart was from me.  I thought there was an 
enclosure note.  Sorry!  Michelle

Kate Cole@ENRON
02/16/2000 09:06 AM
Felecia - Someone has sent me a copy of an org. chart showing employees for 
the subs. of The Protane Corporation.  I will enter these into the database.  
Please confirm that you have a copy or send your fax number to receive a 
copy.  Thanks Kate

Twanda, would you please make this a form entitled "Canada Release" and then 
draft one for John Gorman?  I'll fill in the blanks.  Thanks.  MHC

Dawn Doucet
02/16/2000 05:07 PM

Peter,

I learned yesterday for the first time about Project Canary, which involves 
the purchase of an asset that employs 400 employees and also has a unionized 
workforce.  I understand that we are in the second round, and that there is a 
deadline of 12/15.

Peter, we have discussed on numerous occasions the need for you to get me 
involved early whenever there are transactions involving personnel issues.  
You haven't involved me in this deal -- I learned about the fact that there 
are employees and unions from my clients in HR.  That makes me and the legal 
department look bad and also does not allow me to provide the best service 
for Enron.

Please provide me with information about this deal asap.  And, I repeat my 
request to get me involved earlier on future deals.

Thank you.

Michelle

David, FYI.  Let me know if you have any comments, which I will give to 
Dawn.   I'll review it and get back with Dawn. 

Dawn Doucet
02/17/2000 09:19 AM
Michelle, here is a first draft of a possible announcement re John Gorman. 

I am continuing to research the golf club status.....

Attached is a draft letter to Duke Energy re the above-referenced.

Yikes!!!!   I can understand your preoccupation with those issues out there.  
I am sure that you are all "talked out" about it, but if you need an 
empathetic ear, give me a buzz.  Talk to you later. 

Michelle

PS  I saw Julie Parraguirre last night, and she told me to say hello.  She is 
going to be teaching at the same school that Cameron attends! 

  

Great.  Our only plans are that we have tickets to the ballet on Saturday 
night.  If you want to attend, let me know, and we will get tickets.  It is 
Cleopatra -- a world premier -- and it should be entertaining.  I understand 
if you don't want to join us, though.  Ballet isn't for everyone.  Let me 
know.  Michelle

mstewart@bmoh.com on 02/25/2000 10:26:57 AM
Thanks - your timing is uncanny - I was just starting to consider a change.
Rog and I are looking forward to seeing you during the weekend of March 11-12.
I'll be in touch soon about our plans - mms

>>> "Michelle.Cash@enron.com" 02/24/00 10:30AM >>>

Maria,  Give me a call at your convenience.  I would like to find out if
you might be interested in something I recently heard about.  My office
number is 713-853-6401.  Talk to you soon.  Michelle

                                                                              
                                                                              
                                                                              
                                                                              
                                                                              
                                                                              
                                                                              
                                                                              
                                                                              
 

Twanda, please print this out and also print out the consulting services 
agreement form for my review with this.  Thanks.  MHC

FMackin@aol.com on 01/24/2000 12:16:23 PM
Michelle,

While I think that "Enron" discourages entering into agreements for services
directly with non-employee contractors, there are times when a business
decision is made to do so on a very limited basis.  Aside from other legal
issues, one single issue that has received a lot of attention in recent years
is the issue addressed by the Microsoft case involving the question under
what circumstances are individuals designated as independent contractors
entitled to employee benefits provided by  an employer to its employees.

While we have amended the various employee benefit plans to address this
issue, another place where it can be effectively addressed is in the contract
for services.

Recently, I was involved with a project to develop provisions to be included
in such a service agreement with non-employee contractors who will not be
entitled to employee benefits.  I thought you might have an interest in this,
so I have attached the contract provisions that were developed for this
circumstance along with an analysis.

I wonder if there are other attorneys who design and draft such agreements
who would be interested in receiving this information?

Regards,

Pat

 - Benefit Waiver 1.doc

Hello.  Do you think this should be included in our consulting agreement 
form?  Michelle

FMackin@aol.com on 01/24/2000 12:16:23 PM
Michelle,

While I think that "Enron" discourages entering into agreements for services
directly with non-employee contractors, there are times when a business
decision is made to do so on a very limited basis.  Aside from other legal
issues, one single issue that has received a lot of attention in recent years
is the issue addressed by the Microsoft case involving the question under
what circumstances are individuals designated as independent contractors
entitled to employee benefits provided by  an employer to its employees.

While we have amended the various employee benefit plans to address this
issue, another place where it can be effectively addressed is in the contract
for services.

Recently, I was involved with a project to develop provisions to be included
in such a service agreement with non-employee contractors who will not be
entitled to employee benefits.  I thought you might have an interest in this,
so I have attached the contract provisions that were developed for this
circumstance along with an analysis.

I wonder if there are other attorneys who design and draft such agreements
who would be interested in receiving this information?

Regards,

Pat

 - Benefit Waiver 1.doc

Twanda, would you please make this change to all forms?  Thank you.  Michelle

Courtney Rath@ENRON
03/09/2000 03:10 PM
Michelle,

We found another change for the employment agreement language.  The reference 
to the full name of the Admin Committee should read "the Administrative 
Committee of the Compensation and Management Development Committee of the 
Enron Corp. Board of Directors."  

Thanks,
Courtney

Twanda, please print all these.  Thanks.  Michelle

Michelle Cash asked that I forward copies of these documents to you.  I have
also forwarded copies to Gene Humphrey and Aaron Brown.  Please call me at
(713)758-4505 or Brian Bloom at (713) 758-2623 with any questions or
comments.

Dear Michelle,

 Attached are the latest drafts of the Enron Investment Partners
Company Incentive Plan (the "Plan") and the form Award Agreement Under the
Enron Investment Partners Company Incentive Plan.  To aid in your review, I
have also attached redlines of each document highlighting the changes since
the first drafts.  Please note the following points with respect to the
latest drafts:

(1) We need to know what state Enron Investment Partners Company is
incorporated in.

(2) We need a copy of the Enron Deferral Plan.

(3) We need to discuss Gene Humphrey's suggested revisions to Section
7.3(c) of the Plan.

 Once you have had a chance to review the drafts, please call me or
Brian Bloom to discuss your comments and questions.

Very truly yours,
Jeanne Wilson

PRIVILEGED AND CONFIDENTIAL:
Contains attorney-client communications
and/or attorney work product

 - Redline - Incentive Plan.DOC
 - Redline - Award Agreement.DOC
 - Word 2nd Draft Award Agreement for Enron Investment Partners Incentive 
Plan.DOC
 - Word 2nd Draft Enron Economic Development Corp. Incentive Plan.DOC

Drew,

At one point, we had mentioned the idea of having services agreements among 
Corp. and the various business units that are using shared services.  I think 
that these agreements should be put into place sooner rather than later as we 
begin to move towards shared services across the organization.

Let me know if you would like me to prepare the drafts of these agreements or 
revise agreements that currently are in existence (if there are none, then we 
really need to put some in place).

Thanks.

Michelle

Twanda, please save this as a form.  Thanks.  MHC
Philip Conn@ENRON
03/08/2000 01:15 PM
Michelle, 
Geynelle told me you wanted a sample performance document.  Attached is the 
requested information. 

Thanks for the info.  I just need simple, basic frames.  No decorations or 
anything.  That way, they can go anywhere, and aren't specific to a decor, 
theme, time of year, etc.  So, painted wood or black resin probably are the 
best.  I could use 5x7" the most.

Trey is going to get Playstation 2 once they become available, so you may 
want to find a game for the new machine.  Also, since it has a DVD player 
attached, he will need DVDs to play on it.  I already got him Being John 
Malkovich and the Grinch, but he has no others.

We are looking forward to your visit.  Trey, Cameron and I are going to the 
Nutcracker ballet on the 26th.  Do you and Marianne want to go?  I am sure 
that Kay would love to watch Madison, and I would think that we still could 
get tickets if you are interested.  Let me know.

See you later.

Michelle

BDCash@bth12.med.navy.mil (Cash, Brooks D.) on 11/28/2000 08:45:00 PM
Please respond to <BDCash@bth12.med.navy.mil>
We're getting Dad the dustbuster or keychain (unless you guys already have)
and Gretchen the placemats/guest towels and Span/Eng dictionary

Marianne wants some clarification on what kind of picture frames (wood/metal
(type) etc and coasters (whimsical, serious artsy, material) for your list.

I'm going to prob get Trey the Lyle CD and a playstation game. Maybe a Polo
shirt

Brooks

Would you let me know which you choose?  I may need some of them as a
backup!  Michelle

BDCash@bth12.med.navy.mil (Cash, Brooks D.) on 10/23/2000 10:47:10 AM

Please respond to <BDCash@bth12.med.navy.mil>

Thanks, that helps a lot. Looking forward to seeing you guys, too.

Hi, Brooks.

He wants the newest Lyle Lovett album -- the soundtrack to Dr. T and the
Women.  Also, he is getting a Playstation II from me for his birthday (they
don't come out until this week, so he doesn't have it yet), so you could
find him a game for the new system.  He has said that he wants a new clock
radio, with AM/FM (I don't think he wants CD/tape player on it), with
battery backup -- Sony would be best.  Also, he always wears short-sleeved
Polo shirts, size XL.  He prefers basics, in solid colors such as white (he
never can have enough of those), navy, khaki, or light blue.

Let me know if you need any other suggestions.

We are looking forward to your visit, especially Cameron.  He always is
talking about how Santa is going to bring presents for him and Madison!
Take care, and say "hi" to Marianne.

Michelle

BDCash@bth12.med.navy.mil (Cash, Brooks D.) on 10/20/2000 09:08:25 AM

Please respond to <BDCash@bth12.med.navy.mil>

Michelle,
     Can you give me any ideas regarding birthday and x-mas presents for
the man
who has everything?

Hope all is well there.

Brooks

Please print the email and the attachments.  Thanks.  MHC

Karen Buckley@ENRON
03/22/2000 02:10 PM
Hi Michelle

Attached are the three review forms that are being proposed for the mid-year 
reviews accross all business units.  The VP form remains unchanged from the 
end of year 99 review.  The other two forms have been created based on the VP 
format.    Can you please review and advise if there are any issues with this.

Secondly, can you advise on the issues, if any, on providing consolidated  
feedback to a VP PRC Committee group (i.e. 26 MD's) on all VP's we have in 
Enron.   There has been a request that we provide this to this group other 
than the direct supervisor.

Thirdly, is there any issues with us or a HR representative  inputting 
feedback into the PEP system in another language ie. spanish/portguese.

Many thanks,

Karen.

Pat, here are the draft plan documents.  Any comments would be appreciated.  
Michelle

Michelle Cash asked that I forward copies of these documents to you.  I have
also forwarded copies to Gene Humphrey and Aaron Brown.  Please call me at
(713)758-4505 or Brian Bloom at (713) 758-2623 with any questions or
comments.

Dear Michelle,

 Attached are the latest drafts of the Enron Investment Partners
Company Incentive Plan (the "Plan") and the form Award Agreement Under the
Enron Investment Partners Company Incentive Plan.  To aid in your review, I
have also attached redlines of each document highlighting the changes since
the first drafts.  Please note the following points with respect to the
latest drafts:

(1) We need to know what state Enron Investment Partners Company is
incorporated in.

(2) We need a copy of the Enron Deferral Plan.

(3) We need to discuss Gene Humphrey's suggested revisions to Section
7.3(c) of the Plan.

 Once you have had a chance to review the drafts, please call me or
Brian Bloom to discuss your comments and questions.

Very truly yours,
Jeanne Wilson

PRIVILEGED AND CONFIDENTIAL:
Contains attorney-client communications
and/or attorney work product

 - Redline - Incentive Plan.DOC
 - Redline - Award Agreement.DOC
 - Word 2nd Draft Award Agreement for Enron Investment Partners Incentive 
Plan.DOC
 - Word 2nd Draft Enron Economic Development Corp. Incentive Plan.DOC

Here it is.  Michelle

FMackin@aol.com on 03/23/2000 11:50:42 AM

Date:  March 23, 2000

Michelle, Carol Jewett called me this morning about including a provision i=
n
the long term incentive plan ("LTIP") being established for Enron Investmen=
t
Partners (old Enron Development Corp.) to permit deferral of payouts under
the Enron Corp. Deferral Plan.

I suggested to Carol that such a provision in the LTIP would not be
appropriate or sufficient; that the tail cannot wag the dog.  If such
deferrals are to be permitted, they would have to be authorized and made
under the provisions of the Enron Corp. Deferral Plan.  Also, there are som=
e
additional issues discussed below.

Any compensatory arrangement that by design or practice defers payment of t=
he
benefit until or beyond termination of an employee=01,s employment is consi=
dered
to be a "pension plan" under ERISA.

ERISA contains complex and challenging administrative, participation and
funding requirements  (which most employers want to avoid) for such non-tax
qualified pension plans.  The way to avoid these requirements is to design
such a compensatory program, such as a deferral plan, so that it is a "top
hat" plan which is exempt, not from ERISA, but from the more onerous
requirements.

For example, only employees who meet the "top hat" definition are permitted
to participate in the Enron Corp. Deferral Plan.  Enron Corp. is not willin=
g
to let all employees who participate in the LTIP make deferrals to the Enro=
n
Corp. Deferral Plan.  Any participant in the LTIP who wants to defer a payo=
ut
must first pass the screening test for top hat employees applied by Enron
Corp. Compensation and then make the deferral election on an approved form.
Also, any such employee must become an employee of Enron Corp. and then
reassigned or seconded to work for Enron Investment Partners.  This
employment requirement is to avoid multiple employer problems related to th=
e
Enron Corp. Deferral Plan and its related trust.

Michelle, it may be "better, faster, simpler" to include a deferral feature
in the LTIP.  The same ERISA issues are present, but Enron Investment
Partners is in control.

Regardless, let=01,s discuss the design for the deferrals at your convenien=
ce.

Pat

Twanda, please save under Japanese labor law memo and print for me.  Thanks.  
Michelle

Nony Flores
03/24/2000 11:56 AM
As per Alan's request, attached is the Baker & McKenzie memorandum dated 
April 1999, which provides an overview of the principal labor rules and 
standards required by Japanese law.

Thanks.
Nony Flores

  

John,

Do you have any comments on this letter?  Rick and I would like to send it 
out soon.  

Thanks.

Michelle

Michelle Cash
02/09/2000 10:41 AM
Sent by: Twanda Sweet
Attached is a memo that I am currently working on with Rick Johnson.  Please 
review and provide me with any comments.
Rick will be in the Houston office for the next two days.

Thanks

TWanda, please print and then save the attachment as HR Confidentiality 
/Non-Solicitation agreement -- print for my review and editing.  Thanks a 
lot.  MHC

Jo Ann Hill@ENRON
03/29/2000 06:47 PM
Thanks for the your input.   Please see my responses in BLUE and here is the 
electronic document:

Thanks.
Jo Ann

Michelle Cash@ECT
03/29/2000 01:59 PM
JoAnn,

I left you a voice mail responding to your voice mail containing these 
questions.  I wonder why you didn't get it?  Anyway, the responses are as 
follows:

1.  Thanks for getting it typed into the system.  I look forward to reviewing 
the document.  (I guess that explains why we couldn't find it in our system!!)
2.  New title is fine.  In fact, I am thinking that we should have anyone who 
works in HR sign off on this agreement.  What do you think?  That is the 
plan.  What I'd like to do is take this to the HR Council and have them 
assign a point person in each of their business units to coordinate getting 
this done for the current HR staff, in addition to all future additions to HR.
3.  It should go in PH file, with a copy to me for my files. This will be 
incorporated into the "Procedures".
4.  I have prepared a contractor agreement, which Derek Anderson has.  If you 
need a copy, let me know.  Yes I'd like this copy.  With so many contractors 
working in HR, I believe we need to also include them in this exercise.  
Please forward a copy and I'll include in the process.

Thanks. 

Michelle

Jo Ann Hill@ENRON
03/29/2000 01:56 PM
Michelle -- per my voice message I left the other day, there are still a few 
outstanding questions I need your feedback on relative to the subject 
document.

I have a hardcopy version which does not indicate a document number.  I am 
having our assistant put this into an electronic version and will forward to 
you for final signoff.
I have retitled the agreement from "Confidentiality Agreement" to "Human 
Resources Information Confidentiality Agreement".
When signed, where do you suggest the signed document be filed -- employees' 
Personnel History (PH) file?
The document is an agreement only between an "employee" and Enron.  What 
about all of the contractors working in HR?  Will they be required to sign a 
similar agreement or should this be covered in the master agreement with the 
vendor and/or individual consultant?

Thanks for your response.
Jo Ann

I spoke with Corporate Compensation yesterday (Kim Bolton) about the option 
of paying for stock options/phantom stock with proceeds from the EIP 
incentive plan.   She is working on obtaining approval for that provision.

Otherwise, I believe that we are ready to review a final version of the 
plan.  Jeanne, could you please circulate one?

I'll be in San Antonio for the law conference the rest of the week, but this 
process should not wait for me.  Once corporate comp gives it the ok, we 
should be ready to finalize it.

Michelle Cash

Attached is a letter to Sue Haynes and Samantha Ray re confidentiality.

Call me if you have any questions.  I hope this is better late than never!  
Michelle

Christa Winfrey
04/13/2000 01:20 PM
Michelle, 

Thank you very much for reviewing and returning the Termination Procedure 
that my group, ENA Competitive Analysis & Business Controls, has been working 
on.  Marissa Womble forwarded the edited procedure to me, and I will make the 
necessary changes to the document.  I truly appreciate your knowledge and 
legal expertise, especially in this matter.  Please note that Marissa Womble 
has rotated into a new group; therefore, please contact either Kristin Walsh 
(ext. 3-9510) or myself (ext. 3-9307) regarding any future policies and 
procedures.

Thank you,

Christa Winfrey

Elspeth, do we want to do a new agreement, or simply assume the obligations 
in the old one?  If the former, I'd do a new agreement.  If the latter, I 
believe I simply can do an assignment agreement, once I receive a copy of the 
current agreement.  It also depends on the language in the old one, and 
whether we believe it protects ENA.  So, we'd have to look at it.

Sharon, do you have the file on this person?  If so, let me know, and I will 
have someone come and pick it up.  Thanks.

Michelle

Elspeth Inglis@ENRON on 04/14/2000 04:56:09 PM
Michelle

when rolling over an employment contract from another  Enron entity is it 
re-issued with same details but under ENA's name? 

thanks Elspeth
David Oxley@ECT
13/04/2000 15:12
Mike will transfer to Delainey's new team (from CALME) effective April 24. He 
has an exec agreement which expires 12/31/01 which we will roll over. He will 
need RC chnaged effective above and also lets make sure he has a desk etc.,

Elspetrh please take lead on above (watch payroll in event the Soc Sec gets 
screwed up).

David

Here are details on one search firm for legal.  thanks.  mhc

Michelle Cash
11/07/2000 03:12 PM
Here is the name of the search firm.  Michelle
'
Tracie_Waligura@rwr.com on 11/07/2000 01:22:32 PM
Richard, Wayne and Roberts

Michelle - I have a corporate securities candidate that has expressed an
interest in Enron.  Please give me a call when you have a moment to discuss 
his
background and the corporate group at Enron.  Thanks.

Tracie Waligura
Legal Recruiter
24 Greenway Plaza, Suite  1304
Houston, Texas 77046
Toll:        800-364-7979  Ext. 7254
Direct:    713-358-7254
Fax:        713-623-2740
Email:    twaligura@rwr.com
Internet: http://www.rwr.com

Jeff,

What is the status of the document?  I expect that Jon will be calling me any 
day.

Thanks.

Michelle

Michelle Cash
01/10/2000 02:34 PM
Jeff, here is information from Jon Chapman.  Let's discuss when you have a 
chance to review it.  Michelle

Michelle,

Further to our discussion on Tuesday , I am very happy to proceed on the 
basis of Jeff Dodd's draft Agreement ( and draft Data Protection Policy) . 
Can you ask him to prepare a final version and let us have it , please. 

The EU "Data Exporter" entities are as follows:-

UK

Enron Europe Limited (also Italy )
Enron Power Operations Limited
Enron Teesside Operations Limited
Enron Direct Limited
Enron Engineering Services
Caxios Limited

Norway and Sweden

Germany

Enron Energie GmbH

Finland

Enron Finland Energy OY

Spain

Enron Espana Energia S.L.

Note that Norway is not a member of the EU but , as a member of the European 
Economic Area , should be treated as an EU member for these purposes.

I look forward to hearing from you.

Thanks.

Jon

Twanda, please save this in whatever power point directory you have.  Then, 
print for me to revise for a presentation to Energy Operations for Norma.  
Save this one, though, because the one I am going to use for Energy Ops will 
be much shorter, and this one has good stuff in it!  Thanks.  Michelle
Michelle:

The PowerPoint presentation that you requested.  Please delete any reference
to Sterling Bank, but otherwise, this is my personal work product and you
may use it.  Let me know if you need anything else on this topic.

In addition, I will let Anne Marie know the timing issue related to the
checks.

Also, let me know what your hear from Jack.  We are disappointed that he did
not come to our firm, but it does not surprise me.

Kerry E Notestine
Littler Mendelson, PC
1900 Chevron Tower
1301 McKinney Street
Houston, Texas 77010
713.652.4748
713.951.9212 (fax)
knotestine@littler.com
www.littler.com

 <<EMPLOYER PPT TRAINING FOR STERLING BANK.ppt>>

----
This email may contain confidential and privileged material for the sole use 
of the intended recipient(s). Any review, use, distribution or disclosure by 
others is strictly prohibited. If you are not the intended recipient (or 
authorized to receive for the recipient), please contact the sender by reply 
email and delete all copies of this message.

To reply to our email administrator directly, send an email to
postmaster@littler.com

Littler Mendelson, P.C.
http://www.littler.com

 - EMPLOYER PPT TRAINING FOR STERLING BANK.ppt

Kerry, thanks for this -- wow, is it long!  Michelle

FYI
Yes the two are the new policy and agreement; the "annotated" has not been
revised, but explains the point about Exhibit C to the Agreement.

Jeff, I assume that the two attachments are the revised policies.  If that
is not the case, let me know.  Thanks for your follow up.  Michelle

.

Wow. You should have received these awhile ago. We had a virus shutdown,
but
I cannot think of any other reason why you do not have these. Let me state
what I attempted to state in my last message:

     1) As to the Data Protection Agreements, we contemplate that an
Exhibit C will be attached that will describe the non-exclusive types of
information that will be personal data. For your information I am resending
the "annotated" version of this agreement to describe the significance of
the removal of brackets. We also added a section 3.g to allow additions to
the purposes for collection. As the regulators in the EU become more
refined
in their analysis and requirements as to the statement of purpose, you
might
need to alter purposes.

     2) As to the Policy itself, we inserted a line that dates the
revision of the policy, and we added a provision in Section 2 corresponding
to the change in Section 3.g mentioned above.

Please call me to let me know that you got this. Should I send something to
John?!

Jeff,

What is the status of the document?  I expect that Jon will be calling me
any
day.

Thanks.

Michelle

Michelle Cash
01/10/2000 02:34 PM

Jeff, here is information from Jon Chapman.  Let's discuss when you have a
chance to review it.  Michelle

Michelle,

Further to our discussion on Tuesday , I am very happy to proceed on the
basis
of Jeff Dodd's draft Agreement ( and draft Data Protection Policy) . Can
you
ask
him to prepare a final version and let us have it , please.

The EU "Data Exporter" entities are as follows:-

UK

Enron Europe Limited (also Italy )
Enron Power Operations Limited
Enron Teesside Operations Limited
Enron Direct Limited
Enron Engineering Services
Caxios Limited

Norway and Sweden

Germany

Enron Energie GmbH

Finland

Enron Finland Energy OY

Spain

Enron Espana Energia S.L.

Note that Norway is not a member of the EU but , as a member of the
European
Economic Area , should be treated as an EU member for these purposes.

I look forward to hearing from you.

Thanks.

Jon

(See attached file: #606521 v2 - ENRON unannotated Data Protection
Policy.doc)
(See attached file: #606631 v2 - data protection agreement-no
annotation.doc)
(See attached file: Annotated Agreement- Not revised since 12-1998.doc)

How is the research going on whether we can set up the plan the way we want 
to?  My understanding is that you were going to do some research for us.  
Thanks.  Michelle

Michelle,

 I am unclear as to what you are asking for below.  Vinson & Elkins
needs additional information before it will be possible to turn another
draft of the plan.  Specifically, I was under the impression that you were
going to review the second draft and give me additional comments.  Also, we
are researching whether the plan will qualify as a bonus plan (vs. a top hat
plan) and need to resolve that issue.  But most importantly, we cannot draft
a deferral provision for purchasing stock options or phantom stock
appreciation rights until we know the details of that provision will be
(such as whether you want it to tie in with an existing stock incentive plan
and the details of how you want it to work).  I am happy to redistribute a
copy of the March 16 draft to anyone you wish. Please call me if you wish to
discuss this.

 Best regards,
 Jeanne Wilson

I spoke with Corporate Compensation yesterday (Kim Bolton) about the option
of
paying for stock options/phantom stock with proceeds from the EIP incentive
plan.   She is working on obtaining approval for that provision.

Otherwise, I believe that we are ready to review a final version of the
plan.
Jeanne, could you please circulate one?

I'll be in San Antonio for the law conference the rest of the week, but this
process should not wait for me.  Once corporate comp gives it the ok, we
should
be ready to finalize it.

Michelle Cash

Attached is a revised copy of the Separation Agreement and Release for Mary 
Jane Brodsky.

Sylvia/Sharon:  I assume that copies will be provided to me and Kriste as 
well.   I would appreciate the opportunity to review them.  Thanks.  Michelle

Sylvia Martinez@ENRON
04/28/2000 04:05 PM
Sharon,
All the information is being gathered and should be on its way to you.  If 
you do not receive it by Monday, please give me a call and I will collect and 
hand walk it up to you.
Thanks so much for the response.
Sylvia

Sharon Butcher
04/27/2000 05:40 PM
Dear Sylvia: I would like to make sure that the terminology used to code 
Terminations is consistent with the terms and provisions of the applicable 
plans, e.g.,  stock plans and severance plans.  I would like to view the 
appropriate SAP screens or you may send me the terminology.  Thanks.  Sharon 

Sylvia Martinez
04/26/2000 05:39 PM
Sharon, Kristi, & Michelle,
I am currently involved in a task group that is reviewing processes for the 
Transaction Processing Center, SAP go live on 7/1.  The processes involve all 
aspects from hiring, transfers, position control and termination.  I wanted 
to drop a line to check with you to see if there were any current reviews 
that your group might be conducting at this time that would require updates 
or changes to the current state processing.  We want to be sure to capture 
all gaps (i.e.  specific terminology, forms, letters, contracts, etc.) are 
documented and resolved before go live.

We would greatly appreciate any feedback you could provide at this time.  
Also, if you are aware of any other groups that might need to be contacted 
that have a vested interest, we will gladly give them a call.

Thanks so much,
Sylvia

Rick, are you on this, or should I get on it?  Michelle

Before we put this together I need to confirm what confidentiality 
obligations we have with respect to PSE.  Do you have a copy of that 
agreement?  

I am copying Michelle and Rick, since they may have been involved in the 
earlier matter.

Dick Sandvik
05/01/2000 01:57 PM
We are pursuing an outsourcing opportunity with Puget Sound Energy.   Their 
field employees are represented by IBEW Local 77.  The Business Manager's 
name is David Timothy.

We'd like to put a confidentiality agreement in place with Local 77, so that 
we can share with them our response to Puget's Request for Information.  We 
all seem to recall that an Enron/IBEW agreement was prepared once before, 
either for Anaheim or West Oregon. As is typically the case, we can't seem to 
find a copy!

Can you help out?  If you can't find one, let me know and I'll describe the 
scope we need for local 77.

Thanks

Hi, Charla,

I have reviewed the additional fields you described.  Most of them look fine 
with me.  I do have some concerns with the questions about birthplace, 
citizenship, personal travel, and reason for return from prior assignment.  

The questions about birthplace/citizenship are the most risky.  As I have 
discussed with others, such questions could create issues of national origin 
discrimination, particularly if one's birthplace country is not evident from 
any other source.  It also could create a privacy issue if we are asking 
questions that are not job-related and consistent with business necessity.  
What is the purpose of this inquiry?  Are we trying to determine whether  a 
person is eligible to work in a particular country?  If so, it appears that 
birthplace and citizenship are not the answers that we need.  We already have 
a field on where a person is eligible to work, which would cover the 
situation where a person has citizenship in one country, but is on a work 
visa to another.   Any other information may not be necessary.

The question about reasons for returning from leave also could unearth 
information that we really don't want to keep on a system.  For example, if a 
person left because of health reasons, or the birth of a child . . . it 
really is not a job-related issue.  What is the purpose of this question?  Is 
there a less intrusive way to ask it?   

Finally, the question about countries visited for personal reasons also is 
asking information that is not job-related.  What is the purpose of that 
inquiry?  Is there another way to gather that information?

Let me stress that none of these inquiries is unlawful -- some of them may be 
unwise for the reasons I cited above.  If you would like to discuss this 
further, please give me a call.

Michelle

Charla Reese@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
05/02/2000 08:34 PM
Sharon / Michelle

As it has been approximately six weeks from my original request, could you 
please advise what timeframe we should expect this request to be completed?  
We would like to move forward with enhancements to GIS this quarter.  Please 
let me know if there is someone else I should be contacting - thank you!

Charla
x69675
Charla Reese
04/05/2000 11:46 AM
Just wanted to touch base with you to see if you had any questions re: the 
attached message and check on what timeline we should expect for legal 
approval.

Thanks!

Charla
x58293
Charla Reese
03/23/2000 10:43 AM
Michelle / Sharon

We would like to include the following fields in GIS to support our 
International Human Resources efforts.  Could you please review for global 
legality issues?  

Thank you!

Charla
x58293

Charla Reese
03/22/2000 10:06 AM
Kathy

As we move forward with enhancements to GIS, the International HR group would 
like to capture the following valuable information related to international 
skills sets:

Demographics
Birth Place (Country)
Current Residence (Country)
Citizenship (Country)
Passport (# / Issuing Country)

Mobility
Authorization to Work (Countries)
Travel Availability (% Domestic / % International)
Relocation Availability (Y/N)
Relocation Preferences (Countries)

Global Exposure
Countries Visited (Business vs. Leisure - Length of Visit)
Current International Assignee (Y/N)
Current Assignment Location 
Former International Assignee (Y/N)
Location and Length of Past Assignment(s)
Reason for Return (As Scheduled, Premature - Change in Business Strategy, 
Premature - Personal, Other)

Jane - is there anything you wish to add or change at this point?

Tim - I will run these by Mike to see what SAP can incorporate in the future 
(particularly Demographics).

Kathy - Please advise how you envision this process to work; it might be a 
good idea to discuss the various ways this information could be laid out - 
thanks!

Charla
x58293

I inadvertently forgot to "Reply to All" when I sent this response to 
Charla.  

Michelle
Michelle Cash
05/04/2000 10:41 AM
Hi, Charla,

I have reviewed the additional fields you described.  Most of them look fine 
with me.  I do have some concerns with the questions about birthplace, 
citizenship, personal travel, and reason for return from prior assignment.  

The questions about birthplace/citizenship are the most risky.  As I have 
discussed with others, such questions could create issues of national origin 
discrimination, particularly if one's birthplace country is not evident from 
any other source.  It also could create a privacy issue if we are asking 
questions that are not job-related and consistent with business necessity.  
What is the purpose of this inquiry?  Are we trying to determine whether  a 
person is eligible to work in a particular country?  If so, it appears that 
birthplace and citizenship are not the answers that we need.  We already have 
a field on where a person is eligible to work, which would cover the 
situation where a person has citizenship in one country, but is on a work 
visa to another.   Any other information may not be necessary.

The question about reasons for returning from leave also could unearth 
information that we really don't want to keep on a system.  For example, if a 
person left because of health reasons, or the birth of a child . . . it 
really is not a job-related issue.  What is the purpose of this question?  Is 
there a less intrusive way to ask it?   

Finally, the question about countries visited for personal reasons also is 
asking information that is not job-related.  What is the purpose of that 
inquiry?  Is there another way to gather that information?

Let me stress that none of these inquiries is unlawful -- some of them may be 
unwise for the reasons I cited above.  If you would like to discuss this 
further, please give me a call.

Michelle

Charla Reese@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
05/02/2000 08:34 PM
Sharon / Michelle

As it has been approximately six weeks from my original request, could you 
please advise what timeframe we should expect this request to be completed?  
We would like to move forward with enhancements to GIS this quarter.  Please 
let me know if there is someone else I should be contacting - thank you!

Charla
x69675
Charla Reese
04/05/2000 11:46 AM
Just wanted to touch base with you to see if you had any questions re: the 
attached message and check on what timeline we should expect for legal 
approval.

Thanks!

Charla
x58293
Charla Reese
03/23/2000 10:43 AM
Michelle / Sharon

We would like to include the following fields in GIS to support our 
International Human Resources efforts.  Could you please review for global 
legality issues?  

Thank you!

Charla
x58293

Charla Reese
03/22/2000 10:06 AM
Kathy

As we move forward with enhancements to GIS, the International HR group would 
like to capture the following valuable information related to international 
skills sets:

Demographics
Birth Place (Country)
Current Residence (Country)
Citizenship (Country)
Passport (# / Issuing Country)

Mobility
Authorization to Work (Countries)
Travel Availability (% Domestic / % International)
Relocation Availability (Y/N)
Relocation Preferences (Countries)

Global Exposure
Countries Visited (Business vs. Leisure - Length of Visit)
Current International Assignee (Y/N)
Current Assignment Location 
Former International Assignee (Y/N)
Location and Length of Past Assignment(s)
Reason for Return (As Scheduled, Premature - Change in Business Strategy, 
Premature - Personal, Other)

Jane - is there anything you wish to add or change at this point?

Tim - I will run these by Mike to see what SAP can incorporate in the future 
(particularly Demographics).

Kathy - Please advise how you envision this process to work; it might be a 
good idea to discuss the various ways this information could be laid out - 
thanks!

Charla
x58293

Kathy, here is Ann Park's due diligence template for Canada, which should be 
of use in Project Canary.  Michelle

Michelle Cash
08/01/2000 01:03 PM
t:  Please print for me.  Thanks a lot! Michelle
Ann Park@ENRON
08/01/2000 10:11 AM
Attached is my due diligence template for Canada.  Please feel free to use 
those parts of it you feel appropriate.  Michelle, if I do not hear back I 
will assume the deal team has decided to have the counsel handle this in my 
place.  Please be sure to let Patrick Wade know.  If I can be of any other 
assistance please let me know.

T:  Would you please print this and attached and file in BP amoco file?  
Thanks.  MHC

Bob, Glenn;  attached word doc provides our recommended responses to BP 
Amoco. 
Michelle indicates that we are requesting copies of collective bargaining / 
union agreements.  Please let me know if I can be of further assistance.  

                 Regards,  Rj                    

EI Security Admin@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
04/03/2000 06:15 PM
Attached are two different programs that have to be installed first to be 
able to open Ghost Files "*.gho".

1. Launch gexp12.exe to install Ghost Explorer v1.2 then
2. Launch Ghost60.exe, then go into the folder Ghost60 and launch 
Ghostexp.exe, ( you will need to unzip to c:\temp )
3. Then goto Start...Run and type:   \\eitxhou1f06\security or 
\\172.20.249.102\security   to access the secure location of users Ghost 
Files.
4. Double click the ghost file you want to access and the lastest version 
should work from then on from just going to the security folder and 
doubleclicking on the ghost file.

1.........2.......................
3................
4...............

If you have any problems or questions call Matt Ahern
x58825

Henry and Michelle your user ID's and Passwords will be sent to you in 
separate emails to access the EI-Houston Domain.

Jon, it was attached to the bottom of his prior email, which I will resend to 
you right now.  MHC

Jon Chapman
05/09/2000 08:21 AM
Thanks , Michelle - something appears to have gone wrong on his system . When 
can we expect something to review here ?

Thanks.

Jon

Michelle Cash
20/04/2000 20:44
FYI
Yes the two are the new policy and agreement; the "annotated" has not been
revised, but explains the point about Exhibit C to the Agreement.

Jeff, I assume that the two attachments are the revised policies.  If that
is not the case, let me know.  Thanks for your follow up.  Michelle

.

Wow. You should have received these awhile ago. We had a virus shutdown,
but
I cannot think of any other reason why you do not have these. Let me state
what I attempted to state in my last message:

     1) As to the Data Protection Agreements, we contemplate that an
Exhibit C will be attached that will describe the non-exclusive types of
information that will be personal data. For your information I am resending
the "annotated" version of this agreement to describe the significance of
the removal of brackets. We also added a section 3.g to allow additions to
the purposes for collection. As the regulators in the EU become more
refined
in their analysis and requirements as to the statement of purpose, you
might
need to alter purposes.

     2) As to the Policy itself, we inserted a line that dates the
revision of the policy, and we added a provision in Section 2 corresponding
to the change in Section 3.g mentioned above.

Please call me to let me know that you got this. Should I send something to
John?!

Jeff,

What is the status of the document?  I expect that Jon will be calling me
any
day.

Thanks.

Michelle

Michelle Cash
01/10/2000 02:34 PM

Jeff, here is information from Jon Chapman.  Let's discuss when you have a
chance to review it.  Michelle

Michelle,

Further to our discussion on Tuesday , I am very happy to proceed on the
basis
of Jeff Dodd's draft Agreement ( and draft Data Protection Policy) . Can
you
ask
him to prepare a final version and let us have it , please.

The EU "Data Exporter" entities are as follows:-

UK

Enron Europe Limited (also Italy )
Enron Power Operations Limited
Enron Teesside Operations Limited
Enron Direct Limited
Enron Engineering Services
Caxios Limited

Norway and Sweden

Germany

Enron Energie GmbH

Finland

Enron Finland Energy OY

Spain

Enron Espana Energia S.L.

Note that Norway is not a member of the EU but , as a member of the
European
Economic Area , should be treated as an EU member for these purposes.

I look forward to hearing from you.

Thanks.

Jon

(See attached file: #606521 v2 - ENRON unannotated Data Protection
Policy.doc)
(See attached file: #606631 v2 - data protection agreement-no
annotation.doc)
(See attached file: Annotated Agreement- Not revised since 12-1998.doc)

Any idea why they did this?  Michelle

Steve Hamilton informed me this morning that the Department of Labor called
him to postpone their investigation scheduled for Monday, May 15th.  They
said they would call again to reschedule later.  We are still proceeding
with our review and report, as are the auditors, and we hope to have our
report ready by the end of this week.  Please let me know if you have any
questions in the meantime.

/s/ Mark A. Cover
Vinson & Elkins L.L.P.
3700 Trammell Crow Center
2001 Ross Avenue
Dallas, Texas  75201
(214) 220-7869
(214) 999-7869 FAX
mcover@velaw.com

CONFIDENTIALITY NOTICE: The information contained in this e-mail may be
confidential and/or privileged.  This e-mail is intended to be reviewed
initially only by the individual named above.  If you are not the intended
recipient or a representative thereof, or if you believe you have received
this e-mail in error, you are hereby notified that any review, dissemination
or copying of this e-mail or the information it contains is prohibited.  If
you have received this e-mail in error, please immediately notify the
sender.  Thank you.

 - C.DTF

That was sent to you by messenger.  Getting it notarized may take a long time 
-- is it necessary?  Michelle

FYI.  Please let me know how I shold respond.  Thanks.
Linda

Linda -

Please let me know when we can expect to see the fully executed settlement
agreement and the papers showing that the suit has been dismissed.

Thank you for your continued cooperation.

Thomas F. Fine
Assistant General Counsel
ET 10A-K
865-632-2061; 865-632-6718 (fax)
tffine@tva.gov 

Twanda, would you please print this for me?  Thanks.  MHC--my printer is not 
working (or maybe I haven't selected my local printer correctly)  

	David Oxley
	05/12/2000 07:27 AM
		 
- Milnthorp's draft is in his hands
- Clemmons final has been sent
- Lemmons is with him
- Brown has been sent to him

David

FYI.  Here is most of the information.  Michelle

	Bryce Baxter
	05/12/2000 07:49 AM
		 
	

Michelle, as I mentioned in my voice mail to you, I would like to use 
contractors from the two firms listed below.  Both of these firms have 
contractors available now, so as soon as we get these agreements in place we 
can bring them in and put them to work.  If possible, I'd like any agreement 
we put in place to be flexible enough to allow us to use other contractors in 
the future besides those we currently have identified.  If you need me to do 
anything else or if you are not the right person to talk to, please let me 
know.  Thanks.

AccountSource International
Contact:   Pam White, Partner
Phone:   713-629-9200
Address:   770 S. Post Oak Lane
  Suite 325
  Houston, TX  77056
Email Address: plw@account-source.com
Fax:  713-629-0101

Enterprise Services Company
Contact:   Rebecca Soots, Manager
Phone:  713-219-4234
Address: 6671 Southwest Frwy
  Houston, TX  77074
Email Address: Rpsoots@esc-hdq.com
Fax:  713.270.7195

Twanda, could you please start Consulting Services AGreements for these 
entities?  I have asked Norma to get the rest of the information.

Thanks.  MHC

	Bryce Baxter
	05/12/2000 07:49 AM
		 
	

Michelle, as I mentioned in my voice mail to you, I would like to use 
contractors from the two firms listed below.  Both of these firms have 
contractors available now, so as soon as we get these agreements in place we 
can bring them in and put them to work.  If possible, I'd like any agreement 
we put in place to be flexible enough to allow us to use other contractors in 
the future besides those we currently have identified.  If you need me to do 
anything else or if you are not the right person to talk to, please let me 
know.  Thanks.

AccountSource International
Contact:   Pam White, Partner
Phone:   713-629-9200
Address:   770 S. Post Oak Lane
  Suite 325
  Houston, TX  77056
Email Address: plw@account-source.com
Fax:  713-629-0101

Enterprise Services Company
Contact:   Rebecca Soots, Manager
Phone:  713-219-4234
Address: 6671 Southwest Frwy
  Houston, TX  77074
Email Address: Rpsoots@esc-hdq.com
Fax:  713.270.7195

Mark, 

Do we need to say something about the fact that V&E is representing Ecogas 
and not the plan to ensure protection of the privilege?  MHC

	"Cover, Mark" <mcover@velaw.com>
	05/10/2000 03:34 PM
		 
Steve,

Here is some proposed language for your memo or e-mail to employees, per
your concerns:
==============
Recently, you may have noticed some activity or heard some rumors regarding
the Ecogas 401(k) plan.  Let me assure you that the plan is sound, and that
the assets of the plan are safely held in trust with Merrill Lynch.  The
activity you may have noticed or the rumors you may have heard likely come
from the fact that Ecogas has been contacted by the Department of Labor for
a routine investigation of the plan.  In connection with that investigation,
Ecogas has hired the law firm of Vinson & Elkins, who has visited our
offices, to conduct a review and to make recommendations for improvement and
for corrective action.  I cannot stress enough that Ecogas stands behind the
401(k) plan and is committed to making the necessary improvements and
corrections.  I know you will join me in welcoming this opportunity to make
our plan better.
===============

/s/ Mark A. Cover
Vinson & Elkins L.L.P.
3700 Trammell Crow Center
2001 Ross Avenue
Dallas, Texas  75201
(214) 220-7869
(214) 999-7869 FAX
mcover@velaw.com

CONFIDENTIALITY NOTICE: The information contained in this e-mail may be
confidential and/or privileged.  This e-mail is intended to be reviewed
initially only by the individual named above.  If you are not the intended
recipient or a representative thereof, or if you believe you have received
this e-mail in error, you are hereby notified that any review, dissemination
or copying of this e-mail or the information it contains is prohibited.  If
you have received this e-mail in error, please immediately notify the
sender.  Thank you.

 - C.DTF

I sent Milnthorp and Lemmons to you.  I sent Brown to Tara Rozen in London.  
Clemmons final will go today. 

Do we need to talk about Josey and Thompson? 

Michelle

	David Oxley
	05/12/2000 07:27 AM
		 
- Milnthorp's draft is in his hands
- Clemmons final has been sent
- Lemmons is with him
- Brown has been sent to him

David

Tim, was it accepted by the court?  Michelle

Michelle,

 Today, I faxed you a copy of the Plaintiff's Second Amended
Complaint.  I am in the process of creating Enron's answer based on my
conversations with McClellan, Reck, McQuade.  I need to ask you a couple of
questions regarding the answer;  Please call me at your earliest possible
convenience.

Tim C. Carrico
Spilman Thomas & Battle, PLLC
email: tcarrico@spilmanlaw.com
phone:             (304)-340-3856
cell phone:       (304)-549-2681
fax:                  (304)-340-3801
address:           300 Kanawha Blvd., East
                       Charleston, W.Va. 25301

Tara, perhaps the Brown contract should have gone to Melissa instead of you 
-- sorry.  Could you please let me know if I need to re-route or do anything 
else on that agreement?  Oxley is anxious for it to get to him.  thanks.  
Michelle

	David Oxley
	05/10/2000 07:27 PM
		 
Spoke with him about his contract on Monday. We agreed following changes and 
he would sign;

1 - Should read Michael L Brown throughout
2 - He would us to have Mark F send him a note (separately) that says why we 
will rank him as a VP he can continue to use the MD title externally and 
maintain any related travel perq's associated with that.
3 - We should change cash sign-on to 12 months pay back.

 Can you get him final asap. Also Kim/Mel lets draft email for Mark F.

David

Welcome to the heat!!! 

If you would re-send your resume to me, I'll re-send it to my contacts here 
in town and let them know that you now are available.  I think I may have a 
firm that could use your skills!  

Michelle

	"Emma Caplan" <emmacaplan@bootsnall.net>
	05/12/2000 10:45 AM
		 
Hi Michelle

I hope that you are well. Just to update you, I am now based in Houston 
permanently.

I am still following up the leads you kindly provided me with. However I 
would be grateful if you would consider me for any suitable future positions 
which you become aware of.

Many thanks for your continuing assistance.

Emma Caplan
--
_______________________________________________________________________
The Ultimate Resource for the Independent Traveller
http://www.BootsnAll.com

powered by OutBlaze

Looks good to me, although I will have a new fax number soon.  I will ask 
Twanda to send it to you once I know what it is.  Michelle

	LaVerne Essoufi@ENRON
	05/12/2000 10:49 AM
		 
Please make the necessary corrections to following attachment to help update 
our current phone list.

Thanks,
LaVerne

TWanda, would you please call them? Thanks.  MHC

	Michael Freel@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	05/12/2000 01:49 PM
		 
Michelle,

Roberto and I would like to meet with for 30 minutes sometime next week.  
Please let us know if and when you are available.

Thanks,
Michael Freel
Information Risk Management  

Valeria,

I will be out of town that day and cannot attend.  I will provide feedback 
via the feedback forms.  

Michelle

	Valeria A Hope
	05/11/2000 05:08 PM
		 
The ENA HR Performance Review Meeting has been scheduled for Tuesday, May 
23rd beginning at 8am at a location to be determined later.  This will be a 
final review of employees below manager level and a prereview meeting for 
managers, directors and sr. directors.  

The meeting will begin at  8am with a review of clerks, jr. professional, and 
sr. professional employees.    Feel free to invite other managers and 
directors on your team to participate in this meeting.

 In preparation for this meeting the following needs to happen asap (note 
that the PEP system opens Monday, May 15):

1.  Employees in your group need to suggest their reviewers using the PEP 
system and provide you a summary of their accomplishments/status of 
objectives.
2.  You need to approve the reviewers and request feedback from the reviewers 
using the PEP system. 
3.  A preliminary evaluation should be completed for each of your employees.

 Call me if you have questions about this process.

Valeria

FYI

	Linda J Noske
	05/12/2000 03:33 PM
		 
Please reserve the following dates on your calendar for the ENA Legal 
Conference that will be held at the Woodlands Resort and Conference Center 
this year:

     October 5 & 6, 2000
Details to follow at a later date.

Twanda, here is more information about the project for Baxter.  Michelle

	Bryce Baxter
	05/12/2000 04:44 PM
		
The bill rate with Enterprise Services for Lloyd Lee is $37.50/hour.  Thanks.

   
	
	

Data for AccountSource:

Name:   Lydia T. Bolanos
Bill Rate:  $48/hour
Job Desc:  Reconciliation of general ledger and subledger account balances.  
Includes A/R reconciliation and A/P reconciliation work to prepare for    SAP 
implementation.
Length of Assign: 3 Months anticipated, with a possibility of going longer

Data for Enterprise Services Co.

Name:   Lloyd A. Lee
Bill Rate:  ?? - waiting to hear from Rebecca Soots on exact rate
Job Desc:  Reconciliation of general ledger and subledger account balances.  
Includes A/R reconciliation and A/P reconciliation work to prepare for    SAP 
implementation.
Length of Assign: 3 Months anticipated, with a possibility of going longer

Norma is researching how we should handle the contingency of hiring.  I'll 
get you the rate and contingency info as soon as I get it.  Thanks again for 
your help!

	
	

	

Michelle, as I mentioned in my voice mail to you, I would like to use 
contractors from the two firms listed below.  Both of these firms have 
contractors available now, so as soon as we get these agreements in place we 
can bring them in and put them to work.  If possible, I'd like any agreement 
we put in place to be flexible enough to allow us to use other contractors in 
the future besides those we currently have identified.  If you need me to do 
anything else or if you are not the right person to talk to, please let me 
know.  Thanks.

AccountSource International
Contact:   Pam White, Partner
Phone:   713-629-9200
Address:   770 S. Post Oak Lane
  Suite 325
  Houston, TX  77056
Email Address: plw@account-source.com
Fax:  713-629-0101

Enterprise Services Company
Contact:   Rebecca Soots, Manager
Phone:  713-219-4234
Address: 6671 Southwest Frwy
  Houston, TX  77074
Email Address: Rpsoots@esc-hdq.com
Fax:  713.270.7195

Twanda,

could you please print these attachments in color?  Thanks.  MHC

	Sheila Walton
	05/12/2000 09:04 PM
		 
	

Please review the attached requested changes in the employment agreement for 
Barbara Paige.  Let me know if we can add these changes or if we need to meet 
and discuss.  Thank you.

   

Bryce,

I am not comfortable with bringing someone in without an agreement.  I should 
have a draft to you this afternoon at the latest, so it should not be a 
problem for the person to start tomorrow.  I will ask my assistant, Twanda, 
to send you the confidentiality agreement that we require all contract 
personnel to sign so that you can get it to the person for signature today.

Michelle

	Bryce Baxter
	05/15/2000 08:40 AM
		 
Do you have any concerns/issues with Rebecca's proposal below to start the 
contractor without the formal contract in place?
Hi Bryce,

In discussing the difficulties in getting this contract in place to meet
both your needs and Mr. Lloyds, it was brought to my attention that since we
have already established a good working relationship with Enron that we
would not have a problem allowing Mr. Lloyd to begin working without an
official contract in place.  I do not know how your management would feel
about a letter of proposal, which would serve as a temporary work
authorization until the final contract is in place but it is something that
ESC is willing to do.  Assuming Ms. Cash is able to pull together the Master
Service Agreement by Monday and everything is agreeable to ESC then it
obviously would not be necessary to implement a temporary work
authorization.  However, should we run into further obstacles, I wanted to
share with you this possible opportunity.

One of the things that I wanted to discuss with you is your remaining
staffing requirements.  I am not sure I have a clear picture of the exact
skills you are looking for and would like to avoid sending you resumes which
do meet your needs.  Also, how many candidates are you looking to bring on?

I look forward to hearing from you, hopefully we'll be luckier with the
phones next week...

Thank You,

Rebecca P. Soots
Manager
Enterprise Services Company
713.219.4234
Rpsoots@esc-hdq.com
Fax - 713.270.7195

Pete,

I learned today of a deal involving a newsprint plant in New Jersey, which 
you are running from the legal side.

Are there any issues involving personnel or labor involved in this deal?  If 
so, I would appreciate your getting me in the loop as early as possible.

Thanks.

Michelle

I've asked them for dates, and I've got them from 2 of them.  Let me bug them 
again early next week.  Tell him to chill out -- his client's deposition has 
been scheduled and rescheduled too many times to count.  

Michelle,

 Clonch's deposition is going to take place this Sunday at Spilman
Thomas & Battle at 9:00 a.m.  I will provide you with a transcript upon
receipt.  Additionally,  counsel for Clonch continues to call me and write
me letters for Deposition dates for Enron officials.  They have provided me
with the following dates on which they will be available in a letter dated
11/27/00:

Jan 3-5
Jan 8-12
Jan 22-26

Tim C. Carrico
Spilman Thomas & Battle, PLLC
email: tcarrico@spilmanlaw.com
phone:             (304)-340-3856
cell phone:       (304)-549-2681
fax:                  (304)-340-3801
address:           300 Kanawha Blvd., East
                       Charleston, W.Va. 25301

FYI, I just learned that Jeff Golden is going to work for EES.  Michelle

Twanda, I will have inserts to the two agreements for Bryce Baxter from this 
document.  Michelle

	Margo Terrell
	05/15/2000 10:04 AM
		 
Per our conversation, attached is the document that includes the liquidation 
language.  Please let me know if you change it.  Thanks!

Twanda, would you please print this for me?  I will need to have it 
executed.  Thanks.  MHC
	Angeline Poon
	05/08/2000 03:02 AM
		 
Hi Michelle

Please let us know when we may expect to receive a copy of the duly executed 
Secondment Agreement for our file.

Regards
Angeline

Matthias Lee
03/05/2000 18:50
Sent by: Angeline Poon
Hi Michelle

We have now finalised the Secondment Agreement with Kim & Chang, and the soft 
copy is attached for your further action.   Please let us have a fully 
executed copy for our file thereafter.

Thanks and regards
Angeline

Michelle Cash
28/02/2000 23:08
Matt,

I am aware that an agreement was contemplated.  I did not prepare one, 
however.  I worked only on the employment agreement.  You might check with 
Sharon Butcher to see whether she has one.

If we need to put one in place, it can be done rather easily.

Michelle

Matthias Lee
02/28/2000 01:44 AM
Dear Michelle and Fran

I understand from my file and from speaking with Anita Fam that you were to 
have a Secondment Agreement for Mr JG Hong and Ms Kim JA put in place between 
Enron Overseas Services Corp ("EOSC" previously known as "OPC Ltd") and Enron 
Capital & Trade Resources Korea Corp. ("ECTRKC", a Delaware corporation). 
This dates back to on or about January 1999, but I don't have a copy of the 
executed Secondment Agreement on file. Please let me have a copy as we may 
potentially have to present a copy to the Korean tax authorities as evidence 
of Mr JG Hong and Ms Kim JA's employment/secondment structure.

There are some tax related issues that have arisen in Enron Korea that I'm 
assisting Lim Tiong Hock to resolve and your early response would be most 
appreciated.

Thanks and regards

Matt 

Talk with Mary McKendrey (may be spelled wrong), or Pam Butler in corporate 
comp.

	Trey Cash@ENRON
	05/15/2000 02:52 PM
		 
Can you remind me who handles the AESOP information -- I will be passing the 
name on to Peggy Determeyer, as noted below.

L, T
Peggy Determeyer
05/15/2000 01:45 PM
Do you have the name and phone number of the person who handles the options?  
I checked my statement, and no options were credited for yearend 1999.

Thanks,
Peggy

Right now, I am .  This meeting may take more than an hour, though.  
Michelle  PS, I think Pat Mackin should be included in this, if he is not 
already.  MHC

	Diana Gutierrez@ENRON
	05/15/2000 11:03 AM
		 
Are you available to meet to discuss the referenced meeting on Wednesday, May 
17th at 1:00 PM CST?

Thanks,
Diana

Linda, I haven't looked at the pleading, but it should be fine if it is 
simply a nonsuit with prejudice.  Thanks for your help on this.  MHC

	"Linda Broocks" <lbroocks@ogwb.com>
	05/15/2000 05:00 PM
	Please respond to lbroocks
		 
Here are the draft motion for nonsuit and order for nonsuit with prejudice.
(As you will recall, Tom specifically requested that the nonsuit be with
prejudice).  If you approve, I will file these tomorrow and bring this
matter to a conclusion.
Thanks for you attention.
Linda
P.S.  I will be in the office all day tomorrow and can discuss the JAMS/AAA
issue at your convenience.

 - MtnNonSuit&.Order.wpd

Here is the thing I have edited.

Michelle
	Sherry Lessner@ENRON
	05/12/2000 06:07 PM
		
Thanks, Sharon.  The GIS version just adds a view words from the employment 
application alerting employees not to 'overstate' their education, skills, 
experience, etc.

Sharon Butcher
05/12/2000 06:00 PM
Dear Sherry:  I provided the SAP version which is similar to the one on the 
Corporate LAN.  I will have Mark Holsworth and Kriste Sullivan provide their 
comments.  Thanks.   Sharon

Sherry Lessner
05/12/2000 05:52 PM
We are working on a single logon process through HR On-Line that will enable 
employees to utilize functionality in SAP Employee Self Service and HR-GIS 
without having to be concerned about which system to use.  I am attaching the 
security warning messages from both systems for your review.  Andrea and I 
believe it would be best to combine these statements and would appreciate 
your assistance in doing so.  Michelle, as you will recall, you helped us 
with the statement for HR-GIS.  I do not know who provided the SAP version, 
but it seems more similar to the general one on the Corporate LAN.

Please let me know if one of you can assist us with this.  We are under a 
pretty tight time crunch with July 1 looming fairly closely.  Thank you for 
your consideration and help!

test

not yet.  mhc

	Pam Butler@ENRON
	05/16/2000 02:12 PM
		 
Any documents available from V&E for my review yet? Thanks.

Pam

MHC

	"Butch Hayes" <shayes@fulbright.com>
	05/16/2000 06:56 PM
		 
     My secretary found the following info, and made a tentative
reservation for you:
     Ameri-suites (512) 231 8491
     3612 Tudor Blvd
     Austin, Tx 78759
     King - no smoking - $129.00/night
     Confirmation # P21301-00

     Directions:  183 North to Capital of Tx Highway
                         Right on Cap of Tex
                         Right on Stone Lake
                         Left on Tudor
                         Hotel on Left

Thank you.
Butch Hayes
Fulbright & Jaworski L.L.P.
(512) 320-4564
shayes@fulbright.com

Jim,

Thanks for trying to call.  I am not surprised by this outcome.   I guess 
wer're bargaining!

Michelle

Wow, this is a shock.  I tried to reach each of you by phone this afternoon.

I suggest we discuss this Monday morning either before or during a
conference call with the Strategy Group.

The EcoElectrica elections held today was won by the United Steelworkers of
America Union with the following results:

UNION--------- 22 VOTES
COMPANY--- 14 vOTES

One employee did not show-up due to sickness.

THIS OUTCOME WAS A TOTAL SURPRISE FOR ME AND THE REST OF THE STAFF.

VICTOR

----
This email may contain confidential and privileged material for the sole use 
of the intended recipient(s). Any review, use, distribution or disclosure by 
others is strictly prohibited. If you are not the intended recipient (or 
authorized to receive for the recipient), please contact the sender by reply 
email and delete all copies of this message.

To reply to our email administrator directly, send an email to
postmaster@littler.com

Littler Mendelson, P.C.
http://www.littler.com

Twanda, would you please print this and attachment?  THX----- Forwarded by 
Michelle Cash/HOU/ECT on 05/18/2000 09:07 AM -----

	Pam Butler@ENRON
	04/06/2000 07:39 PM
		
Felecia, thanks so much for the listing of companies whose employees are paid 
directly by Enron which includes legal name, % ownership, employee count, 
etc.  Great work and excellent due diligence.  As we discussed, you are in 
the process of researching and documenting the same information for the 
non-payroll companies which of course is critical for completing our due 
diligence with respect to the new AESOP.

In order to get this information for determining AESOP participation, and as 
we dscussed today, we are asking the HR leadership team to work with their 
business units to provide us with all non-payroll company names (to provide 
legal name, if different), % ownership, whether or not the company is part of 
Enron's consolidated reporting group (if not, why) and number of employees.  
They will also give us a "yes" or "no" at this time as to whether their 
Business Unit Head wishes for the company to participate in AESOP.  We are 
asking them to forward this file to you, as we discussed, to assist you with 
data collection.  We would ask that you coordinate the necessary Legal review 
of ownership levels with Michelle Cash.  We will facilitate with Johnna Young 
a review of whether we will have any accounting issues with granting options 
to employees of each respective company.    We have a tight turnaround, of 
course, as outlined in today's meeting, but hopefully we have good game plan 
to get us to where we need to be.  

Note to Johnna:  Johnna, attached please see Felicia's file on domestic for 
your initial review.

Thanks again, Felecia, for your help.

Pam

Felecia Acevedo
04/05/2000 10:59 AM
Pam,

Here is the file 

I got this email.  My address is Michelle.Cash@enron.com. 

We're going to San Antonio tomorrow and then to Austin for a few days.  It 
will be nice to get away.  

See ya! 

Michelle

	"Brian Hoogendam" <Brian_Hoogendam@computerhorizons.com>
	05/18/2000 08:42 AM
		 
is this your correct email address? if not, some nabe is getting a mail from 
the
wrong person....heh, heh...let me know..later..Brian

Twanda, would you please print this and also the attachment -- with the 
notes?  Thanks.  MHC

	Jane Allen
	05/02/2000 08:47 AM
		 
I have prepared the attached and forwarded to Drew Lynch.  I am meeting with 
him today.  From my understanding, he agrees with the attached, so we can 
move forward with the payback letter.  Can you assist?

Thanks,

Jane

I agree but there is still no policy in place.  We need to develop a 
mechanism for charging the green cards as well.  Can you assist me with 
drafting something that I can get the individuals to sign?  We currently have 
about 25 in process.

Thanks,

Jane

Michelle Cash
03/13/2000 03:34 PM
Jane,

When the Green Card Task Force was alive, we discussed a payback provision if 
the person left within two years after receiving a green card (voluntarily).  
Is this being done?  If not, I think we should talk about it, given all the 
time, energy, resources, funds, etc., being expended on getting a person a 
green card.

Michelle

Hi, Kelly,

Yes, I probably am the person to contact on this.  In fact, I am getting 
ready to circulate a draft data protection policy that would put Enron in 
compliance with EU directives.  Look for it in the next few days!

Michelle

	Kelly Noel Higgason@ENRON
	05/19/2000 03:13 PM
		 
Michelle:
 It occurred to me as I sent the message below to Michael Brown that you may 
be the lawyer I need to coordinate with.  Is that true?
Kelly Noel Higgason
05/19/2000 03:11 PM
Michael:
 Please see message below in which Christopher Millard of Clifford Chance 
indicates that a project that CC is working on with Enron Europe may involve 
subscription to the Nextlaw subscription service.  Sharon Butcher and I are 
working on a project for Enron Corp. HR that requires research on data 
protection laws in the various countries in which Enron has employees.  It is 
likely that we will subscribe to Clifford Chance's Nextlaw service, a 
database of data protection legislation in various countries.  One of the 
advantages of Nextlaw is that it is a more cost-effective approach than 
engaging local counsel in each jurisdiction to provide the legal research, 
and subscribers are entitled to quarterly updates of the information on the 
database during the annual subscription period.  At the end of my message to 
Christopher, please see the list of countries that we need information 
about.  My guess is that any of the jurisdictions you need are covered.  If 
so, I would propose to Christopher that if (as I anticipate) Enron Corp. 
subscribes to Nextlaw for the project Sharon and I are working on, Enron 
Europe should be entitled to access and use the information for the other 
project Christopher references.  We certainly don't want Enron to pay for the 
subscription service twice! Please tell me which lawyer in your group I 
should include in discussions.  Thanks
Christopher.Millard@CliffordChance.com on 05/19/2000 01:55:23 PM
Kelly

Very good to hear from you after all this time. Enron's subscription to
NextLaw has indeed expired, though we are starting to do some data
protection work with Enron Europe and were planning to show them NextLaw
soon as we believe it would be very useful to them. In the meantime, I would
be pleased to talk with you and Sharon on Monday at 09.00 Houston time about
how we might assist you with your new project.

We have indeed expanded the coverage of our NextLaw service over the last
few months. Of the 29 jurisdictions you list below, 17 are now covered by
NextLaw. Don't quote me on this but, to my knowledge, of the remaining 12
only Columbia has a data protection law which is currently in force and
Canada has a new law which is not yet in force.

I am copying this to my colleague Ben Ebdon in our Clifford Chance Online
group in the hope that he will be able to join us on the call on Monday.

In the meantime, I hope you have a good weekend.

Best regards
Christopher
___________________________________________

Christopher Millard, Clifford Chance
Limited Liability Partnership
200 Aldersgate Street, London, EC1A 4JJ, England
Voice: +44 20 7956 0023 / Fax: +44 20 7600 5555
Email: christopher.millard@cliffordchance.com
___________________________________________

Christopher:
     You may remember me from our conversations about 18 months ago, which
resulted in Enron subscribing to Clifford Chance's Nextlaw subscription
service.  Enron's annual subscription lasped several months ago, but we are
in need of similar services again for a different HR project.  Enron senior
management has tasked the HR department with the creation of an internal
"expert directory" with which all Enron employees can identify other Enron
employees who have specific skills (such as language capabilities,
experience with particular kinds of projects, political contacts, etc.)
that may be useful for new intiatives.  As you can imagine, the data that
must be collected from all Enron employees worldwide is significantly more
complex than the information we were gathering from international employees
when we engaged your firm previously.  We would now like legal advice about
what consents must be obtained from employees in various foreign
jurisdictions in order to collect and publish the information, whether
certain information gathered must be requested on a voluntary basis (and
conversely, what information we can require that employees provide), etc.
[Please note that all information to be requested will be collected for
business purposes (our internal legal department has already informed HR
and management that certain information about personal interests, hobbies,
and non-professional memberships should not be collected or asked for.)]

     I am hopeful that in the time since we last spoke, your firm has added
additional jurisdictions to the subscription service, since many of the
countries in which we have employees were not on the database in early
1999.  I will list the jurisdictions that are relevant for this project at
the end of this message; however, in certain jurisdictions, Enron has only
a few employees, and we may elect not to include those employees in the
expert directory if we determine that the cost of the legal research for
that jurisdiction is not justified by the benefit to Enron.  I am also
wondering whether the information included in the database is sufficient
for this more complicated project.

     My colleague, Sharon Butcher, and I would like to discuss our new
project with you to see if Clifford Chance is again willing and able to
provide the local research that we require, and to get an estimate of the
cost involved.  We were hoping to call you at 9:00 am Houston time on
Monday, May 22nd.  Please let me know if this time is not convenient, and
we will arrange for another call.  I can be reached by telephone
(713-853-5698), fax (713-646-5847), or email (kelly.noel.higgason@enron).
I hope you are well, and look forward to our work together.

Regards,

Kelly Noel Higgason

Argentina
Australia
Brazil
Canada
China
Colombia
Finland
Germany
Guatemala
Hungary
India
Indonesia
Italy
Jamaica
Japan
Mexico
Netherlands
Norway
Philippines
Poland
Puerto Rico
Russian Federation
Singapore
Spain
Sweden
Thailand
Turkey
United Kingdom
Venezuela
This message and any attachment are confidential and may be privileged or 
otherwise protected from disclosure.  If you are not the intended recipient, 
please telephone or email the sender and delete this message and any 
attachment from your system.  If you are not the intended recipient you must 
not copy this message or attachment or disclose the contents to any other 
person.

For further information about Clifford Chance please see our website at 
http://www.cliffordchance.com or refer to any Clifford Chance office.

Hi, Linda.   I am not surprised; she sent me an email, too.  I was out on 
vacation last week, so I only gave Kim my feedback early this week.  I hope 
that ELM has received the response by now.  Let me know if I need to do 
anything else.  Michelle

	Linda Strahm@ENRON COMMUNICATIONS
	06/01/2000 07:47 AM
		 
Hi Michelle. Unfortunately, this issue with Eddie Lynn Morgan is still alive. 
I talked with Kim a few weeks ago and she mentioned that she sent her 
write-up to you for your review - before sending it to Eddie Lynn. Do you 
have a status update on when it will be ready to go to Eddie Lynn?

Thanks Michelle!
	Lynn Morgan
	05/27/00 01:16 PM
		 
It has now been two weeks since Kim said she would send me a note and yet no 
response.  Perhaps now you can see my continued frustration with the lack of 
response to what I consider to be a very serious matter.   As you had 
suggested when we first talked, I would appreciate it if you would forward 
this to Kim's boss so that I can get a response.  

Lynn Morgan
(503) 886-0668
(503) 816-0982 (cell)

Enron Broadband Services
2100 SW River Parkway
Suite 740A
Portland, OR  97201

	EL Morgan
	05/18/00 10:00 AM
		
I have not received anything from Kim.  

EL Morgan
(503) 886-0668
(503) 816-0982 (cell)

Enron Broadband Services
2100 SW River Parkway
Suite 740A
Portland, OR  97201

	Linda Strahm
	05/10/00 09:52 AM
		 
EL - I just spoke with Kim Melodick. As you indicated, she had not had an 
opportunity to provide you with the final outcome of the email investigation. 
She apologizes for this and will have a write up to you within 1 week from 
today.

Let me know if you don't receive it by next Wednesday. 

thanks.

Kim, what day?

great news! 

	Hector McLoughlin
	06/06/2000 01:55 PM
		 
FYI
Raygayle turned in her signed separation agreement at 1:30 PM today.   She 
believes that she will most likely move to Philadelphia with her mother 
instead of pursuing other opportunities for re-hire at Enron. 
hgm

Don't worry about it!  Of all people, I understand about schedules being 
tight.  Good luck with the post-trial work.  Michelle

	"Eden Sholeen" <esholeen@bracepatt.com>
	06/07/2000 09:01 AM
		 
Sorry that I have not called.  We were gone the first weekend that you called 
and I worked this last weekend.  I am trying to get our JMOL and motion for 
new trial filed by this Friday.  I will call you this weekdend.  I am a 
little keyed up.

Eden P. Sholeen
Bracewell & Patterson, L.L.P.
South Tower Pennzoil Place
711 Louisiana, Suite 2900
Houston, Texas 77002
(713) 221-1526
(713) 222-3221 fax
esholeen@bracepatt.com

Alan, I just called our counsel on this matter this morning to find out the 
status.  I believe that Cline has different counsel now, and I will find out 
about this asap.  Michelle

	Alan Aronowitz
	06/08/2000 09:20 AM
		
Michelle:

Please look into this and speak with our Charleston counsel, and then apprise 
the people copied on this note.

Thanks, Alan

	George McClellan
	06/07/2000 10:45 PM
		
Thanks Tom.  If he calls back tell him to speak with Alan.

Tom Mcquade
06/07/2000 04:17 PM
I was contacted by Cline's attorney who is handling the Clonch lawsuit.  He 
wants to depose Enron emploees with direct knowledge of the events leading up 
to suit filed by Clonch.  I told him that we will have an Enron lawyer 
contact him.  He is apparently in direct contact with the firm in Charleston 
representing us.  I will wait until we talk before contacting anyone 
regarding the matter.

I don't know anything about this!  MC

	Richard B Sanders
	06/08/2000 05:34 PM
		 
Do you know anything about this?
	Lisa Robichaux@ENRON
	06/08/2000 04:16 PM
		 

Charles, if this is for London, then we generally ask Jon Chapman (attorney 
over there) to review things.  Let me know if that is the case.  Michelle

Charles A Taylor@ENRON
11/22/2000 11:24 AM
Search for EIM Candidates in Europe.  Charles ext.53365
Rebecca Skupin
11/22/2000 10:59 AM
Bryan - Lu Ann,

Can you please sign this proposal and fax a copy and courier a  copy as we 
need your signature to proceed with the recruitment assignment.

Your earliest attention would be appreciated.

Happy Thanksgiving.

MH
Martin Holmes
20/11/2000 17:04
Bryan

Here is the proposal for recruitment agency. We might need your sign off

MH
** High Priority **

Atty / Martin,

enclosed is the detailed proposal for your attention, could it be signed & 
sent back to me on 0207 872 1502.

We have started the research programme in europe, this will be managed by 
Andrew Thornton-Norris here in london. He will co-ordinate across europe for 
us. Martin I have given him your number as a reference point if he needs 
clarification on any company/candidate details.

regards
Marc

Marc Havercroft
Senior Consultant
direct line: 0207 872 1524
Mbl: 0797 0776819
Yvette Francis (PA) 0207 872 1620
 - Enron Europe Proposal.doc

Thanks for the info.  I think that makes it worse!  Michelle

Amanda Curless@ENRON
12/01/2000 12:01 PM
Michelle,
I talked with Accounts Payable and we are sending payments to the UK. The 
address is 5355 HighStreet, Egham, Great Britain. Thanks!
Mandy

Jim/Don,

Do you know anything about this for Ecogas?

Michelle Cash

	Randal Maffett
	06/08/2000 06:44 PM
		 
FYI - see Jerrel's response to my query below.  This is the first I've ever 
seen or heard that this was a "condition to closing."  
Dan/Rob - is this true?  

To me the cost is irrelevant since Jerrel is the only Director affected and 
because of his actions (and/or lack thereof) the company can't afford to 
cover him.  
Jerrel Branson <jerrel@ecogas.com> on 06/08/2000 05:16:24 PM
Answering backwards - D&O insurance is exceedingly expensive for small firms
to secure, thus most do without it.  Second, it was a condition when we
closed and McConville/Lambert, et al researched it through Enron Risk
Management, Don Marshall, and stated that it was in place automatically for
any majority owned merchant investment.  A confirmation letter was promised
on 14 July and when pressed in September Lambert finally got around to
issuing the letter to Carl and me that I mentioned earlier.

Jerrel
I'm not very experienced in these matters so I'm checking with the folks
here.  Can you explain why Enron should cover non-Enron directors?  Why
doesn't Ecogas have its own insurance?  Any help you can provide is
appreciated.

Kerry,  What are your thoughts on this issue?

Michelle

Michelle,

We have had a couple of interpretations as to how to calculate the overtime 
for employees who receive a shift differential and wanted to ask for 
assistance from you.  The problem we are having deals with employees who 
rotate shift.  Please review the following scenario.

For a simple example with an ee at $10/hour and shift of $1/hour for the 
Night (N) shift.

  M T W Th F S

REG  8 8 8 8 8 
OT       8 
SHIFT  N N D D D D 

Interpretation 1

The shift differential would be added to his pay to determine the regular 
rate of pay and his pay would be calculated as follows:

REG  $400
SHIFT       16
OT    124.80  ((400+16)/40) x 1.5)

Interpretation 2

Since his overtime was during a day shift, his pay would be calculated as 
follows:

REG  $400
SHIFT       16
OT    120.00 (400/40 x 1.5)

Can you please let us know which interpretation is correct or if we have 
totally missed the boat on both of them?

Thanks for your help,
Diane

David,  I am with you.  In fact, I sent this issue to outside counsel earlier 
this week because I simply wasn't able to get to it due to the issues 
surrounding the latest reorg/redeployment efforts.  I expect an answer by 
Monday or Tuesday.  Sorry I forgot to let you know about the status.  Michelle

	David O'Dell@ENRON
	06/09/2000 09:45 AM
		 
Michelle,

This is the first of 2 messages..   We have been trying to get a response on 
this since April, I understand you are very busy, as are we, is there someone 
you can assign to us to work on these issues?  Some type of response would be 
appreciated.

Thanks - David
David O'Dell
05/30/2000 07:25 AM

Michelle,

This is the first of 2 messages we are looking for your input on, can you 
advise when can we anticipate a response to Diane's questions?  At this point 
it is too late to make configuration changes for the 7/1 go-live but we 
wanted to get your feedback so that if we are not in compliance we can get 
the corrections on the schedule for post 7/1. 

Your assistance, as always,  is greatly appreciated.

Thanks - David

Diane Taylor
05/09/2000 08:07 AM
Michelle,

Have you had a chance to look at this question?  We are needing to finalize 
the configuration and wanted to make sure that we had everything in line.

Thanks,
Diane
Diane Taylor
04/24/2000 12:24 PM
Michelle,

We have had a couple of interpretations as to how to calculate the overtime 
for employees who receive a shift differential and wanted to ask for 
assistance from you.  The problem we are having deals with employees who 
rotate shift.  Please review the following scenario.

For a simple example with an ee at $10/hour and shift of $1/hour for the 
Night (N) shift.

  M T W Th F S

REG  8 8 8 8 8 
OT       8 
SHIFT  N N D D D D 

Interpretation 1

The shift differential would be added to his pay to determine the regular 
rate of pay and his pay would be calculated as follows:

REG  $400
SHIFT       16
OT    124.80  ((400+16)/40) x 1.5)

Interpretation 2

Since his overtime was during a day shift, his pay would be calculated as 
follows:

REG  $400
SHIFT       16
OT    120.00 (400/40 x 1.5)

Can you please let us know which interpretation is correct or if we have 
totally missed the boat on both of them?

Thanks for your help,
Diane

Twanda, could you please handle this if you haven't already?  Thanks!  M

	Kim Melodick
	06/09/2000 12:01 PM
		 
Please process Tim's request and forward to me. Thanks!
	
	

Please generate an executable contract for Jeremy Morris and send to me.  
Thanks.

Here is his form b date.  mhc
	Kim Melodick
	06/09/2000 12:01 PM
		 
FYI
	
	

He executed the Form B on June 9th, 2000.

Twanda, please print.  Thanks.  MHC

	Rick Johnson@ENRON
	06/01/2000 01:25 PM
		 
Michelle, John, Attached please find the draft check-list I prepared per your 
requests.  I utilized a variety of legal memorandums and topic reference in 
developing this.  In the many instances listed,  the consensus from both 
NEPCO and ECC should be paramount.  Please let me know if  there are topics 
you would clarify.  I believe we were going to attempt a joint discussion 
after receipt and review of this draft.   I have good availability for a 
conference discussion on:
Thursday 6/1/2000 - through 6 PM PST
Monday 6/5/2000 - 12 through 6 PM PST 
Thursday 6/8/2000  - 12 through 5 PM PST
I will be trying to vacation in the interim periods.  Thanks,  I'll look 
forward to your comments.  Rj.       

Gerry, should Sharon Butcher and Kriste Sullivan be included in the 
distribution list?  I would think so, now that we are back to "normal" staff 
meetings.  Michelle

	Gerry Gibson@ENRON
	06/08/2000 01:19 PM
		 
Hello Folks:

Enclosed is the agenda for the June 12 HR Leadership Team Meeting. The 
meeting will run from 12:15 - 1:30 and be held in EB49C4. The call in number 
is 713-853-3233 conf. code: 6000.

Regards, Gerry Gibson

Gene,

What is the status of the ProNexxus situation?  Have we received anything 
from them?  If not, they are very shortsighted!

Michelle

FYI.

	Mark Holsworth@ENRON
	06/09/2000 10:53 AM
		 
 I received a call from Gene Diers today about what he believes may be going 
on with changes to my Agreement for Project Services ("APS") and how we 
operate.  There are business and legal reasons for the APS  being in the name 
of Enron Corp.  If we sell a company and the APS was in the name of a 
subsidiary, we would have to get the sold subsidiary to license the computer 
software to us.  Given the inability to determine this at the time everyone 
is pushing to sell the subsidiary, we could end up without any software or 
having to pay a substantial amount of money to the buyer later on when we 
discover the mistake.  Secondly, allowing all subsidiaries to negotiate 
different versions with vendors would be a nightmare and create five times 
the number of agreements to file.  I am opposed to this.  Every time we sell 
a company, the software has always been an issue.  We are as I told you 
before trying to fix something that is not broken. 

Please print for me and put in my Japan file - please give me the file!  
Thanks.

Michelle

	Scott Gilchrist@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	06/07/2000 01:23 PM
		 
As discussed
Nigel Sellens@ECT
06/07/2000 06:29 AM
Here is the contract template, I will call you later with my comments.
London Fax System
07/06/2000 10:06
You have received a new fax from 0354498794

The image contains 16 page(s).

Rick, FYI.  Also, there is a status meeting at 10:00 today -- I don't know if 
you got message, but I hope you can participate by phone.  Michelle

Michelle,

I have asked Sarah Reyna, Finley Biggerstaff's assistant to send to you 
copies of the collective bargaining agreements, the employment agreements 
with senior management (there is only one, for Fred Inglis, the plant 
manager) and all benefit material.  I am also making copies of relevant 
sections of the AGRA Simons report regarding union and labor matters.  
Michelle, we only got copies of the due diligence materials and the AGRA 
Simons report on Thursday.  Indeed, I am waiting for the benefits documents 
to arrive with this morning's express mail.  

Your contact at Davis & Co, our Canadia counsel in Vancouver, is Dean 
Crawford (604) 643-2951, dccrawford@davis.ca.  Our principal contact at Davis 
& Co. is Brian Hiebert, (604) 643-2917, fax: 687-1612, 
brian_hiebert@davis.ca.  I have not met Dean, but understand from Brian that 
he is a senior employment attorney with experience with the provincial labor 
ministry.  I understand that Dean is currently reviewing the CBAs, the Inglis 
employment agreement, benefits documents, union grievance records, workers 
compensation claims records and human rights complaints files.  Davis & Co. 
have prepared consents to be signed by KPMG as receiver for Stone Venepal 
(Celgar) Inc., owner of the mill, in order to get access to correspondence 
between Stone Venepal and the Workers Compensation Board.  

I trust I will see you at the Celgar metting at 10:00 am today in 27C2.

Peter

	Gene Diers@ENRON
	06/09/2000 07:54 AM
		 
	

I talked briefly to Carmen this morning about plans to revise the above 
agreements and associated arrangements for processing them. ]

Since I am retiring on June 30, 2000, I have no territorial interest in what 
happens but I think I would be remiss if I didn't at least offer a couple of 
comments: 

1.  Taking the agreements in the name of Enron Corp. while irksome to some 
has been effective.  It allows any/all commercial companies to reference an 
agreement.  This provides for consistency not only in the manner in which 
vendors treat different operating companies but also in the manner in which 
we treat different vendors.  I think it keeps vendors from employing a divide 
and conquer approach. 

2.  The agreements need to be updated.  I know that there are some reasons 
for using two agreements, i.e., MASTER SERVICE AGREEMENT and AGREEMENT FOR 
PROJECT SERVICES, but I would vote for combining them if the problems could 
be worked out.  It's not that the current agreements are bad but there is 
some duplication, terms that are confusing, clauses that are missing, etc., 
all things that could be fixed rather easily. 

3.   I don't see why the agreements couldn't be generalized somewhat to cover 
all kinds of professional services as opposed to just IT consulting.

4.  If commercial companies need/want to sign PWD's, why can't we work out an 
arrangement wherein the PWD is still subject to a Corporate master agreement 
but the commercial company signs and indemnifies the corporation, e.g., for 
anything that they might do on the PWD. 

I realize that nobody has asked me and maybe I don't really understand what 
it is that you are trying to accomplish in the modified processbut as I view 
it with from an overall Enron Corp., I am concerned that we might be chunking 
a methodology that has served us.

Thanks.  gene    

Jane, I was not involved -- I think Sharon was.  Michelle

	Jane Allen
	06/12/2000 12:01 PM
		 
Do either of you have a copy of Dennis Pick's employment agreement which 
contains the provisions of his severance?  The UK Inland Revenue is making 
inquiries and needs a copy.

Jane

Victoria McCarthy
06/09/2000 09:17 AM
Dear Jane

I have just joined Enron, and will be assisting Tara Rozen and Madeline Fox 
with their expat work.

We have recently had an enquiry from the UK Inland Revenue regarding Dennis 
Pick's termination payment.  They have asked that we supply them with a copy 
of Dennis's original contract of employment (we have the letter of assignment 
on file, but this is not sufficient for their enquiry). 

Do you know a contact who we could request the contract from?

Thanks for your help.

Victoria

Twanda, if I am here, I would like to attend this lunch meeting.  Thanks. =
=20
Michelle
=09Sylvia Hu@ENRON
=0906/08/2000 11:28 AM
=09=09=20
What are some legal issues we should be aware of as e Business/eTrade chang=
e=20
our way to do business?   Do you know Lexis Search Advisor?  Please join Ed=
=20
Chang, Lexis attorney for a Cyberlaw & Telecommunications presentation in=
=20
Conference Room EB 47C2 on Tuesday, 6/20 from 12:00 noon to 1:30 PM.   Lexi=
s=20
provides lunch.  R.S.V.P. to Sylvia Hu x36775 by noon, Monday (6/19).=20

Thanks,
Sylvia Hu
Corporate and Law Information Services
x36775

   Come discover LEXIS-NEXIS and it=01,s vast
 collection of information on=20
CYBERLAW and TELECOMMUNICATIONS

Learn how to monitor the latest cases and legislation in these emerging are=
as=20
of law.

Find out what new cyberlaw journals=20
LEXIS-NEXIS has recently acquired.

See how easy it is to locate FCC Cases,=20
FCC Licenses, PUC Decisions and Reports,=20
and Telecommunications News.

Watch as LEXIS-NEXIS SEARCH ADVISOR practically does all of your research f=
or=20
you.

FYI.

Michelle
=09Sylvia Hu@ENRON
=0906/08/2000 11:28 AM
=09=09=20
What are some legal issues we should be aware of as e Business/eTrade chang=
e=20
our way to do business?   Do you know Lexis Search Advisor?  Please join Ed=
=20
Chang, Lexis attorney for a Cyberlaw & Telecommunications presentation in=
=20
Conference Room EB 47C2 on Tuesday, 6/20 from 12:00 noon to 1:30 PM.   Lexi=
s=20
provides lunch.  R.S.V.P. to Sylvia Hu x36775 by noon, Monday (6/19).=20

Thanks,
Sylvia Hu
Corporate and Law Information Services
x36775

   Come discover LEXIS-NEXIS and it=01,s vast
 collection of information on=20
CYBERLAW and TELECOMMUNICATIONS

Learn how to monitor the latest cases and legislation in these emerging are=
as=20
of law.

Find out what new cyberlaw journals=20
LEXIS-NEXIS has recently acquired.

See how easy it is to locate FCC Cases,=20
FCC Licenses, PUC Decisions and Reports,=20
and Telecommunications News.

Watch as LEXIS-NEXIS SEARCH ADVISOR practically does all of your research f=
or=20
you.

David,  I did keep these provisos in the final draft, which will come to you 
today.  Michelle

	David Oxley
	06/13/2000 07:31 AM
		 
But the bonuses are still dependent on perf and company earnings?

fyi.  michelle

	Gene Diers@ENRON
	06/09/2000 07:54 AM
		 
	

I talked briefly to Carmen this morning about plans to revise the above 
agreements and associated arrangements for processing them. ]

Since I am retiring on June 30, 2000, I have no territorial interest in what 
happens but I think I would be remiss if I didn't at least offer a couple of 
comments: 

1.  Taking the agreements in the name of Enron Corp. while irksome to some 
has been effective.  It allows any/all commercial companies to reference an 
agreement.  This provides for consistency not only in the manner in which 
vendors treat different operating companies but also in the manner in which 
we treat different vendors.  I think it keeps vendors from employing a divide 
and conquer approach. 

2.  The agreements need to be updated.  I know that there are some reasons 
for using two agreements, i.e., MASTER SERVICE AGREEMENT and AGREEMENT FOR 
PROJECT SERVICES, but I would vote for combining them if the problems could 
be worked out.  It's not that the current agreements are bad but there is 
some duplication, terms that are confusing, clauses that are missing, etc., 
all things that could be fixed rather easily. 

3.   I don't see why the agreements couldn't be generalized somewhat to cover 
all kinds of professional services as opposed to just IT consulting.

4.  If commercial companies need/want to sign PWD's, why can't we work out an 
arrangement wherein the PWD is still subject to a Corporate master agreement 
but the commercial company signs and indemnifies the corporation, e.g., for 
anything that they might do on the PWD. 

I realize that nobody has asked me and maybe I don't really understand what 
it is that you are trying to accomplish in the modified processbut as I view 
it with from an overall Enron Corp., I am concerned that we might be chunking 
a methodology that has served us.

Thanks.  gene    

fyi.  michelle

	Mark Holsworth@ENRON
	06/09/2000 10:53 AM
		 
 I received a call from Gene Diers today about what he believes may be going 
on with changes to my Agreement for Project Services ("APS") and how we 
operate.  There are business and legal reasons for the APS  being in the name 
of Enron Corp.  If we sell a company and the APS was in the name of a 
subsidiary, we would have to get the sold subsidiary to license the computer 
software to us.  Given the inability to determine this at the time everyone 
is pushing to sell the subsidiary, we could end up without any software or 
having to pay a substantial amount of money to the buyer later on when we 
discover the mistake.  Secondly, allowing all subsidiaries to negotiate 
different versions with vendors would be a nightmare and create five times 
the number of agreements to file.  I am opposed to this.  Every time we sell 
a company, the software has always been an issue.  We are as I told you 
before trying to fix something that is not broken. 

fyi.  michelle

	Gene Diers@ENRON
	06/09/2000 07:54 AM
		 
	

I talked briefly to Carmen this morning about plans to revise the above 
agreements and associated arrangements for processing them. ]

Since I am retiring on June 30, 2000, I have no territorial interest in what 
happens but I think I would be remiss if I didn't at least offer a couple of 
comments: 

1.  Taking the agreements in the name of Enron Corp. while irksome to some 
has been effective.  It allows any/all commercial companies to reference an 
agreement.  This provides for consistency not only in the manner in which 
vendors treat different operating companies but also in the manner in which 
we treat different vendors.  I think it keeps vendors from employing a divide 
and conquer approach. 

2.  The agreements need to be updated.  I know that there are some reasons 
for using two agreements, i.e., MASTER SERVICE AGREEMENT and AGREEMENT FOR 
PROJECT SERVICES, but I would vote for combining them if the problems could 
be worked out.  It's not that the current agreements are bad but there is 
some duplication, terms that are confusing, clauses that are missing, etc., 
all things that could be fixed rather easily. 

3.   I don't see why the agreements couldn't be generalized somewhat to cover 
all kinds of professional services as opposed to just IT consulting.

4.  If commercial companies need/want to sign PWD's, why can't we work out an 
arrangement wherein the PWD is still subject to a Corporate master agreement 
but the commercial company signs and indemnifies the corporation, e.g., for 
anything that they might do on the PWD. 

I realize that nobody has asked me and maybe I don't really understand what 
it is that you are trying to accomplish in the modified processbut as I view 
it with from an overall Enron Corp., I am concerned that we might be chunking 
a methodology that has served us.

Thanks.  gene    

Gina, check with Erin Knouff.  I think she has it.  Michelle

	Gina Corteselli@ENRON
	06/14/2000 10:11 AM
		 
Hi Michelle.  I am so sorry that i was unable to chat with you at last week's 
meeting with David.  I have a question regarding photos on the MD/VP 
biographic profiles (which will be provided at the VP/MD Global meetings on 
31 July and 1 Aug. 

 I am told that insofar as possible we should ensure photos are included on 
all the bio profiles-- but I also understand that there are legal 
considerations (i.e. we need to get employee concurrence to include the 
pictures).

I gather that there is a disclaimer or consent form that the VP's and MD's 
will have to sign and wondered if you would have a copy of this consent form 
for me to use.  
Any info you can provide on this would be greatly appreciated.  Thanks in 
advance.

 Gina

Philip,  have you had a chance to pull this information together for me?  Let 
me know when you think you might have it.  Thanks.  Michelle

	Michelle Cash
	06/01/2000 05:14 PM
		
Philip, would you please gather information about Jynell Holliday.  I believe 
that there is a possibility of litigation.  Thanks.  Michelle

He and I are meeting this week to discuss opportunities.  I'll keep you 
posted.  Michelle

What is the status of our discussions with Carlos?   Mark
	John Schwartzenburg@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	12/04/2000 01:29 PM
		
Mark,  although I will hate to lose  Carlos and everyone here at EECC and 
NEPCO wants him to stay, in point of fact he has repaid his debt to society 
and is entitled to look at opportunites outside of EECC now. Please feel free 
to talk with him. He is discussing matters with Vicki et al now, and  she is 
aware that he will be contacting ENA (EWS?)as well.  

 As background, it was understood at the time we took Carlos on board that 
his long term career interests were not limited to our construction work, 
and, consistent with his resume, I have kept him mostly focused on our equity 
and finance related matters (including work-outs).  I do think well of 
Carlos, and certainly believe that he is a lawyer that Enron wants to keep.

	Carlos Sole
	12/01/2000 09:36 AM
		 
Michelle, per my voicemail as I indicated, I am trying to pursue what 
opportunities may be available at EWS and both Julia Murray and Kay Mann 
recommended that I contact you.  As background, I have been at EECC since 
October last year where I have focused on traditional EPC contracts and joint 
venture agreements with construction partners, cross-border financing 
agreements principally in Mexico and merger and acquisition/strategic 
investment transactions.  Before coming to Enron, I worked with the Houston 
office of a New York based firm (Curtis, Mallet-Prevost, Colt & Mosle)  where 
I focused mostly on transactions in Mexico since we represented Pemex on 
their transactions involving long and short term oil supply agreements and 
CFE (Mexico's electricity commission) on its public bids for EPC and IPP 
projects.  Lastly, I started my legal career in 1994 at Patton Boggs in 
Washington, DC where I focused on general domestic corporate transactions 
such as establishing new business entities (ie, joint venture work, 
partnerships etc.), m & a work, and securities offerings.  Thanks for your 
consideration and I look forward to talking with you when you return from 
vacation (my extension is 6-6127).  

Thanks, Pat.  I am sending you a copy of the opinion, which I got from the 
Daily Labor Report.  Michelle

	FMackin@aol.com
	06/12/2000 05:27 PM
		 
Ruling Helps Workers Prove Job Bias

By RICHARD CARELLI
.c The Associated Press

WASHINGTON (June 12) - Workers who say their employers illegally
discriminated against them can win lawsuits, or at least get their
accusations to a jury, without direct evidence of intentional bias, the
Supreme Court ruled Monday.

The court's unanimous decision in an age-bias dispute from Mississippi could
carry profound practical importance as well for lawsuits nationwide that
charge employment discrimination based on race, sex and physical disabilities.

The ruling was a huge setback for employers because some federal appeals
courts routinely had dismissed lawsuits that lacked ''smoking gun'' evidence
of employers' discriminatory intent.

Monday's decision said circumstantial evidence often is enough to sue
employers successfully.

Employer organizations were disappointed.

''The bottom line is ... it may be tougher to get cases out of the hands of
the jury,'' said Peter Petsch, a lawyer for the Society for Human Resource
Management. ''In some jurisdictions, we're going to see more litigation ...
which lasts longer, even for employers who did nothing wrong,'' he said.

But Thomas Osborne, an AARP lawyer, praised the decision as a victory for the
some 12 million over-50 workers who belong to his organization because it
''says employers no longer can lie about their personnel decisions and get
away with it.''

''The playing field is no longer slanted toward employers,'' Osborne said.

In a series of employment-bias decisions, the nation's highest court has
imposed various requirements on employees who say they were treated
illegally. They must show they were subjected to adverse treatment and that
the employer's asserted reason for such treatment was phony.

But federal appeals courts have disagreed on a key point:
whether employees who discredit an employer's stated reason must also offer
proof of a discriminatory motive. Not always, the Supreme Court said Monday.

Justice Sandra Day O'Connor wrote that a federal appeals court wrongly relied
on ''the premise that a plaintiff must always introduce additional,
independent evidence of discrimination.''

''Proof that the defendant's explanation is unworthy of credence is simply
one form of circumstantial evidence that is probative of intentional
discrimination, and it may be quite persuasive,'' she said. ''In appropriate
circumstances, the trier of fact can reasonably infer form the falsity of the
explanation that the employer is dissembling to cover up a discriminatory
purpose.''

O'Connor said employees will not always be entitled to win a job-bias lawsuit
after showing that an employer's explanation for their treatment was false.
But she ruled that it was enough in the case of a Mississippi man who said
age discrimination cost him his supervisory job at a toilet-seat
manufacturing plant.

Roger Reeves sued Sanderson Plumbing Products of Columbus, Miss., after he
was fired in 1995 from his job as a hinge-department supervisor in the plant.
Reeves, then 57, had worked at the plant for 40 years.

His lawsuit invoked the federal Age Discrimination in Employment Act, and a
jury awarded him $70,000 in damages and $28,490 in lost pay.

But the 5th U.S. Circuit Court of Appeals threw out that award after ruling
that Reeves had not offered enough proof of illegal age bias.

Reeves had been required to prove he was over 40 and therefore protected by
the federal law, that he had been fired and replaced with someone younger.
Such evidence amounted to what courts call a ''prima facie'' showing of
discrimination.

Sanderson Plumbing then was required to offer a legitimate, nondiscriminatory
reason for the firing. Once it did, the burden shifted back to Reeves to show
that the stated reason was false.

He also pointed to derogatory comments made about his age by a supervisor.

Company officials said Reeves had been fired for falsifying time records but
he showed that he had not.

The jury apparently concluded that he succeeded in proving bias, but the
appeals court said Reeves had to also offer proof that the company's decision
was motivated by age bias.

Monday's decision said the appeals court was wrong about that, and reinstated
the jury's verdict.

AP-NY-06-12-00 1522EDT

Copyright 2000 The Associated Press. The information contained in the AP news
report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or otherwise distributed
without the prior written authority of The Associated Press. All active
hyperlinks have been inserted by AOL.

Beth, do you really need me there?  I haven't been involved in KAFUS at all.  
I'll be happy to go if needed.  Michelle

	Beth A Ryan
	06/14/2000 04:33 PM
		 
I would like to check availability on Wednesday, June 21 from 8:00am until 
5:00pm for a KAFUS all hands meeting.  The topic is ALL issues regarding 
KAFUS included but not limited to:

Commercial
Legal
Accounting
Analyst
Associates
Tax

Please advise if you will be available Wednesday, June 21 and names of others 
involved that should be included in this meeting.

Thank you for your help.

Pursuant to your request, I have revised the Disclaimer below.  Please review 
and provide me with any comments.

Thanks
Michelle

By clicking on the "LOGIN" box above, I acknowledge that any information I 
have provided or confirmed in this system is true, complete, and not 
misleading in any way. I understand that any false or misleading statement 
that is incorrect, incomplete, or untrue will be grounds for disciplinary 
action, up to and including termination of employment, at the Company's 
discretion if discovered at any time.

By clicking on the LOGIN box, I also represent that I will not use this 
system in violation of the Enron Information System Security Policy.  I 
acknowledge and understand that this system is for the use of authorized 
users only. If I use this computer system without authority, or in excess of 
my authority, I may be prosecuted to the maximum extent allowable by the 
law.  I understand that I am subject to having all of my activities on this 
system monitored and recorded.  I consent to such monitoring and understand 
that if such monitoring reveals evidence of possible criminal activity, it 
may be provided to law enforcement officials.

	Kriste Sullivan@ENRON
	Sent by: Tanja Murray@ENRON
	06/16/2000 10:47 AM
		 
Kriste K. Sullivan
Enron Corp. Legal
EB 4861
Ext. 37557

I think it would be neat to hear from George Bush or George W. Bush.  Thanks!

	eThink@ENRON
	Sent by: Enron Announcements@ENRON
	06/15/2000 06:06 PM
		
Is there someone outside of Enron that you feel would have a valid audience 
inside Enron?  Or, is there someone at Enron you think we have overlooked 
thus far?  

E-mail your eSpeak wish to ethink@enron.com.

Twanda, would you please handle this?  Thanks.  Michelle
	Kim Melodick
	06/16/2000 05:21 PM
		 
Please prepare an executable employment agreement for Don Baughman.

Kim, to speed things up, it is a good idea to cc:  Twanda on all emails 
regarding agreements.  She can get it going if she reads it before I do.  see 
you later.  michelle

	Kim Melodick
	06/16/2000 05:21 PM
		 
Please prepare an executable employment agreement for Don Baughman.

Twanda, would you please handle this?  Thanks.  mhc

	Kim Melodick
	06/16/2000 07:04 PM
		 
Please create an executable agreement for Miguel Garcia as soon as possible.  
Thanks for your help.

Please print this and attachment.  Thanks a lot.  Michelle

	"Notestine, Kerry" <KNotestine@littler.com>
	05/10/2000 10:18 AM
		 
 <<24_#02!.doc>>
John:

As we discussed, I am sending you a letter summarizing the law related to
double-breasted issues, with particular focus on operating two companies in
the same geographic and project market.  I also have included some
information, as you requested, about the potential liability if the efforts
to maintain double-breasted status fail.

I will send the original of this letter to you by mail.  I have copied this
letter to Michelle Cash but have not sent it to anybody else in your
organization because of your prior comments about David Lund's direct
contact with me.  Let me know if you want me to forward a copy of this to
David, Rick Johnson, or anybody else.

If you have any questions about this letter or this topic in general, please
let me know.

Kerry E Notestine
Littler Mendelson, PC
1900 Chevron Tower
1301 McKinney Street
Houston, Texas 77010
713.652.4748
713.951.9212 (fax)
knotestine@littler.com
www.littler.com

----
This email may contain confidential and privileged material for the sole use 
of the intended recipient(s). Any review, use, distribution or disclosure by 
others is strictly prohibited. If you are not the intended recipient (or 
authorized to receive for the recipient), please contact the sender by reply 
email and delete all copies of this message.

To reply to our email administrator directly, send an email to
postmaster@littler.com

Littler Mendelson, P.C.
http://www.littler.com

 - 24_#02!.doc

twanda, would you please print the email and the attachment for my review?  
Thanks.  mhc
	LaQuitta Washington@ENRON
	05/11/2000 11:05 AM
		 
Hi Pam, 

Attached is an updated copy of the AESOP Program Participation Grid.  Felecia 
forwarded the voicemail to me from Melissa Laing.  She confirmed Nowa Sarznya 
and Trakya Elektrik's participation, but she did not confirm Enron's percent 
of ownership or whether they were consolidated or unconsolidated.  I also 
need information on Torpy Limited (EES) and Enron Energy Services Company 
Limited.  These  two companies were not listed in Secretariat.  I am still 
awaiting information from Belinda McGaughy on the Wind and Zond Companies.  
Do you want me to contact them again or will you handle it?  Please advise.  

Thanks -- LaQuitta

12/18 is ok, not the 19th.

Bonnie White@ENRON
12/04/2000 04:25 PM
Would you be available either Monday, Dec. 18, either morning or afternoon, 
or Tuesday, 12/19, in the morning?

Twadna, would you please print and then file Ecogas (not due diligence file) 
for me.  Thanks a lot.  Michelle

	Randal Maffett
	05/12/2000 02:36 PM
		 
	

Attached is my draft of what we discussed.  I'm trying to get w/ 
Bowen/Donahue to discuss ASAP and will keep you posted accordingly.  Let me 
know ASAP if you have any comments, edits, etc...

Thanks for all your help today and thru all the other issues, etc...  It's 
been invaluable and I sincerely appreciate your patience as I learn more of 
how to deal with the legal aspects of all this.

RANDY 

T;  please print this and any attachments and file under "Japan -- 
Pre-Employment Testing."  Thanks!

	Paul.TYO.Davis@BakerNet.com
	05/15/2000 03:20 AM
		 
John

Our team does not know the answer off hand but we will check and come back in 
a
couple of days.

Regards

Paul Davis

Phil-

I have raised the issue of testing with Michelle Cash, an ENA labor lawyer,
whose comments and queries are set forth below, for your review.  Please
reply to Michelle's specific queries in paragraph 3 of her e-mail.

Paul-

Following your review of the attached e-mail traffic, please provide us
with the Japanese legal perspective on undertaking these types of
activities.  Also, based on your experience, inform us as to how testing of
this nature may be perceived in the Japanese market.

Best regards,

John
                    Michelle
John,

Thanks for including me on the distribution of this -- I received your
voice mail and was glad to be in the loop.

In general, we try to avoid any type of personality/psych testing because
of issues relating to the Americans with Disabilities Act, which prohibits
pre-employment medical testing.  It does apply to US citizens working for
Enron in foreign locations (i.e. extraterritorially).

Before we go forward and do this type of testing, it is useful to ascertain
the purpose/goal of the tests.  Why do they want this information?  Is
there another, less intrusive, way to obtain that information (e.g.,
references from prior employers, etc.)?

As noted below, there may be Japanese labor/employment law issues that
address this type of activity as well.  I suggest that we obtain the
information above as well as the opinion requested below and then determine
how to proceed.

Michelle

                    John
Michelle-

Pursuant to my voicemail, I am forwarding the attached e-mail traffic for
your consideration.  I am unsure as to the types of testing contemplated,
but want to ensure that such activities are permitted under Enron's policy.

Your comments on the attached agreement would also be appreciated.

Thanks,

John
                    Phillip
                    05/10/2000
                    05:13 PM

Hi John

  Enron will be using PDI in Tokyo for candidate abilities testing prior to
employment.  The outcome of the testing is a confidential report that comes
to me (as HR) and I then send to the participant(s) in the recruitment
decision making process for their confidential consumption.  PDI have
agreed to me doing this via email, however are seeking some reassurance as
to our use of and maintenance of confidentiality of the final product.  Can
you review the attached and come back to me with your thoughts?  I would
also appreciate a local (Japan) opinion on the legal issues associated with
abilities/psych testing prior to employment (I know you guys shy away from
it in the US although it is quite widely accepted "down under").

Thanks and regards

Phil
Phil,
With the e-mail transmission (using .pdf files), we'll need you or someone
else in Enron to sign a document similar to the attached letter. Please
read it and let me know if you want to make any changes before we fill in
all the details.

Thanks very much,
Douglas

(See attached file: emailrelease.doc)

My information looks ok.  Thanks.  Michelle Cash

Twanda, please print this and attachment.  Thanks.  Michelle

	Kelly Noel Higgason@ENRON
	06/07/2000 02:21 PM
		 
Michelle:
 I got the answer to the voicemail message I left for you about which lawyer 
would be the contact for the Enron Europe countries for the new Enron 
employee stock option plan.  Jon Chapman will be responsible for Norway, 
Poland, Spain, Sweden and Turkey (and any other Enron Europe countries that 
are added between now and December).  I assume you are the appropriate lawyer 
for Mexico.  (If not, please forward this message to the right lawyer, and cc 
me so that I know who it is!)  Please read the message below for an 
explanation of the first action item (due June 23rd).  The Mexico spreadsheet 
is contained in the file marked "CALME AESOP" at the  end of Jana's message.  
Thanks for your help!

Kelly
	Kelly Noel Higgason
	06/07/2000 01:14 PM
		 
Jonathon:
 I was in a meeting this morning concerning the new Enron employee stock 
option plan that will be implemented at the end of this year, and Melissa 
Laing (who participated by telephone) informed me that you were the lawyer to 
support Enron Europe HR on this project.  I recently joined the Enron Corp. 
legal staff from Enron International legal.  My role in this project is to 
coordinate the international legal support for the new option plan.  As such, 
I have contacted lawyers in various international business units to work with 
local counsel in each of the countries in which Enron has employees who will 
participate in the plan, to ensure that the plan does not run afoul of any 
legal restrictions.  Based on current information (which is likely to change 
between now and December, per Melissa Laing), the relevant countries in the 
Enron Europe group are Norway, Poland, Spain, Sweden and Turkey.  In the 
attachment labeled "asiapac" at the end of Jana Domke's message, you will 
find spreadsheets for all five of the Enron Europe companies.  Please review 
(with local counsel, if necessary) the information in the "Legal Compliance" 
section of each spreadsheet to confirm that the information therein is 
accurate.  Please forward any changes or comments to me and Jana Domke (Jana 
has requested that the review be complete by June 23rd).  The Public 
Relations department is currently preparing the written material that will 
communicate the details of the plan to the participating employees.  When 
that is available, I will send it to you so that you may make any 
modifications that are necessary to comply with local laws in each of the 
Enron Europe countries.  The communication documents will be available in 
English, Spanish, Portuguese, German and Greek.  Please call me at 
713-853-5698 with any questions.  Thank you for your assistance!

Kelly
	Jana Domke
	06/02/2000 04:13 PM
		 
If you attended the recent AESOP meeting, you are aware that the approval for 
establishing an Enron AESOP 2000 Program was granted by the Executive 
Committee on April 6, 2000.  In most instances, the plan design replicates 
the prior Plan parameters.  However, on an international basis, there have 
been numerous regulatory and legislative changes which may impact this 
program.

Attached are individual Country Summary Highlights which consolidate the 
various accounting/tax/legal/banking/human resource, etc. details and issues 
into one document.  This consolidated document is based not only on 
information gleaned from the previous AESOP inplementation, but it also 
reflects the most recent local tax changes - at least based upon the 
information we have here.

Because successful Plan implementation and rollout is predicated upon solid 
information, understanding and interpretation, we need your assistance.  
Please coordinate review of the your appropriate country documents with your 
local financial, legal, tax and/or other professionals, as required.  We want 
to ensure that AESOP incents our employees and reinforces the "One ENRON" 
philosophy - but at the same time, we need to ensure this program is cost 
effective, tax efficient, legally defensible and culturally acceptable in 
your areas of responsibility. 

Please document any specific issues and/or concerns, and where appropriate, 
provide input on viable options, corrective action, etc.. Also, if you have 
plans to be in other foreign locations prior to AESOP implementation and they 
need to be included, please advise ASAP.  Please send your responses via 
e-mail to either Dung Huynh or myself or by fax to (713) 646-7203.  If you 
have questions or if you need to discuss further, please call me @ (713) 
345-6142.  Our timeline is tight so would appreciate your responses at the 
latest by June 23rd - earlier if possible.  

Once we have the input, we'll roll this information up into a revised Summary 
Document, identifying issues that need further assessment/discussion and move 
forward to coordiinate final resolution with the AESOP team members.

Appreciate your assistance!

Regards/Jana Domke & Dung Huynh

PS - I apologize ahead of time for not getting all the countries correctly 
sorted by region.  You may need to extrapolate your specific locations from 
one or more of the following attachments. 

Attachments 

                

Jennifer,

Thanks for the email.  Cameron is great.  He loves his new school, even 
though it is not as "working parent friendly" as Cathedral House was. 

Cameron also loves fire engines (and ambulances, and tow trucks, and 
bulldozers and ..... ).  We took Cameron to the Bellaire EMS Open House a few 
weeks ago.  He got to climb all over the fire engines and even get into the 
driver's seat and "drive."   They also handed out plastic fireman's hats.   
He had a blast!

I look forward to having you back on 36;  I'm moving there as soon as they 
get my phone/computer set up -- I'll spend half days there.

See you later.

Michelle

	Jennifer Milligan
	06/13/2000 03:24 PM
		
Michelle,

Thanks for continuing to include me on these mailing lists - We are still 
snowed under on the PEP team (feedback ends on Friday and everyone has waited 
until the last minute...), but I hope to attend these information sessions 
after the Mid Year process is concluded.

How is Cameron?  Jack is turning 4 in two weeks and I can't believe how 
quickly time passes.  He is obsessed with fire engines and we are visiting a 
fire station for his birthday.  I am now the resident expert on fire safety 
and hydrant locations...

I feel rather isolated off in Allen Center, but we will return to 
civilization in August, so perhaps we can meet for lunch.

Thanks,
Jennifer

Earline,

The questions are as follows:

1.  Has Enron provided Ecogas with such coverage for its non-Enron board 
members so far?
2.  What is the general scope of such coverage?

Ecogas is a stand-alone company.  Enron owns about 85 percent of its stock 
and has three people on its Board.

I hope that helps.

Michelle

	Earline Kendall
	06/14/2000 10:19 AM
		 
OOps there were about 4 emails from Jim Bouillion that were forwarded to me 
on this matter.  Apparently I picked up the wrong name.  It is Jerrel Branson 
that is seeking coverage under Enron's D&O.  The same questions apply only 
change the name to Jerrel Branson.    We just need to know the chain of 
ownership to answer.  The Enron D&O policy is very broad.  

Thanks and sorry for adding to the confusion on this coverage question.

Earline Kendall
6/14
Earline Kendall
06/14/2000 10:08 AM
Your email to Jim Bouillion regarding coverage for Ron Maffett  of ECOGASA 
has been forwarded to me for handling.  Teddy Ward, retired June 1.  I am her 
successor as manager of the D&O coverages.  Please provide additional 
information to further my research into the D&O coverages.

We do cover outside directors but it depends on our ownership interest and if 
we manage it

Thanks,  Earline Kendall
James L Bouillion
06/13/2000 04:37 PM
More of what was sent this morning.
Jim/Don,

Do you know anything about this for Ecogas?

Michelle Cash

	Randal Maffett
	06/08/2000 06:44 PM
		 
FYI - see Jerrel's response to my query below.  This is the first I've ever 
seen or heard that this was a "condition to closing."  
Dan/Rob - is this true?  

To me the cost is irrelevant since Jerrel is the only Director affected and 
because of his actions (and/or lack thereof) the company can't afford to 
cover him.  
Jerrel Branson <jerrel@ecogas.com> on 06/08/2000 05:16:24 PM
Answering backwards - D&O insurance is exceedingly expensive for small firms
to secure, thus most do without it.  Second, it was a condition when we
closed and McConville/Lambert, et al researched it through Enron Risk
Management, Don Marshall, and stated that it was in place automatically for
any majority owned merchant investment.  A confirmation letter was promised
on 14 July and when pressed in September Lambert finally got around to
issuing the letter to Carl and me that I mentioned earlier.

Jerrel
I'm not very experienced in these matters so I'm checking with the folks
here.  Can you explain why Enron should cover non-Enron directors?  Why
doesn't Ecogas have its own insurance?  Any help you can provide is
appreciated.

Shelly, because he should have received this much sooner, we should hand 
deliver the check as soon as we get it from AP if it is not done through 
direct deposit.   If it is, then mailing the pay advice is ok.  Thanks.  
Michelle

	Shelly Pierce@ENRON COMMUNICATIONS
	06/15/2000 01:13 PM
		 
Carmen -

As discussed, please request an Accounts Payable Check for William Craig 
Falbaum for his vacation balance as of the date of his termination which was 
June 5, 2000.  We need to provide Craig this check (or pay advice if he had 
direct deposit), as soon as possible.    Once you receive this check, please 
mail to Craig at his home address, on the system, return receipt requested.  
The address shown in the system should be listed in Bellaire.

Please let me know today when you expect to receive the check.  Also, could 
you please follow-up with me after the check has been received and mailed.

Thank you so much for your assistance!  If you should have any questions, 
please feel free to contact me.

Thanks,
Shelly
X57962

Hector,

Where are we with regard to the investigation into this matter?  I know that 
you've got a lot going on, and I didn't want that one to fall through the 
cracks. 

Thanks a lot!

Michelle

Privileged and Confidential

In our meeting on Friday, we talked about the summary of complaints that you 
three are going to do.  If possible, I would like to receive those by Tuesday 
night so that they can be reviewed on Wednesday.  We are meeting with 
Beck/Olson on Thursday.

Let me know if that is impossible -- I know you all are swamped with zillions 
of other things!

Thanks.

Michelle

This works for me.

Michelle Cash

I am available at 3:00 Wednesday.  I agree that we should convene and 
discuss.  I would be surprised if we have grounds to challenge, but we can 
keep our fingers crossed.  If we don't, then we could discuss strategy for 
negotiations.  Thanks.  Michelle

Vincente suggests a conference call Wednesday afternoon at 2:00 or 3:00pm,
to discuss whether there are grounds to challenge the election and to
discuss future strategy.

He will be at the facility Wednesday morning and will have a report about
what happened Friday and the possible grounds for an election challenge.

I think this is a good idea,  Is it ok with you?  If so, is the time
convenient?

----
This email may contain confidential and privileged material for the sole use 
of the intended recipient(s). Any review, use, distribution or disclosure by 
others is strictly prohibited. If you are not the intended recipient (or 
authorized to receive for the recipient), please contact the sender by reply 
email and delete all copies of this message.

To reply to our email administrator directly, send an email to
postmaster@littler.com

Littler Mendelson, P.C.
http://www.littler.com

This is a test.  This is only  a test.

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

Pat, fyi re:  Evan Lovell's claim.  Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.
	Ann Ballard@ENRON
	06/19/2000 10:23 AM
		 
I spoke with Keith Fullenweider at V&E regarding PGE's discharge of 
liabilities, and whether or not a consent would be required from Sierra 
Pacific Resources pursuant to Section 5.14 of the Stock Purchase Agreement.  
He agreed that settlement of this type of liability by PGE in the amounts 
discussed would not be material to PGE (even settlements with a broader group 
of individuals).  Payments made by PGE prior to the closing should not have 
any impact on Sierra's ownership of PGE or the value of PGE after closing.  
Enron has the right to dividend net income out of PGE before closing (up to 
certain limits).  Payment of liabilities would probably reduce the amount 
that Enron could dividend before closing.  Its not clear whether or not  the 
materiality standard was intended to be material to PGE and PGH II taken as a 
whole.  The amounts could be material to PGH II, but we assume that this 
would not be paid out of PGH II.  

I believe that the benefit plan at issue here is sponsored by Portland 
General Holdings, Inc.  That entity is not being sold to Sierra Pacific 
Resources.  I do not know whether or not there will be any employees that 
participate in that plan after PGE and PGH II are sold to Sierra.  Sierra 
will cause a new plan with similar benefits to be adopted at the time of the 
sale for PGE and PGH II employees.  I suppose that the plan sponsored by 
Portland General Holdings, Inc. might be terminated following the sale of PGE.

Please call me if you have further questions regarding the Stock Purchase 
Agreement between Enron and Sierra Pacific Resources.

Dale, here it is.  Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.
	Ann Ballard@ENRON
	06/19/2000 10:23 AM
		 
I spoke with Keith Fullenweider at V&E regarding PGE's discharge of 
liabilities, and whether or not a consent would be required from Sierra 
Pacific Resources pursuant to Section 5.14 of the Stock Purchase Agreement.  
He agreed that settlement of this type of liability by PGE in the amounts 
discussed would not be material to PGE (even settlements with a broader group 
of individuals).  Payments made by PGE prior to the closing should not have 
any impact on Sierra's ownership of PGE or the value of PGE after closing.  
Enron has the right to dividend net income out of PGE before closing (up to 
certain limits).  Payment of liabilities would probably reduce the amount 
that Enron could dividend before closing.  Its not clear whether or not  the 
materiality standard was intended to be material to PGE and PGH II taken as a 
whole.  The amounts could be material to PGH II, but we assume that this 
would not be paid out of PGH II.  

I believe that the benefit plan at issue here is sponsored by Portland 
General Holdings, Inc.  That entity is not being sold to Sierra Pacific 
Resources.  I do not know whether or not there will be any employees that 
participate in that plan after PGE and PGH II are sold to Sierra.  Sierra 
will cause a new plan with similar benefits to be adopted at the time of the 
sale for PGE and PGH II employees.  I suppose that the plan sponsored by 
Portland General Holdings, Inc. might be terminated following the sale of PGE.

Please call me if you have further questions regarding the Stock Purchase 
Agreement between Enron and Sierra Pacific Resources.

Please handle.  Thanks.  Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.
	Kim Melodick
	06/19/2000 12:20 PM
		 
Please generated 2 executable employment agreements for Anna Santucci.  
Anna's form "B" date is June 19, 2000.  Her start date is June 19, 2000 as 
well.

Trey, it looks like I may have to be in Portland for a mediation on July 27 
-- with travel on the 26th and the 28th.  Are you planning to be gone then, 
too?  If not, I'll schedule this trip (wanna join me with CAC and spend the 
weekend?).

I hope you are having fun and not working too hard.  Don't worry too much 
about me.  Gwyn is coming over to join us for dinner tonight, and Kay is 
dropping by tomorrow -- she offered to watch Cameron if I needed to do 
stuff.  I do miss you, though.

L, M

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

Mandy,  Jane's language looks good.  I would add one thing at the end:  "Of 
course, receipt of an H1B visa transfer and/or permanent resident status will 
depend on whether the INS approves those applications."  Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

	Amanda Curless@ENRON
	06/19/2000 06:40 PM
		 
Michelle,
This is the verbage that Jane gave me for the green card issue Gary Buck 
talked to you about. Please approve and let me know if we need to make any 
changes. Thanks! 
Mandy
	
	

I have expanded on it a bit:

As part of the hiring process, the Company will sponsor the transfer of your 
H1-B visa. Please contact Margaret Daffin at 713/345-5083 as soon as possible 
to discuss the documentation necessary to initiate the transfer.  In 
addition, as part of the Performance Management Process at Enron, your job 
performance will be reviewed within the first 6 months of employment 
(year-end 2000).  If your job performance is within the top 33% of your peers 
(employees in the IT function at your level), we will sponsor you for an 
employment-based permanent residency application (green card).  The 
application process will begin shortly after the year-end review is 
finalized.  

Amanda Curless@ENRON
06/19/2000 04:53 PM
To get Andre, we have to have some language that provides him an assurance 
that we'll support him for a green card. I discussed this with Beth and she 
is ok with providing some language like this. 

I would propose that we say something to the effect of : "We will support the 
H1B transfer. You will be reviewed for job performance within the first 6 
months. If your job performance is within the top 33% of IT people at your 
level, we will support you for a green card process at the end of the 6 month 
review. 

Even with this language, I think it's iffy that  he'll accept. 

3) I think our critical path on recruiting is as follows : 
Recruiting: Technical team leads for Ken / Regan in the Unify Settlements and 
Accounting area
Recruiting: EDI team lead / developer
Hiring (some assumptions here): Matt Pena as gas operations manager, Paul 
O'Neal as Delphi developer for DCAF.

I really appreciate all the support that ya'll are providing. 

Thanks. 

I'll be happy to review it; please send it to me.  mhc

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

	Hector McLoughlin
	06/20/2000 09:04 AM
		 
Michelle, 
Tim O'Rourke developed the performance agreement form for our group to use 
with every employee who received a "needs improvement"  or "issues" 
rating.     Would you please review the form and give us the OK to use the 
form?  
Thanks, hgm

Twanda, we need to revise Shankman's contract as described below.  Thanks a  
lot!!  Michelle  (Memo to Oxley)

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.
	David Oxley
	06/20/2000 04:56 PM
		 
Can you update draft and let me have a copy?

Thanks
Mary Joyce@ENRON
06/20/2000 04:19 PM
David,

Lets move forward!  Approved by Jeff.

Thanks!

MAry

David Oxley@ECT
06/16/2000 02:37 PM
Mary,

I spoke with Dave and Mark above below and have concluded that we would like 
to go back to him with following offer. Before we do so can you make sure 
this is OK with ENE OTC;

   Offered   His Counter  Proposed Compromise

Contract Term  2 years   Happy for 3  leave at 2

Base   $250   Agreed   No change
   $275 2/1/01

S/O Equity  None   $500k options  None

Bonus   $1.25mmTarget  $1.5mm Target(for 00) $1.5mmTarget (for 00)
      $1.25mm Target (for 01) $1.25mm Target (for 01)

ENE LTI   $1.25mmTarget  $1.5mm Target (for 00) $2mm Target (for 00)
      $1.25mm Target (for 01) $1.25mm Target (for 01) 

All targets for top 25% performance.

David

	

Following up from yesterday:
 
 Base--$250 effective at contract sign
 Base--$275 effective Feb 1, 2001
 (Already discussed)
 
 Bonus Target for Cal 2000  Bonus Target for Cal 2001
 Cash   1,500,000  Cash  1,250,000
 Stock/Opt 1,500,000   Stock Opt 1,250,000

Bonus Target for Cal 2000 assumes current performance, etc, etc.
Stock/Opt targets structured as program paid/participated in Bonus paid in 
Cal 2000.
Also, 
 Options on 100,000 shares of Enron (valued at current valuation) Struck on 
date of contract execution with 25% vesting at contract signing, an 25% each  
January thereafter.
 
Also,
 $500,000 interest free loan (between ENA and myself) payable back by 
employment contract expiry.

Standard MD noncompete. 
David, you had mentioned (at Cliffs suggestion a 2 year deal, but I'd be 
happy to entertain 3 if you prefer).
      

Dawn,

I have not seen a request form for his contract.  I believe that Teresa Bien 
was working on it with Mark Haedicke.  I am copying her on this email so that 
if I am mistaken, she can let me know.

Thanks.

Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

	Dawn Doucet
	06/21/2000 10:01 AM
		 
What's the status, Michelle?  Peter was asking yesterday - I told him we 
might have something to him this week - was I lying??

Here it is, you nabe.  Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.
	Jeff Hoogendam <Jeff@SmartPrice.com>
	06/21/2000 05:16 PM
		 
OK, so maybe I haven't kept in touch lately - but there's a pretty good
reason for it.  I've been working for a new company called SmartPrice.com,
and we've been pushing hard to get our web site launched.    Now that we've
officially launched, I want to make sure my friends are the first to come by
and use it.  You can find us at http://www.smartprice.com/.

We deliver all of the information you need to make smart long distance
choices.  All you need to do is come to our site, give us a little
information about your calling habits, and we'll find you the best deal.
The best news is: our service is free.

Now that you know what's been keeping me so busy, I hope you'll come to the
site and start saving money.  I think you'll find it's worth it - so far,
our customers have saved an average of 30% on their long distance bills by
using our service.

As I mentioned, our site is fairly new.  We're really interested in learning
as much as possible, and this is where we can use your help.  If you have
suggestions or comments once you've come by the site, please send them to
feedback@smartprice.com.  The more we learn, the better we can make our
site.  (Also, we're breaking in our customer care processes, so if you're
going through the site and have questions, please give us a call at
1-877-550-5317.)

Thanks!

Jeff

Jeff Hoogendam - President & CEO
SmartPrice.com, Inc.
"Changing the way the world buys telecom."
T: 512.342.8800, x3008
F: 512.342.1072
www.smartprice.com

Mark, If this hasn't already taken place, I'd like to participate.  My 
assistant, Twanda Sweet, should have my calendar.  Also, FYI, Rick JOhnson  
will be in town at the end of the week if you want a face-to-face.  MHC

Mark Greenberg@ENRON
12/03/2000 01:11 PM
Dee, Jeff, Rick -

I need to set up a meeting between the benefit group and the tax people to 
walk through the structure we want for the purchase of Project Crane.  We 
made a good bit of progress in Toronto over Thursday and Friday on the tax 
structure, but clearly indicated the need to confirm all of this in relation 
to benefit issues.  I would like to have the meeting on Monday sometime, but 
need to coordinate schedules.  As soon as possible, please advise me of your 
respective availabilities so that a meeting can be scheduled, keeping in mind 
the need to have Rick involved.

Thanks.

Mark
Senior Counsel, ENA
Phone:     713-345-8897
Facsimile: 713-646-3940
E-Mail:      Mark.Greenberg@enron.com

Dave, I am available the 27th for mediation in the Evan Lovell case.  Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

Kim, no we do not have a form b yet.  I will need one before printing 
executables

Thanks
Twanda

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

	Kim Melodick
	06/23/2000 10:08 AM
		 
See below.  Do you have a form B date?
Amy FitzPatrick
06/22/2000 06:07 PM
Spoke with Leaf - no questions or concerns.  Please prepare executable.

Amy

Kim Melodick
06/22/2000 06:56 AM
Any word from Leaf?  Are we needing an executable?

Amy FitzPatrick
06/19/2000 01:58 PM
Tim is fine with the draft agreement.  I am sending overnight to Leaf today, 
so I will come back to you with any of his comments tomorrow.

Thanks for your help in this matter.

Amy

Margaret,  thanks.  My title, FYI, is Assistant General Counsel for Enron 
North America Corp.  Thanks.  Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

	Margaret Daffin
	06/23/2000 12:22 PM
		 
Michelle:  for your information.

Margaret

Margaret Daffin
06/23/2000 12:21 PM
Attention:  Mary May Wong:  

Mary:  further to our telephone conversation this morning, I have received 
notification from Jane Allen that all invoices to Enron regarding immigration 
matters need to be sent to Michelle Cash, prior to processing for payment.

Therefore, please send them directly to:

Michelle H Cash
General Counsel
Enron Corp.
1400 Smith Street
EB3823
Houston, TX 77002

Many thanks
Margaret

Attached is a confidential draft of the Consulting Services Agreement between 
Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

Twanda,

Would you please juggle the rest of my calendar to accommodate this?  I've 
got two meetings at that time to reschedule -- try Wednesday, or with Amy on 
Tuesday morning.  Thanks a lot!

Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.
	Ana Alcantara
	06/23/2000 03:46 PM
		 
This is to confirm the time, place and attendees for the meeting w/Mariner: 

Date:   Tuesday, June 27th

 Time: 1:30pm - 5:00pm

 Place: EB 27C2

Attendees:
ENA - Brad Dunn, Michelle Cash, Lance Schuler, Jesus Melendrez
Mariner - Hunt Hodge, Mike Strickler, Kelly Zelikovic, Bob Henderson

Thank you,
Ana x35737

Sheila, do you think we should meet with Rick Buy about this?  Or, should we 
talk about it without Rick and then respond accordingly?  The bottom line is, 
that the non-compete probably should stay as is, even in the case of RAC.  
Let's discuss.  Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.
	Ted Murphy
	06/21/2000 06:25 PM
		 
	

I have reviewed the proposed contract and have the following comments:

 1) The numbers appear acceptable but only in context with the rest of my 
comments
 2) The language is such as to even give an illusion that I could act in an 
independent and objective manner
 3) There is no consideration given for the obligations to not compete, 
solicit customers and employees, and speak harsh words
 4) The length of the non-compete is ludicrous, i.e. it is so long that it 
makes no sense for Enron to pay someone for it and the marginal 6 months adds 
very   little incremental protection to Enron from a competition 
perspective.  This might be appropriate for a member of the Executive 
Committee.
 

Let me go into some more detail on the above.
Point #2
All of Senior Management has told outside constituents (The Board, 
Shareholders, Investment Analysts, Rating Agencies, Regulatory Agencies, 
Banks and Counterparties) that the RAC Group is independent of the Business 
Units.  That is, given that our job is to provide objective analysis of the 
business activities, it has provided great comfort to these interested 
parties that our judgment is not influenced by the people who are taking risk 
on behalf of the firm.  Individual compensation is the foundation of this 
independence.  These parties have made judgments to provide capital (dollar 
or otherwise) to us based on the knowledge that this group in this 
independent configuration exists and is effective.  It has been specifically 
cited in reports as a strength and we are asked to make dozens of 
presentations each year to that effect.   This is especially true in the 
Market Risk function because, unlike other transactions in the firm, there is 
no analysis and approval chain for risk taking other than coarse buckets and 
the valuation, direction, and volatility are so opaque.  Independence is a 
cornerstone of the G-30 recommendations on derivatives.  I believe that these 
parties are much more concerned with what they can't see as opposed to what 
they can. 
I believe that our claim to have an independent function would be jeopardized 
if my bonus were a function of earnings targets and a PRC full of trading 
MD's.
This should be a simple guaranteed minimum.  

Point #3
If Enron wants the right to keep me on the shelf for up to 12 months, then 
Enron needs to pay for it.  While I understand that sign on bonuses and 
retention bonuses are discouraged, I have firm evidence that low level 
commercial people are receiving both without any senior management approval.  
The amount should approximate the market price for the job (all in) for the 
period of the non-compete.  This follows to point #4 - I don't expect anyone 
to pay me such additional amounts equal to my "target" compensation for 12 
months ($500,000!!!!).   The right answer is to shorten the non-compete to a 
maximum of 6 months and pay me for that.  I think that it would be equally 
stupid for Enron to not have the right to put me on the shelf for a 
considerable period of time given that I have and must continue to have 
complete access to all positions, p&l and the underlying contracts.   I would 
consider giving Enron the option (for a smaller premium) to have me 
non-compete which, if exercised, would trigger a larger payment.

There are some other smaller points that I have discussed with Sheila Walton 
which can be addressed later.

Please give your consideration to these items asap as I my old contract has 
expired.

Ted

 

Hector, what is this all about?  MHC

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

	Hector McLoughlin
	06/21/2000 12:35 PM
		
FYI.   hgm

   
	
	

Hector:

Here is a specialist level pay point for a records management person. This is 
from a general industry survey which Enron uses.

Yvonne
Tharsilla Broussard@ENRON
06/21/2000 09:54 AM
0606  Librarian directs the classification, indexing, cataloguing and 
circulation of books, periodicals and various other documents. Conducts 
library research and prepares bibliographic summaries of findings to 
requesting personnel. Determines the need for additional source materials; 
requisitions the purchase of new sources.

Dawn,  did we ever ascertain whether Duke is being sued for fraud based upon 
his alleged conduct?  Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

	Dawn Doucet
	06/26/2000 09:51 AM
		 
Hi Michelle, we've finished our due diligence on John Guerriero from Duke.  I 
didn't speak to his references but Paul DeVries did and he and Rob Milnthorp 
are both satisfied that there were no earlier occurrences of the legal 
situation that is unfolding now (or other signs of incompetence or lack of 
judgement).  John is being courted by several companies right now and they 
want to get an offer to him today.  Just wanted to let you know where we were 
on this one....

Twanda, please print and then file -- GM/Labor Union

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.
	Rick Johnson@ENRON
	05/05/2000 01:22 PM
		 
 Attached for your review is an assessment of the General Motors RFP.  I 
focused on specifics related to labor unions, construction, and operations.  
Please call if further reviews or clarifications are desired.  I will be 
prepared to support your efforts and  determinations as this opportunity is 
developed.  I have received the two UAW collective bargaining agreements 
however, it would be premature to tackle those documents until Enron O&M 
objectives are defined.  The opportunity to support pre-construction PLA 
discussions, in concert with GM, should be anticipated Regards,  Rj.   

                                    

T:  Please print this and attachment -- file in Japan file.  Thanks.  MHC

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.
	John Viverito@ENRON
	05/11/2000 02:44 PM
		 
Michelle-

Pursuant to my voicemail, I am forwarding the attached e-mail traffic for 
your consideration.  I am unsure as to the types of testing contemplated, but 
want to ensure that such activities are permitted under Enron's policy.

Your comments on the attached agreement would also be appreciated.  

Thanks,

John
	Phillip -SYDNEY- Taylor@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	05/10/2000 05:13 PM
		 
Hi John

  Enron will be using PDI in Tokyo for candidate abilities testing prior to 
employment.  The outcome of the testing is a confidential report that comes 
to me (as HR) and I then send to the participant(s) in the recruitment 
decision making process for their confidential consumption.  PDI have agreed 
to me doing this via email, however are seeking some reassurance as to our 
use of and maintenance of confidentiality of the final product.  Can you 
review the attached and come back to me with your thoughts?  I would also 
appreciate a local (Japan) opinion on the legal issues associated with 
abilities/psych testing prior to employment (I know you guys shy away from it 
in the US although it is quite widely accepted "down under").

Thanks and regards

Phil   
Phil, 
With the e-mail transmission (using .pdf files), we'll need you or someone 
else in Enron to sign a document similar to the attached letter. Please read 
it and let me know if you want to make any changes before we fill in all the 
details.

Thanks very much, 
Douglas 
 
 - emailrelease.doc

Mark,

As I mentioned in my voice mail, here is a bullet-point synopsis of my 
accomplishments for the second half of 2000.  

Transaction Support

Triple Lutz -- provided support for potential divestiture (e.g., data room, 
PSA review, direct negotiations with potential buyer, etc.).
Project Crane -- monitored diligence, PSA review/comment, client discussions.
Garden State Paper -- provided employment law advice on closing and 
transition issues.
MG Metals -- handled issues surrounding termination of Rudolph Wolff 
employees, including separation agreements, negotiations with counsel, etc.
Project Falcon -- reviewed diligence reports, client discussions.
AMPS -- worked on diligence/transition issues.
Project Inga -- provided PSA review, diligence support.

Litigation

No employee-initiated litigation has been filed this year.
Non-compete litigation:  Jim Ajello (resolved); Alonzo Williams (pending -- 
employee went to work for TXU).
Other litigation:  Marentz & Co. v. Enron (suit for non-payment of placement 
fee) -- pending; Rick Clonch v. Cline Resources, et. al (pending in West 
Virginia -- Cline is indemnifying Enron).
Evan Lovell matter -- handled pre-litigation mediation filed by former First 
Point employee.
Todd Richardson matter -- pre-litigation demand letter sent by employee 
working for Tom Martin; resolved through negotiation.

Agreements

256 Employment agreements.
 54 Consulting agreements.
104 Separation agreement/releases.
Numerous retention letter agreements.
Drafted new Agreement for Recruiting or Contract Personnel Services (to 
replace old Master Service Agreement and Agreement for Project Services) for 
use in hiring contract personnel through agencies as well as for use with 
recruiting firms (to be rolled out 1/1/01).
Enron Investment Partners Incentive Compensation Plan -- supervised the 
drafting and execution of long-term incentive plan for EIP employees.

Asset Support

EcoElectrica -- supported company's campaign against union recognition.
East Coast Power -- provided support on employment law matters, particularly 
terminations/separation documents.
Ecogas -- gave litigation advice and wind-down support.
CGAS -- provided employment advice/counsel, drafted employment agreements, 
arranged harassment training.  
Bridgeline -- prepared assignment letter agreements to assign Enron personnel 
to Bridgeline.
Mariner -- assisted in negotiation of Mariner Change of Control Agreements.

Training

Conducted interview training for Net Works campus recruiting classes.
Provided  training sessions on employment law risks for Energy Operations 
management personnel.
Conducted employment law training for ENA Human Resources department.
Conducted sessions on ethics and harassment prevention for New Hire 
Orientation approximately once a month.

Investigations/Testing Issues

Managed confidential investigation into issues raised in anonymous letters 
sent to Office of Chairman regarding Energy Operations.  Supervised work of 
outside consultants on the project and made recommendations to client on 
survey results.
Supervised numerous investigations into allegations of harassment, computer 
hacking, discrimination, etc.
Gave advice regarding pre-employment testing to be used in trading track and 
IT re-skilling program.

Other Contributions

Participated in Legal Technology Committee  -- proposed LegalOnline site name 
and worked with PR to create logo and tag line for web site.
Participated in on-campus recruiting for Associate and Analyst Program at 
Wellesley College.
Recently became EWS legal recruiting contact -- have met with most of OGC and 
will have a staffing plan finalized in the next week.
Provided real-time legal review of HR-related E-Speak sessions.

I haven't included what I consider to be routine responsibilities such as 
providing advice on employee relations issues, attending off-sites/staff 
meetings for Olson/Oxley, attending CLE, etc.  Let me know if you would like 
more information about these activities.  If you have any questions, or if 
you would like a summary of accomplishments from the first half of the year, 
let me know.

Thanks.

Michelle

T:  Would you please print and file in Japan file?  Thanks.  MHC

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.
	Scott Gilchrist@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	05/19/2000 10:24 AM
		 
Michelle

Alan responded to this with copies to you and John Viverito -and I've lost it.

If you still have the email, could I ask a big favour and ask you to forward 
it to me. Appreciate it!
Scott Gilchrist
03/30/2000 07:30 PM
Alan

As discussed.

1)Text from B&M document on labour law relating to contract duration states

Quote

The term of an employment contract can be indefinite. However, if an 
employment agreement provides for a definite term, such term may not exceed:

a) one year, or

b) 3 years in regard to agreements with any of the following types of 
employee:

 i) a new employee with special expertise, techniquew or experience 
designated by the MOL which is necessary for research or developement of new 
products, new services, or new technologies;

 ii).a new employee with special expertise, techniquew or experience 
designated by the MOL which is necessary for services that are rendered to 
efffect start-up, change, expansion, scale down or discontinuation of a 
business and that are expected to be completed within a specific period..

Unquote

I seek clarification as to whether we can obtain MOL approval that our senior 
Japanese (say Director level) staff can be categorized under b). Thanks for 
your assistance

Michael,

I met Amy today and look forward to working with her.   Thanks for the heads 
up about her arrival here in the States.

Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

	Fiona Lavelle
	05/25/2000 05:43 AM
		 
I understand that Amy Fitzpatrick will be moving from Enron Europe to 
Portland in the near future as her husband is relocating back to the states.

As you will no doubt be dealing with Amy going forward, I thought I would let 
you know that she has worked extensively with myself and Jon Chapman and is 
also the HR rep for the Legal Department in Europe.  She has done an 
outstanding job and is an absolute pleasure to work with, so we are very 
disappointed to lose her.  However, our loss is your gain and I have asked 
her to look you up when she goes to Houston.

Speak to you soon.
Michael 

Charla, congrats and all the best in your new role.  I know you will enjoy 
the opportunity!  Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

	Charla Reese@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	06/26/2000 05:36 PM
		 
	

Friends & Colleagues

As a result of the recent restructuring of Human Resources and Enron's 
innovative redeployment efforts, I would like to let you know that I am now a 
member of the Community Relations group!  I am very excited about this new 
and challenging opportunity as Manager of Enron Corp.'s Special Events.

In addition to creatively exploring new ways of getting employees involved, 
I'll also be focusing on how we can align our activities with efforts to 
attract / retain top talent, while at the same time, leveraging our 
initiatives in the community and maintaining a global perspective.  

My new contact details are provided below:

Location: EB416
Phone:  713.853.5202
Fax:  713.646.3612

I'll be looking for ways we can all work together so consider this fair 
warning!   Hope you are all doing well & please stay in touch!!

Charla
x35202

Jim, Thanks for this.  Would you please let me know how much we owe?  Would 
you like to join us for the game?  Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

	"Bensfield, James" <JBensfield@milchev.com>
	06/27/2000 08:58 AM
		 
 Michelle:  You have 6 seats for the Orioles-White Sox game on Monday
evening, August 14.  These are the "firm seats" that I mentioned -- along
the third baseline above the visitor's dugout.  Game time is 7:35 p.m.  I'll
send the tickets down to you in the next day or two.  Have fun!    

FYI.

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.
	"Bensfield, James" <JBensfield@milchev.com>
	06/27/2000 08:58 AM
		 
 Michelle:  You have 6 seats for the Orioles-White Sox game on Monday
evening, August 14.  These are the "firm seats" that I mentioned -- along
the third baseline above the visitor's dugout.  Game time is 7:35 p.m.  I'll
send the tickets down to you in the next day or two.  Have fun!    

Trey, FYI.  MHC

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.
	"Bensfield, James" <JBensfield@milchev.com>
	06/27/2000 11:31 AM
		 
 You owe nothing, and I'll have to let you know later about whether I
(or we) can join you.

Jim, Thanks for this.  Would you please let me know how much we owe?  Would
you
like to join us for the game?  Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

|--------+------------------------>
|        |          "Bensfield,   |
|        |          James"        |
|        |          <JBensfield@mi|
|        |          lchev.com>    |
|        |                        |
|        |          06/27/2000    |
|        |          08:58 AM      |
|        |                        |
|--------+------------------------>

>---------------------------------------------------------------------------
-|
  |
|
>---------------------------------------------------------------------------
-|

     Michelle:  You have 6 seats for the Orioles-White Sox game on Monday
evening, August 14.  These are the "firm seats" that I mentioned -- along
the third baseline above the visitor's dugout.  Game time is 7:35 p.m.  I'll
send the tickets down to you in the next day or two.  Have fun!

Jim,

If you are sure you don't want reimbursement, then thanks a lot!!!  I hope 
that you both can join us.  If not, let's plan on another arrangement.  We 
are planning to stay at the Doubletree Suites in/near Georgetown (apparently, 
it is close to the Watergate).  It was way less expensive than the Embassy 
Suites we discussed the other day (approx. $100 per night!).  We are renting 
a car, though, so we can get around wherever we need to -- or, of course, we 
can take the Metro.

Talk to you later.

Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

	"Bensfield, James" <JBensfield@milchev.com>
	06/27/2000 11:31 AM
		 
 You owe nothing, and I'll have to let you know later about whether I
(or we) can join you.

Jim, Thanks for this.  Would you please let me know how much we owe?  Would
you
like to join us for the game?  Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

|--------+------------------------>
|        |          "Bensfield,   |
|        |          James"        |
|        |          <JBensfield@mi|
|        |          lchev.com>    |
|        |                        |
|        |          06/27/2000    |
|        |          08:58 AM      |
|        |                        |
|--------+------------------------>

>---------------------------------------------------------------------------
-|
  |
|
>---------------------------------------------------------------------------
-|

     Michelle:  You have 6 seats for the Orioles-White Sox game on Monday
evening, August 14.  These are the "firm seats" that I mentioned -- along
the third baseline above the visitor's dugout.  Game time is 7:35 p.m.  I'll
send the tickets down to you in the next day or two.  Have fun!

Dear Gretchen:  

Wow!  You are thinking ahead!  What is a Leap Pad?  Is it something computer 
related? I have never heard of it.

On our end, we have planned a trip to DC to visit Madison in August -- nice 
and hot by then.  We just got word that we have tix to the Orioles game while 
we are there, so that is good.  We got new furniture in the living room -- a 
chocolate brown suede/leather sofa and chair/ottoman.  It amplified the need 
for bright art in that room -- to the galleries and starving artists sales we 
go!

Stay cool -- Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

	"wpcashjr" <wpcashjr@email.msn.com>
	06/27/2000 03:43 PM
		 
Hi!? The heat has gotten to us!? We are  thinking Christmas.? We would like 
to give C a Leap Pad if he doesn't have  one and you and T think it would be 
appropriate.? The item is for ages 4  and up but we do not think C is too 
young for it and hopefully it will get him  to read more.? Nothing exciting 
happening here.? Just waiting, waiting  for furniture, materials, etc.? Takes 
forever as you well know.?  What's happening your end?? G? 

Don,  I tried to call you this evening, but unfortunately missed you.  I am 
available in the afternoon tomorrow.  Please call my assistant, Twanda Sweet, 
to confirm a time.  Her extension is 3-9402.  Thanks.  Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

	Don Miller
	06/27/2000 04:17 PM
		 
Michelle,

I was given your name as a contact to discuss the HR/Labor issues for 
creating a JV.  We are evaluating a JV for our Merchant Generation, and need 
to talk through a number of issues with you.  I am available any time 
tomorrow.  Please let me know your availability.

Thanks,

Don
3-0492

Rhonna, you know there's an espeak with Cindy Olson on Friday at 10:00, 
right?  Perhaps that should be advertised in the floor meeting . . . .  
Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

	Rhonna Palmer
	06/27/2000 06:20 PM
		 
There will be a HR floor meeting on Friday morning, June 30 beginning at 
8:30.  Please come to EB3676A.  Your attendance is appreciated.  Breakfast 
will be provided.

Trey Cash@ENRON
11/02/2000 03:23 PM
They must be hurting for business -- but I thought you might want to take a 
look at their site.

L, T
JGS Alumni Office <jgsalum@rice.edu> on 11/02/2000 02:25:55 PM
A message of "holiday greetings" from a JGS alum...

Ashford.com (www.ashford.com) would like to offer the employees, students
and alumni of Rice University
a 20% discount off of the items on our site - just in time for the holidays!
Whether you are looking a fantastic gift for a loved one, or the perfect
corporate gift, you can now save 20% off Ashford.com's irresistible
selection of luxury brands*. We have a vast collection of fine watches,
vintage watches,
pens, designer jewelry, sunglasses, ties, scarves, diamonds, handbags and
leather goods - all just a click away.

The e-coupon code is 6B368AAAAA - expiration date is
12/31/00, not good with any other promotional offers.

Feel free to pass it along.

Here are the details:
To save the 20%, simply enter the coupon code on your online order form
during checkout.

*There are some restrictions on the coupon. It is not valid on loose
diamonds, select jewelry items, fragrances, items on our Corporate Gifts
site and gift certificates. Each coupon is only valid for one use per
email. It is not valid with any other coupon, special, or promotion. And
finally, it expires on December 31, 2000 - so act fast!

HAPPY HOLIDAYS & HAPPY SHOPPING! Take care.

Amy Oates Fitzgerald
Director of Brand Marketing
Ashford.com
713-369-2380
aoates@ashford.com

Trey,  Unfortunately, I do not know of any position at Enron that would be 
available.  I think that Bracewell may be looking for people, as might 
Littler, Mendelson.  I hope that helps. Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

	Trey Cash@ENRON
	06/27/2000 05:04 PM
		 
Do you know of any such opportunities?

Trey
Tara Rafter
06/27/2000 04:59 PM
Trey,

I have a friend that is a 5th year lawyer who has 4 years of labor and 
employment experience with a large law firm and a labor boutique firm (both 
here in town)- this person has asked me if Enron might have a need for a 
labor and employment lawyer with these kind of credentials.  Would you pretty 
please ask your wife if she is aware of any potential opportunities.  

Thanks - Tara

Brian,

Would you or someone in your group please investigate the allegations raised 
by Janeth Rodriguez-Philhower?  Based upon her voice mail message, there is a 
strong possibility of litigation.  Your investigation into her allegations 
thus would be conducted in anticipation of litigation.

Once you have conducted the investigation, please provide me with the results.

Thank you.

Michelle 

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

T:  Please print this and attachments.  Thanks.  MHC

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.
	Peter del Vecchio
	06/27/2000 09:31 PM
		 
	"GEORGE T. LEE" <GTLEE@LLGM.COM>
	06/27/2000 05:29 PM
		 
  Attached are revised drafts of the Purchase and Sale Agreement relating to 
Garden State Paper Company, Inc., one of which has been marked to show 
changes from the prior draft (6/16/00) distributed to you. Please recognize 
that this draft is being distributed prior to the completion of Enron's due 
diligence review.  In particular, bracketed provisions merit further 
discussion and/or review.  Please contact us with your comments at 
713-287-2004 or 713-287-2066.

Sincerely,

Benjamin G. Clark and George T. Lee

This e-mail, including attachments, contains information that is confidential 
and it may be protected by the  attorney/client or other priviliges.  This 
e-mail, including attachments, constitutes non-public information intended to 
be conveyed only to the designated recipient(s).  If you are not an intentded 
recipient, please delete this e-mail, including attachments, and notify me by 
return mail, e-mail or at 713-287-2066.  The unauthorized use, dissemination, 
distribution or reproduction of this e-mail, including attachments is 
prohibited and may be unlawful.  George T. Lee, gtlee@llgm.com.

 - Purchase.DOC
 - Purchas1.DOC

Thanks for the description.  Last night, I asked Trey about it, and we went 
onto Amazon.com to look at it.  It looks like a cool toy that Cameron would 
enjoy.  FYI:  the price at Amazon was way less than the price at etoys.  As a 
matter of fact, I told Trey that it would be great to have it for our trip to 
DC in August!  But, we can wait til Christmas, so go ahead with your plans.

Congrats on the furniture.  I am sure that you will be happy with it and will 
love the new look. 

See ya.  Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

	"wpcashjr" <wpcashjr@email.msn.com>
	06/27/2000 09:11 PM
		 
Leap pad looks like an open book when placed in a child's lap.  There is an
attached pen type instrument which the child can use to point to various
things on the pages and also to indicate whether he/she would like the word
to be pronounced, spelled or sounded.  It comes with a book but other books
can be purchased to be placed in the pad.  That's the best description I can
give since I have never used one.  Check it out when you go to the toy
store.  Good news - several pieces of our living/dining  room furniture are
being delivered tomorrow with all new coordinated materials!  Happy art
looking.  It is fun to look for things to brighten up a room.  G

FYI; I forgot to cc you!  Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.
	Michelle Cash
	06/28/2000 10:04 AM
		
Thanks for the description.  Last night, I asked Trey about it, and we went 
onto Amazon.com to look at it.  It looks like a cool toy that Cameron would 
enjoy.  FYI:  the price at Amazon was way less than the price at etoys.  As a 
matter of fact, I told Trey that it would be great to have it for our trip to 
DC in August!  But, we can wait til Christmas, so go ahead with your plans.

Congrats on the furniture.  I am sure that you will be happy with it and will 
love the new look. 

See ya.  Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

	"wpcashjr" <wpcashjr@email.msn.com>
	06/27/2000 09:11 PM
		 
Leap pad looks like an open book when placed in a child's lap.  There is an
attached pen type instrument which the child can use to point to various
things on the pages and also to indicate whether he/she would like the word
to be pronounced, spelled or sounded.  It comes with a book but other books
can be purchased to be placed in the pad.  That's the best description I can
give since I have never used one.  Check it out when you go to the toy
store.  Good news - several pieces of our living/dining  room furniture are
being delivered tomorrow with all new coordinated materials!  Happy art
looking.  It is fun to look for things to brighten up a room.  G

Brian, THANK YOU for taking a role in the rotation!!  Let me know if you need 
help with the script.  Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.
	Kriste Sullivan@ENRON
	06/28/2000 10:59 AM
		 
Attached is the REVISED presentation schedule for July 2000 to December 
2000.  

Kriste K. Sullivan
Enron Corp. Legal
1400 Smith, EB 4861
Houston, TX  77002
(713) 853-7557
(713) 646-5847 Fax
KSulliv@Enron.com

Trey, would you please print this for me at home?  Thanks.  M

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.
	Kriste Sullivan@ENRON
	06/28/2000 10:59 AM
		 
Attached is the REVISED presentation schedule for July 2000 to December 
2000.  

Kriste K. Sullivan
Enron Corp. Legal
1400 Smith, EB 4861
Houston, TX  77002
(713) 853-7557
(713) 646-5847 Fax
KSulliv@Enron.com

FYI.  Michelle 

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.
	Pamela J Allison
	06/28/2000 03:43 PM
		 
Please make copies of the attached and substitute it for the old Form B in 
new hire packets.  I am also working with Forms Management to put it in their 
book so you can order a supply.

If you have questions about the form, please call Kriste Sullivan at the 
number below.
	
	

06/01/2000 10:52 AM
Kriste Sullivan
Kriste Sullivan
Kriste Sullivan
06/01/2000 10:52 AM
06/01/2000 10:52 AM
Sent by: Tanja Murray
Below please find the distribution list for the Confidentiality and 
Intellectual Property Rights Agreement.  Also find the revised 
Confidentiality and Intellectual Property Rights Agreement.  If you have any 
questions, I can be reached at the number below.

Kriste K. Sullivan
Enron Corp. Legal
EB 4861
Ext. 37557

yes.

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

	FMackin@aol.com
	06/29/2000 11:23 AM
		 
Michelle,

Re:  "This is awful," the behavior of the supervisor, the president or the
court?

<g>

Pat

Dee,

I left you a voice mail yesterday, but I wasn't sure if you were in.

There is a new deal -- Project E2/Endeavor.  It is in the preliminary stages, 
but the deal team (led by Don Miller) would like to have data regarding the 
average cost of Enron employee benefits, broken down by type of benefit, if 
possible.  I assume that you would have that type of data and could forward 
it to Don and me.

Let me know if I should be contacting someone else.

Thanks a lot!

Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

Cheryl,

Thanks so much for extending your business trip to visit us in Houston.  I 
had a blast with you being here.

I hope that you didn't get sick -- I'd feel awful if you did.  I still have 
the sniffles, but managed to avoid the worst of it (so far).  Cameron perked 
right up after the antibiotics kicked in.   He is his usual self today 
(happily -- he was kind of a pest this weekend --  you really saw him at his 
worst, unfortunately).  We watched How the Grinch Stole Christmas today on 
the Cartoon Network, and he was happy as can be.

I hope you can manage the February trip and weren't frightened off by the 
rough time here last weekend.  When we're not sick, we're really much more 
fun!!  Besides, the pig races await.

gotta go.

Michelle

I hope that helps. 

Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

	Kriste.Sullivan@enron.com
	06/29/2000 09:37 AM
		 
We have had some legal interns  that were on rotations in the Company
,however, I am not sure what program that they were attributed to within
Enron.  I believe it was the old diversity program.   I do not know the
state of affairs today with respect to legal interns or associates.  You
may want to check with Michelle Cash as she may know if ENA has any legal
interns or associates.

Kriste K. Sullivan
Enron Corp. Legal
1400 Smith, EB 4861
Houston, TX  77002
(713) 853-7557
(713) 646-5847 Fax
KSulliv@Enron.com

This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

                    Molly
Do you have some sort of policy about hiring lawyers?  We have received a
resume, but didn't know if anyone in Legal would be interested in seeing
it.

Thanks,
Molly
Charlene Jackson@ENRON
06/26/2000 06:25 PM

Lexi,
I don't think the legal department takes candidates without prior legal
experience.  Molly, will you check with Kriste or Sharon on their policy so
that we know for the future.
Lexi, there may be some interest in our Program if he is interested and has
had some type of finance experience.  Give me a copy of his resume.

Thanks

Twanda, please prepare a consulting agreement.  Thanks.  Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.
	Lloyd Will
	06/29/2000 03:54 PM
		 
Michelle as discussed please prepare a consulting agreement for a contract 
with Kema consulting.  I have attached one of their sample contracts for your 
review.

Effective July 3rd for 6 months.
Company Name - Kema ECC, Inc. 
Location- Fairfax Virginia 22033-3899 
Fee structure that we have agreed to is on a task release basis and is not to 
exceed $50,000 (all costs).
The fee schedule is missing and I will forward it to you as soon as I receive 
it.  
Please ensure that non disclosure wording is included in this contract. 

Description of service

KEMA Consulting will assist the Enron "team" to create a new "Fundamental 
Analysis System" by performing a concentrated review of the following areas:
 Systems Architecture
 Middleware
 Market Interfaces
 Data warehousing
 User Interface

This review will result in the creation of a systems requirements document 
and overall plan.  As part of this service Kema will also provide a guardian 
role and detailed consulting on a as required basis during the term of this 
contract.

The Enron Signatory will be Kevin Presto  V.P. Enron Power Marketing.

Thanks. 

Parvis Sigari <psigari@kemaconsulting.com> on 06/29/2000 11:41:35 AM
X-Mozilla-Status2: 00000000

X-Mozilla-Status2: 00000000

Lloyd:
Sorry it was our e-mail system. Enclosed please find the sample
agreement.
Thanks
Parvis

 - sample consulting agreement.wpd.doc

Pam,  I spoke with Rex through several voice mails early this week.  I have 
initialed the agreement and sent it to Gene for signature.  I expect that it 
has been signed already.  Have a great holiday.  Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

	Pam Butler@ENRON
	06/24/2000 03:14 PM
		 
Michele, can you please provide me with the status?  I never heard back from 
Rex.  Did you?

Twanda, what do we need to do with this information?  How do we get Emma 
paid?  Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.
	Legal Temp 6
	06/30/2000 01:08 PM
		 
Michelle, here are my hours for this week.

Monday 26 - 7h 45m
Tuesday 27 - 4h 45m
Wednesday 28 - 7h 45m
Thursday 29 - 8h
Friday - 8h

Total Hours - 36h 15m

Thanks 

Emma

Pat, here is additional information about the transaction we have been 
working on.  Of course, they are going to finalize tomorrow.  I agree with 
your concerns about the tortious interference situation.  Do you have any 
suggestions on mitigating that risk?  My thought would be to request an 
indemnity for the t.i. claim if it is received.  Alternatively, we can ask 
for a waiver for all persons who are terminated and ask that  the buyer be a 
beneficiary/waived party.  Any ideas?

Michelle

Generally speaking, nothing has changed since we last spoke.  One small 
change is currently contemplated however.   Seller has insisted that we give 
them a maximum number of non-union employees that we will want them to 
terminate.  We have suggested that the maximum number be 30.  This seems good 
at least for WARN Act purposes.  As it is currently contemplated (not in the 
documents but rather in the most recent negotiations), we would provide the 
Seller with written notice (no later than 3 or 4 business days before closing 
but after our financing contingency has expired) as to which employees would 
need to be terminated.  One other thing that I have heard is that we want the 
Seller to be the terminating party because the commercial folks would prefer 
not to have to tell our analysts that we did the firing.  If you and the 
other labor folks feel strongly about making the Buyer the terminating party, 
please call me ASAP and I can hook you in with Rodney Malcolm et al to 
discuss.  The deal is set to be finalized tomorrow.

Stuart

Amy,

Is Patrick Chris Mallory located in Portland or in California?  If 
California, then he needs a slightly different agreement because non-competes 
are not enforceable in California.  

Let me know.  (I hope he is in Oregon!)

Thanks. 

Michelle

Pat,

I am going to forward you a draft of an amendment to the employment agreement 
for Greg Whalley.  I would appreciate your thoughts on the language, 
particularly the language in amended section 2.1b regarding the calculation 
of value for options/restricted stock.  

For some reason, I cannot attach it to this email, so I will have my 
assistant send it under separate email cover.

Thanks a lot.

Michelle

Here's the latest.  Michelle

  Attached are revised drafts of the Purchase Agreement, one of which has 
been marked to show the changes from the July 8 draft that was distributed to 
you.  In the interest of time, this draft is being circulated prior to its 
review by any one at Enron, and it remains subject to our client's comments.  
Please call me at 713-287-2066 or Ben Clark at 713-287-2004 with your 
comments at your earliest conveniece.

Sincerely
George T. Lee

This e-mail, including attachments, contains information that is confidential 
and it may be protected by the  attorney/client or other priviliges.  This 
e-mail, including attachments, constitutes non-public information intended to 
be conveyed only to the designated recipient(s).  If you are not an intentded 
recipient, please delete this e-mail, including attachments, and notify me by 
return mail, e-mail or at 713-287-2066.  The unauthorized use, dissemination, 
distribution or reproduction of this e-mail, including attachments is 
prohibited and may be unlawful.  George T. Lee, gtlee@llgm.com.

 - Purchase.DOC
 - Purchas1.DOC

Privileged and Confidential
This email contains legal advice and confidentiality should be maintained

The attached memo describes a recent decision from the National Labor 
Relations Board regarding an employee's right to be "represented" by a 
co-worker or other person during a disciplinary meeting.  Employees in 
unionized settings always have had this right, but it now has been extended 
by the NLRB's ruling.

 The ruling was contentious -- there were dissents -- and I expect it to be 
appealed quickly.  Nonetheless, if an Enron employee wants to have someone 
sit in on a disciplinary meeting, please call me to discuss how to proceed 
before responding to that request.  We want to be careful to avoid a finding 
of an unfair labor practice.

Thanks.  Michelle
Leah Smith <lsmith@bracepatt.com> on 07/13/2000 09:42:00 AM
 - WEINGART.WPD

Kristina,  

Attached is the letter we give to all persons who terminate from ENA 
voluntarily (although I don't really know why we limit it to voluntary 
terminations -- I have to look into that).  I also will send you by messenger 
the draft letter to a company (which I don't have on the system) and the 
letter I sent to the individual we discussed.

I hope these help.  Let me know if you would like additional information.

Michelle

 Just and FYI- This letter is used for Voluntary Termination's Only.

vp

Molly, my meeting with Carlos is at 3:30 on Friday.  Thanks.  Michelle

   

Sure thing.

Molly

Michelle Cash
12/05/2000 10:31 AM
Molly, could you please schedule interviews with Carlos Sole (resume 
attached) with Barbara Gray?  I think there may be others as well.  He's 
meeting with me on Friday.  Thanks.  Michelle

 I think we should speak with this candidate about a position in our 
group..................working with Peggy on Mexican matters

	Michelle Cash
	12/04/2000 10:04 PM
		 
Attached is the resume of Carlos Sole, who currently is working for EECC.  He 
is interested in pursuing opportunities within EWS, and we received excellent 
references about his work performance from John Schwartzenburg and Kay Mann.  
I am meeting with him on Friday of this week (he is out of town until then).  
If you have an interest in talking with him, let me know, and I will arrange 
a meeting.

Thanks.  Michelle

Michelle, per my voicemail as I indicated, I am trying to pursue what 
opportunities may be available at EWS and both Julia Murray and Kay Mann 
recommended that I contact you.  As background, I have been at EECC since 
October last year where I have focused on traditional EPC contracts and joint 
venture agreements with construction partners, cross-border financing 
agreements principally in Mexico and merger and acquisition/strategic 
investment transactions.  Before coming to Enron, I worked with the Houston 
office of a New York based firm (Curtis, Mallet-Prevost, Colt & Mosle)  where 
I focused mostly on transactions in Mexico since we represented Pemex on 
their transactions involving long and short term oil supply agreements and 
CFE (Mexico's electricity commission) on its public bids for EPC and IPP 
projects.  Lastly, I started my legal career in 1994 at Patton Boggs in 
Washington, DC where I focused on general domestic corporate transactions 
such as establishing new business entities (ie, joint venture work, 
partnerships etc.), m & a work, and securities offerings.  Thanks for your 
consideration and I look forward to talking with you when you return from 
vacation (my extension is 6-6127).  

t:  please print for me.  thanks.  mhc

	

Michelle,

Here is what I have prepared for those items that were assigned to me.   I 
know you will have questions so if we need to get together tomorrow that is 
fine and we can review the backup data.

t:  please print for me.  thanks. mhc

Michelle, 
This is to the best of my recollection from my daytimer, scheduler, and phone 
log. 
Let me know if you need anything else.   Please keep me in the loop.
I'd like to know when Sally is briefed.  
Thanks, hgm

Amy,

It looks like my presence in Portland is iffy at this point.  There are other 
ways to do the training if you still want it asap.  Otherwise, I can schedule 
it a few weeks from now.  I'll give you the details as I confirm my situation 
with the Portland trip.

Michelle

Amy FitzPatrick
07/11/2000 06:31 PM
Michelle -

As of now, does this date still work for you?  I want to get out information 
to let the employees know about the sessions - I was a bit hesitant to do so 
before now just in case you did have to cance.

I hope that you are well.

Kind regards -
Amy

Michelle Cash
06/30/2000 03:03 PM
Amy, that day may not work after all.  I'll get back with you if it doesn't. 

 In any event, the training lasts about an hour.  I'll need a video player 
and a projector for a powerpoint presentation.  

Thanks.  Michelle

Amy FitzPatrick
06/30/2000 04:56 PM
Michelle -

It looks like the 26th of July works best for everyone here.  I hope that 
this date still works for you.

Can you let me know how long the sessions take and what a good number is so 
that I can get these scheduled?

Thanks and have a great weekend.
Amy

Privileged and Confidential 
Attorney-Client Communication
This E-Mail Contains Legal Advice

In the Barbed Wire Purchase Agreement is the provision that the Purchaser has 
45 days to identify those employees of Company whom it would like the Company 
to terminate from employment prior to closing.  The Seller is providing a 
limited indemnity for Purchaser's actions in selecting those employees.  The 
indemnity expressly excludes claims against ENA for the selection of those 
employees.  This indemnity thus excludes claims for discrimination on the 
basis of age, sex, race, religion, etc.  The indemnity exclusion also could 
be interpreted to exclude claims for tortious interference.

Thus, if ENA is going to exercise its right to select Company employees under 
that provision, ENA will assume the risk of claims by affected employees.  I 
can assist  you in identifying legal risks in the selection process and 
determining methods to manage the risks of those claims.

Let me know if you would like to discuss this issue.

Michelle Cash
x3-6401

Attached for your review is a memo from Michelle and Kriste regarding the 
above referenced.

memo

Assignment Letter

I am going to send these one at a time because they want all fit in one email.

Twanda, could you please print for my review?  Thanks a lot!  MHC
	Michael Slade
	07/21/2000 08:26 AM
	
Hello Michelle

Twanda gave me your name - would it be possible for you to have a quick look 
through the attached consulting agreement that our new acquisition, MG Plc, 
wish to enter into with Colorado Global Resources, and confirm that it is in 
order?

Many thanks.

I have added a Schedule 1 listing the services, and other than filling in the 
standard gaps I haven't changed anything substantive.

Best wishes

Michael
Enron Europe Legal

t; please prnt for me thx

PR have confirmed that it was forwarded to Mike Casey  in Missouri - as 
instructed by Mike Hutchinson .

Regards

Melissa

Hoyt Thomas@ENRON
22/07/2000 00:10
Melissa, was this info forwarded to US and Canadian employees as well?

Hoyt
	Enron Europe
	

FYI
Fiona Grant
21/07/2000 14:19
Dear all,

As promised at today's weekly team meeting, please find attached a copy of 
the "policies and procedures" information that was distributed yesterday to 
MG staff.   
We will be facilitating meetings next Thursday here at Enron House on this 
material so as to afford MG staff an opportunity to ask questions, etc.

Fiona

Ann, I am following up on the status of the research involving Section 6.4 of 
the SPA; specifically, what are the potential liabilities of Enron selecting 
persons for termination and providing those names to the Seller?  I would 
like to have this research asap because our time table is very short.  Do you 
have any information on that?  Thanks.  Michelle Cash

Mr. del Vecchio and Ms. Cash,

We are following up regarding the outstanding benefits issues in the GSP 
purchase.  It is very important that certain benefits matters be addressed 
and resolved before the Closing Date.

Attached is a copy of our Benefits Required Action list, which was sent to 
Dolores Lenfest, Mark Greenberg, and Mr. del Vecchio on July 21, 2000.  We 
spoke with Stuart Zisman today, who suggested we make sure that both of you 
have receive a recent copy of the list.  (Please let us know if you have any 
problems opening the WordPerfect document.  The page set-up to print should 
be 'landscape'.)

Among the outstanding issues is the amount of potential withdrawal liability 
existing in the 2 multiemployer pension plans.   These numbers should be 
requested from the multiemployer plans as soon as possible.  A concern has 
been raised as to whether requesting such information from the multiemployer 
plans will create problems with the union or plan because the union or plan 
might be given the false impression that GSP anticipates terminating these 
benefits.  We do not expect any such problems (especially if the plan is told 
that the sale is anticipated and the buyer wants to make sure of its 
potential liabilities).  A request for withdrawal liability, although not a 
daily event, is something that falls within the ordinary administration of a 
plan.   The plans should either have this amount immediately available, or be 
able to calculate this amount for you.  If you would like us to assist you 
with obtaining this information, please let us know.

We have included Dolores Lenfest as the responsible person for the majority 
of the required actions, since she had been our main contact.  If any of 
these actions have been assigned to another responsible party, please let us 
know.

Thank you.
Ann Murray

CONFIDENTIALITY NOTICE:

This e-mail, including attachments, contains information that is confidential 
and it may be
protected by the attorney/client or other privileges.  This e-mail, including 
attachments,
constitutes non-public information intended to be conveyed only to the 
designated recipient(s).  If
you are not an intended recipient, please delete this e-mail, including 
attachments, and notify me
by return mail, e-mail or at (904) 630-5336.  The unauthorized use,
dissemination, distribution or reproduction of this e-mail, including 
attachments, is prohibited and
may be unlawful.

Ann E. Murray
LeBoeuf, Lamb, Greene & MacRae
50 N. Laura St. Suite 2800
Jacksonville, FL 32202
(904) 630-5336
amurray@llgm.com
Date: Fri, 21 Jul 2000 18:20:37 -0400
Attached in WordPerfect format is a required action list for benefits items.  
This list is intended to be a starting point for transferring and setting up 
new benefits plans for GSP employees.

If you have any questions or concerns, please let us know.  Also, please let 
us know if you prefer this document in Word format.

Thank you,
Ann Murray

CONFIDENTIALITY NOTICE:

This e-mail, including attachments, contains information that is confidential 
and it may be
protected by the attorney/client or other privileges.  This e-mail, including 
attachments,
constitutes non-public information intended to be conveyed only to the 
designated recipient(s).  If
you are not an intended recipient, please delete this e-mail, including 
attachments, and notify me
by return mail, e-mail or at (904) 630-5336.  The unauthorized use,
dissemination, distribution or reproduction of this e-mail, including 
attachments, is prohibited and
may be unlawful.

Ann E. Murray
LeBoeuf, Lamb, Greene & MacRae
50 N. Laura St. Suite 2800
Jacksonville, FL 32202
(904) 630-5336
amurray@llgm.com

 - 0153366.01

I will look closely at the sample letters to see whether there is any way to 
avoid the conclusion you have reached, which appears to be the correct one.  
I have a meeting right now, and will focus on it right after that -- I'll 
send another email once I've completed that review early this afternoon.  
Michelle

Hoyt Thomas@ENRON
07/28/2000 11:23 AM
Michelle, Melissa Laing and I talked to Jon Chapman today, and basically Jon 
deferred to you, since the RW employees in NY are a question for US 
employment law.

Melissa and I do believe that the  RW US-based employees that were given 
UK-style employment letters, such as the sample one I gave you, are our 
employees, because of those letters; they were given "offer letters" by MG 
before the MG/Enron deal went unconditional and in most cases they accepted 
them, so they were MG employees when all MG employees became our employees.  
If it is a fact that they are Enron employees, we have to figure out the 
liability associated with terminating them!  

It appears that on Monday, MG and Enron leadership will decide to exit some 
of the London and New York RW business that MG acquired, and some (minimum 9, 
max 15) of the former RW employees will need to be terminated during 
August.   John Sheriff and Gary Hickerson both want to know the cost of that 
decision.   Right now we are assuming that we are liable for the severance 
periods stated in the offer letters to the people; we would like to be able 
to avoid that cost  (estimated at $700k and $1.5M, depending on who is 
redundant) or reduce it if possible.  However, if it is your recommendation 
that we have to honor those letters, so be it.

If you have any questions, please call Melissa Laing (tie line 8303 6617) in 
the UK and she can find me.  Thanks.

Hoyt

Michelle Cash@ECT
07/28/2000 10:10 AM
Hoyt, I am convinced that the MG employees are ours.  The RW employees may or 
may not be ours.  It is my understanding that we own the assets of RW, and 
that we decided to hire certain, key personnel from RW.  The remaining RW 
employees do not automatically come with the assets.  I am working on 
obtaining more information on the RW side of things from lawyers here in the 
US.  Key to employment decisions will be provisions of the asset purchase 
agreement, if any are applicable.  You might check with Jon Chapman in the UK 
to see whether he has any more information on this point.  Thanks.  Michelle

Hoyt Thomas@ENRON
07/28/2000 04:12 AM
	

Justin Boyd said he talked to you, are you convinced that the MG and RW 
employees are now ours?

Assuming that you do:

I will bring copies of all the offer letters MG wrote to RW employees, I 
think there are something like 27 or 28.  They are all very similar to the 
one or two that I have already given you.

I believe that we will not want to keep some of the businesses that are being 
acquired with Rudolph Wolff, particularly the FX business in New York.  
Naturally, some of the people in the potentially discontinued business 
received the onerous letters.  Gary Hickerson has to decide what he is going 
to do with this by August 18, if not sooner.  With the letters that were 
delivered , I would like to get an opinion from you on what we have to do to 
terminate the people associated with the business, assuming that Gary wants 
to shut it down.

Also, MG have 4 to 6 employees in Montreal.  We (HR) are trying to convince 
the business side that we do not want any people in Montreal because of the 
employment laws . . . but it does not appear that we will succeed.  We may 
reduce the size of the office, though, and we may not want to put them on the 
Canadian payroll, particularly is we only keep 1-2 people there.  Do you have 
contacts in Montreal that can advise us on how to terminate any employees 
that we choose to terminate?  What would be the Enron position on having them 
on a separate payroll from Enron Canada?

Thanks
Hoyt

Gracie,

Based upon my brief review of her comments, many are not acceptable.  Without 
a convincing explanation, I am not going to delete entire sections of our 
agreement, particularly when those sections protect Enron.  Please get with 
her (not by copy of this privileged email) and ask for reasons why she wants 
the changes. 

Thanks.  Michelle

Gracie S Presas
11/22/2000 08:42 AM
Please see Paige's comments.  Let me know if any of this is not appropriate 
for us to change/add.  
In Section 2 Services
b.  ....reproduction of books   (should not be included)

Gracie
ppatt@vzinet.com (ppatt on 11/21/2000 08:42:13 PM
Gracie,
?
Here are my comments so  far on the contract you gave me last week.
?
Paige
 - November 21.doc

Dee, what do you think?  I suggest that we let them handle that, but defer to 
your opinion.  Thanks.  Michelle

Dean,

Michelle Cash is responsible for all employment, union and benefits issues.  
I will let her make that call.

Thanks,

Peter del Vecchio

	"Dean Crawford" <dcrawford@davis.ca>
	12/04/2000 08:41 PM
		 
Mr. Del Vecchio,
?
We have received materials concerning the pension plan for non-union  
employees at Celgar. The company's latest actuarial report disclosed that as 
of  January 1, 2000:
?
1. The going-concern liabilities exceeded the actuarial value of assets  by? 
C$1,922,342; and
?
2.? The solvency liabilities exceeds the market value of plan assets  by? 
C$1,805,819.
?
We have also received the full text of the plan and its amendments.
?
Will you be reviewing these matters internally or shall we retain a local  
actuarial firm to perform the due diligence?

FYI, here is information relating to the voice mail I forwarded to you late 
Friday.  I will be on vacation the dates they want to handle diligence, so 
one of you may need to handle it.  Let's see what happens. . .  Michelle
Patrick Wade
07/28/2000 05:27 PM
I have scheduled a meeting for Monday (7/31) at 4:00 at an EB location to be 
determined to finalize the Project Crane Deal Team, and get everyone up to 
speed on the latest developments.

For those of you I have not spoken with, our counterparty has accelerated the 
schedule, and as a result we only have a couple of weeks to assemble a team 
for the data room.  The data room process will begin on Sunday evening, 
August 13 in Quebec City, Quebec, and end Friday, August 18 in Port Angeles, 
Washington, with a travel day in between mills on Wednesday.  My assistant, 
Susie Fallon will handle all the travel arrangements.  We will receive an 
updated itenerary and index of the data room the middle of next week.  I will 
distribute the information memorandum at Monday's meeting.  I apologize for 
the short notice, but look forward to working with you all on this 
transaction.

Thanks,
Patrick

fyi.  michelle
Bret Scholtes@ENRON
07/31/2000 09:58 AM
Today's 4:00pm meeting to discuss Project Crane will be held in Conference 
Room 5C2.  We will bring copies of the Information Memorandum, Data Room 
Checklist and Working Group List for anyone that does not have these items.  
If you have any questions or need additional information, please contact 
Patrick Wade (x39396) or myself (x58297).

Regards
Bret

   

Patrick Wade@ECT
07/28/2000 05:27 PM
I have scheduled a meeting for Monday (7/31) at 4:00 at an EB location to be 
determined to finalize the Project Crane Deal Team, and get everyone up to 
speed on the latest developments.

For those of you I have not spoken with, our counterparty has accelerated the 
schedule, and as a result we only have a couple of weeks to assemble a team 
for the data room.  The data room process will begin on Sunday evening, 
August 13 in Quebec City, Quebec, and end Friday, August 18 in Port Angeles, 
Washington, with a travel day in between mills on Wednesday.  My assistant, 
Susie Fallon will handle all the travel arrangements.  We will receive an 
updated itenerary and index of the data room the middle of next week.  I will 
distribute the information memorandum at Monday's meeting.  I apologize for 
the short notice, but look forward to working with you all on this 
transaction.

Thanks,
Patrick

Don Miller
08/01/2000 10:24 AM
Many of you that had an interest in E2/Endeavor probably heard yesterday that 
FPL and Entergy agreed to merge.  This was a complete surprise to us, and 
unfortunately kills our chances for creating a JV with FPL. We are looking at 
other options, and I am confident that we will be back with another partner.

Thanks for your time and help in this process.

Regards,

Don 

t:  Please print for me.  Thanks a lot! Michelle
Ann Park@ENRON
08/01/2000 10:11 AM
Attached is my due diligence template for Canada.  Please feel free to use 
those parts of it you feel appropriate.  Michelle, if I do not hear back I 
will assume the deal team has decided to have the counsel handle this in my 
place.  Please be sure to let Patrick Wade know.  If I can be of any other 
assistance please let me know.

Scott, 

I would love to attend, except that I will be out of the office on vacation 
that whole week.  It sounds like a great presentation!  

Would you mind if I forward it to some other folks in corporate legal who 
might be interested (i.e., my counterparts)?  

Thanks.  Michelle

   

Sent by: Sharon Purswell
You are cordially invited to attend a presentation entitled:  "Acquiring 
Information: Trade Secrets and the Economic Espionage Act (EEA)".   Daniel 
Waltz, of the law firm Patton Boggs LLP, is a leading expert on the EEA and 
will deliver what promises to be an interesting and informative segment.  
Congress passed the EEA in 1996, and it will increasingly shape how corporate 
America collects, uses, and protects valued information.  In addition to 
explaining some of the intricacies of the EEA, Dan Waltz will include 
"hypothetical" corporate case studies (some actually torn from the headlines) 
to illustrate his points.

This event is sponsored by ENA's Competitive Analysis and Business Controls 
(CABC) group and is supported by ENA legal.   This event kicks-off CABC's 
Competitive Intelligence Standards Program, which seeks to raise awareness of 
issues relevant both to Enron's practitioners and senior consumers of 
competitive intelligence.  This particular speaking engagement is designed to 
raise awareness of the EEA's legal guidelines, as well as to stimulate 
thought both on the collection opportunities against our competitors as well 
as how we might better protect Enron's own proprietary information.   I 
believe the topic of the EEA is especially relevant, given that we find 
ourselves amidst the big bang of this new information age.  

The EEA presentation is set for August 15, 1:30-3:00 PM, in the 50th floor 
Conference room.  Please RSVP to either myself or Sharon Purswell.

 
P.S.  By the way, our next speaker segment in the CI Standards Program will 
concentrate on the guidelines and implications of the "Foreign Corrupt 
Practices Act (FCPA)," and will likely be scheduled for the fall.

TWanda, I assume that you have these saved somewhere?  If not, would you?  
Thanks.  Michelle
Fernando de Ovando <fdo@domc.com.mx> on 07/13/2000 02:25:19 PM
On behalf of Fernando de Ovando, please find attached the Spanish versions of 
the agreements with the amendments made by
Michelle.
Please do not hesitate to contact me if you need any further clarification
on these issues.
Edna

>
>Dear Mr de Ovando
>
>I am presently assisting Ms Michelle Cash on the above project. Michelle
has
>made some minor amendments to the Agreements and I attach tracked versions
of
>the same.
>
>I would be grateful if you would arrange for translations.  I trust that
you do
>have the latest versions of these Agreements on file, and will simply
arrange
>for the amendments to be translated.
>
>Please don't hesitate to contact me if you need any further clarification
on
>these issues.
>
>(See attached file: 3517mhcRED.doc)           (See attached file:
>3518REDmhc.doc)
>
>
>

 - 2s Ejecutivo indefinido.doc
 - 4s  Noejecutivo indefinido.doc
 - 3517mhcRED.doc
 - 3518REDmhc.doc

Debi, I will prepare a draft response for you.  Michelle

Debi Vanwey
08/07/2000 01:24 PM
Michelle, should I respond?
Debbi,

First off, I am wondering how you knew the company name I was calling on.  I
never gave that other girl the name of the company.

Any how, I am wanting information on Contracting Solutions, Inc.  They
listed your company as a reference, and I have been trying to chase this
down for about two months now.  I have been able to contact the other two
references they had given, but the one with your company has been a bear to
run down.

They stated that they have worked with your company on a permanent
placement.  Is this correct?

How was their performance? (did they respond timely with qualified
candidates? With legitimate resumes of real people or were the people no
longer available when you wanted to interview them?, etc.)

Can you tell me if there have been any problems with this company? (if yes,
what are they.)

Are you currently doing business with them?  (If yes, please proceed to the
next question, if no, Please tell me why?)

Do you have any additional information that would assist me in doing
business with this company?

Is there any way you can respond as soon as possible, I would like to either
approve them or close this file.

Priscilla
Rex Trucking

Amy, we do put people under contract with a definite term; however, at the 
end of that term, the employee converts to an employee at will.  We also hire 
consultants for a fixed term, but a year-long period for an individual is 
pretty long for a consultng position.  What is the situation?  Maybe we can 
find an alternative.

Michelle

Amy FitzPatrick
08/09/2000 06:12 PM
Michelle -

Do we ever do fixed term offers?  I got a question today from RD Hawkins as 
LasVegas Cogen asking if we could hire someone for a one year period of 
time.  I know we can do it in the UK, just not sure about the US.

Thanks!
Amy

I agree with your approach.  MHC

PS, I am out next week on vacation.  Call Twanda to arrange for assistance 
while I am out, and she will refer you on.  Agreements will be done during my 
absence; again, work with Twanda.  Thanks. Michelle

Amy FitzPatrick
08/10/2000 09:44 AM
Basically, RD wants to hire someone and have that person make a one-year 
commitment to the Company (this is someone that worked for them before and 
left after a few months due to personal reasons).  Rather than doing any kind 
of agreement, I have recommended to RD that we either do a signing payment 
(full amount repaid if leaves within the year) or a retention payment as part 
of the offer letter. 

Are you comfortable with that?

Thanks!
Amy

Michelle Cash
08/10/2000 03:51 AM
Amy, we do put people under contract with a definite term; however, at the 
end of that term, the employee converts to an employee at will.  We also hire 
consultants for a fixed term, but a year-long period for an individual is 
pretty long for a consultng position.  What is the situation?  Maybe we can 
find an alternative.

Michelle

Amy FitzPatrick
08/09/2000 06:12 PM
Michelle -

Do we ever do fixed term offers?  I got a question today from RD Hawkins as 
LasVegas Cogen asking if we could hire someone for a one year period of 
time.  I know we can do it in the UK, just not sure about the US.

Thanks!
Amy

Here is the note that went out.  I'm giving a speech this morning and will be 
out all afternoon, but I will try to catch you in between.  Also, I am in 
tomorrow, but then am out all next week on vacation.  While I am out, you can 
work with Emma Caplan.   Thanks.  Michelle

To all Energy Operations employees:

ENA has experienced extraordinary growth thus far in 2000.  I am especially 
proud of the accomplishments of Energy Operations in supporting this growth.  
I wanted to express my appreciation for all the hard work and dedication that 
you have demonstrated.  We have done great work and I want to recognize you 
for that.  

Although we have done much, we have additional goals to accomplish within ENA 
and Energy Operations this year.  Therefore, as we go forward, I want to make 
sure that you have all the necessary tools to do the best possible job, and 
that any barriers that may impede your work are removed.

To help in this effort, I have asked a consulting organization -- S.J. Bashen 
Corporation -- to survey our organization; to "take its pulse" if you will; 
to help us understand what in our environment fosters success and where we 
could improve; in essence, to assist us in acquiring the "necessary tools" 
and breaking down any "barriers."  SJBC is comprised of seasoned consultants 
who assist organizations like ours to help on issues like this.  SJBC will 
meet with members of our group in a private setting where we can highlight 
our successes, discuss our concerns, ask our questions, make our comments, 
and the like.  This collective information then is studied by SJBC with the 
goal of providing us an opinion regarding our strengths and weaknesses.  
Specific input will not be identified by the individual who provided that 
input.  

Many of you will be receiving a phone call in the near future from a SJBC 
consultant.  Please schedule a time to participate at your earliest 
opportunity, as this effort will be a success for our group only if we 
cooperate to the fullest extent.  Of course, given the size of our group, it 
will not be possible to meet with each of you.  Therefore, if you have not 
received a call from SJBC by August 15 but would like to share your thoughts 
with them, please feel free to contact Cheryl Brown at 713.780.8056 and 
Cheryl will be glad to include you in our survey.

Communication is one of Enron's core values.  I want to stress that only 
through open communication will this survey be a success.  Please be candid.  
Thank you.

Sally 

Here are others who want to interview Carlos.  I tell you what -- before you 
schedule any of these, let me talk with Carlos first to see where his 
interests lie.  Keep these names, and I'll keep you posted on who to schedule 
with him.  Thanks.  Michelle

Alan Aronowitz
12/05/2000 10:46 AM
Dan Rogers and I would each like to meet with Carlos for a potential position 
with EGM. Could you arrange?

Alan

Michelle Cash
12/04/2000 10:04 PM
Attached is the resume of Carlos Sole, who currently is working for EECC.  He 
is interested in pursuing opportunities within EWS, and we received excellent 
references about his work performance from John Schwartzenburg and Kay Mann.  
I am meeting with him on Friday of this week (he is out of town until then).  
If you have an interest in talking with him, let me know, and I will arrange 
a meeting.

Thanks.  Michelle

Michelle, per my voicemail as I indicated, I am trying to pursue what 
opportunities may be available at EWS and both Julia Murray and Kay Mann 
recommended that I contact you.  As background, I have been at EECC since 
October last year where I have focused on traditional EPC contracts and joint 
venture agreements with construction partners, cross-border financing 
agreements principally in Mexico and merger and acquisition/strategic 
investment transactions.  Before coming to Enron, I worked with the Houston 
office of a New York based firm (Curtis, Mallet-Prevost, Colt & Mosle)  where 
I focused mostly on transactions in Mexico since we represented Pemex on 
their transactions involving long and short term oil supply agreements and 
CFE (Mexico's electricity commission) on its public bids for EPC and IPP 
projects.  Lastly, I started my legal career in 1994 at Patton Boggs in 
Washington, DC where I focused on general domestic corporate transactions 
such as establishing new business entities (ie, joint venture work, 
partnerships etc.), m & a work, and securities offerings.  Thanks for your 
consideration and I look forward to talking with you when you return from 
vacation (my extension is 6-6127).  

David Oxley
08/01/2000 09:45 AM
Seems we are close but a few things are different than my spreadsheet we 
discussed. Here are my comments:

1 - I think this needs to be a UK form contract rather than US. Otherwise I 
think it is difficult for me to mainatin all the UK benefits (Pension, share 
plan etc.,). All numbers bar base can stay in US$'s. The Base will need to be 
translated at 1.5 into UKpds (ie pds150,000 then the car allce subtracted 
pds10,800 and shown as such) and state in the contract how much should be 
paid on US payroll and how much in UK (my current arrangements allows me to 
keep about pds600 per month paid in the UK so I can pay UK bills). I am happy 
to prepare a draft of this is you wish for Michelle and John Chapman to 
review.

2 - I'd like confirmation that new base is effective June 1, 2000. This is 
when we started these discussions.

3 - The cash retention amounts of pds45,000 are missing. We agreed this would 
be paid 3/01 and 3/02.

4 - There are 3 stock option grants on appendix A of $100k each, but I 
believe we agreed $120k on signing and $120k 6/01. Additionally given you 
were uncomfortable with additional base bump in Jan 01 I suggested we add 
that $25k to the second option grant making it $120k in options on signing 
and $145k in 6/01. Incidentally, can we make these clearly 5 year options 
with standard vesting (1/3, 1/3, 1/3).

5 - On Bonus targets, can we insert top 25% as a VP, top 50% otherwise, after 
each target.

6 - On ENE LTI awards, I believe we agreed this years award of $300 would be 
guaranteed. For 01 I would like again wording saying "as a VP" inserted after 
25% target and top 50% otherwise.

7 - Not sure if we need to but obviously the Relo memo might need to be 
referenced with regards to this not being the sole agreement etc.,

Thanks

David

Debi,

Your plan sounds good to me.  You all have done a good job of researching 
this data, and I believe we are in a strong position.

My one question is whether it is worth it to tell them we are not accepting 
resumes from them.  What is the harm in accepting them?  Are we obligated to 
interview the candidate?  Given this situation, it is possible that telling 
them not to send resumes will fan the flames for no good reason, especially 
since their "proven track record" is only for one placement.  It does not 
appear as if they are flooding us with resumes.  Let me know if my assumption 
is not correct.

Also, I am not sure your apology is necessary.  It certainly is 
well-intentioned, but I wouldn't want it to be construed as some sort of 
admission of wrongdoing.  So, unless you feel compelled, . . . .

Thanks.

Michelle

Debi Vanwey
08/10/2000 02:03 PM
Our research is complete with John Nguyen and Mark Delaro.    There is only 
one John Nguyen that works for Enron, and he is at EBS.   This is not the 
same John Nguyen that was sent from Contracting Solutions.  I talked with the 
Enron John personally and compared past employment to the CS John.    The 
John Nguyen that was sent by CS was sent on 5/4 to Keith Dziadek for an 
opening he had.   We got no response from Keith, which for him is considered 
a no.    We have no record of Mark Delaro ever being sent in by CS.    He was 
directly recruited by Ergos, presented by them, and hired through them.   
Jennifer talked with Mark  and he states that he has never talked to a 
recruiting firm named Contracting Solutions.   If CS did indeed present his 
resume to Enron, then they should be able to produce the email with date/time 
stamp.    Neither Jen nor I have asked them for this yet.   I feel Robert and 
I should meet with them tomorrow to bring closure to the situation.   Robert 
had mentioned that we should be able to get back with them this week, and I 
think we should make good on the promise.

Here are my recommendations - please give me your thoughts.

1)  I owe the Account Manager an apology for being rude on the phone.
2)  Clarify with them that we do not owe them a fee on Mark Delaro or John 
Nguyen, based on above facts.
3)  Clarify with them that we are not doing business with them at this time.  
The recruiters have just given me their final preferred vendor list, and CS 
is not on it since no one is interested in working with them.   We should let 
them know that yes, they do have an MSA which is an agreement for contract 
placement, but this does not require us to accept resumes from them.    We 
accept resumes only from those agencies that we ask to assist us with 
recruiting.    We should offer to take another look at them in 90 days, give 
them a second chance, and have the guidelines for the trial period well 
defined.  They should contact me directly at that time.
4)  We should address the relationship between Jennifer and Kathryn, the 
difficulties being that Jennifer made a decision not to work with them, 
Kathryn tried to force her business on Jennifer after the decision had been 
made, and Kathyrn brought her personal problems into the conversation in 
order to press the point.   They should be aware of the basis of Jennifer's 
decision not to employ them as a vendor:   1)  inadequate resume flow  2) 
poor working relationship with account manager.
5)  We have no proof that Jennifer has spread bad press about CS to any other 
company including Continential, Shell Services, and Dynegy, and after 
addressing this issue with her do not believe that this occurred.   Nor did 
she did send Mark Delaro's resume to Ergos.  We have no reason to believe 
that she has ever acted out of integrity while working for Enron, nor that 
she will in the future.
6) Cheryl Charles (Maddison) presented her resume to Robert and Ryan, and 
Ryan forwarded to me in the past 2 weeks, and has not claimed association 
with CS.   We have no recruiter openings at this time, and she has been 
informed of this by Ryan and myself.

Debi

Thanks for handling that!  We are looking forward to our trip.  I'll call you 
when we get in and let you know our details.  I look forward to seeing you, 
Mary Lou, and Peter, if available.  See you soon!  Michelle

 Michelle: The tickets went out FedEx today.  If they don't show up
at the appropriate time tomorrow, give me a call and we'll track them down.

Privileged and Confidential
This email contains legal advice

Hoyt and Melissa,

I am assuming that we are discussing contract personnel who provide some sort 
of services for MG/RW.  It looks like there may be some key personnel we want 
to employ, but that there are many whom we don't want to hire.   I am not 
really familiar with the specific facts here.

The question of a joint employer arises when a company treats its contract 
personnel like its own -- by setting compensation, controlling their 
activities, engaging in promotion/discipline/termination, etc. decisions, and 
other ways in which an employer treats its own employees.  So, if the plan is 
to have workers doing the same thing, with one as a contractor, and one as an 
employee, there could be some issues, particularly if they share a 
supervisor.  Unfortunately, that often is the case with contract personnel.

If there are distinctions among the various responsibilities of these workers 
-- and like workers are treated similarly -- the risk may be reduced.    It 
is cleanest, however, to use all of these workers through the contracting 
agency for a while (assume we don't want to hire them all, which is the other 
alternative).  Then, the company may want to make selected offers to people 
who may be in a managerial role or have some other distinction from the bulk 
of the contract workers.

I would like additional information on this situation before reaching a 
definitive conclusion.  So, let's try to discuss it.  I am booked until about 
11 this morning, but am available after that.

Michelle

Hoyt Thomas@ENRON
08/08/2000 04:21 PM
Michelle, I guess emails will get to you sooner if I remember to add you to 
the addressee list!  Sorry.

Hoyt
Hoyt Thomas
08/08/2000 02:01 PM
Melissa, my concern is that we may get hit with what is called a 
"co-employment suit" in the US.  This is where an agency employee claims that 
he/she was treated like an employee, therefore he/she should get employee 
benefits (vs. benefits from the agency company, which are probably weak).  
Since we did a share purchase of MG, if the agency employees filed a suit 
against MG claiming that they are really employees, I think that we would 
have to defend it.

I am not an attorney, but I am going to send this to Michelle Cash, who can 
advise us on the position we should take.  I would think that if we single 
out certain employees to become Enron employees and the remainder stay as 
agency employees, this would enhance the legal position of the agency 
employees (versus everyone staying as an agency employee).  Michelle, can you 
help us with this one?  Thanks.

Melissa, I also think we should minimize distribution on this discussion . . 
. 

   
	Enron Europe
	

Hi Hoyt,

I have today spoken to Ed Dablin regarding Henry Bath LA.  We discussed how 
the employees seem to feel that they are Enron employees, although they are 
infact agency workers.  Ed confirmed that Martha and half a dozen other 
employees quite clearly should become Enron employees and should get 
applicable benefits.

The other employees (who are mainly manual employees) he does not feel should 
become Enron employees and should remain as agency staff.

He realises that the original granting of Share Options has slightly "muddied 
the water" with regard to whether these employees are employees of Enron or 
the agency.  He was not involved with the original decision to grant these 
employees Share Options.

We discussed the issues (in broad terms, as I could not remember all of the 
specific issues) and he is aware that making a limited number of individuals 
Enron employees, whilst the others remain agency workers, is not an easy 
thing to do.  

However, this is his ideal scenario.  How viable is it that we can do this 
for him?

He also made the point that Martha is the most senior executive in Henry Bath 
Inc. and is one of his most valuable employees.

Regards

Melissa

Bret,

I received the schedule and itinerary for diligence on Project Crane and have 
forwarded it to Rick Johnson, Fran Mayes, Pat Mackin, and Dee Lenfest.

We have preliminarily decided that Rick Johnson will go to both sites to 
cover Labor (union) issues and support in the general HR diligence that Fran 
Mayes of ENA HR will conduct.  Either Pat or Dee will travel to Washington to 
address benefits issues, including obtaining information for subsequent 
modeling of benefit costs.  We would like to have our outside counsel in 
Canada conduct the benefits diligence in the Quebec City location and to 
support Rick to the extent that there may be any special issues of Canadian 
or Quebec law.   I will continue to coordinate these activities and provide 
whatever other assistance may be needed.

Let me know if you need any other information about this diligence plan for 
employment/labor matters.  I will work with Peter Del Vecchio to identify our 
outside counsel designee.

 Michelle

Bret Scholtes@ENRON
08/03/2000 01:28 PM
The Project Crane Due Diligence process has been rescheduled for  August 27 
to September 1.  We begin the process on Sunday, August 27, in Quebec City 
where we will attend a dinner and work in the data room Monday and Tuesday.  
Wednesday will be a travel day, and we will spend Thursday and Friday at the 
Port Angeles data room.  The Beacon Group is finalizing our itinerary and 
updating the data room index, so we will send this information to you as it 
becomes available.

Please continue to work on your due diligence lists, and we will call you 
early next week to finalize responsibilities.  

Thanks
Patrick and Bret

would you please print this and attachments and put a sticky note on them 
that it is for Anonymous Letters project -- so that I focus on it!  thanks.  
mhc
*************************CONFIDENTIAL COMMUNICATION*************************
 Prepared at the Direction of Counsel in Anticipation of Litigation

Michelle Hoogendam Cash
Assistant General Counsel
Legal Department
Enron Corporation
1400 Smith Street, EB3823
Houston, Texas 77002-7361

Dear Michelle:

Attached please find a list of employees we plan to interview.  Of course,
the list is not exhaustive, and does not reflect a proposed order of
interviews.  Please notify us once Sally Beck sends the survey letter to her
employees.  We will then begin setting up interviews.

Sincerely

____________________________
Cheryl A. Brown
Director of Operations

S.J. Bashen Corporation
1616 S. Voss, Suite 1000
Houston, Texas 77057
ph: 713.780.8056 ext. 104
fax: 713.780.8206
cbrown@sjbc.com

This message and the documents attached to it, if any, are intended only for
the use of the addressee and may contain information that is PRIVILEGED and
CONFIDENTIAL, and/or may contain information that was prepared IN
ANTICIPATION OF LITIGATION and/or AT THE DIRECTION OF COUNSEL.  If you are
not the intended recipient, you are hereby notified that any dissemination
of this communication is strictly prohibited.  If you have received this
communication in error, please delete all electronic copies of this message
and its attachments, destroy any hard copies you may have created and notify
Cheryl A. Brown immediately at 713/780-8056 or cbrown@sjbc.com.

 - enronwitness.lst.wpd

Debi,

I will defer to your expertise on whether we should actively accept resumes 
from CS at this time.  I think the way to couch it is that we do not want to 
receive them at this time, but that they are free to check with us in a 
couple of months to see whether that has changed.  That way, we aren't making 
it an absolute ban.

Thanks for the information.

Michelle

Debi Vanwey
08/11/2000 09:27 AM
Thanks for your feedback.   If we accept resumes from an agency it means 
establishing a full working relationship with them which is time consuming 
for the recruiter.  We have to constantly QA them and answer their phone 
calls, and it is more work than it seems from the outside.   They almost need 
to be coached all the time unless they are really good, which is rare.    CS 
is one of the fairly high maintenance agencies.   This is why we are going to 
a preferred vendor list.    We have lots of agencies that want to work with 
us, and choosing those that we can count on to get us good candidates 
quickly, and take the least amount of our time saves a lot of time for the 
recruiters.   After Jennifer told Kathyrn she wasn't going to work with her, 
Kathyrn did flood her inbox with unsolicited resumes.   That would certainly 
make me not want to work with them.   I can force the issue and ask one of 
the recruiters to work with them if you feel we need to, however I feel that 
until Kathryn cools off a little, this would not be productive.    As for the 
apology, I will always apologize if I am clearly in the wrong, however, I 
think that definitely in this case it would be construed as an admission of 
wrongdoing on Enron's part.   I'm fine with letting go of it.   This has been 
a good learning experience for me.    There have been a couple of phone calls 
this week where I was consciously more polite with agency/sales phone calls 
than I would have been prior to last week.    Jennifer had some fear up 
yesterday about addressing an issue with an agency because of the CS issue, 
which is understandable, and we're working through it together.  I want her 
to be able to stay in her power with these people, and we just need to learn 
new ways to do that.   It's a tough job dealing with agencies day after day - 
really wears you down.    We're going to write some scripts for talking with 
them in the future, and the recruiters will route all the new ones through me 
so they all get the same story.    We're also putting some new processes in 
place so that we are consistent in our relationships with agencies.    
Hopefully this will help eliminate some of these issues in the future.   
Thanks for all your help......

Debi

Michelle Cash
08/10/2000 11:13 PM
Debi,

Your plan sounds good to me.  You all have done a good job of researching 
this data, and I believe we are in a strong position.

My one question is whether it is worth it to tell them we are not accepting 
resumes from them.  What is the harm in accepting them?  Are we obligated to 
interview the candidate?  Given this situation, it is possible that telling 
them not to send resumes will fan the flames for no good reason, especially 
since their "proven track record" is only for one placement.  It does not 
appear as if they are flooding us with resumes.  Let me know if my assumption 
is not correct.

Also, I am not sure your apology is necessary.  It certainly is 
well-intentioned, but I wouldn't want it to be construed as some sort of 
admission of wrongdoing.  So, unless you feel compelled, . . . .

Thanks.

Michelle

Debi Vanwey
08/10/2000 02:03 PM
Our research is complete with John Nguyen and Mark Delaro.    There is only 
one John Nguyen that works for Enron, and he is at EBS.   This is not the 
same John Nguyen that was sent from Contracting Solutions.  I talked with the 
Enron John personally and compared past employment to the CS John.    The 
John Nguyen that was sent by CS was sent on 5/4 to Keith Dziadek for an 
opening he had.   We got no response from Keith, which for him is considered 
a no.    We have no record of Mark Delaro ever being sent in by CS.    He was 
directly recruited by Ergos, presented by them, and hired through them.   
Jennifer talked with Mark  and he states that he has never talked to a 
recruiting firm named Contracting Solutions.   If CS did indeed present his 
resume to Enron, then they should be able to produce the email with date/time 
stamp.    Neither Jen nor I have asked them for this yet.   I feel Robert and 
I should meet with them tomorrow to bring closure to the situation.   Robert 
had mentioned that we should be able to get back with them this week, and I 
think we should make good on the promise.

Here are my recommendations - please give me your thoughts.

1)  I owe the Account Manager an apology for being rude on the phone.
2)  Clarify with them that we do not owe them a fee on Mark Delaro or John 
Nguyen, based on above facts.
3)  Clarify with them that we are not doing business with them at this time.  
The recruiters have just given me their final preferred vendor list, and CS 
is not on it since no one is interested in working with them.   We should let 
them know that yes, they do have an MSA which is an agreement for contract 
placement, but this does not require us to accept resumes from them.    We 
accept resumes only from those agencies that we ask to assist us with 
recruiting.    We should offer to take another look at them in 90 days, give 
them a second chance, and have the guidelines for the trial period well 
defined.  They should contact me directly at that time.
4)  We should address the relationship between Jennifer and Kathryn, the 
difficulties being that Jennifer made a decision not to work with them, 
Kathryn tried to force her business on Jennifer after the decision had been 
made, and Kathyrn brought her personal problems into the conversation in 
order to press the point.   They should be aware of the basis of Jennifer's 
decision not to employ them as a vendor:   1)  inadequate resume flow  2) 
poor working relationship with account manager.
5)  We have no proof that Jennifer has spread bad press about CS to any other 
company including Continential, Shell Services, and Dynegy, and after 
addressing this issue with her do not believe that this occurred.   Nor did 
she did send Mark Delaro's resume to Ergos.  We have no reason to believe 
that she has ever acted out of integrity while working for Enron, nor that 
she will in the future.
6) Cheryl Charles (Maddison) presented her resume to Robert and Ryan, and 
Ryan forwarded to me in the past 2 weeks, and has not claimed association 
with CS.   We have no recruiter openings at this time, and she has been 
informed of this by Ryan and myself.

Debi

I certainly agree with the concept.  It sounds like it gives us more 
flexibility.  

Mary Joyce@ENRON
08/07/2000 08:30 AM
I think this sounds like a great suggestion.  Pam and Michelle, comments?

Thanks!

Mary

Drew C Lynch@ECT
08/07/2000 06:19 AM
Sent by: Drew C Lynch@ECT
Mary,

Hope things are going well with you and yours! Nigel and I were discussing 
some contract language today and wanted some input from you on how we might 
word future grants of options or stock. Should we be wording Director Level 
and below agreements with a more generic "equity" component instead of 
specifying options or restricted stock? My question revolves around our 
tendency from time to time to change the structure of how we deliver value as 
a company. Your thoughts? What are others doing?

DCL

Debi,

Your response should go as follows.  I suggest doing it in writing, rather 
than an email that could be manipulated.  If you have theri fax number, that 
probably would be best.  Also, I suggest that we ask CS not to identify us as 
a reference or to use our name in any type of advertising or publicity 
materials.  We prefer to keep our vendor list private.

Dear Ms. Poss,

 Thank you for your written  request for a reference on Contracting 
Solutions.  It is not our practice to provide references for contracting 
agencies.  I would suggest that you contact another company that does 
business with Contracting Solutions to obtain the information you seek.  I am 
sure that Contracting Solutions can provide you with alternatives.

 By the way, I spoke with Jennifer Cronin, who had referred your call to me.  
She indicated that you had identified Contracting Solutions as the subject 
matter of your request.  

 Sincerely yours, Debi Vanwey

Debi Vanwey
08/07/2000 01:24 PM
Michelle, should I respond?
Debbi,

First off, I am wondering how you knew the company name I was calling on.  I
never gave that other girl the name of the company.

Any how, I am wanting information on Contracting Solutions, Inc.  They
listed your company as a reference, and I have been trying to chase this
down for about two months now.  I have been able to contact the other two
references they had given, but the one with your company has been a bear to
run down.

They stated that they have worked with your company on a permanent
placement.  Is this correct?

How was their performance? (did they respond timely with qualified
candidates? With legitimate resumes of real people or were the people no
longer available when you wanted to interview them?, etc.)

Can you tell me if there have been any problems with this company? (if yes,
what are they.)

Are you currently doing business with them?  (If yes, please proceed to the
next question, if no, Please tell me why?)

Do you have any additional information that would assist me in doing
business with this company?

Is there any way you can respond as soon as possible, I would like to either
approve them or close this file.

Priscilla
Rex Trucking

Hoyt,

I have reviewed the attached.  I think it looks good.  It strikes the balance 
of welcoming and also letting them know that changes will occur in the 
future.  Kriste, any other thoughts? 

Michelle

Hoyt Thomas@ENRON
08/15/2000 06:02 PM
I tried to make this as innocuous as I could, it will not make the New York 
folks happy but I don't think we should go beyond this right now.  I have to 
print these Wed AM so please give me some feedback ASAP!

Alan, he's out of town until Friday, so I will schedule early next week with 
you and Dan.  Others are interested as well, so we'll probably have a full 
interview schedule with him.  Thanks for the quick response.  Michelle

Alan Aronowitz
12/05/2000 10:46 AM
Dan Rogers and I would each like to meet with Carlos for a potential position 
with EGM. Could you arrange?

Alan

Michelle Cash
12/04/2000 10:04 PM
Attached is the resume of Carlos Sole, who currently is working for EECC.  He 
is interested in pursuing opportunities within EWS, and we received excellent 
references about his work performance from John Schwartzenburg and Kay Mann.  
I am meeting with him on Friday of this week (he is out of town until then).  
If you have an interest in talking with him, let me know, and I will arrange 
a meeting.

Thanks.  Michelle

Michelle, per my voicemail as I indicated, I am trying to pursue what 
opportunities may be available at EWS and both Julia Murray and Kay Mann 
recommended that I contact you.  As background, I have been at EECC since 
October last year where I have focused on traditional EPC contracts and joint 
venture agreements with construction partners, cross-border financing 
agreements principally in Mexico and merger and acquisition/strategic 
investment transactions.  Before coming to Enron, I worked with the Houston 
office of a New York based firm (Curtis, Mallet-Prevost, Colt & Mosle)  where 
I focused mostly on transactions in Mexico since we represented Pemex on 
their transactions involving long and short term oil supply agreements and 
CFE (Mexico's electricity commission) on its public bids for EPC and IPP 
projects.  Lastly, I started my legal career in 1994 at Patton Boggs in 
Washington, DC where I focused on general domestic corporate transactions 
such as establishing new business entities (ie, joint venture work, 
partnerships etc.), m & a work, and securities offerings.  Thanks for your 
consideration and I look forward to talking with you when you return from 
vacation (my extension is 6-6127).  

I have not prepared one and am not aware of one in place -- that is why I 
prefaced my comments with that.  Randy's email made it sound like there was 
one. Sorry I'm not more help on this.  Michelle

Dan Lyons
08/18/2000 09:42 AM
Do we have a CA with these people?

	Michelle Cash
	08/17/2000 11:15 PM
		
As far as I am concerned, if we have a CA in place , we are ok in disclosing 
the data regarding employees you describe.  Good luck!  MHC

Randal Maffett
08/17/2000 01:55 PM
Per my v-mail: I'm actively engaging prospective buyers for Ecogas (ENA's 
stock).  A couple of questions:

Under the "Come-Along" provision [Sec. 8(d)(ii)] of the Stockholder's and 
Voting Agreement am I correct assuming that if ENA finds a willing buyer and 
acceptable price that we can effectively require/force all other shareholders 
to sell under the same terms, etc...?  
If the terms of such a sale included non-cash items (stock, stock options, 
gas contracts, power contracts, tolling agreements, etc....) is it also 
correct to assume that those items would be valued (for the non-ENA 
shareholders) at "Fair Market Value" pursuant to Sec. 7?
In some cases the discussions are elevating quickly to very senior levels and 
there are certain questions that are being asked and/or going to be asked 
relative to the Securities Purchase Agreement, Business Opportunities 
Agreement, JB Employment Agreement and Stockholder's and Voting Agreement.  
Assuming the prospective buyer is under a Conf Agrmt, are there any 
restrictions to my discussing or disclosing material facts relative to these 
agreements and/or providing them a copy?

I appreciate your feedback ASAP.

RTM

I'd suggest finding otu more information.  My inclination would be not to 
accept the contractor. 

Candace Womack
08/21/2000 04:39 PM
Michelle - Welcome back from vacation!

Gary Buck suggested that I approach you for guidance regarding a background 
investigation report we have received on a contractor candidate for 
Networks.  The report indicates that 8/14/95, the candidate was found guilty 
of theft, a misdemeanor.  He was sentenced to 3 days jail and fined $200.  
The candidate indicated on his Contractor Information Sheet that he had a 
misdemeanor from 1995.  

Should we have the recruiter contact the candidate and ask for more 
information about the misdemeanor, or should we simply reject him?

Thanks for your assistance.

Candace

As you know, we have another power plant project -- if I haven't forwarded 
information to you yet, I will be doing so in the next day or so.

The schedule is for preliminary diligence to be completed by 9/8; data room 
is open 9/6.  Attached to the email I will be sending you is a list of the 
current information we have here -- lots of documents are here.  Please 
review the data list and forward to me which ones you want copied, and I will 
coordinate that process.

The stock purchase agreement draft will be circulated next week.  

Michelle

Sure.  Dick is an outside consultant.  His name is Dick Jeanerette.  His 
number is 713-650-6535.  Thanks, and have fun in MA.  Michelle

Gina Corteselli@ENRON
08/24/2000 11:24 AM
Michelle, 
As regards yesterday's meeting on PRC descriptors, I understood that we were 
going to move from the "Strong" through "Needs Improvement"  categories  to 
numbers 1-5 (or 1-6 if we decide not to combine the last two categories), and 
that we were going to assign relative descriptors to the new number 
categories.  My task is to come up with some good verbiage for the 
descriptors.  

I'd like to chat with Dick, if this is possible, for his additional input as 
I go along with this.  Does he have a phone number in Enron or an email 
address at which I may reach him. 

I am leaving for a mini-vacation to Cape Cod tonight --will be back on 
Monday.  But intend to work on this over the weekend so that I have something 
in hand early next week for us to discuss.  Does this work for you? 

Many thanks in advance, 

Gina   

FYI, it sounds like they now are organized about the process in New York.  
Michelle

Hi!  i have refined the plan a bit, please give me comments.

 - August25Plan.doc

FYI.  Michelle
I have discussed with Melissa and it does not seem to impact them; in fact, I
think it messes them up in London from a legal standpoint if they offer
redeployment.  I also think that we are going to reduce the redeployment
possibilities for the NYC staff and the time given to them to find an Enron
job (which led to my phone call this afternoon re putting term letters
together for them next week).    But I will let Melissa address the question!

Hoyt

Michelle.Cash@enron.com wrote:

> Hoyt, do you think there are any issues because we are considering
> redeployment in the US but not in the UK?  MHC
>
--
Hoyt H. Thomas
713.668.3122

David,

Hello, I hope all is well with you.  I was out last week on holiday and am 
just now getting back into the swing of things.

Alan and I have spoken about your contract, and I am getting in touch with 
the CU lawyers to work on an appropriate form for Australia.  I will be keep 
you apprised of the status.

Have a good weekend.

Michelle

Privileged and Confidential

Felicia,

Would you please run a disparate impact analysis for the proposed stock 
options to be granted within Enron Net Works?  I would like this data for the 
purpose of giving legal advice.

Thank you.

Michelle

Dear Mr. Catanzariti:

My name is Michelle Hoogendam Cash, Assistant General Counsel-Enron North 
America Corp.  I was referred to you by David Minns in the Enron Australia 
office. I am attaching a copy of our Employment Agreement Form for your 
review in light of Australian law.  Please review this form and provide me 
with any comments that you may have.

Thank you for your assistance in this matter.

If you have any questions, please give me a call at (713) 853-6401.

I agree.  Thanks for letting them know about my contact.  I emailed them the 
form, so we should be on our way!  Michelle

David Minns@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
08/27/2000 05:42 PM
Thanks for the update - I've spoken to CU and they are expecting to hear from 
you. Apart from a personal interest I would like to get an Australian version 
of the Enron employment contract as a precedent.   

Michelle Cash@ECT
26-08-2000 04:18
David,

Hello, I hope all is well with you.  I was out last week on holiday and am 
just now getting back into the swing of things.

Alan and I have spoken about your contract, and I am getting in touch with 
the CU lawyers to work on an appropriate form for Australia.  I will be keep 
you apprised of the status.

Have a good weekend.

Michelle

David, I did not receive the package in interoffice mail.  Could you email it 
to me or re-send it by fax at 646-3490?  Thanks!  Michelle

   

Did you receive my interoffice mail?  It had an example of the contract 
Bridgeline wants to create for Risk.

Dave

Hoyt,

Under the Older Workers Benefits Protection Act, we must provide demographic 
information to persons over the age of 40 who are offered severance packages 
in exchange for a release.  We need the title/position and the age of the 
persons holding those positions for the persons who were offered a package as 
well as the persons who were not offered a package.  We will provide this 
data to persons over 40 to validate their releases.

Thanks.

Michelle

Attached is an Agreement and Release Form that Michelle would like for you to 
review.  She is on the phone with you now regarding this attachment.

Brian, 

Pat Mackin requested that I forward this on to you.   I think he has a good 
idea here to look at a process for RIF selection.  Currently, it is done on 
an ad-hoc basis, with plans being prepared for each situation.  

Pat, do you still have a copy of the one you prepared a while back?  It would 
be an excellent start.

Thanks.

Michelle

FMackin@aol.com on 08/29/2000 12:34:12 PM
Document attached

 - RIF Willrich m1.doc

Sheryl, sorry, I had the wrong email address.  Here is the resend.  Michelle

Mailer-Daemon@bracepatt.com on 08/29/2000 04:02:42 PM
The message that you sent was undeliverable to the following:
 cgussett@bracepatt.com (user not found)

Possibly truncated original message follows:

Received: from mcafee.bracepatt.com by bracepatt.com; Tue, 29 Aug 2000 
16:02:16 -0500
Received: FROM postmaster.enron.com BY mcafee.bracepatt.com ; Tue Aug 29 
16:04:30 2000 -0500
X-Proxy: keymaster.bracepatt.com protected
Received: from mailman.enron.com (mailman.enron.com [192.168.189.66]) by 
postmaster.enron.com (8.8.8/8.8.8/postmaster-1.00) with ESMTP id QAA28081; 
Tue, 29 Aug 2000 16:00:17 -0500 (CDT)
Received: from dserv1.ect.enron.com (dserv1.ect.enron.com [172.16.1.37]) by 
mailman.enron.com (8.10.1/8.10.1/corp-1.05) with ESMTP id e7TL0GH00119; Tue, 
29 Aug 2000 16:00:17 -0500 (CDT)
Received: from notes.ect.enron.com (ecthou_gt2.corp.enron.com [172.16.4.33]) 
by dserv1.ect.enron.com (8.8.8/8.8.8) with SMTP id QAA11640; Tue, 29 Aug 2000 
16:00:09 -0500 (CDT)
Received: by notes.ect.enron.com(Lotus SMTP MTA v4.6.5  (863.2 5-20-1999))  
id 8625694A.00735BE5 ; Tue, 29 Aug 2000 16:00:01 -0500
X-Lotus-FromDomain: ECT

Hello everyone!!

Well, no one is celebrating anything specific, so we haven't had an 
opportunity
for the girls to get together in a while.  Therefore, we have decided to have 
a
NO Excuses Girls Night.

The proposed date is Friday, Sept. 29 -- Are there any major conflicts with 
this
date?

Proposed place is to be determined.  Debbie Rank suggested that a restaurant
would be the easiest.  I offered to have it at my house, but she was concerned
that I would get stuck doing too much and spending too much.  My thought is 
that
if everyone agrees to chip in a bit, we can have it catered, and no one will

I hadn't heard about Alex's offer. That is great!!  He is such a nice guy.  
I'll send details on hen night later.  Michelle

Michelle, consider me a "yes." Sounds like fun.  Also, thanks for Alex
Juden's resume; we extended him an offer.

Hey Cash--I AM going to chicken out of the Lasex surgery--put me down as a
yes.

>>> "Michelle Blaine" <Michelle.Blaine@enron.com> 08/31/00 09:37AM >>>

Great idea!! I should be in town because I will be moving on the 30th into
my
new place at the Houstonian. Yippee!!!  Having said that, we'll have the
Christmas bash at my place.

Michelle Cash@ECT
08/29/2000 03:59 PM

Hello everyone!!

Well, no one is celebrating anything specific, so we haven't had an
opportunity
for the girls to get together in a while.  Therefore, we have decided to
have a
NO Excuses Girls Night.

The proposed date is Friday, Sept. 29 -- Are there any major conflicts with
this
date?

Proposed place is to be determined.  Debbie Rank suggested that a restaurant
would be the easiest.  I offered to have it at my house, but she was
concerned
that I would get stuck doing too much and spending too much.  My thought is
that
if everyone agrees to chip in a bit, we can have it catered, and no one will
have to do too much or pay too much.  What do you think about that?

If you are interested, let me know.

Also, this first email is limited to those persons for whom I had email
addresses.  Many others should be added to this list, including:  Mary
Thamm,
Lisa Anouilh, Deanne Noel, Tamberly Thomas, and others whom I am sure to
have
forgotten.  Please forward this on and have everyone get back to me if they
can
attend or have a different suggestion.

My email is:  michelle.cash@enron.com.  Phone number 713-853-6401.  More
details
to come . . .

Michelle

----
This email may contain confidential and privileged material for the sole use 
of the intended recipient(s). Any review, use, distribution or disclosure by 
others is strictly prohibited. If you are not the intended recipient (or 
authorized to receive for the recipient), please contact the sender by reply 
email and delete all copies of this message.

To reply to our email administrator directly, send an email to
postmaster@littler.com

Littler Mendelson, P.C.
http://www.littler.com

please print this and attachment for me.  thanks.  mhc

Attached is the updated timeline.  Please be aware that the original timeline 
has been shortened as a result of the need to present this transaction at the 
October 6/7 ENE board meeting.  Please call me at x37590 with any questions 
or concerns.

Thanks-
Bill

Here are the latest!!!  Michelle

Trey Cash@ENRON
09/04/2000 10:20 PM

fyi re:  Lutz.  mhc
Cynthia Barrow@ENRON
09/06/2000 06:53 AM
Michelle, looks good.  I don't know the details of this one, but if you get 
the Buyer to agree it is very generous for the employee.  Regarding Pension 
Plan, if you get Dee the list of employees, we can get an idea of the 
unvested amounts by employee.  Since this appears to be an asset sale, Enron 
can either pay this outside of the plan or consider it forfeited.

Thanks
Cb

Michelle Cash@ECT
09/05/2000 08:07 PM
Tim,

Anne Koehler asked me to provide general employment terms for Project Triple 
Lutz.  I have spoken with persons in HR and benefits and have put together 
the following "headlines" for employee matters.  This list is a first cut, 
based upon my discussions with persons I could reach today; thus, it may not 
be exhaustive.  Details of certain issues, as described below, will have to 
be worked out.

Of course, your team may choose to modify/delete items from this list, 
depending on the exact nature of the deal.  In the interest of time, however, 
I am sending this list to our lawyers at V&E to begin drafting the employee 
provisions of the sale agreement, which I understand you would like to see on 
Thursday.  Any modifications based upon your team's comments should not be 
difficult.

The employment provisions may include:

Buyer will hire all employees identified by Seller.
The hired employees will have a title that is at least the same/equivalent as 
their title at Enron for a two-year period after closing.
Buyer will give all hired employees credit for years of service at Enron for 
purposes of participation in Buyer's benefits (though not accruals), thus 
allowing the hired employees to have immediate participation in Buyer's 
benefit and compensation plans (e.g., 401k, vacation eligibility, etc.).
The hired employees will be paid, at a minimum, the same base salary they 
earned at Enron (which would include the merit increase for 2001) for a 
two-year period after closing.
The hired employees will receive the same level of total cash compensation as 
their last year of Enron employment for one full year after closing (the 
buyer can make this happen through base salary, bonus, etc.).
The hired employees will receive benefits (e.g., health insurance, life 
insurance, etc.) that are comparable to those they had in their last year of 
employment with Enron (although we probably will have some discussions over 
our sick leave policy, which is generous).
Buyer will retain severance benefits at Seller's level for one year after 
closing, after which the hired employees will be eligible for severance under 
the Buyer's plans (with credited service).
Before Buyer terminates the employment of a hired employee (other than for 
cause -- to be defined), Buyer shall inform Seller, which will have the right 
to re-employ the employee at Enron, with credited service.
For employees with less than 5 years of service, some concession for unvested 
portion of Cash Balance Plan may be necessary.

Open issues/questions include:

Equity:  What is to be done with unvested equity?  For example, in December, 
every Enron employee will be granted stock options worth 25% of their base 
salary (based on the Black-Scholes valuation).  Also, persons with other 
equity grants may forfeit those grants upon closing.  An evaluation of the 
various plans and participants will be necessary to determine exactly where 
any issues exist, as well as possible resolutions of those issues.  In light 
of the appreciation in Enron's stock, this equity issue may be significant.
Pension:  What will happen to hired employees with potential eligibility 
under Enron's pension plan?

If you have any questions about these issues, please give me a call at x 
3-6401.  If I receive additional feedback, I will let you know.

Thanks.

Michelle

 

Rick,  It sounds like this may satisfy CURE, but I question whether this is 
an appropriate payment.  I would want to touch base with the lawyers working 
on the deal to find out if there are any implications.  Any other feedback?  
Michelle  

Rick Johnson@ENRON
09/05/2000 09:16 PM
Please review and comment on the attached inter-office memorandum, as soon as 
possible.  Thanks Rj

Hoyt -- actually, we need only the New York office -- other locations should 
not be included.  Thanks.  Michelle

Hoyt Thomas@ENRON
09/07/2000 08:33 PM
Under the OWBPA or one of the laws similar to it, we have to present 
statistics to the employees over 40 who were offered the package.  Gloria, 
could you pull together two lists: one would have the names, titles and ages 
of everyone offered the package (Mo and the FX guys) and the other list will 
be the names, titles and ages of everyone else in the US in Enron Metals 
(including ST. Louis and Chicago but excluding Los Angeles), the people who 
were not offered it.  I know that we do not have titles for some of the 
Rudolph wolff folks at this time; please try to get their old titles at RW 
from the RW HR guy and we will use them.  We will need to submit this to 
Michelle Cash soon; we have to give that data to Mo before we can finalize 
his package.

Thanks
Hoyt
Michelle Cash@ECT
09/07/2000 10:53 AM
I suggest using the entire New York office as the group.  It really doesn't 
matter because the bulk of the people being offered the packages are under 
40, so our statistics look good either way.  Michelle

Hoyt Thomas@ENRON
09/06/2000 06:43 PM
Michelle, you define the NYC office as the group, and not the FX/Bullion 
traders as the group?  would it look better to show a small group, with 
almost all of them terminated, or a big group with only a few terminated?

Michelle Cash@ECT
09/06/2000 05:33 PM
Hoyt,

As we discussed, even though Mo and Penner are not part  of this initial 
round, to be on the safe side, we should provide them with data regarding all 
persons in the group (defined as the New York office) who are provided with a 
release and those who are not.  The data should include age and title of 
persons offered packages, and then a separate list of age and titles of 
persons who are not offered packages.

Once this data is pulled together, I will be happy to review it to ensure 
compliance with the Older Worker Benefit Protection Act, as the DOL has 
interpreted it.

Thanks.

Michelle

Thanks,  I'll be there.  Michelle

Mark Greenberg@ENRON
12/05/2000 11:05 AM
Michelle -

The meeting is scheduled for today at 4:00 in EB38C1.  Rick will be calling 
in to the meeting.

Mark
Senior Counsel, ENA
Phone:     713-345-8897
Facsimile: 713-646-3940
E-Mail:      Mark.Greenberg@enron.com

	Michelle Cash@ECT
	12/04/2000 09:52 PM
		
Mark, If this hasn't already taken place, I'd like to participate.  My 
assistant, Twanda Sweet, should have my calendar.  Also, FYI, Rick JOhnson  
will be in town at the end of the week if you want a face-to-face.  MHC

Mark Greenberg@ENRON
12/03/2000 01:11 PM
Dee, Jeff, Rick -

I need to set up a meeting between the benefit group and the tax people to 
walk through the structure we want for the purchase of Project Crane.  We 
made a good bit of progress in Toronto over Thursday and Friday on the tax 
structure, but clearly indicated the need to confirm all of this in relation 
to benefit issues.  I would like to have the meeting on Monday sometime, but 
need to coordinate schedules.  As soon as possible, please advise me of your 
respective availabilities so that a meeting can be scheduled, keeping in mind 
the need to have Rick involved.

Thanks.

Mark
Senior Counsel, ENA
Phone:     713-345-8897
Facsimile: 713-646-3940
E-Mail:      Mark.Greenberg@enron.com

FYI re:  Crane.  Michelle

FMackin@aol.com on 09/08/2000 09:50:51 AM
Attached is my preliminary report based on the information in the data room.

There was not near enough information in the data room, and for the second
time, there was no one from the Seller present at the data room who we could
ask questions of.

There are a couple of areas of concern.  There is still a lot of data to be
furnished.  Much of the documents in the data room was not allowed to be
copied.

I have instructed Paul Blundy, the  attorney contact for our Canadian counsel
to have documents sent to Rick.

Rick, as you receive data that involves benefits, please send it to Dee.

I provided a copy of our Q format to Roland, our Canadian labor counsel, to
format and revise as need to fit the Canadian companies being acquired.  He
seemed to be knowledgeable in labor relations, but will need actuarial help
(as will we) in reviewing the benefit accruals for defined benefit plans.

For the next two weeks, I will have my beeper and will check my phone
messages as I find telephones in the wilderness.

I also provided a hard copy of the attachment to the Enron deal guys before I
left Toronto.

Pat

 - Crane DDlgnce Q1.doc

FYI re:  Crane
FMackin@aol.com on 09/08/2000 09:50:51 AM
Attached is my preliminary report based on the information in the data room.

There was not near enough information in the data room, and for the second
time, there was no one from the Seller present at the data room who we could
ask questions of.

There are a couple of areas of concern.  There is still a lot of data to be
furnished.  Much of the documents in the data room was not allowed to be
copied.

I have instructed Paul Blundy, the  attorney contact for our Canadian counsel
to have documents sent to Rick.

Rick, as you receive data that involves benefits, please send it to Dee.

I provided a copy of our Q format to Roland, our Canadian labor counsel, to
format and revise as need to fit the Canadian companies being acquired.  He
seemed to be knowledgeable in labor relations, but will need actuarial help
(as will we) in reviewing the benefit accruals for defined benefit plans.

For the next two weeks, I will have my beeper and will check my phone
messages as I find telephones in the wilderness.

I also provided a hard copy of the attachment to the Enron deal guys before I
left Toronto.

Pat

 - Crane DDlgnce Q1.doc

Hello, girls.

If Stacey can do it, so can I!  Here are the latest pictures of Cameron.  
These were taken right before the Baptism of my sister's third (can you 
believe it??) child, so he is all dressed up.

I hope all is well with everyone.

Love, Michelle

Trey Cash@ENRON
09/04/2000 10:20 PM

Andrea,

Brian and I were talking about the dissemination of this policy.  It seems as 
if it should come from your group and go out globally.  What do you think?

Michelle

Michelle Cash
09/06/2000 11:43 AM
Sent by: Twanda Sweet
Attached is a revised draft of the Employee Data Protection Policy, which is 
required because of directives by the European Union.

Please provide me with any questions or comments on this policy.

I would appreciate any comments by Monday, September 11, 2000 so that this 
policy can be rolled out quickly.

Thank you.

Michelle Cash

Hoyt, Here is a privileged and confidential legal memorandum regarding the 
Garden State modification of operations.  Let's discuss these issues tomorrow 
or Friday.  Michelle

cpage@phks.com on 09/20/2000 01:04:55 PM
Pat McCarthy asked me to forward the enclosed memo.

 - dhvg01!.DOC

Please see the note below, which was forwarded to me by Richard Sanders, on 
Triple Lutz.  Michelle

In case someone calls
	Patrick Wade
	09/19/2000 03:41 PM
		 
As the data room visits wind down, we have had several requests both 
internally and externally to provide greater detail on a variety of issues.  
IT IS IMPERATIVE THAT ANY ANSWERS TO THESE QUESTIONS, EITHER IN WRITTEN, 
ORAL, OR SPREADSHEET ANALYSIS, GOES TO ME BEFORE IT GOES OUT TO THE 
COUNTERPARTY.  IN ADDITION, ALL CONTACT MUST BE THROUGH LEHMAN BROTHERS. This 
will ensure that we get the counterparty accurate information in a timely 
fashion.  Please call me if you have any questions (3-6396).

Thanks
Patrick

CPage:  Would you please forward this directly to Pat?

Pat, For your information, Chris Tomko has resigned from GSP.  GSP has hired 
a consultant, Hoyt Thomas (who has been working as an Enron HR consultant for 
a few weeks), to handle interim HR responsibilities until GSP hires a new HR 
person.  I suspect that you will be involved in a lot of advice/counselling 
in the next few weeks as this transition occurs.  If you are available on 
Friday, I would like to have a phone introduction of you and Hoyt.   Would 
you please call my assistant, Twanda Sweet, at 713-853-6401, to let her know 
your availability so that she can set up a conference call?  Thanks a lot.

Twanda, would you please set this up when Pat calls?

Michelle

cpage@phks.com on 09/20/2000 01:04:55 PM
Pat McCarthy asked me to forward the enclosed memo.

 - dhvg01!.DOC

great, Andrea, shall we discuss rollout asap?  Thanks!!  Michelle

Brian Schaffer@ENRON
09/18/2000 09:55 AM
I'm comfortable with this approach.

Michelle Cash@ECT
09/18/2000 01:13 AM
Andrea, 

I don't think we need a certification.  I suggest an email mailout, with the 
policy residing on the hr web site.  It would be a good idea to place a link 
to the policy on all pages that involve HR data, such as PEP, comp data base, 
SAP HR, etc.

Brian, what do you think?

Michelle

Andrea Yowman@ENRON
09/17/2000 04:21 PM
Do you need any type of certification that the employee has read and accepts 
like the "Certificate of Compliance"?  Can we put it on the front page of 
ehronline and HROL?  Should this just be an email mailout?  Should this 
reside on the hrwebsite?

Michelle Cash@ECT
09/15/2000 03:08 PM
Andrea,

Brian and I were talking about the dissemination of this policy.  It seems as 
if it should come from your group and go out globally.  What do you think?

Michelle

Michelle Cash
09/06/2000 11:43 AM
Sent by: Twanda Sweet
Attached is a revised draft of the Employee Data Protection Policy, which is 
required because of directives by the European Union.

Please provide me with any questions or comments on this policy.

I would appreciate any comments by Monday, September 11, 2000 so that this 
policy can be rolled out quickly.

Thank you.

Michelle Cash

Roberto, 

These are good questions, and, in fact, are ones to which I am not certain of 
the answer (at least for #2).  Let's get together next week to discuss the 
specifics of how this program works and then determine the issues.

Twanda, would you please set up this meeting for me?

Thanks.  Michelle

Roberto Deleon@ENRON
09/21/2000 02:18 PM
Enron will be implementing the Mailsweeper software shortly.  This 
application is primarily designed for email scanning/content filtering.  We 
have the following outstanding issue that need to be addressed before this 
application goes into production.

1. Legal disclaimer for out going mail.  (Propose verbiage listed below)

IMPORTANT: THIS DOCUMENT IS NOT A BINDING CONTRACT. ENRON DOES NOT CREATE ANY 
CONTRACTUAL RIGHTS BY TRANSMISSION OF THIS EMAIL.  THIS MESSAGE IS INTENDED 
ONLY FOR THE USE OF THE INDIVIDUAL OR ENTITY TO WHICH IT IS ADDRESSED, AND 
MAY CONTAIN INFORMATION THAT IS PRIVILEGED, CONFIDENTIAL, AND EXEMPT FROM 
DISCLOSURE UNDER APPLICABLE LAW.  IF THE READER OF THIS MESSAGE IS NOT THE 
INTENDED RECIPIENT OR THE EMPLOYEE OR AGENT RESPONSIBLE FOR DELIVERING THE 
MESSAGE TO THE INTENDED RECIPIENT, YOU ARE HEREBY NOTIFIED THAT ANY 
DISCLOSURE, DISSEMINATION, DISTRIBUTION, OR COPYING OF THE COMMUNICATION IS 
STRICTLY PROHIBITED.  IF YOU HAVE RECEIVED THIS EMAIL TRANSMISSION IN ERROR, 
PLEASE IMMEDIATELY NOTIFY THE SENDER BY TELEPHONE SO THAT WE CAN ARRANGE FOR 
ITS RETURN.      

2. Under the new setup, all out-going mail (including remote sites i.e 
London) will be routed through Houston, processed through Mailsweeper and 
then sent to its final destination.  How can be sure that we are not in 
violation of a foreign country's privacy laws?

Your comments on these issue is greatly appreciated.

Regards,
Roberto DeLeon

Bob, there also are legal issues to address, so I appreciate your keeping me 
in the loop as this evolves.  Thanks.  Michelle

Molly, add her to the list for Carlos.  Also, could you find out who Bonnie 
Nelson has worked for in the past and provide me with that information so 
that we can call and make reference checks?  Thanks a lot.  Michelle

I am interested in Carlos.  I would also like to run some references on 
Bonnie Nelson.

Chuck,

Do we have a rescheduled date for the deposition of the plaintiff?  Given the 
correspondence I've been receiving about rescheduling other depositions, we 
probably should set forth a date in Nov/Dec and get a protective order from 
the court stating that it cannot be rescheduled.  Otherwise, even if we do 
"agree" on dates, there likely would be additional delays.  I am ready to 
hear what this guy has to say about my client.

Let me know your thoughts.  Thanks.

Michelle

Drew, You are right on.  I do have the concerns raised in your prior email, 
but I did not want to commit those to writing.  I have asked to be kept in 
the loop, and will provide that input as needed in a meeting setting.  
Thanks.  Michelle

Ginger, I cannot attend that meeting, as I am in another.  I will be out of 
the office the rest of the week, so check with Twanda Sweet, my assistant, 
for rescheduling options.  Thanks.  Michelle

I also want to be included in this discussion, but I do not want to commit my 
thoughts to writing.  So, count me in.  Michelle

   

David:

I would characterise my view as "treat the causes not the symptoms".  
Bottomline line, change and innovation are good.  Let's capture the good 
available to us in innovation.

With respect to free radicals, something is missing which creates 
instability, negativity and a highly reactive state.  For this reason, free 
radicals are very "short-lived."   Let's avoid short-lived results.

Regards,

Bob

David Oxley@ECT
09/25/2000 09:24 AM
Gerry,

Would you please organise a gathering or an alternate forum for this 
discussion. Based on the various messages I believe the following have 
expressed an interest in being involved:

Drew Capitalist Lynch
Neil Free market radical Davies
Bruce I couldn't think of a witty reposte Van Cleve
Pam Just the facts Butler
Robbie I'm too busy to reply to your silly emails but include me in the 
debate Jones
Andrea Lets be careful Yowman
Bob Lets be extra careful Sparger
and me.......so far.

Now for this weeks debate...................................."I propose no 
Commercial staff may or can move between Op Co's until January or February, 
unless the poaching Op Co OTC has approached the sponsoring Op Co OTC in 
advance of contacting the employee and the move is subsequently sanctioned by 
the Exec Committee".

David

Bruce Van Cleve@EES
09/25/2000 07:43 AM
HR folks, Ralph Waldo Emerson, Adam Smith, Karl Marx, etc.:

I too would like to be involved in this discussion.  I would comment that I 
support any type of broad band structure vs. a "Hay type" system.  Having 
been part of organizations having various types of both, payment, movement 
and placement of people is simply, much easier with broad banding in a 
relatively flat organization.

Bruce

David Oxley@ECT
09/22/2000 08:12 AM
OK. Great. 

However, in our laudable desire to be practical and enter this debate 
understanding some of the undisputed challenges a radical approach might 
present, LETS NOT KILL RADICAL THOUGHT OR IDEAS PLEASE! At least initially 
lets get all the opinions out there before we place any limits or timeframes 
or qualifications.

David (It's revolution - far out!) 

   

David:

Would love to be involved in this as a view of process and change 
opportunity.  

We do not want to react to, and treat, the symptoms (number of absolute 
categories), without full consideration of the root cause and setting a plan 
to address it.  The real change issue as I see it is job description and 
"position" classification.   The real project is to rationalise the job 
structures within Enron - simplify wherever possible.  Target a cut from 24 
categories to say 12.  This impacts not only the PRC, but how we look at 
compensation across the levels, function performed (e.g., commercial, 
commercial support, technical) and specialization areas (e.g.,  legal, 
accounting, IT, engineering, HR, etc.)

With respect to current yearend PRC, it is hard to change the agreed process 
midstream.  It is doable if we can show where/how certain of the categories 
are "equivalent" and should be considered together.   Only caveat is to 
ensure we do not render the root cause untreatable by addressing symptoms.

Tim / Gerry:

How would you like to approach this?  Two key groups we need to link in are 
Compensation (Mary Joyce, Pam Butler) and PRC (Gina Corteselli, Andrea 
Yowman).  Let talk early next week.

Regards,

Bob

David Oxley@ECT
09/21/2000 02:49 PM
Tim/Gerry/Bob,

Would you facilitate this discussion?

David

Neil Davies@ENRON
09/21/2000 02:41 PM
Commie and Capitalist 

It seems to me that both ideas and philosophies have merits - it is all down 
to how you assign value to roles - in ENA commercial deal making function 
this is very easy to do - how much they profit they generate - grade has very 
little place in this world.

In other areas it is harder and grading provides a methodology (far from 
perfect) for grouping and providing structure around a set of skills and how 
they are valued in the organisation. To lose them without providing some 
other method of measuring value e.g. a more robust PRC process, would run the 
risk of making a sometimes too subjective process even more subjective.

Give me a small number of loose grades anytime. So we should aim for nearer 
to 8/9 and head away from the 24 - having 7 levels for admins does smack of 
bureacracy.

Would be interested to be involved in looking at this

Neil
(free market radical)

Drew C Lynch@ECT
09/21/2000 11:41 AM
David,

Obviously I missed this meeting, but Scott has been good enough to fill in 
some of the details for me. In concept I agree that less levels is better, 
but I am not sure that we can get it down to 5. The process does warrant 
further discussion and I would like to be included.

DCL (Capitalist)

David Oxley
21/09/2000 17:22
I'm disappointed that we haven't followed up on the conversation we had a few 
weeks ago relating to the 24 hierarchical levels we apparently preside over 
here at Enron.

My view remains we should have a strong ambition to significantly reduce and 
simplify the current grade structures. Far from adding additional levels a 
fundamental analysis should be made of the need for any more than 5 from top 
to bottom. In this regard I would lay down the following challenge for your 
comments: why would the following structure not work better in promoting a 
flat, entrepreneurial, open, fast paced organisation, while also 
significantly reducing the bureaucracy:

Number of PRC levels Commercial   Support/Technical   Key
1    MD/VP    Same     Collapse 2
2    Deal Makers    Management    Collapse 3
3    A&A's    Specialists/Consultants/Professionals Collapse 3/5
4    Admin (non- Exempt)  Same     Collapse 7!

David (Commie) Oxley

Andrea,

I am supposed to follow up and work on our action plan for data integrity.  
However, I know that you are going to meet with David/Robert on the whole 
concept and that you proposed a work around for the near term after our 
sessions.  It appears as if our action plans will depend on the results of 
that meeting.  

I will be out of the office on Wed-Friday on business.  It looks like our 
action plan revisions are due on Friday (but, if necessary, I'll ask for an 
extension because of my travel).  In the meantime, you can meet with 
David/Robert and begin to look at revamping our prior efforts.

Alternatively, you can reconvene the group and work on revising action plans 
without me.  (I am not sure how helpful I am in any event).  What do you 
think?  

Michelle

PS, do we need to include Don in our group?

TWanda, please print for me, including attachments.  Thanks.  Michelle

Rick Johnson@ENRON
09/25/2000 02:48 PM
Michelle, Attached are the summary reports and tasking letter that I had 
compiled for Falcon,  Peter indicarted that the due diligence and internal 
review was being strickly limited, since he is now sharing info with you, I 
wanted you to have the stuff I have commented on.  Rj.  
 

fyi.  mhc

Leah Smith <lsmith@bracepatt.com> on 09/25/2000 12:34:00 PM
2000 EEO-1 Surveys Deadline Extended
September 25, 2000

The Joint Reporting Commission  of the U.S. Equal Employment Opportunity
Commission (EEOC) has extended the deadline for employers to file their
2000 EEO-1 Surveys from September 30, 2000 to October 30, 2000. Private
employers with 100 or more employees and federal contractors with 50 or
more employees and contracts of $50,000 or more, are required to file
an EEO-1 report.
The EEOC has recently completed its mail-out of EEO-1 forms, so keep checking
your mail - it should be on its way!  If October 15th rolls around and
you have not yet received your survey, you may call the Joint Reporting
Committee at (757) 461-1213, or log on to www.mimdms.com, to request a
copy.

If you would like more information on this issue, please contact Kelly
Killian Satel at (210) 299-3590 or 1-800-597-1166.

I would suggest working through Sheila Knudsen and the Compensation Council 
to get this done Enron-wide.  Let me know if that isn't successful.  Thanks. 
Michelle

   

What is your suggestion regarding disseminating the message to all other 
Enron Companies that part-time employees from the staff level on up (all 
exempt positions) should be paid on a salaried basis?   I could use your 
input on this.    I called Brian Schaeffer approx. 1 month ago and he said he 
was aware of the situation and that changes were going to be made but, I've 
not heard anything about how the message is being communicated to other Enron 
companies. 

No, just hold on -- we're waiting for final settlement documents from 
Reliant, with the Ajello release.  Michelle

Hi Michelle...just a note; I haven't heard anything about the settlement,
and have neither sent nor received a dismissal order. Is this ball in my
court? Let me know.
Best regards,
Bill

 tweanda, please print this and save as a form.  Then, put the print out in 
the Merger, Acquisition, and Divestitures Notebook on myu credenza-- just 
stick it inside there.  Thanks.  MHc

Dolores Lenfest@ENRON
08/22/2000 07:22 PM
Bill,

Here's my standard diligence check list.

Thanks,
Dee

Michelle Cash@ECT
08/22/2000 05:53 PM
Dee, could you please forward to him your standard list?  Thanks a lot!  
Michelle

Michelle:

Attached is the DD list provided by RAC - please let me know if you would 
like the team to request additional information from Ahlstrom during our 
visit on Thursday and Friday.  If you could send me this info before I leave 
Wednesday at 10:30, I would appreciate it.

I will send you copies of the plant O&M agreements over the next few days.

Thanks-
Bill

no, hold all of them until I speak with him -- we've obviously got a lot of 
interest!  Michelle

   

I'll wait to hear from you for all interviews for him--or did you want me to 
go ahead and schedule him with Barbara anyway?

Michelle Cash
12/05/2000 11:00 AM
Here are others who want to interview Carlos.  I tell you what -- before you 
schedule any of these, let me talk with Carlos first to see where his 
interests lie.  Keep these names, and I'll keep you posted on who to schedule 
with him.  Thanks.  Michelle

Alan Aronowitz
12/05/2000 10:46 AM
Dan Rogers and I would each like to meet with Carlos for a potential position 
with EGM. Could you arrange?

Alan

Michelle Cash
12/04/2000 10:04 PM
Attached is the resume of Carlos Sole, who currently is working for EECC.  He 
is interested in pursuing opportunities within EWS, and we received excellent 
references about his work performance from John Schwartzenburg and Kay Mann.  
I am meeting with him on Friday of this week (he is out of town until then).  
If you have an interest in talking with him, let me know, and I will arrange 
a meeting.

Thanks.  Michelle

Michelle, per my voicemail as I indicated, I am trying to pursue what 
opportunities may be available at EWS and both Julia Murray and Kay Mann 
recommended that I contact you.  As background, I have been at EECC since 
October last year where I have focused on traditional EPC contracts and joint 
venture agreements with construction partners, cross-border financing 
agreements principally in Mexico and merger and acquisition/strategic 
investment transactions.  Before coming to Enron, I worked with the Houston 
office of a New York based firm (Curtis, Mallet-Prevost, Colt & Mosle)  where 
I focused mostly on transactions in Mexico since we represented Pemex on 
their transactions involving long and short term oil supply agreements and 
CFE (Mexico's electricity commission) on its public bids for EPC and IPP 
projects.  Lastly, I started my legal career in 1994 at Patton Boggs in 
Washington, DC where I focused on general domestic corporate transactions 
such as establishing new business entities (ie, joint venture work, 
partnerships etc.), m & a work, and securities offerings.  Thanks for your 
consideration and I look forward to talking with you when you return from 
vacation (my extension is 6-6127).  

Amy, this looks fine, except I would delete the provision about exceptions, 
because there really are none!  Thanks.  Michelle

Amy FitzPatrick
09/28/2000 05:09 PM
Michelle -

Can you have a look at the attached compliance form and let me know if this 
is OK to send out to all employees with a copy of the policy?

This goes back a while - sorry for the delay.

Thanks!
Amy

Here are comments from Tom Moore regarding the proposed Services Agreement.  
I will circulate the draft SSD this week.  As always, I welcome additional 
feedback from the user groups.  

Michelle

Tom O Moore@ENRON
10/02/2000 01:15 PM
Michelle,

I have reviewed the document and offer the following items for your 
consideration:

1.  Should we include the standard "affiliate" language for clarity and to 
maximize our flexibility?

2.  Can you tell me the basic differences between the PWD and SSD?

3.  Do we want to impose the Enron Code of Ethics referred to in para. 3a., 
Performance Standards?

4.  I personally believe that we should delete reference to the "Staffing 
Service Fee" in para. 4b and the "Liquidation                Table" in para. 
4c.  These type of fees/factors are subject to many outside influences and 
can fluctuate considerably with the marketplace.  I think that we may lose 
some negotiations leverage by locking any such rates in the basic contract.  
Those kind of issues can still be worked on a case by case basis and 
incorporated into the contract by amendment, or possibly, the PWD.

It looks like an efficient document, and it should save some time and effort 
as we progress.  Please feel free to contact me if you have any questions.

Thanks,

Tom Moore
Global Strategic Sourcing
x55552

	Michelle Cash@ECT
	Sent by: Twanda Sweet@ECT
	09/27/2000 03:42 PM
		 
Attached is a draft of the Agreement for Recruiting or Contract Personnel 
Services.  This draft combines the Master Services Agreement, the Agreement 
for Project Services, and the Staffing Services Agreement into a single, 
comprehensive document.

Attached to this, as applicable, will be a Project Work Description ("PWD") 
and/or a Staffing Services Description ("SSD").  I understand that HR is 
working on a revised PWD.

I will circulate the SSD in the near future.  It will contain a more specific 
description of staffing services (e.g. retained/contingency) as well as pay 
rates.

Please review this draft to determine if it fits your needs.  Feel free to 
throw darts!  Let me know by return email if you have comments or questions.  
I will resolve as many as possible based upon your comments as well as those 
of others in Legal, and circulate a revised draft based upon those comments.

Thank you.

Gerry, this is too cryptic for me -- what was decided?  I'd like to go to the 
next meeting!  Thanks.  Michelle

Gerry Gibson@ENRON
10/06/2000 10:56 AM
Hello Folks:

I wanted to quickly follow-up with a note on the Next Steps we agreed to this 
morning. We will distribute the balance of the meeting notes shortly. If I 
missed anything in the translation, please let us know... Thanks, Gerry G.

Key Next Steps            Who / When

Solicit Cindy Olson's help lining up McKinsey Consultant's (Suzanne) 
participation  David O. / 10-6

2. Convene small group that was present this morning and McKinsey      Gerry 
G. / by 10-17
Consultant to further define philosophical direction and a high level snap 
shot
of the new and improved organizational model

3. Present high level model to Cindy. Prepare her to run by Jeff S.     Team 
/ by 10-27

4. Present to Jeff S. - make decision on go or no go       Cindy O by 11-1

5. If decision is a go - convene more comprehensive team meeting to further 
define model  Team by 11-15
and implementation plan

David,  I will have this re-reviewed by Oregon counsel, but it was scrubbed 
about 18-24 months ago as being enforceable.  Thanks.  Michelle

Bill, I had asked Twanda to get a conference call with you and Dana Davis on 
Williams.  I hope that happened . . .   I would like to have a petition ready 
early next week.  It will be lawsuit only, not injunctive relief.

I believe Ajello will be finalized this week.  I sent our signed version to 
Reliant last week, and I hope to have it signed by Ajello soon.  Once that 
happens, we can dismiss.

Thanks.  Michelle

 Hi Michelle...

 Just a reminder: I've heard nothing further on either the Ajello settlement
or the new matter involving Alonzo Williams.

 I'm looking forward to lunch next Tuesday.

 Best regards,

 Bill

Gina, I am not sure that the "Satisfactory" descriptor is accurate.  "Met" 
expectations probably does not fit the average person's view of a person in 
Satisfactory.  Perhaps "met most, but not all" or something like that would 
be more accurate.

Where are we on the total revamp?  Has that been postponed until next year?

Thanks.  Michelle

   

Hi Michelle;

I have attached the latest version of the proposed cluster descriptors for 
year end-2000.  We would like to have these reviewed by the VP/MD PRC 
Committee tomorrow , but wanted to ensure that you saw them first.  They 
comprise merely a refinement of the present descriptors, with an effort to 
demonstrating "relativity".  let me know your thoughts, thanks, G  

Davie -- 

Meets many, but may have some developmen needs works just fine.  

I just don't want people to say someone is satisfactory and meets 
requirements when, in fact, there are developmental needs that are obvious 
when compared to persons in strong.

So, I am happy with your proposal (although I suggest that your second 
proposal does not meet the "fairly up" goal).

Cheers.  Mich

David Oxley
10/09/2000 12:34 PM
Mich,

What's middle ground. I would prefer to keep satisfactory wording fairly up. 
This is what caused most concern at mid year in conjunction with our 20% 
guideline for that cluster "We don't feel comfortable putting Joe in here 
given what it says - he really does an OK job".

My orginal pitch was meets many but may have some development needs relative 
to peers, or meets most or exceeds some and sucks in others.

The latter is my personnel favorite.

David

   

Do you agree?   
Michelle Cash@ECT
10/09/2000 11:31 AM
Gina, I am not sure that the "Satisfactory" descriptor is accurate.  "Met" 
expectations probably does not fit the average person's view of a person in 
Satisfactory.  Perhaps "met most, but not all" or something like that would 
be more accurate.

Where are we on the total revamp?  Has that been postponed until next year?

Thanks.  Michelle

   

Hi Michelle;

I have attached the latest version of the proposed cluster descriptors for 
year end-2000.  We would like to have these reviewed by the VP/MD PRC 
Committee tomorrow , but wanted to ensure that you saw them first.  They 
comprise merely a refinement of the present descriptors, with an effort to 
demonstrating "relativity".  let me know your thoughts, thanks, G  

I have sent a mark-up of this to Dave.  Let's talk tomorrow around 10:00.  
Michelle

	Fran L Mayes
	10/09/2000 01:48 PM
	

your thoughts

FYI -- Michelle

09/27/2000 03:09 PM
Kriste Sullivan@ENRON
Kriste Sullivan@ENRON
Kriste Sullivan@ENRON
09/27/2000 03:09 PM
09/27/2000 03:09 PM
FYI

In case this issue comes up for you, be advised that in Oregon by statute the 
employer is required to provide a terminated employee access to his or her PH 
file and a certified copy  of the file upon request.  A copy of the statute 
is attached.

Kriste K. Sullivan
Enron Corp. Legal
1400 Smith, EB 4861
Houston, TX  77002
(713) 853-7557
(713) 646-5847 Fax
KSulliv@Enron.com

This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.
	Barbara Halle/ENRON@Gateway
	09/25/2000 02:10 PM
		 
Here is the statute you were asking about.  Any questions, please call....

O.R.S. o 652.750
 
1999 OREGON REVISED STATUTES
TITLE 51. LABOR AND INDUSTRIAL RELATIONS
CHAPTER 652. HOURS; WAGES; RECORDS
PERSONNEL RECORDS

Current through End of 1999 Reg. Sess.
 

652.750. Inspection of records by employee; furnishing copy to employee;
disposition of record on termination of employment; charge for copies.

 (1) As used in this section:

 (a) "Employer" has the meaning for that term provided in > ORS 656.005.

 (b) "Personnel records" do not include records of an individual relating to
the conviction, arrest or investigation of conduct constituting a violation of
the criminal laws of this state or another state or the United States,
confidential reports from previous employers or records maintained in
compliance with > ORS 351.065.

 (2) At the request of an employee, the employer shall provide reasonable
opportunity for the employee to inspect, at the place of employment or place
of work assignment, those personnel records of the employee which are used or
have been used to determine the employee's qualification for employment,
promotion, additional compensation or employment termination or other
disciplinary action. At the request of the employee, the employer shall
furnish a certified copy of such records.

 (3) Upon termination of employment, the employer shall keep the terminated
employee's personnel records for not less than 60 days. At the request of the
employee, within the 60-day period or at any time if the employer has retained
the records at the time of the request, the employer shall furnish a certified
copy of such records.

 (4) An employer may make only such charge for the services referred to in
subsections (2) and (3) of this section as is reasonably calculated to recover
the actual cost of providing the service.
 

(1977 c. 861 o 2; 1985 c. 404 o 6)

Here are the schedules.  MHC

Karen E Jones
10/09/2000 07:35 PM
Attached for your review and input are initial cuts at the schedules for the 
draft P & S Agreement that we will be discussing on our call tomorrow 
morning.  You'll see that in many places the drafts are simply placeholders 
for information that some of you will need to provide, but hopefully they 
provide a useful starting point.  I  cannot overstate the importance of the 
schedules.  They have a direct impact upon the representations that ENA will 
be making to a potential purchaser and any errors in the schedules can result 
in serious financial liability for the company.

We need to have our schedules for Pastoria ready for posting on DealBench by 
the end of this week.

Thanks for your continued efforts.  I look forward to talking with you 
tomorrow.

Alice, for the employee we discussed last week, here is information on 
payee.  It doesn't look good.  Michelle

Amanda Curless@ENRON
12/01/2000 12:01 PM
Michelle,
I talked with Accounts Payable and we are sending payments to the UK. The 
address is 5355 HighStreet, Egham, Great Britain. Thanks!
Mandy

Hector/Valeria,

Do we have a rule against heaters?  If not, that seems to be the easiest 
solution, as well as the "dress warm" advice.  I think that moving him would 
not be good -- his isolation could work against our goals here.

Your thoughts? 

Michelle

thanks, I look forward to your thoughts and comments.  michelle

Steve, I hope that I did not educate her too well . . . It was great to see 
you, and be sure to let me know if you can use my help in the future.  
Michelle

Michelle -

It was grand to bump in to you last night at Randalls.  Your son looks like a 
bundle of energy.  Your cookie insights were not lost on my daughter.
She has secured my commitment to visit the bakery area first thing on our 
next trip. I'd say she considers it a good encounter.

Take care
Steve

Kay, I will be out attending a seminar -- but, don't hold it up for me.  
Thanks!  Michelle

   
	
	

How does next Friday October 20, 2000, look for everyone ??? I have morning 
and afternoon available.  I even have a 10:00 am if you just want to move the 
date and not the time.

Kay

Tana Cashion @ ENRON   10/12/2000 02:28 PM

What is the first availbale day that David can be at the meeting?  Let's try 
to schedule a time that day.  THanks - Tana

   

The Monday October 16, 2000 meeting at 10:00 am needs to be moved again.  
Sorry for the inconvenience, but David Oxley is going to be traveling..

Thanks,

Kay

All is fine -- no disparate impact in the selection.  But, I still would like 
to see data about why certain persons were selected.  Thanks.  Michelle

Francisco deJesus@ENRON
10/12/2000 06:07 PM
Michelle,

Thank you. Can you pls share the results?

Regards
Frank

Michelle Cash@ECT
10/12/2000 02:32 PM
fyi.

Michelle, 

I have completed this analysis.  Are you in your office this afternoon?  If 
so, I will drop it by.

Felecia

Cathy, what do we want to do with regard to Paskoff?  Remember, we were 
waiting until this week to respond to his requests for additional 
consideration?  Please let me know.  Thanks.  Michelle

Cathy,

Also, for persons over 40 who are signing waivers, we must provide them with 
the census data about persons under 40/over 40 who were offered a package, as 
well as their title and age.  Please make sure that happens, or our waivers 
will not be valid.

Thanks. 

Michelle

FYI.

Also, I never heard back from Ilya's lawyer.  Did he sign?  

Thanks.  Michelle

I am sending you links to our newest ASAP's on California wage and hour and
workers compensation issues.  Our ASAP's are our summary of important
developments in employment law.  If you do not have employees in California,
these ASAP's probably are not relevant to your company.

The first ASAP summarizes recent developments relating to whether or not
computer professionals and nurses must be paid overtime.  The link to this
ASAP follows:

http://128.241.163.162/nwsltr/asap_sb88.html

The second ASAP is a general overview of the current state of the workers'
compensation system in California.  This may even be of interest if you do
not have employees in California because the issues that arise in California
often occur in other parts of the country.  The link to this ASAP follows:

http://128.241.163.162/nwsltr/asap_insurance.html

Please notify me if you have problems opening this link.  I can send you a
hard copy of the ASAP if necessary. In addition, feel free to print or
forward this link to others in your or other companies, or use it in any
other manner that assists your organization. In addition, let me know if you
do not wish to receive these updates.

Littler Mendelson is the nation's largest law firm devoted exclusively to
representing management in employment and labor matters.  With approximately
400 lawyers in 30 offices around the country, our firm handles more
employment matters than any other law firm.  Feel free to contact me if you
have questions about the issues addressed in these ASAP's or about any other
employment law issue.

Kerry E Notestine
Littler Mendelson, PC
1900 Chevron Tower
1301 McKinney Street
Houston, Texas 77010
713.652.4748
713.951.9212 (fax)
knotestine@littler.com
www.littler.com

----
This email may contain confidential and privileged material for the sole use 
of the intended recipient(s). Any review, use, distribution or disclosure by 
others is strictly prohibited. If you are not the intended recipient (or 
authorized to receive for the recipient), please contact the sender by reply 
email and delete all copies of this message.

To reply to our email administrator directly, send an email to
postmaster@littler.com

Littler Mendelson, P.C.
http://www.littler.com

Jim,

FYI.

The second link here is about workers' comp insurance in California.  

Michelle

I am sending you links to our newest ASAP's on California wage and hour and
workers compensation issues.  Our ASAP's are our summary of important
developments in employment law.  If you do not have employees in California,
these ASAP's probably are not relevant to your company.

The first ASAP summarizes recent developments relating to whether or not
computer professionals and nurses must be paid overtime.  The link to this
ASAP follows:

http://128.241.163.162/nwsltr/asap_sb88.html

The second ASAP is a general overview of the current state of the workers'
compensation system in California.  This may even be of interest if you do
not have employees in California because the issues that arise in California
often occur in other parts of the country.  The link to this ASAP follows:

http://128.241.163.162/nwsltr/asap_insurance.html

Please notify me if you have problems opening this link.  I can send you a
hard copy of the ASAP if necessary. In addition, feel free to print or
forward this link to others in your or other companies, or use it in any
other manner that assists your organization. In addition, let me know if you
do not wish to receive these updates.

Littler Mendelson is the nation's largest law firm devoted exclusively to
representing management in employment and labor matters.  With approximately
400 lawyers in 30 offices around the country, our firm handles more
employment matters than any other law firm.  Feel free to contact me if you
have questions about the issues addressed in these ASAP's or about any other
employment law issue.

Kerry E Notestine
Littler Mendelson, PC
1900 Chevron Tower
1301 McKinney Street
Houston, Texas 77010
713.652.4748
713.951.9212 (fax)
knotestine@littler.com
www.littler.com

----
This email may contain confidential and privileged material for the sole use 
of the intended recipient(s). Any review, use, distribution or disclosure by 
others is strictly prohibited. If you are not the intended recipient (or 
authorized to receive for the recipient), please contact the sender by reply 
email and delete all copies of this message.

To reply to our email administrator directly, send an email to
postmaster@littler.com

Littler Mendelson, P.C.
http://www.littler.com

Twanda, would you please schedule a meeting with me, Hector, Sheila W., and 
Brian Schaffer re:  follow up to the Bashen information?  I would like to 
have this group discuss how to close the loop with Sally's employees and 
implement any recommendations for follow-up.
I think the meeting with last approximately 1 1/2 hours. 

Thanks.  Michelle

I'll interview.  I'm available between 10-12 on Thursday.  Let me know when 
and where.  Michelle

Geynille Dillingham
12/05/2000 12:54 PM
Due to some scheduling conflicts some of the candidates are coming in at 
various times.  As it stands the following is their arrival dates and times:

Candidate  Date  Time
Christina Benkert Dec. 8  after 6:00 PM
Nelly Haghighat Dec. 8  after 6:00 PM
Rupa Bhargava  Dec. 8  9:05 PM
Belinda DeLa Cruz Dec. 8  11:05 AM
Ayesha Kanji  Dec. 8  11:05 AM
Sona Khanova  Dec. 8   1:48 PM
Amanda Lang  Dec. 8  11:05 AM
Dale You  Dec. 8   11:05 AM
Sabrina DeMelo Dec. 7  after 6:00 PM

One of the candidates Sabrina DeMelo is unavailable for the weekend 
interviews and in order to accomodate her she has been given the option of 
getting her four interviews in on the off cycle Super Thursday.  However, 
they are looking for interviewers for that Thursday so I will need two 
volunteers from the Wellesley team for the following date:

Thursday, December 7th from 9:00 a.m. -12:30 p.m.

Please contact Cathy Lira, at ext. 5-4049 to inform her of your availability.

If you have any questions please do not hesitate to contact me.

Thanks, Geynille

 Please print this and save it to my document list.  Thanks.  Michelle

Michelle:

 Here is copy of email message to Mark with redlined version of
proposed services agreement.

     Clark

 - AGREEMT.DOC

I agree with your assessment.  Thanks.  michelle

Brian Schaffer@ENRON
10/16/2000 03:04 PM
Michelle:

 By the way, I talked with Marty last week about Bashen's files.  He said 
that they were on the way to him and he would forward to me immediately.  
Therefore, I expect to get them any day now.  I assume I should review 
immediately; let me know if you think otherwise.

Brian

I suggest contacting Peggy Banzak for a contact in Mexico.  Michelle

	Fran L Mayes
	10/17/2000 12:28 PM
	

	

Please read the original email below.  Unfortunately I never responded - 
however as I read through the material today, I am unable to answer any of 
these questions.  Do we have a contact (outside counsel) who can provide 
assistance.

Fran

Fran:

What's the word on the tax summary for Mexico?  Has it been completed?  If 
not, we are running up against a deadline so this task needs to be completed 
as soon as possible.  If you have any questions, please call me at 
713-853-9151.

Thanks.
Lina
	
	

Fran:

You should be aware that Enron Corp. will grant stock options to domestic and 
some international employees.  Some employees in Mexico will be granted stock 
options this year.  As a result, I must identify the treatment of stock 
options in various countries.  Your name was provided by the Human Resources 
representatives in charge with administering the EnronOptions program.

Attached you will find a series of questions regarding the taxation of stock 
options.  I need you to provide answers to the short list of questions and to 
verify those answers already supplied.  You may wish to contact outside tax 
counsel in Mexico to assist you with these questions.  I ask that you 
complete this task by October 1, 2000.

If you have any questions, please call me at 713-853-9151,

Thank you for your cooperation in this matter.

Lina Jimenez

Pursuant to your request, attached is a draft letter to WiseSoft, Inc. 
regarding Hennadiy Batrak.

Anne,

I have reviewed the P&S Agreement for Triple Lutz.  From my perspective, it 
generally looks fine.  I have a few comments, and invite Pat Mackin to add 
any he may have, in particular based on his review of Section 4.14.

In Section 4.7(c)(iv), there is a reference to any contract obligations.  I 
believe this would include employment contracts, which do not appear to be 
identified specifically on any schedule unless the annual amount exceeds 
$250K.    We may want to clarify that the disclosures are consistent with the 
provisions of Section 4.13(iii).

Section 4.8 provides that we will not enter into any employee benefits not 
required by law.  However, given that closing is pushed out so far in the 
future, we may want the flexibility to provide incentive bonuses for key 
personnel to stay with the company through closing.  This may be done with 
the Buyer's consent, but we may be tying our hands.  Section 6.2(e) contains 
a similar restriction on making payments to officers/directors.

In addition, Section 4.8 states that we won't enter into or amend any 
employment contracts.  We do not renew employment contracts at a single time, 
and the contracts of key personnel may expire.  Do we want to tie our hands 
and be prohibited from amending/extending the agreements?  Section 6.2(l) 
also prohibits the modification/amendment of contracts with employees.

In Section 4.10, the wording "(other than Environmental Laws)" suggests that 
we are not in compliance with environmental laws.  Rephrasing that sentence 
to refer to the provision of the Agreement may be preferable.

In Section 4.11(d), we promise that we haven't provided any gift of any kind 
to customers.  I don't think we can say that, given that we regularly host 
client development outings (e.g. Rodeo BBQ tickets, golf tourneys, etc.) and 
provide Enron goodies to people all the time.  Perhaps a limitation on de 
minimus gifts would be more accurate.  Also, a reference to our Code of 
Ethics may work here.

In Section 4.13(a)(iii), does the $250K threshhold include only cash value, 
or does it include equity grants that vest over time?  A reference to "cash" 
payments would clarify, given that people here are compensated by stock 
options/restricted stock that vest over time.

In Section 4.14(d), I am not sure whether this transaction accelerates 
vesting -- Pat, do you know?

Should Section 7.3 be italicized?  I have not seen the latest of the Employee 
Matters Agreement.

Have the parties discussed arbitration in lieu of litigation in Texas for the 
purposes of dispute resolution?

Anne, let me know if these comments need clarification or if you have any 
other questions.

Michelle

Pat,

I have reviewed this agreement and provided my comments under a separate 
email.  I would appreciate your review of Section 4.14 in particular, given 
your familiarity with the compensation plans and benefit plans.  In terms of 
timing, your comments probably can go into the next draft, but if you have a 
chance to look at 4.14 today, it would be great!

Thanks a lot!

Michelle

Attached please find a revised draft of the Purchase and Sale Agreement 
prepared in response to Bidder A's comments.  Please review your sections and 
provide me with any comments today.  We plan to circulate to the other side 
this afternoon.  thanks

 Anne C. Koehler
Sr. Counsel, ENA
EB 3832
713-853-3448
	"Collins, Christopher" <chriscollins@velaw.com>
	Sent by: "Lowell, Katrina" <klowell@velaw.com>
	10/16/2000 04:25 PM
		 
Attached is a mark-up of the PSA with Bidder A, which incorporates most of
the Bidder A's comments.  As discussed, we have attempted to include those
comments proposed by Bidder A when possible and yet preserve the more
important "materiality protections for Seller.   The draft is marked against
Seller's bid document form, however, I have asked Lehman to send to me
electronically the Bidder A form.  Upon receipt, I will prepare and
distribute to you a compare-rite which will show the Bidder A comments which
we didn't accept.  In this draft, please note the following:

1.  Enron should confirm and advise whether the delayed closing date (April
2001) as reflected in Section 3.1 is acceptable.

2.  The tax provisions  include V&E's comments, however Enron Tax personnel
should consider carefully the "after tax basis" concept and definition,
Section 4.9 and Article 11.

3.  The appropriate Enron business people should provide input regarding the
proper thresholds and amounts for (i) the Deductible Amount, (ii) the
liability cap, (iii) Section 4.13 and Section 6.3.

4.  The appropriate Enron business people should provide input regarding the
provisions in Section 4.16 (Insurance) including the continuing post-closing
insurance obligations.

5.  The appropriate Enron personnel should advise us regarding the proper
procedures for Buyer to participate (observatory capacity) in the
post-signing business in accordance with Section 7.15.

Once you have had the opportunity to review the attached agreement, please
give me a call to set up a time to discuss your comments and required
revisions.

 <<Triple Lutz:Redlined PSA.DOC>>

 - Redlined PSA.DOC

Here is a set of comments by Pat Mackin on the Triple Lutz agreement.  

Cynthia/Mary, do you have anything to add?

Michelle

FMackin@aol.com on 10/18/2000 12:37:37 PM
Document attached

 - Triple Lutz m2.doc

please excuse the delay on this --

If possible, I would like the following documents copied from the data room:

Leaf River:  Tab No.'s 20, 119-140, 146, and 168-170

Woodland:  Tab No.'s 107-130, and 136

Brunswick:  Tab No.'s 102-127, and 137

Thanks.  

Michelle Cash

One other item:  Could you please request all employment contracts and change 
of control agreements, if any?  Thank you.  Michelle

Karen, does  Sean have his art on a web site anywhere?  I have someone who 
wants to look at it.  Michelle

FYI.  Michelle

I am sending you our most recent ASAP.  Our ASAP's are our summaries of
recent developments in employment matters.  This ASAP addresses the recent
changes in the regulations related to affirmative action plans.  Employers
which have contracts with the federal government, or contracts with federal
contractors, must prepare and maintain affirmative action plans (AAPs) as
long as they employ 50 or more employees, when the contracts are for $50,000
or more. The changes addressed in this ASAP are quite technical and require
careful consideration.
http://www.littler.com/nwsltr/asap_fed_affirmact.html

Please double click on the above link to access the ASAP.  Let me know if
you have trouble accessing this ASAP, and I can send you a hard copy.  You
also may visit our website (www.littler.com) to review this and other
publications by lawyers from our firm.  Feel free to forward this link or
print a copy and distribute it to others within or outside your company.  In
addition, let me know if you do not want to receive these updates, and I
will delete you from my distribution list.

Littler Mendelson is the nation's largest firm representing employers in
employment and labor matters.  With approximately 400 attorneys in 30
office, we address more issues related to employment than any other law
firm.  Please contact me if we can assist you with your AAP or other
employment matters.

Kerry E Notestine
Littler Mendelson, PC
1900 Chevron Tower
1301 McKinney Street
Houston, Texas 77010
713.652.4748
713.951.9212 (fax)
knotestine@littler.com
www.littler.com

----
This email may contain confidential and privileged material for the sole use 
of the intended recipient(s). Any review, use, distribution or disclosure by 
others is strictly prohibited. If you are not the intended recipient (or 
authorized to receive for the recipient), please contact the sender by reply 
email and delete all copies of this message.

To reply to our email administrator directly, send an email to
postmaster@littler.com

Littler Mendelson, P.C.
http://www.littler.com

Andrea, This looks good.

I have two nits:  First, the street value of our phone book is $1k, not $1.  
Also, "loosing" people should be "losing" people.

One other risk is that the descriptions of what people are doing could reveal 
confidential business strategies to our competitors because there is no 
filter on what employees can/can't put.  In other words, if an employee is 
working on developing something within Enron that our competitors do not know 
about, expertfinder could provide them with that data/strategy.

One other recommendation (by Scott) was to allow access only from an Enron 
facility -- not remotely.  This would manage risk of a person taking a laptop 
to a competitor and also would protect against hackers.

Given that employee talent is a major asset, we should find ways to move that 
talent around while also protecting it from being picked off from the outside.

Thanks.

Michelle

Here is the attachment.  Thanks for the update on Delainey.  Michelle

Andrea Yowman@ENRON
10/18/2000 06:47 PM

REMINDER:

 This email is to remind you that a meeting is scheduled for Monday, October 
23rd from 4:00-5:00 regarding visa issues in EB38C2.

Attached is a draft from Michelle Cash.

fyi.  Michelle

Rick Johnson@ENRON
10/19/2000 04:39 PM
Craig - My Data Room Request will in part be duplicate to the materials that 
Michelle Cash will be asking for.  Because I'm in a separate Location - 
Please provide me copies from the data room, (as requested on the attached 
word doc.) and FED-EX direct to my Portland Office Address
 
  
 Rick Johnson -  Enron Corp.
 121 SW Salmon St. ( 3WTC0306)
 Portland,  OR.  97204
Thanks, Rj.
  

Craig Hiddleston
10/17/2000 07:33 PM
In response to the question posed by numerous people today, we will have 
access to various GP representatives through calls coordinated through Morgan 
Stanley but it is unlikely that you will have access to GP contact people to 
repeatedly ask questions.

As requested this afternoon, please provide me a detailed list of the 
documents listed on the data room index that you want copies of (and other 
relevant documents) no later than 10AM on Wednesday morning.

Thanks,
Craig

Hector, we need to check with Kriste Sullivan on this.  I have a vague 
recollection about a group of employees going to Dynegy, and we had to send a 
demand letter to prohibit the improper use of Enron information.  She was 
involved, so could you please send her the email you sent to me?  Then, we 
can discuss a strategy.  Thanks.  Michelle

David,

I believe the agreement was signed.  It would have been a Corporate Services 
Agreement.  I believe that Shonnie Daniel or Steve Van Hooser worked on 
this.  I have cc'd this email to them so that they can provide you with a 
copy, forward it on to the appropriate person, or let me know if one never 
was signed, in which case I can prepare a new version.

Thanks.  Michelle

   

I was given your name by Steve Venturatos.  He said that you were involved in 
getting a Master Agreement set up so that Enron would supply a Risk team to 
take care of that function for Bridgeline.  I talked with Trevor Mihalik and 
he believes that an agreement was never signed.  Can you help me determine if 
there is an agreement in place and if not can we get one created?

Dave Baumbach

Here is the latest.  Michelle

Attached hereto is the most recent version of the Triple Lutz PSA for Bidder 
A.  Please review and let me know if you have any further comments on your 
sections.  thanks again for all your input.  

Anne C. Koehler
Sr. Counsel, ENA
EB 3832
713-853-3448
	"Collins, Christopher" <chriscollins@velaw.com>
	Sent by: "Lowell, Katrina" <klowell@velaw.com>
	10/19/2000 01:49 PM
		 
Attached is the most recent draft of Bidder A PSA incorporating all
comments.

 <<Enron Bidder A PSA Redlined.DOC>>

 - Enron Bidder A PSA Redlined.DOC

FYI, particularly the part about the performance management system.  Let's 
see what kind of data we can get about the Microsoft evaluation system to 
find the differences.  Thanks.  Michelle

Jane Allen
10/20/2000 08:43 AM
What are your thoughts?

Jane J. Allen
Enron Corp
Global Employee Services
Phone - 713/345-5064
Fax - 713/646-9501
	Tara Rozen
	10/18/2000 04:43 AM
		 
Hi. Some interesting reading. Although it doesn't explicitly relate to 
foreign assignments, I am aware that our assignments to and from Europe are 
predominately white males and I am assuming that this is the case globally as 
well.  I am sure that if Enron was ever filed with a lawsuit for 
discrimination, this could be an area that would negatively affect the 
outcome of Enron's defence as foreign assignments generally provide career 
development opportunities that most non-white males at Enron are missing out 
on.

Tara

	Enron Europe
	

FYI

Thought I'd share this with the group.  This case will be watched very 
closely because 1) it was filed against Microsoft, and 2) because of the 
large potential class of plaintiffs.  Class action suits are an employers 
worst nightmare (think Texaco and Coca-Cola). 

Please feel free to share this with your management.

```````````````````````````````````````````````` 

No. 200
Monday, October 16, 2000 Page A-3
ISSN 1522-5968

News 
 
Discrimination Suit 
Filed by Microsoft Salaried Employee
Alleges Discrimination Based on Race, Sex 

SEATTLE--A suit has been filed against Microsoft Corp. alleging the company 
maintains a systemic and pervasive practice of discriminating against African 
American and female salaried employees, affecting pay rates and promotion 
opportunities (Donaldson v. Microsoft Corp., W.D. Wash., No. C00-1684P, 
10/4/00). 
Such discrimination at the company "is the standard operating procedure," the 
lawsuit said. 

The suit filed Oct. 4 in federal court in Seattle seeks back pay, other job 
benefits, and compensatory and punitive damages for a proposed class of about 
400 African American employees and some 4,500 female employees. 

Mark Murray, company spokesman, said Microsoft does not tolerate 
discrimination of any kind. 

"We take these kinds of issues very seriously," Murray said regarding the 
lawsuit. The company has an "active diversity policy" and seeks to recruit 
and promote minorities and women, Murray told BNA Oct. 12. He said he could 
not comment on any specific aspects of the lawsuit. 

The class would include all current and former female salaried employees who 
worked for Microsoft beginning Feb. 23, 1999, and all current and former 
African American salaried employees who worked at the company beginning Oct. 
4, 1998. Microsoft employs some 18,000 workers in the U.S. the complaint 
said. About 2.5 percent to 3 percent are African American and about 26 
percent are women. 

Murray said the company has about 27,250 employees in the U.S., including 
21,767 in Western Washington. In the U.S., 26.3 percent of Microsoft 
employees are women and 22.2 percent minorities, he said. 

The lawsuit was filed by Cohen, Milstein, Hausfeld & Toll of Seattle. The 
named plaintiff, Monique Donaldson, sued on behalf of herself and a class of 
all similarly situated African American and similarly situated female 
salaried employees at Microsoft. 

"African American and female salaried employees of Microsoft are routinely 
subjected to a pattern and practice of race and sex discrimination affecting 
the terms and conditions of their employment" at the company, the complaint 
said. The violations--of Title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, the Civil 
Rights Act of 1991, and Civil Rights Act of 1871--are "systemic in nature, 
and constitute a pattern and practice of conduct which permeates Microsoft's 
operations," the lawsuit maintains. 

'Excessive Subjectivity' Alleged

The complaint said the company allows "excessive subjectivity" in decisions 
involving promotions and compensation. Microsoft has retaliated against 
employees in the class who complained "either internally or externally about 
Microsoft's treatment of African American and female employees by giving 
unjustified lowered performance evaluations and constructively terminating 
them."
 
The lawsuit said the company "uses an excessively subjective evaluation 
system" that allows managers "who are predominantly white males, to rate 
employees based upon their own biases rather than based upon merit." 
Performance evaluations, for instance, use a five-point scal, but scores of 
five, the highest number, are not awarded. Within any organization of the 
company, only a certain number of employees are allowed to receive each 
score, which can range from 2.5 to 4.5, the lawsuit said. 

"Thus, no matter how good or bad the actual performance of employees a 
certain number of them must still receive the lower scores." Any employee 
with a 2.5 score is placed on a "personal improvement plan" or asked to 
resign, the complaint said. 

"Stack rankings" are used to rank employees in the same job category and 
organizational unit from best to worst, the complaint said. Employees can be 
ranked higher under the stack ranking than others who receive numerically 
higher performance evaluations, the lawsuit said. 

"Obtaining higher stack rankings is often governed by an employees' personal 
popularity with other managers" because the rankings mix employees working 
for different managers. 

In addition to allowing discrimination in performance appraisals, the company 
also has a pattern of paying African American and female employees salaries 
"substantially lower" than those paid white males doing similar work, with 
the same or lesser skills, and with similar or lesser experience, the lawsuit 
said. 

Furthermore, "excessively subjective decisionmaking criteria" are applied in 
promotions, which favor white males with fewer qualifications than African 
Americans and female employees. 

By Nan Netherton

Copyright , 2000 by The Bureau of National Affairs, Inc., Washington D.C.

Would you let me know which you choose?  I may need some of them as a 
backup!  Michelle

BDCash@bth12.med.navy.mil (Cash, Brooks D.) on 10/23/2000 10:47:10 AM
Please respond to <BDCash@bth12.med.navy.mil>
Thanks, that helps a lot. Looking forward to seeing you guys, too.

Hi, Brooks.

He wants the newest Lyle Lovett album -- the soundtrack to Dr. T and the
Women.  Also, he is getting a Playstation II from me for his birthday (they
don't come out until this week, so he doesn't have it yet), so you could
find him a game for the new system.  He has said that he wants a new clock
radio, with AM/FM (I don't think he wants CD/tape player on it), with
battery backup -- Sony would be best.  Also, he always wears short-sleeved
Polo shirts, size XL.  He prefers basics, in solid colors such as white (he
never can have enough of those), navy, khaki, or light blue.

Let me know if you need any other suggestions.

We are looking forward to your visit, especially Cameron.  He always is
talking about how Santa is going to bring presents for him and Madison!
Take care, and say "hi" to Marianne.

Michelle

BDCash@bth12.med.navy.mil (Cash, Brooks D.) on 10/20/2000 09:08:25 AM

Please respond to <BDCash@bth12.med.navy.mil>

Michelle,
     Can you give me any ideas regarding birthday and x-mas presents for
the man
who has everything?

Hope all is well there.

Brooks

Twanda, please take the text of this email and turn it into a document that 
is presentable so that I can give it to Mark at our Quarterly Business Review 
Meeting at 2:00 Monday -- actually, I will need it by noon so that I can 
revise it.  Thanks.  Michelle

Transactions

Major Events of September - November 2000

Garden State Paper -- closing and transition.

Triple Lutz -- issues surrounding potential divestiture, including internal 
discussions, review of data requests and responses, review and comment on 
both PSA documents, negotiations with both buyer's representatives, and 
discussions with clients.  Issues include salaries of employees hired by 
buyer (effect of Enron severance plan), other benefits for divested employees 
(including unvested stock options, insurance, vacation, etc.), process for 
divesture, payment of severance obligations, possible redeployment, etc.

Crane -- monitor due diligence, PSA review and comment, client discussions.

Falcon -- review diligence reports, client discussions.

E2  -- limited involvement in PSA and schedule review, data requests.

Anticipated Issues for December 2000 - February 2001

Triple Lutz -- continued negotiations and document drafting.  Transition 
issues for divestiture will continue to be significant.  Litigation by 
persons who lose their jobs as a result of the transaction and who choose not 
to sign the waiver for double the severance benefits is possible.

East Coast Power:  If we sell our interest in ECP, there will be many 
transition issues due to Enron's providing benefits, payroll, etc. for ECP 
personnel.  Also, there will be transition issues for other services, 
including legal services that Enron has been providing for ECP.

Crane/Falcon -- could move forward; Crane is more likely.  Issues of labor 
unions and Canadian law will require attention on transition issues.

Litigation

Major Events of September - November 2000

No employee-initiated litigation for 2000.

Non-compete litigation:  Currently, suit pending against Alonzo Williams in 
Sharolyn Wood's court.  Suit filed, no TRO sought.  Service in process.

Minor litigation:  Marentz & Co. v. Enron.  Suit for non-payment of placement 
fee.  Maximum damages $75K.  Discovery period ends this week, court-ordered 
mediation to follow.

Anticipated Issues for December 2000 - February 2001

I expect that we will be filing non-compete litigation in February and March, 
as people leave after they are paid their bonuses.  

We should discuss the continued use of Bill Ogden for non-compete litigation.

Documents Generated

Major Events of September - November 2000

New Consulting Services Agreement:  I prepared a new form of Consulting 
Services Agreement to replace old Master Service Agreement and Project Work 
Description for Net Works contract personnel. I received minor comments from 
outside counsel as well as client group feedback.  I will finalize the 
agreement, so that the new document can go into effect on 1/1/01.  

Standard Agreements:

I prepared:

  ___ draft employment agreements.

 ___ draft consulting services agreements.

  ___ separation agreement and releases.

 ___ retention letter agreements.

The number of employment agreements seems low to me, particularly in 
trading.  My understanding is that Lavorato does not want to put every person 
in trading under contract, but wants to wait and see how they perform.  There 
are potential legal risks with this approach if we want to enforce our 
non-compete provisions. 

Anticipated Issues for December 2000 - February 2001

I expect that, after bonus amounts are announced, there will be a flurry of 
contract activity in efforts to pay people through means other than the bonus 
pool.  

Investigations

Major Events of September - November 2000

Anonymous Letters Sent to Office of Chairman about Energy Operations:  I 
directed the investigation and supervised outside consultants once the 
company decided to employ them.  I and the team reviewed the results with 
Sally Beck in early November and proposed methods to address the results of 
the consultants' surveys.  Sally Beck is contemplating communication to 
employees on results of survey.  [Other proposals can be discussed verbally.]

Texaco Hacker:  We had a situation where one of our employees logged onto the 
Texaco computer system using an ID of a former co-worker.  He then sent 
inappropriate emails to her co-workers, posing as her.  The investigation 
results led to termination of employment for cause.

Anticipated Issues for December 2000 - February 2001

I expect that there will be some claims that will need to be investigated 
following PRC/bonus discussions. 

Training

Major Events of September - November 2000

 Increased role as trainer.  I provided interview training for all Net Works 
employees who are involved in the Technology Track (about 10 sessions).  

Anticipated Issues for December 2000 - February 2001  

EIM:  Ray Bowen has asked Julia and I to provide training to the Industrials 
Group.  The focus will be on labor and employment issues in the acquisition 
of assets as well as the integration of assets into the Enron family.  

All of Wholesale:  The harassment prevention training is going to be repeated 
early next year for all persons hired in the last 18 months.  Refresher 
training is being developed and will be delivered for those who already went 
through the first round.

Pre-Hire Testing 

Major Events of September - November 2000

Many Wholesale groups are looking at pre-employment testing as a method of 
screening out applicants.  I am working with the Training and Development 
groups to ensure that the tests meet legal standards.  I have suggested 
experts for HR to use in validation of such tests to ensure that the tests 
will result in a successful employee.

Re-Skilling:  One aptitude test is being employed in the selection of 
potential employees who may be re-skilled to perform IT jobs working under 
Beth Perlman. 

Anticipated Issues for December 2000 - February 2001

I expect the testing issue to continue to be hot, particularly since John 
Lavorato likes the concept for use in the Trading Track rotations for the A&A 
program.

Employee Relations/Terminations  

Much of my time is spent providing advice on employee relations/termination 
issues -- approximately 10-15 per week (total).  No two situations are alike, 
and they require significant time.

Anticipated Issues for December 2000 - February 2001

After PRC/bonus time, this area of practice will be exceptionally busy.  The 
company will put persons who received a Needs Improvement or lower rating on 
a performance improvement plan.  Generally, I review those before they are 
put in place.  If they are not successful, then terminations are likely 
(probably early in the first half of 2001).  Those issues are time-consuming 
and full of risks.

Work for Portfolio Assets

Major Events of September - November 2000

Ecogas:  wind-down issues.

Mariner:  Change of Control Agreements.

CGAS:  harassment prevention training -- arranged for Littler, Mendelson to 
provide training for CGAS personnel.

East Coast Power:  Agreements, advice and counselling on various issues.

Anticipated Issues for December 2000 - February 2001

CGAS:  Revising employment agreements for key personnel.

Mariner:  Employment agreement negotiation.

Conclusions

ENA:  ENA has not been able to hire commercial talent at the levels of 
manager and above.  I expect to see a great emphasis on hiring.  Lavorato has 
placed processes in place for hiring at that level, including the requirement 
of an interview with the OOC before someone can be hired at the level of 
manager or above.  

Salaries need to be reviewed for equity (by gender as well as by race).

Net Works:  Net Works has hired over 800 employees and contractors in 2000.  
I expect that a portion of those will be bad hires and will have to be 
managed out.  Generally, the IT personnel are not the best about counselling 
and documentation, so there may be significant work to be done to  ensure 
that risks are managed in that situation.  I have seen improvement in that 
group working with HR, and they have invited me to conduct training, so it 
may improve over time.

Contractors are another issue at Net Works.  A significant portion of the 
work force is contract personnel.  Microsoft issues could arise if 
contractors are allowed to stay on too long.

Misclassification under the FLSA is another issue.  Net Works has too many 
employees in the "exempt" category who should be classified as "non-exempt."  
I have raised this issue with HR, and they are working through it.  It will 
not be an easy fix.

EIM:  The biggest issues facing EIM include the attraction and retention of 
talent as well as M&A activity.  HR has hired a person from Azurix to handle 
diligence for EIM, but only time will tell whether she will be able to handle 
the job.  

EGM:  EGM has the same issues of hiring and retention of talent as other 
groups within Wholesale.  That, plus the added earnings pressures, will make 
retention of key personnel essential.  I expect to see continued pressure to 
shorten the non-compete duration for this group.

For your information.  Michelle

I am sending you our most recent ASAP.  Our ASAP's are our summaries of
recent developments in employment matters.  This ASAP addresses the recent
changes in the regulations related to affirmative action plans.  Employers
which have contracts with the federal government, or contracts with federal
contractors, must prepare and maintain affirmative action plans (AAPs) as
long as they employ 50 or more employees, when the contracts are for $50,000
or more. The changes addressed in this ASAP are quite technical and require
careful consideration.
http://www.littler.com/nwsltr/asap_fed_affirmact.html

Please double click on the above link to access the ASAP.  Let me know if
you have trouble accessing this ASAP, and I can send you a hard copy.  You
also may visit our website (www.littler.com) to review this and other
publications by lawyers from our firm.  Feel free to forward this link or
print a copy and distribute it to others within or outside your company.  In
addition, let me know if you do not want to receive these updates, and I
will delete you from my distribution list.

Littler Mendelson is the nation's largest firm representing employers in
employment and labor matters.  With approximately 400 attorneys in 30
office, we address more issues related to employment than any other law
firm.  Please contact me if we can assist you with your AAP or other
employment matters.

Kerry E Notestine
Littler Mendelson, PC
1900 Chevron Tower
1301 McKinney Street
Houston, Texas 77010
713.652.4748
713.951.9212 (fax)
knotestine@littler.com
www.littler.com

----
This email may contain confidential and privileged material for the sole use 
of the intended recipient(s). Any review, use, distribution or disclosure by 
others is strictly prohibited. If you are not the intended recipient (or 
authorized to receive for the recipient), please contact the sender by reply 
email and delete all copies of this message.

To reply to our email administrator directly, send an email to
postmaster@littler.com

Littler Mendelson, P.C.
http://www.littler.com

I have a copy of the signed Employee Services Agreement between Bridgeline 
and ENA.  Would you like a copy of it?  Michelle

   

Thanks Michelle.  Please let me know if you hear from Shonnie or Steve.

Dave

Michelle Cash
10/23/2000 09:14 AM
David,

I believe the agreement was signed.  It would have been a Corporate Services 
Agreement.  I believe that Shonnie Daniel or Steve Van Hooser worked on 
this.  I have cc'd this email to them so that they can provide you with a 
copy, forward it on to the appropriate person, or let me know if one never 
was signed, in which case I can prepare a new version.

Thanks.  Michelle

   

I was given your name by Steve Venturatos.  He said that you were involved in 
getting a Master Agreement set up so that Enron would supply a Risk team to 
take care of that function for Bridgeline.  I talked with Trevor Mihalik and 
he believes that an agreement was never signed.  Can you help me determine if 
there is an agreement in place and if not can we get one created?

Dave Baumbach

Sure, I'll send letters.  The one for Paskoff will go out today.  Michelle

   

Michelle,

Can you please respond to both their attorney's letters with the details 
below?

Thanks
Cathy

   

I agree, this seems very sensible to me.

Melissa

   

Melissa,

I gave his attorney a call just to tell him that we received his letter.  He 
mentioned to me that Tony's primary concern is the nonsolicitation.  Although 
I think Tony is being a little more reasonable than John Paskoff, we need to 
be somewhat consistent with what we provide both of them.  They are both very 
close.

I think the following would be a fair offer for both of them.

Additional 15,000.  This would give Paskoff and additional 2.5 months salary 
and Cirino almost 2 months salary.  This get them closer to the 12-13 months 
pay they are both asking for.  Plus, Michelle brought up a point about them 
incurring attorney's fees and this should well cover it.
Payment of their COBRA premiums through the term of their MG contract ( 9 mos 
)
No  on the bonus payments
No on waiving or reducing the non solicitation of customers, unless Hutch 
want's to accommodate this.

They will probably both push back on the non solicitation, but I would rather 
wait to see how theyr respond to our offer.

Michelle, what are your thoughts?

Thanks
Cathy

   

Hi Cathy,

Mike Hutchninson is out of the office until Monday, so I will follow up with 
him on Monday.  Do you want to call the lawyer and tell him that we will 
respond early next week?

With regard to the claims, what is your opinion?  I would suggest that most 
of it seems reasonable to discuss apart from the bonus.

Let me know what your thoughts are.

Regards

Melissa

   

Hello All,

I was just wondering yesterday why we hadn't heard from Tony Cirino regarding 
his separation agreement.  The letter I received today from his attorney 
answers my questions.

I'll fax over to all of you.  FYI, the letter was also copied to Hutch.

Cathy

Amy, this is way late, so sorry.  I suggest running it by the HR leadership 
team.  The email list can be obtained from Gerry Gibson at corp.  If there 
are HR openings, and she would be interested, they would most probably be the 
best people to assess her skills.  Thanks.  Michelle

   

Michelle,
Thanks so much for the feedback on Debra's resume.  Ted and I also shared it 
with Brian Schaffer who said he would potentially like to have her in his 
group, but has no openings right now.  You'd mentioned in your e-mail that 
there may be HR possibilites for her and she's expressed an interest in 
exploring that kind of a career move (see below).  Do you know of something 
specific or anyone else I should share her resume with?

I really appreciate your help!
Amy
Glebeplace@aol.com on 09/26/2000 07:54:58 PM
Thank you so much for circulating my resume and for forwarding the positive
feedback to me.  As a matter of fact, I am very interested in exploring the
possibility of a transition from a Legal Department position to a  Human
Resources position.  Even though there may not be an opening at this time, it
would still be very interesting to speak with someone who has made this
career change.
Thank you again,  Debra

Nathan,
Ted Bland is the Enron wholesale person responsible for all recruiting for 
one of the business units I support.

I actually spoke with Ted today about you.  He is working on scheduling you 
for a meeting, but he has had some difficulty in finalizing schedules.  So, 
there is no need to follow up, because he will get with you in a few days.

Hope all is well.

Michelle

Michelle,

I received a call from Ted about 10 days ago about a possible
interview.  Ted said he would call to schedule an interview at the
beginning of last week, but I have not heard back from Ted.  I would
like to email Ted to remind him I am still interested.  Who is Ted?
Can you forward his email address?

Thanks for your help!

Nathan Wesely
Royston, Rayzor, Vickery & Williams, L.L.P.
600 Travis, Suite 2200
Houston, Texas 77002
Email: nathan.wesely@roystonlaw.com
Website: www.roystonlaw.com
Telephone: 713.224.8380
Facsimile: 713.225.9945

******************Internet Email Confidentiality
Footer*******************

Attorney-Client Privileged, Attorney Work Product, and Confidential
information may be contained in this message.  If you are not the
addressee indicated in this message (or responsible for delivery of
the message to such person), you may not copy or deliver this message
to anyone.  In such case, you should destroy this message and kindly
notify the sender by reply email. Please advise immediately if you or
your employer does not consent to Internet email for messages of this
kind.

please print this and attachments.  Thanks.  MHC

Attached here are the current draft of the disclosure schedules to be 
attached to the Purchase and Sale Agreement with Bidder A.  I have also 
attached the portion of the PSA that contains the reps and warranties to 
which the schedules relate. Please review the following schedules against the 
reps and warranties to which they relate and let me know if any changes or 
updates need to be made.  

Thanks.

Anne C. Koehler
Sr. Counsel, ENA
EB 3832
713-853-3448

Craig, I spoke with Fran Mayes about being the HR person for the Leaf River 
site visit, and she is planning to go.  Michelle

Anne,

Would you please re-send me the Employee Matters Agreement for Lutz?  I have 
deleted my electronic copy and need to send it on to the HR people.   
Thanks.  

Michelle

My understanding now on this is that we are talking about the Bridgeline 
deal.  In that deal, Enron and Texaco both assigned employees to work for the 
Bridgeline entity.  It is done under a secundment arrangement, and the 
employees are sent there via an assignment letter.   (Pat, you may recall 
that we visited about this process a while back, although I may not have 
given you the transaction name at the time).  

So, currently, all Enron personnel assigned to Bridgeline actually are Enron 
employees.  I am not aware of any change to that structure.  Fran, do you 
know of any changes?  Are we now going to transfer all of those employees to 
the Bridgeline entity?  Those answers would help.

Michelle

FMackin@aol.com on 10/25/2000 09:34:27 AM
In a message dated 10/24/00 2:47:31 PM Pacific Daylight Time,
Mikie.Rath@enron.com writes:

<< Wilson suggested I contact you to obtain answers to the same desk issue as
 it relates to these employees.  I don't have a lot of information on this
 deal nor does Dee and we are not sure if employees can take a distribution
 from our plan. >>

Mikie and Wilson,

Please send me a copy of the transaction document, or if there is not one,
the letter of intent.

Will there be a sale of assets?

Will Texaco have any continuing obligation to provide Enron with services in
connection with the transaction?

Will Texaco be required to make  offers of employment to Enron employees?

I can't respond to the question about the same desk rule unless I know all of
the facts.  Earlier this year, in Rev Rul 2000-27 the IRS relaxed the same
desk rule to a sale of less than substantially all of the assets of a
business.  I need to understand the facts of the Texaco transaction to
determine if there is a fit.

Generally, an "outsourcing," pursuant to which the third party service
provider offers employment to Enron employees and thereafter provides
services to Enron, is subject to the same desk rule.

Pat

Attached is a revised draft of your Employment Agreement.  Please feel free 
to call me if you have any questions.

Andrea, would it be possible to update our list to show the current progress 
on the "30 days" items?  I think you have a better handle on the timelines 
than I would.  Thanks.  Michelle

Gerry Gibson@ENRON
10/25/2000 11:49 AM
Hi Folks:

Enclosed is the agenda for the Corporate HR Leadership Team Meeting that will 
take place tomorrow in the Executive Board Room (50th Floor) from 9:00 to 
10:00. Please note...we will meet in the Board Room not the Dining room on 
the Mezzanine level... Our primary meeting objective will be to review where 
the team stands implementing the short term Action Plans for the Key Focus 
Areas established at the retreat. I understand that some very good work has 
been done and that several potential "Wows" are either currently being 
implemented or about to launch. 

We look forward to getting the latest status reports relative to 
accomplishing these critical activities and keeping the momentum flowing.

Regards, Gerry Gibson

Cathy,

Do we have an answer on Cirino? 

Thanks.

Michelle

Marty,

Gracie Presas is asking about training for ENA for harassment.  As we 
discussed, I think it would be a good idea to offer several sessions to Enron 
global wholesale and ENW, to maximize efficiency.  So, I told her to call you.

The lawyer contact on this is Kerry Notestine at Littler Mendelson.  His 
number is 713-652-4748.  Thanks.

Michelle

I am not at all surprised!!!!  Michelle

Andrea Yowman@ENRON
10/25/2000 03:58 PM
Already working on it... 
ay

Michelle Cash@ECT
10/25/2000 03:38 PM
Andrea, would it be possible to update our list to show the current progress 
on the "30 days" items?  I think you have a better handle on the timelines 
than I would.  Thanks.  Michelle

Gerry Gibson@ENRON
10/25/2000 11:49 AM
Hi Folks:

Enclosed is the agenda for the Corporate HR Leadership Team Meeting that will 
take place tomorrow in the Executive Board Room (50th Floor) from 9:00 to 
10:00. Please note...we will meet in the Board Room not the Dining room on 
the Mezzanine level... Our primary meeting objective will be to review where 
the team stands implementing the short term Action Plans for the Key Focus 
Areas established at the retreat. I understand that some very good work has 
been done and that several potential "Wows" are either currently being 
implemented or about to launch. 

We look forward to getting the latest status reports relative to 
accomplishing these critical activities and keeping the momentum flowing.

Regards, Gerry Gibson

Marty/Tim,

Here is pricing information about harassment prevention training.  Feel free 
to call Kerry directly about his availability.

Michelle
Michelle:

Thanks for the call.  I have not heard from Marty Christian (spelling?)
about training but will be glad to talk to her about scheduling.  Regarding
the cost, the price I quoted before was $1500 for half day, and $2500 for a
whole day.  The actors are $100 apiece per presentation ($300 total for each
presentation). Typically, I can do three sessions in a half day and five in
a whole day.  Thus, total cost with the actors for a half day would be $2400
and $4000 for a whole day.  One issue with the actors is that they do shows
in the morning at their theater so afternoons usually are better for them.
I know they have some Fridays in November in which they are open full days.

Kerry E Notestine
Littler Mendelson, PC
1900 Chevron Tower
1301 McKinney Street
Houston, Texas 77010
713.652.4748
713.951.9212 (fax)
knotestine@littler.com
www.littler.com

----
This email may contain confidential and privileged material for the sole use 
of the intended recipient(s). Any review, use, distribution or disclosure by 
others is strictly prohibited. If you are not the intended recipient (or 
authorized to receive for the recipient), please contact the sender by reply 
email and delete all copies of this message.

To reply to our email administrator directly, send an email to
postmaster@littler.com

Littler Mendelson, P.C.
http://www.littler.com

Yes, thanks.  I was aware of that joyous news.  I am going to see if I can 
get a copy of the petition to review all the allegations in detail.  Thanks.  
Michelle

   

You've probably seen this already, but just in case..... also, their 
performance review process sounds a lot like ours!

No. 200
Monday, October 16, 2000 Page A-3
ISSN 1522-5968

News 
 
Discrimination Suit 
Filed by Microsoft Salaried Employee
Alleges Discrimination Based on Race, Sex 

SEATTLE--A suit has been filed against Microsoft Corp. alleging the company 
maintains a systemic and pervasive practice of discriminating against African 
American and female salaried employees, affecting pay rates and promotion 
opportunities (Donaldson v. Microsoft Corp., W.D. Wash., No. C00-1684P, 
10/4/00). 
Such discrimination at the company "is the standard operating procedure," the 
lawsuit said. 

The suit filed Oct. 4 in federal court in Seattle seeks back pay, other job 
benefits, and compensatory and punitive damages for a proposed class of about 
400 African American employees and some 4,500 female employees. 

Mark Murray, company spokesman, said Microsoft does not tolerate 
discrimination of any kind. 

"We take these kinds of issues very seriously," Murray said regarding the 
lawsuit. The company has an "active diversity policy" and seeks to recruit 
and promote minorities and women, Murray told BNA Oct. 12. He said he could 
not comment on any specific aspects of the lawsuit. 

The class would include all current and former female salaried employees who 
worked for Microsoft beginning Feb. 23, 1999, and all current and former 
African American salaried employees who worked at the company beginning Oct. 
4, 1998. Microsoft employs some 18,000 workers in the U.S. the complaint 
said. About 2.5 percent to 3 percent are African American and about 26 
percent are women. 

Murray said the company has about 27,250 employees in the U.S., including 
21,767 in Western Washington. In the U.S., 26.3 percent of Microsoft 
employees are women and 22.2 percent minorities, he said. 

The lawsuit was filed by Cohen, Milstein, Hausfeld & Toll of Seattle. The 
named plaintiff, Monique Donaldson, sued on behalf of herself and a class of 
all similarly situated African American and similarly situated female 
salaried employees at Microsoft. 

"African American and female salaried employees of Microsoft are routinely 
subjected to a pattern and practice of race and sex discrimination affecting 
the terms and conditions of their employment" at the company, the complaint 
said. The violations--of Title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, the Civil 
Rights Act of 1991, and Civil Rights Act of 1871--are "systemic in nature, 
and constitute a pattern and practice of conduct which permeates Microsoft's 
operations," the lawsuit maintains. 

'Excessive Subjectivity' Alleged

The complaint said the company allows "excessive subjectivity" in decisions 
involving promotions and compensation. Microsoft has retaliated against 
employees in the class who complained "either internally or externally about 
Microsoft's treatment of African American and female employees by giving 
unjustified lowered performance evaluations and constructively terminating 
them."
 
The lawsuit said the company "uses an excessively subjective evaluation 
system" that allows managers "who are predominantly white males, to rate 
employees based upon their own biases rather than based upon merit." 
Performance evaluations, for instance, use a five-point scale, but scores of 
five, the highest number, are not awarded. Within any organization of the 
company, only a certain number of employees are allowed to receive each 
score, which can range from 2.5 to 4.5, the lawsuit said. 

"Thus, no matter how good or bad the actual performance of employees a 
certain number of them must still receive the lower scores." Any employee 
with a 2.5 score is placed on a "personal improvement plan" or asked to 
resign, the complaint said. 

"Stack rankings" are used to rank employees in the same job category and 
organizational unit from best to worst, the complaint said. Employees can be 
ranked higher under the stack ranking than others who receive numerically 
higher performance evaluations, the lawsuit said. 

"Obtaining higher stack rankings is often governed by an employees' personal 
popularity with other managers" because the rankings mix employees working 
for different managers. 

In addition to allowing discrimination in performance appraisals, the company 
also has a pattern of paying African American and female employees salaries 
"substantially lower" than those paid white males doing similar work, with 
the same or lesser skills, and with similar or lesser experience, the lawsuit 
said. 

Furthermore, "excessively subjective decisionmaking criteria" are applied in 
promotions, which favor white males with fewer qualifications than African 
Americans and female employees. 

By Nan Netherton

Copyright , 2000 by The Bureau of National Affairs, Inc., Washington D.C.

How about this:

Any future grant/payment described on this worksheet is subject to 
appropriate committee approvals and previously-defined performance standards; 
the use of the term "guaranteed" on this worksheet does not modify the terms 
and conditions of any such payment/grant.

Too wordy?

Michelle

Mary McKendree@ENRON
10/26/2000 04:56 PM
Michelle --

Per our conversation, the term sheets list any future grants/bonus payments 
as outlined in employment agreements.  The description that prints along with 
the amount may say "Guaranteed Grant".  Of course we all know that it's 
contingent upon Admin/Comp Committee approval.  However, to keep down any 
question, we thought about adding an asterick and saying:

"Any future referenced payments are contingent upon attaining appropriate 
approvals."

Please word-smith as appropriate.

I appreciate your help.

Mary

please save as a form and print for me.  I'll revise then.  Thanks.  Michelle

Ambroshia Hunter-Perry@ENRON
10/24/2000 01:04 PM
Michelle, please find below the standard offer letter that is being used for 
new hires, per the request of Shanna Funkhouser. 

Thanks,
Ambroshia,

Pat,

Hello!  I am sending to you a memo from Stuart Zisman here at Enron.  He has 
a question that I am forwarding to you, since I don't know the answer.  Would 
you please give him an answer today, if possible?

Thanks a lot!

Michelle
Attached is a memo relating to the E2 transaction.  Please review the memo
and respond as soon as possible.  We need to receive all feedback promptly
as we expect to revise and post the revised Purchase & Sale Agreement by the
end of business today (Monday).  Thanks in advance.

Stuart

Jinsung, please forward this to Don Miller ASAP.

Share information about yourself, create your own public profile at
http://profiles.msn.com.

 - GENERAL COMMENTS TO REVISED PSA FOR E2.doc

Fran, I think we should get together tomorrow to discuss the issues around 
this deal.  Could you get with Twanda to do that?  THanks.  MIchelle

	Fran L Mayes
	10/30/2000 08:58 AM
	
Kathy Neal and I will attend the meeting on Tuesday.

Fran

Michelle Cash
10/29/2000 03:15 PM
Craig,

We were supposed to have a conference call with labor/employment personnel 
early next week.  Has that been scheduled yet?  Also, I will not be able to 
attend at 4:00 on Tuesday, but will see if someone from HR/benefits can be 
there.

Michelle

Craig Hiddleston@ENRON
10/27/2000 06:36 PM
Please attend a meeting in EB2988 at 4 pm on Tuesday, October 31st. If you 
are unavailable to attend please have someone represent you at the meeting.

The plan for the meeting is to:

Go through individuals' findings regarding completeness of information 
available in data room binders, issues encountered that my impact the value 
of the assets to Enron, and any additional information required for Leaf 
River and Woodland.
Provide an update regarding the status of Woodland and deal stopper issues.

The issue relating to Woodland and the hesitancy to fully proceed on the due 
diligence relates to two potential deal stoppers -- security of fiber supply 
and labor union issues. Our preference was to better understand these issues 
before fully engaging in the due diligence process, and incurring the 
associated costs, but the constrained timing has limited our ability to 
accomplish that. At this stage it appears as though we will proceed to submit 
a mid-November bid, and therefore we should proceed with all necessary due 
diligence for Woodland.

Craig

FYI.  Michelle

I spoke with Pat Mackin regarding the two representations that I mentioned =
in=20
my Comments to the PSA.  For those that are copied on this email that did n=
ot=20
receive my comments, I have inserted the relevant language below:

 Labor Issues

1) Two different bidders made reference to different parts of Section 414 o=
f=20
the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.  One was Section 414(t)=20
dealing with being treated as a =01&single employer=018 with another party =
and the=20
other was Section 414(n) dealing with =01&leased employees.=018  I have to =
assume=20
that the two are somehow related.  Is there something that we can concede i=
n=20
this area to provide our bidders some level of comfort without increasing=
=20
Enron=01,s exposure?? =20

According to Pat, the single employer representation (414(t)) should not be=
=20
added to any of the PSA's because the Peaker and the Pastoria LLCs do not=
=20
have any employees and ENA does not own more than 80% of LV CoGen.=20

The second representation regarding 414(n) and Leased Employees is a=20
representation that can be given by the Peaker and Pastoria LLCs (because t=
he=20
LLCs have no employees and don't lease any employees).  It is unclear,=20
however, whether it is applicable to LV CoGen.  Ron/Andy would either of yo=
u=20
please let me know  whether LV CoGen "leases" any employees.  Pat suggested=
=20
that the HR person for LV CoGen should know.

Stuart

Dave,

I left you a voice mail that I am available to assist in this process at your 
convenience.  Let me know how you want to proceed.

Michelle

   

Michelle, I appreciate your help in finding the services agreement for 
Bridgeline.  However, Trevor Mihalik and I would like to get an agreement set 
up for the outsourcing of Enron's Risk employees.  Do you know who could help 
me get this agreement set up?

Dave

Finley,

Can we schedule a conference call with the HR folks at Celgar?

Thanks.

Michelle

Sorry about the earlier email! 

The following contains a summary of  high-level employment/labor issues based 
upon the review of the documents in the data room here in Houston.  We still 
need to have a conference call with the HR team at GP to ascertain the 
climate of labor relations and other employment issues.

Woodland

1.  Employment Claims:  In the list of insurance matters, there are several 
employment-related claims.  Those include sexual harassment allegations, 
disability discrimination, retaliation, and mistreatment.  It is unclear 
whether those are ongoing claims or not.  I would question whether the mill 
has had harassment prevention training, and if so, when.  Also, are there 
other employment claims that are not identified in the documents?    

2. Labor Union matters:  Rick Johnson is going to review the collective 
bargaining agreements.   I am waiting on a list of union grievances, which is 
supposed to be forwarded to me today.

3.  I saw nothing about employment contracts, change of control agreements, 
or other documents that may require a buyer to provide benefits after closing 
for either Woodland.

Leaf River 

1.  Litigation Summary:  The company provided a summary of litigation.  Three 
of the four are personal injury claims -- one is a fall down stairs by a 
delivery person (settled on 7/14/00); another is a contract employee who was 
injured when a propane truck on a forklift exploded in his face, and the 
third is another contract employee who fell down some stairs (settled 
7/27/00).  The fourth is a race discrimination claim from 1991, which has 
been on hold due to the plaintiff's bankruptcy.  The summary states that the 
corporate law department has more details about the personal injury claims.  
We may want to obtain more detailed information as we proceed in this 
transaction.  Are there other litigation matters or pending claims?  (E.g., 
EEOC).

2.  No employment contracts.  I saw nothing about change of control 
agreements or other documents that may require a buyer to provide 
post-closing payments.

3.  Workers Comp:  There are several workers comp claims for 1999 and 1998.  
I would suggest that our risk/insurance groups review these claims to make 
sure that they are not unusual.

Dee Lenfest is going to review the material on employee benefits and should 
provide a separate analysis on that topic.

Michelle

Michelle Cash
10/31/2000 10:36 AM
Fran,

I have reviewed the documents in the data room, and I have the following 
thoughts.

Laura, do you need any more information from me on this point?  Michelle

At one point in time, many years ago, we required EDS to have a DOT drug and 
alcohol testing program for their DOT-covered employees, who were the IT 
people working at our sites, since they were doing the same job as Enron 
employees and were considered DOT.  We should probably look carefully at 
their current jobs to determine if they are DOT-covered or not.  If they are 
performing DOT-covered jobs, their employer should be required to have a DOT 
Drug and Alcohol Testing program, if not it is not necessary to test them on 
a random basis.  The only random testing this company allows is for 
DOT-covered  and safety sensitive employees in NEPCO and OEC.  Also we have 
no means to test employees from other companies since our random selection is 
accomplished through our payroll system, nor do we want to be in the business 
of testing other's employees.   Hope that helps.  Susan T.

Michelle Cash@ECT
10/23/2000 11:10 AM
Susan,

The question of random drug testing of non-DOT employees who work 
side-by-side with DOT employees has come up (see below).  My understanding is 
that we do not do random tests except for DOT personnel.  First, am I 
correct?  Second, have we ever done random testing in this type of 
situation?  Your experience would be helpful.

Thanks.

Michelle

Laura Wilkinson@ENRON
10/23/2000 10:29 AM
Michelle, could you please review the correspondence below.  Thanks.

Gary Buck@ECT
10/23/2000 09:17 AM
Laura,

Sounds like they have a precedence for doing it.  This is a question for 
Michelle Cash.     I would not test non-Dot employees unless there was a 
significant reason.   However, I have worked in a DOT environment and 
understand the desire to test them all.   I don't think it is good practice.

Gary    

Laura Wilkinson@ENRON
10/20/2000 02:47 PM
Gary, what is your opinion of non-DOT employees being subject to random drug 
tests?  This IT department supports the Gas Controllers,  who are subject to 
random drug tests.  My only concern is if we enforce this policy with one IT 
group and not the rest of the group, is that fair?
 

Laura Wilkinson
10/20/2000 02:43 PM
Gary, I am going to look into this and get back to you once I have researched 
this question.  Thanks.

Gary Kenagy
10/20/2000 08:16 AM
During the EDS to Enron transition I asked about getting the IT staff 
supporting Gas Control into the random drup testing program within Enron. Per 
the transition agreement, EDS had continued the program with an external drug 
testing vendor after we were outsourced to EDS back in 1985. We need to get 
our staff into the Enron internal program. Not everyone in my group is 
effected, but most are. I've listed the names below. The Gas Control support 
staff is framiliar with the program and aware that they are required to 
participate. I haven't heard anything about it from anyone since the 
transition back to Enron so I am assuming this slipped through the cracks.

The staff listed below all support Gas Control, have access to the SCADA 
systems, and could have significant impact to the operation of the 
applications used in Gas Control to monitor and control the pipeline. 

Thanks, Gary

Basha, Clifford
Kenagy, Gary
Little, Steve
Margoliner, George
Marshall, George
Moore, Michael
Hagen, Robert
Poole, Kenneth
Thompson, Rodney
Sayegh, Angela
Smith, Mike (new hire)
Rodriguez, Ruben
TBD (Vasu Sashti)
TBD (Tracey Brown)

Should that be 2 months or 3 months?  we haven't done less than three, and I 
don't think it is a good idea to go below that.  MHC

Kim Melodick
10/31/2000 01:48 PM
Please prepare a 2 month non-compete agreement for Thomas Swank.  The start 
date of the agreement will be 10/24/00.  Thanks for your help.  If you need 
furhter information, please do not hesitate to ask.

Felicia,  Does this sound right to you?  Just wanted to confirm.  Thanks.  
Michelle

HThomas@gspcorp.com on 11/01/2000 07:19:00 PM
     Michelle and Peter, we (GSP) have determined that we are not a federal
     government contractor.  Based on feedback from GSP employees, we do
     sell newsprint to printers who print material for the federal
     government, but we are a 'second-tier' contractor, not a 'first-tier'
     contractor.  (Pat McCarthy, the local employment law attorney that I
     have been using, used these terms when David Howe and i talked to him
     today.)  Pat informed us that second-tier contractors do not have to
     abide by all the federal government requirements for contractors.

     Based on this, GSP does not plan to file EEO-1 reports or prepare
     affirmative action plans.  In addition, we do not feel that we are
     subject to an OFCCP audit.

     Michelle, since you left me the voicemail telling me that we are not
     included in the Enron EEO-1, i assume that also means that Enron's
     status as a government contractor does not force us to prepare EEO-1
     and AAPs.

     Please advise us if you feel we have made incorrect assumptions on any
     of this.

     Hoyt

Pat, thanks for your comments.  I agree 100%.  Michelle

PS.  My friend who is a photographer is doing a show in Dallas this week.  I 
suspect that we'll see info on his web site pretty soon.  

FMackin@aol.com on 11/03/2000 10:15:19 AM
Michelle,

It looks like there are a lot of deal issues to be negotiated.  You have a
good hand on the legal issues for the employment matters.  If a form of
indemnity is required, make it very broad to cover all risks, including, but
not limited to, selection, unlawful discrimination and for permitting
tortuous interference with employment.

I assume that you have received my November 1 memo regarding Bidder D.
Redlined SPA.

I listened in on the labor relations call yesterday, but there didn't seem to
be anything for me to comment on.  I do have one observation about the call.
While I don't know anything about the transaction, the conversation about
employment and benefits would have been facilitated if Enron had previously
submitted a written schedule of all of the documents and information Enron
required in completing its due diligence review, and used that written
schedule to make reference to the data that has not yet been received.

Enron should not let the other side's data schedule or lack of a complete
schedule control Enron's due diligence agenda.  Enron should know in advance
what information it wants and use a check off sheet to manage the due
diligence process.  That way, the other side will better understand what
Enron expectations are.

I use this kind of data management tool all of the time and it is very
helpful to be able to refer to when it was presented to the other side, how
long they have had it and what items are still missing.

I heard nothing like that in the conference call yesterday.  It was though
people were thinking of things as the conversation went along.

Pat

Tim, I just got your letter about  the January trial setting.  When did we 
learn of that setting?  How do we accomplish the goal of keeping our business 
people free from depositions at year-end?  Can that be done?  Michelle

Michelle, I just spoke to Brian Glasser; he informed me that Clonch wants
1.2 mil, therefore, no settlement.  However,  Clonch and Cline have agreed
to meet again this coming Monday to discuss settlement.  Apparently, Clonch
is going to go back and look at his numbers.

Tim C. Carrico
Spilman Thomas & Battle, PLLC
email: tcarrico@spilmanlaw.com
phone:             (304)-340-3856
cell phone:       (304)-549-2681
fax:                  (304)-340-3801
address:           300 Kanawha Blvd., East
                       Charleston, W.Va. 25301

Dee, could you please forward to Steve Van Hooser our usual checklist on 
employee matters for diligence purposes?  That would be helpful.  Thanks.  
Michelle

Attached is the Summary that Glenn Wright and I used as the basis for 
reviewing the Steam Purchase Agreement and the Lease today.  

Jay and Clark, please note that there are a couple of drafting follow up 
instructions contained in the Summary.

Glenn, please let me know if I misstated the resolution of any issues 
discussed.

David, there is at least one follow-up request in the Summary.

Finally, Michelle Cash, ENA's labor and employment attorney informed me that 
there are 23 employees currently involved in the operation of the 2 Cogentrix 
plants and that employee due diligence will take some time.  I am expecting 
to receive a checklist of employment related documentation shortly and will 
forward it on to you so that you can have Alamac obtain such information from 
Cogentrix as soon as possible.  Michelle would like to know what plans have 
been developed to date as to post-acquisition of the 2 plants.  In short, are 
we planning to offer all 23 of Cogentrix's employees jobs? 

Steve

Anne,

I got you an invitation to the Preview Party for Wednesday!  Eden Sholeen is 
going to call you with the details.

Michelle

fyi. 
Kathy Neal@ENRON
11/02/2000 04:00 PM
As I receive additional information I will update this report.

Thanks!

Kathy Neal
Manager, Human Resources ENA
x57803

fyi
Kristin Walsh
11/03/2000 03:37 PM
FYI - former Enron employees Jeffrey Bortniker and Lynda Clemmons are the new 
Chief Executive Officer and President/Chief Operating Officer (respectively) 
for Element Re, a new unit of XL Capital Ltd..  The company will provide 
weather risk management insurance, reinsurance and financial products.  
Please let me know if you have any questions or would like us to look into 
this further.
(first announced September 25th)

Thanks,

Kristin

I haven't heard anything from Alice yet.  MHC

Amanda Curless@ENRON
12/01/2000 12:01 PM
Michelle,
I talked with Accounts Payable and we are sending payments to the UK. The 
address is 5355 HighStreet, Egham, Great Britain. Thanks!
Mandy

Felicia,

This is a merchant asset, which we currently own 100%, but plan to sell down 
in the coming months.  It absolutely has separate HR functions from Enron -- 
they do not participate in Enron benefits, and we are working hard to prevent 
any claims that we could be a joint employer with it.  

Thoughts?

Michelle

   

Michelle,  who is GSP?  Are they a legal entity?  Are they on our payroll?  
If they are we filed EEO-1's for them.    Below is the criteria to file an 
EEO-1 report:

Standard Form 100 must be filed by -

A.  All private employers who are: (1) subject to Title VII of the Civil 
Rights Act of 1964 (as amended by the Equal Employment Opportunity Act of 
1972) with 100 or more employees EXCLUDING State and local governments, 
primary and secondary school systems, institutions of higher education, 
Indian tribes and tax-exempt private membership clubs other than labor 
organizations; OR (2) subject to Title VII who have fewer than 100 employees 
if the company is owned or affiliated with another company, or there is 
centralized ownership, control or management (such as central control of 
personnel policies and labor relations) so that the group legally constitutes 
a single enterprise, and the entire enterprise employs a total of 100 or more 
employees.
 
B.  All federal contractors (private employers), who: (1) are not exempt as 
provided for by 41 CFR 60-1.5, (2) have 50 or more employees, and (a) are 
prime contractors or first-tier subcontractors, and have a contract, 
subcontract, or purchase order amounting to $50,000 or more; or (b) serve as 
a depository of Government funds in any amount, or (c) is a financial 
institution which is an issuing and paying agent for U.S. Savings Bonds and 
Notes. 

All multi-establishment employers, i.e. employers doing business at more than 
one establishment, must file: (1) a report covering the principal or 
headquarters office; (2) a separate report for each establishment employing 
50 or more persons; (3) a consolidated report that MUST include ALL employees 
by race, sex and job category in establishments with 50 or more employees as 
well as establishments with fewer than 50 employees; and (4) a list, showing 
the name, address, total employment and major activity for each establishment 
employ-ing fewer than 50 persons, must accompany the consolidated report.

All forms for a multi-establishment company must be collected by the 
headquarters office for its establishments or by the parent corporation for 
its subsidiary holdings and submitted in one package.

For the purposes of this report, the term parent corporation refers to any 
corporation which owns all or the majority stock of another corporation so 
that the latter stands in the relation to it of a subsidiary.

The OFCCP has always held that subsidiary companies that do not have direct 
govt contracts must comply with AAP regulations if the parent company or 
other subsidiary companies benefit from government contracts.  Their line of 
thought is that the subsidiary without government contracts benefits 
indirectly from the contract as well.   If GSP is completely free standing 
and they do not participate in Enron's benefits, abide by our policies or 
procedures , participate in our bonus process that may partially or wholly be 
funded by Enron Corp. , etc., they may have some type of argement not to 
comply  but I doubt it.  If we own them over 51% I don't see a way they could 
not file EEO-1's and have an AAP.  We do all the AAP's in Corporate so if 
this is a freestanding Business Unit I need to know. 

Thanks!

Felecia

Michelle Cash@ECT
11/01/2000 07:49 PM
Felicia,  Does this sound right to you?  Just wanted to confirm.  Thanks.  
Michelle

HThomas@gspcorp.com on 11/01/2000 07:19:00 PM
     Michelle and Peter, we (GSP) have determined that we are not a federal
     government contractor.  Based on feedback from GSP employees, we do
     sell newsprint to printers who print material for the federal
     government, but we are a 'second-tier' contractor, not a 'first-tier'
     contractor.  (Pat McCarthy, the local employment law attorney that I
     have been using, used these terms when David Howe and i talked to him
     today.)  Pat informed us that second-tier contractors do not have to
     abide by all the federal government requirements for contractors.

     Based on this, GSP does not plan to file EEO-1 reports or prepare
     affirmative action plans.  In addition, we do not feel that we are
     subject to an OFCCP audit.

     Michelle, since you left me the voicemail telling me that we are not
     included in the Enron EEO-1, i assume that also means that Enron's
     status as a government contractor does not force us to prepare EEO-1
     and AAPs.

     Please advise us if you feel we have made incorrect assumptions on any
     of this.

     Hoyt

Kathy, I think we should do some sort of an assignment agreement.  It does 
not have to be as long and involved as our current ones, but we should paper 
it up.  Michelle

Kathy Neal@ENRON
11/06/2000 11:08 AM
Michelle:

Gary Hanks is putting together a plan on how to better utilize his team in 
supporting Bridgeline with their gas control training.  It may result in 
having his team rotate during this one-month cross-training.  With this, do 
we need to put together assignment letters indicating they will be rotating 
on a monthly basis or can this just happen without an assignment letter.  I 
don't think we need to add any additional compensation for this one-month 
cross training.   All expenses will be paid by Texaco.

Let me know what you think.

Kathy Neal
Manager, Human Resources
x57803

Cheryl,

I am taking 12/1 off as a vacation day -- so, let's play!!!  I have a hair 
appointment Saturday, which I cannot really change this late in the year.  
So, do you want to get a haircut, manicure, or anything else beautifying 
while you are here?  If so, I'll book something for you.  

There is no way we would have you babysit.  In fact, we have a  sitter for 
Saturday night. so we can go somewhere fun for dinner and maybe even see a 
movie or do anything else you may want to do.

I can't wait for your visit!!

Michelle

Cheryl.Brinkman@mckhboc.com on 11/06/2000 11:34:38 AM
I'm all set for my Houston visit.  I can't wait.  I get in to Houston about
3:30 on friday Dec, the day after your anniversary.  If you and Trey are
going out for your anniversary I can babysit!  I don't want to cramp your
anniversary celebration. As soon as the travel agent e-mails my intenerary
I'll send it on to you.

Cheryl

Dear Gerald,

I received and reviewed your email, and I will check with my clients on your 
proposal.  I expect that I will have an answer later this week.

I understand that my assistant has sent you the documents by email.   Let me 
know if you did not receive them.

Feel free to give me a call to discuss.

Michelle Cash

Cindy, Tim, Marly, Pam, and Neil -- 

I will make my house available for you do do the first week of laundry this 
weekend.  How about 6:30 am on Saturday?  After that, you can schedule it at 
your convenience for the rest of the 4 weeks.  

I am prepared for you ; I bought Tide, Downey, and Bounce, as well as spray 
starch for all the ironing that needs to be done -- don't worry, I only have 
5-6 full-sized tablecloths and about 15 of Trey's shirts to be ironed.  That 
shouldn't take too long.

See you then. 

Michelle

David Oxley
11/06/2000 01:45 PM
Gerry, Michelle and I rather enjoyed our discussion at lunch time. It was 
highly productive and I would like to thank those who took the time out of 
their very busy schedules to attend.

In no small way related to the high calibre of the people at the meeting and 
the skills of the facilitation, we accomplished a great deal. For ease of 
reference and to make sure you each are clearly on you action before our next 
meeting, here is a summary:

General Minutes
The group voted David, Michele and Gerry as the most intelligent and 
attractive members of the HR community
Gerry had the most interesting strory about disciplining people who are 
always late for meetings by having their houses visited by a radical 
Californian based sect who do the reverse of an exorcism.
The average IQ of those present was measured as over 200 (thanks to Michelle).
Gerry won the tic tack tow tournament 
I won the biggest feet competition

Follow up action points
It was agreed that Tim, Cindy, Marla, Neil and Pam would do the laundry for 
Michelle for the next 4 weeks.
It was agreed that Tim, Cindy, Marla, Neil and Pam would clean David and 
Gerry's houses every Tuseday and Thursday for the next month (Gerry is 
concerned about his antique china and has requested that Neil doesn't visit 
his home).
All the wrongs of the world are to be solved and the necessary actions 
implemented by Tim, Cindy, Marla, Neil and Pam by next Monday at 5pm central 
time (including third world debt and world hunger).

Thanks

David

Go ahead and file it.  Thanks.  Michelle

Hi Michelle -- just a reminder note that no one has told me to file the
Alonzo Williams petition. Have the powers that be decided to let this one
ride? And, more importantly, when can we reschedule lunch? Let me know;  --
Bill

On lunch, I've asked Twanda to reschedule.  thanks.  mhc

Hi Michelle -- just a reminder note that no one has told me to file the
Alonzo Williams petition. Have the powers that be decided to let this one
ride? And, more importantly, when can we reschedule lunch? Let me know;  --
Bill

for your entertainment.  mhc

You really don't want me doing your laundry - just ask my husband how many 
pair of pink underwear he has as a result of my laundry ability!

	Michelle Cash@ECT
	11/07/00 11:45 AM
		
Cindy, Tim, Marly, Pam, and Neil -- 

I will make my house available for you do do the first week of laundry this 
weekend.  How about 6:30 am on Saturday?  After that, you can schedule it at 
your convenience for the rest of the 4 weeks.  

I am prepared for you ; I bought Tide, Downey, and Bounce, as well as spray 
starch for all the ironing that needs to be done -- don't worry, I only have 
5-6 full-sized tablecloths and about 15 of Trey's shirts to be ironed.  That 
shouldn't take too long.

See you then. 

Michelle

David Oxley
11/06/2000 01:45 PM
Gerry, Michelle and I rather enjoyed our discussion at lunch time. It was 
highly productive and I would like to thank those who took the time out of 
their very busy schedules to attend.

In no small way related to the high calibre of the people at the meeting and 
the skills of the facilitation, we accomplished a great deal. For ease of 
reference and to make sure you each are clearly on you action before our next 
meeting, here is a summary:

General Minutes
The group voted David, Michele and Gerry as the most intelligent and 
attractive members of the HR community
Gerry had the most interesting strory about disciplining people who are 
always late for meetings by having their houses visited by a radical 
Californian based sect who do the reverse of an exorcism.
The average IQ of those present was measured as over 200 (thanks to Michelle).
Gerry won the tic tack tow tournament 
I won the biggest feet competition

Follow up action points
It was agreed that Tim, Cindy, Marla, Neil and Pam would do the laundry for 
Michelle for the next 4 weeks.
It was agreed that Tim, Cindy, Marla, Neil and Pam would clean David and 
Gerry's houses every Tuseday and Thursday for the next month (Gerry is 
concerned about his antique china and has requested that Neil doesn't visit 
his home).
All the wrongs of the world are to be solved and the necessary actions 
implemented by Tim, Cindy, Marla, Neil and Pam by next Monday at 5pm central 
time (including third world debt and world hunger).

Thanks

David

Hector,

I met with David Baumbaugh today about Bridgeline.  Apparently, we have sent 
Trey Logan over there to replace O'Neal Winfree.  We thus need to do an 
assignment letter for Logan.  Could you please provide me and Twanda with the 
particulars so that we can paper it up? 

Thanks.

Michelle

Here is the latest piece of information.  Michelle
Michelle - I am scheduled to be in Europe the week of Nov. 27, and in Asia 
the week of Dec. 4.  In addition we are trying to close a synfuel deal with 
AIG / Aquila by year end.  AIG is located in Conn. and Aquila is located in 
Kansas City.  We are also trying to close complex originated deals with 
Kennecott (Gillette, Wyo.), Vulcan and Arch (both in St. Louis) and I am 
trying to leave as much time open as possible in order to be available to 
meet with each of the above companies in order to get our deals closed.

Thanks,

George

Michelle Cash
11/08/2000 12:31 PM
The attorneys for Rick Clonch want to depose you in December.  What are the 
commercial reasons that we can use to argue against that?  For example, are 
you working on deals that require you to be out of town?  Are you too busy 
(explain in detail)?  If you provide me with this information, I can forward 
it to our lawyers, who can use it to try to move the depositions until 
January.

Your quick reply would be helpful.

George, I know we talked about your scheduled international travel.  Any 
other reasons?

Thanks.

Michelle

Trey Cash@ENRON
11/02/2000 03:23 PM
They must be hurting for business -- but I thought you might want to take a 
look at their site.

L, T
JGS Alumni Office <jgsalum@rice.edu> on 11/02/2000 02:25:55 PM
A message of "holiday greetings" from a JGS alum...

Ashford.com (www.ashford.com) would like to offer the employees, students
and alumni of Rice University
a 20% discount off of the items on our site - just in time for the holidays!
Whether you are looking a fantastic gift for a loved one, or the perfect
corporate gift, you can now save 20% off Ashford.com's irresistible
selection of luxury brands*. We have a vast collection of fine watches,
vintage watches,
pens, designer jewelry, sunglasses, ties, scarves, diamonds, handbags and
leather goods - all just a click away.

The e-coupon code is 6B368AAAAA - expiration date is
12/31/00, not good with any other promotional offers.

Feel free to pass it along.

Here are the details:
To save the 20%, simply enter the coupon code on your online order form
during checkout.

*There are some restrictions on the coupon. It is not valid on loose
diamonds, select jewelry items, fragrances, items on our Corporate Gifts
site and gift certificates. Each coupon is only valid for one use per
email. It is not valid with any other coupon, special, or promotion. And
finally, it expires on December 31, 2000 - so act fast!

HAPPY HOLIDAYS & HAPPY SHOPPING! Take care.

Amy Oates Fitzgerald
Director of Brand Marketing
Ashford.com
713-369-2380
aoates@ashford.com

Looks good to me. MHC

Yes, we will reword it.  In fact, we are looking at a review of the entire 
application.  Michelle

Candace Womack
11/13/2000 08:53 AM
Michelle - I have not heard back about the Application, and I wanted to be 
able to tell Ryan something before she leaves.  Wednesday is her last day.  
Can you please let me know if you will be able to reword this section?

Thanks.

Candace
Candace Womack
11/06/2000 04:16 PM
Michelle -

In the meeting we had last month regarding background investigation policies, 
we discussed the area on our current application where the candidate is asked 
to disclose convictions, etc.  In some instances, the candidate could 
truthfully disclose nothing, yet have a misdemeanor conviction for theft, 
possession, etc.  or other charges that would be potential disqualifiers for 
a position with Enron.  Since the question is poorly phrased, you had 
recommended that this piece be reworded, and you suggested that Ryan Seleznov 
bring it up in the Recruiting Council.  I brought this up to Ryan, but she 
felt that this would probably be more in the province of your area or Felicia 
Acevedo.  Would you like to take this task on, or would it be more 
appropriate to ask Felicia Acevedo to work on it?

Thanks.

Candace

Any interest in either of these candidates?  They are presented by a 
headhunter.  Let me know.  Michelle

Tracie_Waligura@rwr.com on 11/10/2000 10:44:37 AM
Richard, Wayne and Roberts

Michelle - As discussed, attached are the resumes of Andy Becnel (corporate
attorney) and Bruce Reemsnyder (energy attorney).

(See attached file: andrew becnel resume.doc)(See attached file: andrew becnel
deals.doc)

(See attached file: bruce reemsnyder resume.doc)

Tracie Waligura
Legal Recruiter
24 Greenway Plaza, Suite  1304
Houston, Texas 77046
Toll:        800-364-7979  Ext. 7254
Direct:    713-358-7254
Fax:        713-623-2740
Email:    twaligura@rwr.com
Internet: http://www.rwr.com

 - andrew becnel resume.doc
 - andrew becnel deals.doc
 - bruce reemsnyder resume.doc

Janie,  Has Peggy been hired yet?  If not, would you please forward me her 
resume again?  Thanks.  Michelle

Michelle Cash
10/16/2000 12:14 PM
Let's see what happens.  MHC

Fran, any word from Nancy?  Thanks.  Michelle

Michelle Cash
11/02/2000 05:17 PM
This email summarizes my conversation on employee matters with Nancy Quigg 
Young, which took place  yesterday.

Logistics.  The most significant area for the employee matters involves the 
logistics of the buyer hiring the employees.  In the original agreement that 
we proposed, we would allow the buyer to interview employees, select the ones 
they wanted to hire, and require that the buyer keep them employed for at 
least 2 years.  Their counter proposal was that they got to hire who they 
wanted, have us pay severance on all others, and they would have no 
obligation to keep them for any length of time.

Since then, there have been discussions internally that we want all employees 
to go with the sale, with the buyer taking the action of severing employees 
(although we would fund severance costs under the Enron formula).  I raised 
that proposal with Nancy, who is going to discuss it with her business 
clients.  

In the alternative, if the buyer selects the people it hires, and we have to 
eliminate the jobs for those not selected, I informed her that we would 
require an indemnity for claims made against us based on the selection 
process.  

Base Salary.  The counteroffer made by Bidder D does not provide that the 
employees hired from HPL would receive at least the same base salary as they 
earn at Enron.  This is important because a severance payment could be due if 
an employee does not accept a job at a lower salary.  Karen appeared 
unwilling to agree to pay divested employees outside of the buyer's salary 
bands (note:  paying outside of a salary band in the context of an 
acquisition is standard procedure, but she was acting as if it were an 
incredibly difficult accomplishment).  She claimed that one problem lies in 
not knowing the exact salary for each employee at issue.  We pushed back on 
this and offered to provide average salaries for each job level, to allow her 
to get comfortable with the ranges.  Fran Mayes will provide this 
information, which may eliminate this issue.

Bonus.  In our proposal, we asked that the hired employees receive a total 
bonus payment that is at least equal to what they earned their last year at 
Enron.  Bidder D did not provide any such guarantee.  Karen said that she 
needed our "bonus formula" before she could commit to this.  I explained that 
we have no bonus formula and that our bonuses are based on performance of the 
company and the individual.  We previously had provided total bonus amounts 
for the entire group, and she could make a determination of bonus costs on a 
consolidated basis for her deal folks to calculate.  j

She said she was "not sure if they could get there" on the bonus issue, 
particularly since she thinks our bonuses will be extra high this year.  I 
offered to discuss whether we could modify the amounts by averaging the last 
two years, which she thought might make it better.  

Unvested Equity.  When I explained to her that we could not supervest 
unvested options, she indicated that there was a "possibility" that the 
amount could be made up in stock options of Bidder D.  I think this is the 
"win-win" position, but I think it will have to be pushed.

Vacation.  Their vacation plan maxes out at 4 weeks; ours maxes out at 5 
weeks.  She thinks she may be able to propose that, for the first year the 
employees work for the buyer, they can use the vacation accrual from Enron, 
but after that, they are subject to the buyer's vacation plan.  This approach 
is reasonable.

WARN Act.  There is the slight possibility of WARN Act implications, in the 
unlikely event that closing occurs within 60 days of signing.  The WARN  Act 
requires a company to give employees 60 days notice of a plant closing or 
mass layoff.  This situation probably would qualify.  Thus, we would have to 
give 60 days notice to all employees who potentially may be affected.  We can 
pay in lieu of notice, in the event that the closing (and thus the 
terminations) occur sooner than 60 days after closing, but we may want to 
spell out who bears that cost, if it is incurred.

Benefits.  Other than the vacation benefit described above, it appears that 
Bidder D has benefits that generally are of the same nature as Enron's 
benefits.  Thus, allowing the hired employees to participate in the buyer's 
benefits plans, with credit for years of service at Enron, likely would be 
comparable to their situations here.

I expect that we will hear from Bidder D with their proposals on these issues 
once Fran provides Nancy with the salary data.  Please let me know if you 
have any questions.

Michelle

Bill, I'll be in tomorrow; let's discuss this matter.  Thanks.  Michelle

Michelle:
The Alonzo Williams matter landed in the 127th (Sharolyn Wood). I'm keeping
after them on the citation but we do not have service yet. I'll let you know
as soon as we do.
Best regards,
Bill

For AMPS:  Here are the HR questions for diligence.  Michelle

Hector -- we do not know the details of how this will work.  It has not been 
finally decided.  I would suggest that we remain vague about the whole thing 
until the deal, if it happens, is signed.  Michelle

   

Michelle or Fran, 
Could you please clarify this point for Pat and his group?
Thanks, hgm

   
	
	

Hector,
Please clarify this issue that came out of the meeting on Friday:

My group heard the following statement:

If you get a comparable offer from the new company (same title and same 
salary) and you decline the offer then
you are basically resigning from Enron.  You will not be placed into the 
redeployment pool and you are not eligible for 
a severence package.

Pat

You should have it.  I sent it yesterday.  Michelle

Twanda, could you confirm?  Thanks.  MHC

	Carol Coats
	11/15/2000 05:18 PM
	
Michelle, Sheila asked that I check with you to inquire about the status of 
Bill's agreement.  
She was just wondering where we stand with it.  We appreciate your help in 
answering 
this question for us.

Thanks so very much,
Carol
3-6613

fyi.  Does this give you enough information?  MHC

Kathy Neal@ENRON
11/15/2000 04:48 PM
The CFO of Power Systems Manufacturing is  Wayne Garrett.

John Howton is forwarding your e:mail to Wayne's attention to review and 
answer questions.  Wayne and I both feel that this is a clean transfer of 
employees.  The story is as follows:

1.  They are payroll by ADP in Fort Lauderdale.  The representative is Sonia 
Vassell (954) 717-6975.  The code that they are currently using is PXU for 
processing payroll.  These employees are paid bi-weekly.

2.   Benefits = Health, Dental and Life in which Wayne does not have a 
problem with continuing to pay their benefits until the end of the year.  
This will allow us approximately 1 1/2 months to set the AMPS company up 
(effective 1/1/2001).

3.  Vacation is 15 days which include sick and vacation.  Wayne company will 
pay any accrued vacation given us a chance to determine how we want to 
structure vacation effective 1/1/2001.

4. 401K is administered by Fidelity.  There is not a company match.  So, we 
can figure out how  to handle 401k going forward.

5.  Disburse Power is the holding company that Wayne has set up to hold these 
employees until AMPS is established.

I asked John Howton who is responsible for getting the joint venture company 
"AMPS" set up and he will call me back with that answer.  Maybe you know the 
answer.

It seems to me that this is a clean set up.  We need to determine how we want 
to process their payroll, how to handle benefits and which policies we want 
to put in place for these employees.  John has a spreadsheet with employee 
information that he will forward to our attention. 

I know you will have more detailed questions and we will need to funnel 
everything through John Howton.

Let's schedule a time to discuss in more detail tomorrow.

What about payrolling through an agency so that he is on a contract-to-hire 
basis?  That way, we can say that the intent is to hire, but that we are 
evaluating the situation before making a regular, full-time offer.  Customers 
understand contract-to-hire concept, so it may not raise "lack of commitment" 
jitters.

What do you think?

Michelle

Shanna Funkhouser@ENRON
12/05/2000 07:05 PM
Michelle,

Mark Tawney has a situation where he wants to hire a Manager level person in 
the Chicago office on a trial basis as a Marketer of Weather products.

This is a trial effort and if it fails, there would be no job for him in 
Houston or otherwise.  Mark is thinking that a 6-9 month evaluation period 
would be adequate to determine success.  How would you recommend that we 
structure an offer that gives us an out if the initiative fails.  We thought 
about hiring him as a contractor or consultant in order to minimize our 
commitment, but we're concerned that if our potential customers learn of his 
employment status, it may appear to our customers that we are not committed 
to the effort or the market.  Mark is willing to be completely above board 
with the candidate that this may or may not work.

My belief is that we are going to have more of this exact situation in EGM.  
Kevin McGowan is also looking for a Marketer for Coal.  The people they are 
targeting have sales backgrounds and would not be re-deployable in other 
parts of Enron.

My goal is to minimize our exposure on the front end!

Shanna

Dan, here is info on AMPS.  Some of these points should be included in deal 
documents.  Michelle

Kathy Neal@ENRON
11/15/2000 04:48 PM
The CFO of Power Systems Manufacturing is  Wayne Garrett.

John Howton is forwarding your e:mail to Wayne's attention to review and 
answer questions.  Wayne and I both feel that this is a clean transfer of 
employees.  The story is as follows:

1.  They are payroll by ADP in Fort Lauderdale.  The representative is Sonia 
Vassell (954) 717-6975.  The code that they are currently using is PXU for 
processing payroll.  These employees are paid bi-weekly.

2.   Benefits = Health, Dental and Life in which Wayne does not have a 
problem with continuing to pay their benefits until the end of the year.  
This will allow us approximately 1 1/2 months to set the AMPS company up 
(effective 1/1/2001).

3.  Vacation is 15 days which include sick and vacation.  Wayne company will 
pay any accrued vacation given us a chance to determine how we want to 
structure vacation effective 1/1/2001.

4. 401K is administered by Fidelity.  There is not a company match.  So, we 
can figure out how  to handle 401k going forward.

5.  Disburse Power is the holding company that Wayne has set up to hold these 
employees until AMPS is established.

I asked John Howton who is responsible for getting the joint venture company 
"AMPS" set up and he will call me back with that answer.  Maybe you know the 
answer.

It seems to me that this is a clean set up.  We need to determine how we want 
to process their payroll, how to handle benefits and which policies we want 
to put in place for these employees.  John has a spreadsheet with employee 
information that he will forward to our attention. 

I know you will have more detailed questions and we will need to funnel 
everything through John Howton.

Let's schedule a time to discuss in more detail tomorrow.

Dorie,

I think this looks good.  I have two tweaks:

On the "Let me be clear" sentence, I'd delete the "let me be clear" 
introduction.  I think the last sentence speaks for itself.  
In the last sentence, why not conclude by saying that if they don't pay, "we 
will have no choice but to take further action on this matter" and delete the 
reference to attorneys.

Let me know if you have any questions.  Otherwise, it is good to go.

Good luck!

Michelle

   
	
	

Attached is the revised ERI letter incorporating your changes from 
yesterday.  Please take a 'fresh' look at the letter and advise me of any 
additional changes and/or comments.  I am out of the office today, so please 
send any changes via my interoffice email.  I am hoping to get the final 
letter sent to Diane Nielsen by email and courier later today.
Again, it was a pleasure meeting you yesterday and I appreciate all of your 
guidance concerning this matter!

This is great!!!!

Can you believe all that is going on in Sunny Florida?  I called Nat/Laura to 
get their take on the mayhem, but I haven't been able to talk with them.  I 
got a voice mail from Laura that Jesse Jackson was leading a demonstration up 
the street from their house!  They are right in the thick of it.

Later.  MHC

Cheryl.Brinkman@mckhboc.com on 11/15/2000 06:02:01 PM
yes, forwarding a joke - I'm sorry, but it's pretty good.

Cheryl

> To the citizens of the United States of America...
>
> In the light of your failure to elect a President of the USA and thus to
> govern yourselves, we hereby give notice of the revocation of your
> independence, effective today.
>
> Her Sovereign Majesty Queen Elizabeth II will resume monarchial duties
> over all states, commonwealths and other territories. Except Utah, which
> she does not fancy. Your new prime minister (The Rt. Hon. Tony Blair, MP
> for the 97.85% of you who have until now been unaware that there is a
> world outside your borders) will appoint a minister for America without
> the need for further elections. Congress and the Senate will be
> disbanded.
>
> A questionnaire will be circulated next year to determine whether any of
> you noticed.
>
> To aid in the transition to a British Crown Dependency, the following
> rules are introduced with immediate effect:
> 1. You should look up "revocation" in the Oxford English Dictionary.
> Then look up "aluminium" . Check the pronunciation guide. You will be
> amazed at just how wrongly you have been pronouncing it. Generally, you
> should raise your vocabulary to acceptable levels.  Look up
> "vocabulary". Using the same
> twenty seven words interspersed with filler noises such as "like" and
> "you know" is an unacceptable and inefficient form of communication.
> Look up "interspersed" .
>
> 2. There is no such thing as "US English" . We will let Microsoft know
> on your behalf.
>
> 3. You should learn to distinguish the English and Australian accents.
> It really isn't that hard.
>
> 4. Hollywood will be required occasionally to cast English actors as the
> good guys.
>
> 5. You should relearn your original national anthem, God Save The Queen,
> but only after fully carrying out task 1. We would not want you to get
> confused and give up half way through.
>
> 6. You should stop playing American football. There is only one kind of
> football. What you refer to as American football is not a very good
> game.  The 2.15% of you who are aware that there is a world outside your
> borders may have noticed that no one else plays American" football. You
> will no longer be allowed to play it, and should instead play proper
> football. Initially, it would be best if you played with the girls. It
> is a difficult game.
>
> Those of you brave enough will, in time, be allowed to play rugby (which
> is similar to American football, but does not involve stopping for a
> rest every twenty seconds or wearing full kevlar body armour like
> nancies). We are hoping to get together at least a US rugby sevens side
> by 2005.
>
> 7. You should declare war on Quebec and France, using nuclear weapons if
> they give you any merde. The 98.85% of you who were not aware that there
> is a world outside your borders should count yourselves lucky. The
> Russians have never been the bad guys. Merde is French for "shit".
>
> 8. July 4th is no longer a public holiday. November 8th will be a new
> national holiday, but only in England. It will be called Indecisive Day.
>
> 9. All American cars are hereby banned. They are crap and it is for your
> own good. When we show you German cars, you will understand what we
> mean.
>
> 10. Please tell us who killed JFK. It's been driving us crazy.
>
> Thank you for your cooperation.
>

I thought you might get a kick out of this.  Michelle

Cheryl.Brinkman@mckhboc.com on 11/15/2000 06:02:01 PM
yes, forwarding a joke - I'm sorry, but it's pretty good.

Cheryl

> To the citizens of the United States of America...
>
> In the light of your failure to elect a President of the USA and thus to
> govern yourselves, we hereby give notice of the revocation of your
> independence, effective today.
>
> Her Sovereign Majesty Queen Elizabeth II will resume monarchial duties
> over all states, commonwealths and other territories. Except Utah, which
> she does not fancy. Your new prime minister (The Rt. Hon. Tony Blair, MP
> for the 97.85% of you who have until now been unaware that there is a
> world outside your borders) will appoint a minister for America without
> the need for further elections. Congress and the Senate will be
> disbanded.
>
> A questionnaire will be circulated next year to determine whether any of
> you noticed.
>
> To aid in the transition to a British Crown Dependency, the following
> rules are introduced with immediate effect:
> 1. You should look up "revocation" in the Oxford English Dictionary.
> Then look up "aluminium" . Check the pronunciation guide. You will be
> amazed at just how wrongly you have been pronouncing it. Generally, you
> should raise your vocabulary to acceptable levels.  Look up
> "vocabulary". Using the same
> twenty seven words interspersed with filler noises such as "like" and
> "you know" is an unacceptable and inefficient form of communication.
> Look up "interspersed" .
>
> 2. There is no such thing as "US English" . We will let Microsoft know
> on your behalf.
>
> 3. You should learn to distinguish the English and Australian accents.
> It really isn't that hard.
>
> 4. Hollywood will be required occasionally to cast English actors as the
> good guys.
>
> 5. You should relearn your original national anthem, God Save The Queen,
> but only after fully carrying out task 1. We would not want you to get
> confused and give up half way through.
>
> 6. You should stop playing American football. There is only one kind of
> football. What you refer to as American football is not a very good
> game.  The 2.15% of you who are aware that there is a world outside your
> borders may have noticed that no one else plays American" football. You
> will no longer be allowed to play it, and should instead play proper
> football. Initially, it would be best if you played with the girls. It
> is a difficult game.
>
> Those of you brave enough will, in time, be allowed to play rugby (which
> is similar to American football, but does not involve stopping for a
> rest every twenty seconds or wearing full kevlar body armour like
> nancies). We are hoping to get together at least a US rugby sevens side
> by 2005.
>
> 7. You should declare war on Quebec and France, using nuclear weapons if
> they give you any merde. The 98.85% of you who were not aware that there
> is a world outside your borders should count yourselves lucky. The
> Russians have never been the bad guys. Merde is French for "shit".
>
> 8. July 4th is no longer a public holiday. November 8th will be a new
> national holiday, but only in England. It will be called Indecisive Day.
>
> 9. All American cars are hereby banned. They are crap and it is for your
> own good. When we show you German cars, you will understand what we
> mean.
>
> 10. Please tell us who killed JFK. It's been driving us crazy.
>
> Thank you for your cooperation.
>

I'll call you tomorrow.  Michelle

Ann Ballard@ENRON
11/16/2000 05:08 PM
Michelle -- I doubt that you would have documents of the type described in 
the memo, but given that the Enron Corp. officer signing the filing has 
personal liability for failure to identify the documents requested by the 
form, we need to poll all those involved in the transaction.  To save you 
time, why don't you call me, and I will give you the two minute synopsis of 
the memo, so that you can confirm that you know of no responsive documents.  
x35285.

	Michelle Cash@ECT
	11/16/2000 04:32 PM
		
Lou, based on our earlier conversation, I have not taken time to review 
this.  Let me know if I should review it.  Thanks. Michelle

Lou Stoler on 11/14/2000 02:00:46 PM
I previously sent to you Ann Ballard's memo re the HSR filing, and to date, 
no one has responded.  Prior to making this filing which is a prerequisite 
for closing, we need to hear back either way----please confirm this directly 
to Ann at 713.853.5285.

I'll take care of it today.  Michelle

Karen E Jones
11/16/2000 06:05 PM
Michelle,
Sam told me that Gene Tackett and Kathy Russeth have approved the form of 
consulting agreements you prepared, and everyone is ready to sign.  Please 
send initialled, execution copies to Sam, and we will have Dave Parquet sign 
them.  I need to request urgency on this, as the documents are relevant (from 
a due diligence perspective) to our larger Pastoria transaction.  Thanks.

Tim,

Do you think these depositions will take a day apiece?  Or, can we schedule 
more than one in a day?  Let me know, so that I can arrange schedules.

Thanks for the update!  Good work.

Michelle

Michelle,

 We had the pretrial hearing today before Judge Kaufman.  He granted
our Motion to continue the trial date.
The new date is February 20, 2001.  The next pretrial conference is
scheduled February 2, 2000, and all of the depositions must be completed by
that date.  I further informed the Judge that Enron would make George
McClellan, Tom McQuade, Mike Beyer, Dan Reck, and Andrea Frate Bennett
available in January, 2000.  He will hold Enron to this.

 Therefore, Please obtain dates for the depositions of George
McClellan, Dan Reck, and Tom McQuade, in Houston Texas during the month of
January 2001.  It is my understanding based on past correspondence between
you and Chuck Woody that the Enron Depositions in Houston will occur at
Locke Liddell & Sapp LLP, 3400 Chase Tower, 600 Travis Street, Houston,
Texas 77002-3095.  Further, please do not schedule any of the depositions on
January 16th or 17th because the Plaintiff's counsel will be unavailable on
those days.

 Furthermore, please provide a deposition date for Mike Beyer in
Pittsburgh Pa. during the Month of January 2001.  Again,  the Plaintiff's
counsel will not be available the 16th and 17th of that month.

 Finally, please provide a date for Ms. Frate for January 2001 if
possible that is not on the 16th or 17th.

 I will provide Plaintiff's counsel with a notice of the availability
of Enron employees upon receipt of your response to this E-mail.

 Thanks

Tim C. Carrico
Spilman Thomas & Battle, PLLC
email: tcarrico@spilmanlaw.com
phone:             (304)-340-3856
cell phone:       (304)-549-2681
fax:                  (304)-340-3801
address:           300 Kanawha Blvd., East
                       Charleston, W.Va. 25301

FYI re:  California law.  Michelle

I am sending you a link to our newest ASAP on California disability issues.
Our ASAP's are our summaries of important developments in employment law.
If you do not have employees in California, this ASAP probably is not
relevant to your company.  This ASAP addresses a recent bill signed into law
that expands the definition of disability beyond federal law and creates a
new cause of action against employers for failing to engage in the
reasonable accommodation interactive process.

http://www.littler.com/nwsltr/asap_cal_disability.html

Just double-click on the link to open it.  Please notify me if you have
problems opening this link.  I can send you a hard copy of the ASAP if
necessary. In addition, feel free to print or forward this link to others in
your or other companies, or use it in any other manner that assists your
organization. In addition, let me know if you do not wish to receive these
updates.

Littler Mendelson is the nation's largest law firm devoted exclusively to
representing management in employment and labor matters.  With approximately
400 lawyers in 30 offices around the country, our firm handles more
employment matters than any other law firm.  Please contact me if you have
questions about the issues addressed in this ASAP or about any other
employment law issue

Kerry E Notestine
Littler Mendelson, PC
1900 Chevron Tower
1301 McKinney Street
Houston, Texas 77010
713.652.4748
713.951.9212 (fax)
knotestine@littler.com
www.littler.com

----
This email may contain confidential and privileged material for the sole use 
of the intended recipient(s). Any review, use, distribution or disclosure by 
others is strictly prohibited. If you are not the intended recipient (or 
authorized to receive for the recipient), please contact the sender by reply 
email and delete all copies of this message.

To reply to our email administrator directly, send an email to
postmaster@littler.com

Littler Mendelson, P.C.
http://www.littler.com

Hoyt,

If GSP LLC  would assume the liability at the time of return, why would it 
risk bringing them back for light duty work?  Why not wait until they are 
fully released, particularly if one of them is going to sue under workers 
comp scheme?

Also, Hoyt, you need to be careful about revealing conversations with GSP 
counsel to MG -- I noticed you had cc'd someone from Media General in the 
prior email.  We don't want to waive any privileges.

Michelle

HThomas@gspcorp.com on 11/15/2000 06:10:00 PM
     Peter, we have two long-term worker's comp cases whose accidents
     happened before Enron bought GSP.  We would like to bring them back to
     do light-duty work, to get them in the swing of working again and also
     to get some adminstrative work done.

     I am concerned that bringing these employees back to work on light
     duty will cause these cases to become an Enron liability rather than
     an MG liability. I discussed this with Pat McCarthy, the labor and
     employment law attorney we are using in NJ, and he said that the
     liability would typically not transfer to GSP just because we brought
     them back . . . it would still be an MG liability, UNLESS THE EMPLOYEE
     HURT HIMSELF AGAIN.  In which case, GSP owns it.

     However, Pat said that a lot of what determines the ownership of the
     worker's comp cases is written into the purchase and sale agreement.
     He said that there may be language that addresses an employee's return
     to work from worker's comp.  I know that we have an ongoing dispute
     about worker's comp with MG at this point.  What would be your
     recommendation on bringing these employees back to work?

     As a bit of additional info, one of the two employees seems eager to
     come back . . . the other one does not.  An employee told me that the
     second employee actually has a lawsuit filed against MG/old GSP about
     his injury.

Trey,

The following items are on my Christmas list:

1.  Boggle game
2.  Joe Jackson CD:  Night & Day II
3.  Pottery Barn Large Organizer:  Catalogue number 48-2806305 ($69)
4.  Monnogrammed Travel Alarm Clock (Pottery Barn)  Catalogue # 10-2811784 
($30)
5.  Monogrammed Business Card Holder (Pottery Barn) Item # 12-33756186 ($30)
6.  Hermes or Hermes-type scarf
7.  Wood picture frames -- painted black is ok -- for 5x7 prints
8.  Drink coasters 

Let me know if you have any questions or want more specific information.

Michelle

More re  Canary
Rick Johnson@ENRON
12/05/2000 10:08 AM
Finley,  I haver made two additions to the labor  and employment document 
request, Items # 16 & 17.  I have also expanded the scope of request # 4.  
Please see attached - rev1.

Thanks Rj.  
     

Rick,
Per my voicemail, attached is a request list Davis & Company has already 
submitted.  If you have additional items please let me know.  Thanks,

Finley

	"Dean Crawford" <dcrawford@davis.ca>
	12/04/2000 06:52 PM
		 
Mr. Del Vecchio,
?
I am working with Brian Hiebert in our due diligence work  regarding Celgar. 
Brian has asked me to forward to you the attached list of  materials I 
requested from Celgar on Friday. The letter and list is attached to  the 
email from my secretary that I am forwarding to you.
?
Doug Cargill's office has just advised me they were able to  put together all 
of the materials today, but the courier package will not arrive  until 
Wednesday morning. They are sending me by fax some of the materials this  
evening.
?
?
Date: Mon, 04 Dec 2000 16:39:13 -0800
 - LT Cargill.doc
 - Attachment Cargill.doc

Attached is the resume of Dominic Carolan, who currently is working at Global 
E&P.  He is looking to move elsewhere within Enron, given that the assets in 
Global E&P are going to be sold.

I understand that you are looking for a lawyer with oil and gas experience.  
He might be a good candidate.  I met him today, and he is pleasant and 
professional.

If you are interested in interviewing him, let me know, and I will get it 
scheduled.

Thanks.  Michelle

Dominic Carolan@ENRON
11/09/2000 01:31 PM
Michelle,

I refer to my earlier voice messages and (I hope) a conversation you had with 
Stephen Wallace a week or so ago.

I would welcome the opportunity to meet with you, learn more about ENA and 
discuss what professional opportunities might exist within the ENA legal 
department. I will be in London for most of next week but other than that, I 
would be able to meet at your convenience.

I have attached a copy of my resume for your reference and look forward to 
hearing from you.

Regards,

Dominic Carolan

  

Julia,

On Garden State matters, how do you want to handle the signing of documents?  
Currently, I have been receiving documents from outside counsel and 
initialling them before signature.  Based upon Hoyt's email below, there may 
be a desire to have a more expeditious process.  

I would suppose the answer would depend on how heavily our legal department 
is going to be involved in GSP work.  Given our discussion last week, I would 
not think that there would be a desire to deviate significantly from the 
standard Enron process, but it is not my call.

I would appreciate your thoughts.

Michelle

Hoyt Thomas@ENRON
11/26/2000 06:25 PM
Michelle, we talked about this at David's staff meeting last week and he 
seemed to want to develop a quicker process on approval when a lawyer such as 
Ann Murray or Pat McCarthy was involved.

Hoyt

I asked David Howe about this issue.  He said htat he wants to have an
attorney's initials on the document before he signs them.  So, I guess it
needs to go through me for now.  Michelle

HThomas@gspcorp.com on 11/03/2000 02:12:00 PM

     Michelle, we terminated Bill Nycz October 12, he is now ready to sign
     the release that Pat McCarthy wrote up.

     Once bill signs this, we will need to get a company signature pretty
     quickly to pay him expeditiously (i would like to cut the check as
     soon as his 7 days are up).  I assume that David Howe needs to sign it
     . . . does David have to have your approval to sign something like
     this?

     When Pat writes contracts for us, do i still need to get you to sign
     off on it before David Howe signs it?  If a management employee of GSP
     who is not an Enron employee signs a contract, do we have to have
     Enron legal approve it?

     Hoyt

(See attached file: nyczoutp.doc)

Felicia, I am going to take a vacation day on Friday.  How about Thursday or 
Monday?

Twanda, ignore my earlier email. 

Michelle

Brian Schaffer@ENRON
11/27/2000 02:24 PM
Yes

   
	
	

Would you be available on Friday early afternoon (12/1) to discuss the PRC 
results?  

Felecia

more . . .  I've forwarded this issue to Dee.  MHC

Dean,

Michelle Cash is responsible for all employment, union and benefits issues.  
I will let her make that call.

Thanks,

Peter del Vecchio

	"Dean Crawford" <dcrawford@davis.ca>
	12/04/2000 08:41 PM
		 
Mr. Del Vecchio,
?
We have received materials concerning the pension plan for non-union  
employees at Celgar. The company's latest actuarial report disclosed that as 
of  January 1, 2000:
?
1. The going-concern liabilities exceeded the actuarial value of assets  by? 
C$1,922,342; and
?
2.? The solvency liabilities exceeds the market value of plan assets  by? 
C$1,805,819.
?
We have also received the full text of the plan and its amendments.
?
Will you be reviewing these matters internally or shall we retain a local  
actuarial firm to perform the due diligence?

FYI re:  outside counsel in B.C. who are handling diligence.  I spoke with 
Dean today, and he appeared to be asking all the right questions.  MHC

Michelle,

I have asked Sarah Reyna, Finley Biggerstaff's assistant to send to you 
copies of the collective bargaining agreements, the employment agreements 
with senior management (there is only one, for Fred Inglis, the plant 
manager) and all benefit material.  I am also making copies of relevant 
sections of the AGRA Simons report regarding union and labor matters.  
Michelle, we only got copies of the due diligence materials and the AGRA 
Simons report on Thursday.  Indeed, I am waiting for the benefits documents 
to arrive with this morning's express mail.  

Your contact at Davis & Co, our Canadia counsel in Vancouver, is Dean 
Crawford (604) 643-2951, dccrawford@davis.ca.  Our principal contact at Davis 
& Co. is Brian Hiebert, (604) 643-2917, fax: 687-1612, 
brian_hiebert@davis.ca.  I have not met Dean, but understand from Brian that 
he is a senior employment attorney with experience with the provincial labor 
ministry.  I understand that Dean is currently reviewing the CBAs, the Inglis 
employment agreement, benefits documents, union grievance records, workers 
compensation claims records and human rights complaints files.  Davis & Co. 
have prepared consents to be signed by KPMG as receiver for Stone Venepal 
(Celgar) Inc., owner of the mill, in order to get access to correspondence 
between Stone Venepal and the Workers Compensation Board.  

I trust I will see you at the Celgar metting at 10:00 am today in 27C2.

Peter

Pursuant to Michelle's request, please review the attached form and provide 
her with your comments.

Thanks.
Twanda

This is a mail merge document, so you will need to click on option and delete 
header source.

Also, I spoke with Michelle the other person to invite is Barbara Gray.

Molly, could you please forward the "thanks, but no  thanks" template letter 
to me?  I will send it to her since she interviewed.  For persons who don't 
interview,  I think the "no thanks" letter can come from HR.

Thanks for your assistance on this. 

Michelle

ARLGin48@aol.com on 11/30/2000 10:09:04 PM
Dear Michelle---Just a note to tell you I thoroughly enjoyed meeting you
today.  Thank you for taking time to learn more about my background and
experience and to share your Enron story with me.  I am very interested in
the available position because I welcome the opportunity to learn new things
and improve my skills.  Although I have not worked at a law firm, I am
fortunate to say that my in-house experience has been very hands-on with most
of the transactions and all of the labor matters handled without outside
counsel.  I discussed this point at some length with Elizabeth Sager and left
a reference list with Molly McGee in HR.  Looking forward to hearing from you
soon,

Alice Ginsburgh

I wasn't sure you'd know who sent it, but good guess!  Trey was quite pleased 
with himself.  Later.  Michelle

Jeff Hoogendam <Jeff@SmartPrice.com> on 11/27/2000 09:37:29 AM
Trey-

Thanks for the wonderful "Eyes of Texas" message.  Bastards.

It looks like A&M is losing the recruiting war.

Jeff

Jeff Hoogendam - President & CEO
SmartPrice.com, Inc.
"The power to make smart choices"
T: 512.342.8800, x3008
F: 512.342.1072
jeff@smartprice.com
www.smartprice.com

Elizabeth, any interest in the second resume here?  We are interviewing the 
first guy already.  Thanks.  Michelle

Tracie_Waligura@rwr.com on 11/10/2000 10:44:37 AM
Richard, Wayne and Roberts

Michelle - As discussed, attached are the resumes of Andy Becnel (corporate
attorney) and Bruce Reemsnyder (energy attorney).

(See attached file: andrew becnel resume.doc)(See attached file: andrew becnel
deals.doc)

(See attached file: bruce reemsnyder resume.doc)

Tracie Waligura
Legal Recruiter
24 Greenway Plaza, Suite  1304
Houston, Texas 77046
Toll:        800-364-7979  Ext. 7254
Direct:    713-358-7254
Fax:        713-623-2740
Email:    twaligura@rwr.com
Internet: http://www.rwr.com

 - andrew becnel resume.doc
 - andrew becnel deals.doc
 - bruce reemsnyder resume.doc

please print this plus attachments and file in Garden State file.  Thanks.  
MHC

HThomas@gspcorp.com on 11/03/2000 01:48:00 PM
Gentlemen, Michelle Cash in Legal has reviewed the engineering advertisement

that we put together for campus and had the comments below.  Michelle is
concerned about how much we tie Enron into the document.

I revised the document as Michelle suggested, see engradv3.  It does not
have
quite the flow that the preceding document had.

Let's discuss this document next week when we are all in New Jersey.  David,
you
might want to talk to Michelle about the bigger issue of keeping Enron's
name
separate from GSP, her phone number is 853.6401

______________________________ Forward Header
__________________________________
I agree with the issue of de-emphasizing Enron in the communications.  I
would suggest that the communication, as written, could be used to imply
that the candidate would be an Enron employee.  If possible, we should say
that GSP is an LLC that currently is owned 100% by Enron, because, as I
understand it, Enron is going to sell down portions of that facility.
Thus, I want to manage the expectations that the person would be an "Enron"
person.

Could you please forward this message?

Thanks.  Michelle

HThomas@gspcorp.com on 11/03/2000 06:22:00 AM

     David, Michelle, Fran, see the following.  Michelle, once you have
     your discussion with David Howe about the Enron influence, perhaps we
     need to have some writeup that states what we should say and what we
     should not say.

     Hoyt

______________________________ Forward Header
__________________________________
     Jim Burkhead: Dave (Syracuse) and Marty (Miami Ohio) are both going to
     campus on the 14th.  If you could move your date at Maine up to that
     week from the 29th, then we could convene after all three interview
     trips and decide who we want to bring on-site.

     I propose (based on Marty's suggestion) that we try to bring all our
     leading candidates in for a mill visit on the same day (or perhaps one
     day for Dec grads and one day for May grads, if we get that many
     interested candidates), preferably the last week of November.  It will
     be a busy day, but then we can knock it all out then.

     Regarding your campus visits, we are looking for at least two process
     engineers, December grads are fine (actually preferred at the present
     time), and we should also look at environmental engineers if they are
     available at the school you are visiting.  In order to hire two
     process engineers, we probably have to bring eight in for a mill
     visit.

     Margo, is there any way we can get some GSPCLLC brochures or handouts
     for Jim, Mary and Dave to use on campus?

FYI, Houston Legal is recommending that we do not emphasize the Enron
connection.  I think that we are probably okay with the reference to Enron
in
the attached blurb that Marty and Dave put together (attached) but let's
avoid
suggesting to candidates that they can hire on here and then move into
Enron.
Jim and Marty, when you send the attached doc to campus, you might want to
add
your name at the bottom in addition to Dave's to make sure that the
students

know that they can contact you.

David Howe and Mike Parker, do you want to go to any of these campus
visits?

Thanks, Hoyt

______________________________ Forward Header
__________________________________
     Hoyt;

     I'm scheduled at Syracuse Nov 14.

     Dave

______________________________ Reply Separator
_________________________________
     Dave, do you have a date set up?  Let's talk.  go ahead and send it to
     Syracuse.

     Jim Burkhead is working on Maine, i have to call Rutgers and NJIT.
     But I would really like to find 2 Dec grads from the paper schools if
     we could.

     Hoyt

______________________________ Reply Separator
_________________________________
     I believe the attached document is the final version for the process
     engineering position. Please review it. If it looks OK I would like to
     send it off to Syracuse to be posted in the Pulp and Paper Science
     Department. I will schedule a recruiting trip there in November.

     Is anyone going to Maine or Rutgers/NJIT?

     Dave

(See attached file: engradv2.doc)
(See attached file: Forward.txt)

 - ENGRADV2.DOC
 - FORWARD.TXT
 - engradv3.doc
 - Forward.txt

sounds fabulous!!!  See you Friday -- is a place/time confirmed yet?  

Michelle Blaine@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
12/06/2000 05:38 PM
Gang.
The big jewels show will be on Sunday the 17--how about 3pm-7pm--come 
whenever you want.  My new place will still be uninhabitable then, so it will 
be at the Houstonian Hotel.  Details on Friday.

Dianne,

Thanks for all your work for the Travel Club.  I never make a meeting, but 
really enjoy the tickets, etc.

One question I have is whether Enron has any special relationships with 
Disney.  Are we a corporate client of Disney?  My old law firm had some sort 
of relationship with Disney that let us get great deals, early entry into the 
parks, etc., so it may be worth looking into.

Thanks again.

Michelle Cash

We will have election of officers at our regularly scheduled meeting on 
Tuesday, December 12, 2000.

The present slate of officers listed below have volunteered to continue to 
serve for the upcoming year.  

Dianne Langeland -- President
Nancy Callans -- Vice President/Historian/Parliamentarian
Donna Teal -- Secretary
Margaret Doucette -- Treasurer
Mary Nguyen -- Assistant Treasurer
Paul Carroll -- Webmaster

We feel we have become a good working team and would appreciate your support 
in our candidacy for 2001.  We discussed this at our last monthly meeting and 
there was no strong objection to this suggestion.  Therefore, unless there is 
strong objection from the membership at large, this slate officers will stand 
and there will be no need to make other nominations for these positions. 

However, there is one position open that we need to fill and we are 
soliciting nominations for this position.  

Membership Secretary  -- The Membership Secretary shall act on behalf of the 
Secretary in the Secretary's absence, assist the Secretary in the fulfillment 
of the duties of the Secretary such as preparing the agenda for monthly 
meetings and taking of minutes at the monthly meetings.  It is imperative 
that the person filling this position be able to attend each monthly meeting 
which is held on the second Tuesday of each month.

Therefore, if you have someone that you would like to nominate for this 
position, please forward the name to me.  I will contact the nominee(s) to 
see if he/she is willing to serve, notify the membership of the nominee(s)  
and we will decide next Tuesday.

We, also, will be recognizing all the coordinators of events and officers for 
their untiring efforts during the past year.  Coordinators are the heartbeat 
of our Club and the officers are the backbone of the Club.  They are the ones 
who take the initiative to pursue the Club's activities and the tenacity to 
follow through to see that our members have a wide variety of events in which 
to participate.    

I would like to take this opportunity to solicit any suggestions, thoughts, 
etc. that you might have regarding the Enron Travel Club, its events, its 
officers, its members, etc.   It is the goal of all the officers to make this 
Club the best it can be.  It is only through active participation of its 
members that will ensure its success.  Your comments,  regardless of the 
content, are important to enable us to continue to improve the Club and its 
activities.  

I look forward to seeing you all at the next meeting.

Thanks,

Dianne
x6-7213

Information Risk Management@ECT
12/07/2000 03:58 PM
Please submit an eRequest for this access.  

For future requests, please use our new online request system, located at 
http://itcentral.enron.com.  For assistance on how to use E-request, please 
go tohttp://itcentral.enron.com/data/services/training/documentationurl/ for 
the online training guide or call the Resolution Center @ x31411.

Thank you,
IRM

michelle.cash on 12/07/2000 11:00:13 AM
This is a request for Michelle Cash to have the Winzip Program installed on 
her computer.  Her location is EB3823.
Please chare to CO# 0413 RC# 105660.

If you have any questions, please contact me at 713-853-9402.

Thanks.
Twanda Sweet

Attached are copies of Dean Crawford's correspondence to the  Employment 
Standards Branch and to Celgar.? These documents are in  Microsoft Word 
format.
?
Lynn Scrivener
Davis & Company
(604) 687-9444 x.  364
lscrivener@davis.ca
 - LTemp stds - Celgar request.doc
 - LT Cargill enc. authorization.doc

Please review and provide me with your comments at your earliest 
convenience.  We are trying to respond this afternoon.  Thanks

Anne C. Koehler
Sr. Counsel, ENA
EB 3839
713-853-3448
	"KAREN MADDREY" <KMADDREY@LLGM.COM>
	12/07/2000 05:24 PM
		 
This e-mail, including attachments, contains information that is confidential 
and it may be protected by the attorney/client or other privileges.  This 
e-mail, including attachments, constitutes non-public information intended to 
be conveyed only to the designated recipient(s).  If you are not an intended 
recipient, please delete this e-mail, including attachments, and notify me by 
return mail, e-mail or at 713-287-2017.  The unauthorized use, dissemination, 
distribution or reproduction of this e-mail, including attachments, is 
prohibited and may be unlawful.

Karen Maddrey, Secretary
LeBoeuf, Lamb, Greene & MacRae, L.L.P.
1000 Louisiana, Suite 1400
Houston, TX 77002
713-287-2017
kmaddrey@llgm.com

 - Y7102!.doc

See Employee Matters issues list prepared by Bidder A.

Anne C. Koehler
Sr. Counsel, ENA
EB 3839
713-853-3448
	"KAREN MADDREY" <KMADDREY@LLGM.COM>
	12/07/2000 05:10 PM
		 
This e-mail, including attachments, contains information that is confidential 
and it may be protected by the attorney/client or other privileges.  This 
e-mail, including attachments, constitutes non-public information intended to 
be conveyed only to the designated recipient(s).  If you are not an intended 
recipient, please delete this e-mail, including attachments, and notify me by 
return mail, e-mail or at 713-287-2017.  The unauthorized use, dissemination, 
distribution or reproduction of this e-mail, including attachments, is 
prohibited and may be unlawful.

Karen Maddrey, Secretary
LeBoeuf, Lamb, Greene & MacRae, L.L.P.
1000 Louisiana, Suite 1400
Houston, TX 77002
713-287-2017
kmaddrey@llgm.com

 - IT 121 Redline.rtf
 - HPL IT Employee Matters Major Points 127.doc
 - IT clean 121.DOC
 - Consolid.DOC
 - PurOptio.DOC
 - Consenta.DOC
 - IssuesLi.DOC
 - Principa.DOC

please print this and attached and put in the Project Canary Due Diligence 
file.  Thanks.  Michelle

Attached are copies of Dean Crawford's correspondence to the  Employment 
Standards Branch and to Celgar.? These documents are in  Microsoft Word 
format.
?
Lynn Scrivener
Davis & Company
(604) 687-9444 x.  364
lscrivener@davis.ca
 - LTemp stds - Celgar request.doc
 - LT Cargill enc. authorization.doc

thanks for organizing this!  It was a blast.  See you Sunday.  Michelle

Deannenoel@aol.com on 12/08/2000 10:02:58 AM
I am sorry to have left the details for so late, but here they are.  Pregos
at 7:30.  Unfortunately, Elizabeth cannot make it, Lisa will be flying in
from NYC so who knows when or if she will be there, and Deb has another
engagement, but will meet us for drinks before dinner, so be prompt.  The
rest of us will have a fabulous time eating and DRINKING and trying not to
cause a scene.  See ya'll tonight.

could you please forward to Scott Miller (email below) our short 
confidentiality, non-solicitation and non-compete agreement?  Thanks a lot.  
Michelle

Attached is a marked version of the Assignment Agreement with our initial 
comments.  In addition to the comments marked, we also have a few other 
questions.

Although we do not object to it being mentioned twice, why is the lease 
assigned pursuant to this Assignment Agreement when there is also a separate 
lease assignment agreement?

How was the employment of the persons listed on Exhibit A to the Assignment 
Agreemement effected?  Were they terminated or did they resign?  Is there any 
documentation regarding this?

We may have further comments after review by Enron and our labor attorney.  
Please call Cle at (713) 221-1314 or me at (713) 221-1131 with your comments.

Thanks.

Scott L. Miller
Bracewell & Patterson, L.L.P.
Phone (713) 221-1131
Fax (713) 222-3242
email:  smiller@bracepatt.com

 - Redline AMPS Assignment Agreement.doc

FYI.  Michelle
For your review and comment.

	"Sandy Baird" <sbaird@davis.ca>
	12/06/2000 02:24 PM
		 
The following message and attachements are from Brian Hiebert:

Enclosed for your review and comment is both a clean copy and a blacklined 
draft of the proposed form of Asset Purchase Agreement prepared by the 
solicitors for the receiver, KPMG.

I have taken that agreement and redrafted it to provide for direct 
representations and warranties from the Banks to Enron regarding such issues 
as title, status of contracts, financial statements, and otherwise.

This agreement should be viewed as a preliminary draft only as I did not have 
the benefit of reviewing the schedules which will form part of the 
agreement.  I understand those schedules are being prepared and will be 
forwarded to us together with a possibly revised version of this agreement.  
Also coming over is a form of debt purchase agreement.

Once I have received those agreements and have had an opportunity to review 
them together with their schedules I expect further changes will result.  
Further changes may also result from the continuation of due diligence 
through the course of this week and next.

However, I think the enclosed is a dramatic improvement from Enron's 
perspective over the form of purchase and sale agreement proposed by KPMG.

I look forward to discussing this with you.  In the meantime, if you have any 
questions please feel free to give me a call.

 - Static copy of ASSET PURCHASE AGREEMENT - KPMG AND CELGAR.doc
 - OUTPUT.DOC

Eden, Here is the data for the Ecogas settlement agreements.  Michelle

Kelly Mahmoud <Kelly@ECOGAS.com> on 12/12/2000 02:32:50 PM
Randy just informed me that we are going to use the PV10 calculation for the
employee contract settlements.

Kelly, my fax is 713-646-3490.  Thanks.  Michelle

Kelly Mahmoud <Kelly@ECOGAS.com> on 12/12/2000 08:57:47 AM

I will send signed contracts and numbers to Michelle.  Michelle, please
e-mail your fax number to me.

Kelly

Michelle - I think Kelly has already sent the #'s to Bracewell and the docs
are in progress.

Kelly - if this is not correct, please make sure Michelle and Bracewell
have the right numbers to fill in the blanks on the employee separation
agreements.  If you've already done so just confirm to Michelle.

Thanks!
Michelle Cash
12/11/2000 05:08 PM

Randy,

I haven't received the numbers for the releases for the Ecogas personnel
under contract.   Would you mind sending it to me so that I can send it to
outside counsel to prepare the releases?

Also, could you please send me copies of the Agreements for the 5 Ecogas
employees?  The only ones I have are unsigned.

Thanks a lot.

Michelle

maybe.  He was in today and met with Mark Taylor, Travis, and Lance, to 
positive results.  I certainly could ask him if he's interested in trading.  
Leslie Hansen thinks highly of him.  Michelle

Any way you think Andrew might like power trading?  His resume looks strong.  

go ahead and initial it.  I assume that there are no changes.  Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

	Karen E Jones
	12/12/2000 08:38 PM
		 
Hi Michelle.  Is it ok for me to put your initials on Kathy Russeth's CSA 
(for some reason, the version she signed is not the intialled version that I 
think you sent to Sam recently).  I can fax to you the document, as she has 
signed it, for a final check.  Please let me know your preference.  I am in 
the SF office this week - (415)782-7800, or page (800)316-0430.  Thanks.  --  
Karen

Candace, You are right -- there is no need to send a second letter since we 
didn't base our decision on the background check results.  Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

	Candace Womack
	12/12/2000 07:07 PM
		
Michelle - Just wanted to verify that there is no need to send this candidate 
a second notice.  It seems a bit pointless, but thought I would double check 
with you.  Please advise.

Thanks.

Candace

Michelle Cash
11/18/2000 04:24 PM
Candace, this letter looks good.  Michelle

Candace Womack
11/14/2000 11:22 AM
Michelle - 

I have drafted up a special letter to send to the candidate with the 
derogatory results on his background investigation report.  We had decided 
not to engage him for business reasons unrelated to the background report 
(his job requisition was actually cancelled), and you suggested that we send 
him a copy of his report anyway.

Could you look over this letter and let me know if it is suitable to send 
out?  Will we need to also modify the second letter (that contains contact 
information for the investigation agency) and send it out in a couple of 
weeks, or will this one letter be sufficient?  Or should I incorporate the 
contact information into this letter?

Thanks for your assistance.

Candace
x30651

I don't do EBS, but I have asked Kriste Sullivan to send me the info you 
requested.  You also may want to check with Shelly Pierce in EBS compensation 
to see what she knows.  Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

	Shanna Funkhouser@ENRON
	12/12/2000 06:21 PM
		 
Michelle,

Do you do employment agreements for EBS, if not, who is the attorney I should 
contact?  Bill is a Trading Manager for EBS and will be transferring to EGM 
in the near future.  Bill evidently had a draft of an employment agreement 
that was not executed.  Shankman and Nowlan want to offer him a contract and 
want to start with the same terms drafted by EBS.

Thanks,
Shanna

Roberto, If a person is accessing inappropriate web sites in the course of 
investigations, it does not violate the policies.  However, it may be useful 
to set up protocols or logs to confirm when a person is accessing it for 
investigative purposes to remove all confusion on the matter.  Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

Twanda, would you please check my calendar and book me yes if I am 
available?  Thanks a lot.  Michelle

Please let me know if you are available for this meeting.

  Tuesday, January 25th @ 2:00
  Conference Room TBD

Thanks!
Sheri
   
	
	

That sounds great.  Thanks again.

Jane

Cynthia Barrow@ENRON
12/16/99 06:06 PM
I'd like to wait until we get legal opinion first.  Once we know there are no 
DOL/ERISA issues (or at least some we can manage), we can set-out the process 
flow and then the companies.  I'll coordinate a conference call -- but let's 
do this after the holidays.  So many of the players are not here at the same 
time and I am sure payroll has as many year end issues as we do right now.

(Sheri, please contact Michelle Cash and Pat Mackin to get available dates 
and then set-up a conference call including the above people as well as Mikie 
Rath and Dolores Lenfest.  We probably need to do this as soon as possible in 
the new year.  Can you also include Jane Pleli, Joann Hill and Sherry 
Lessner, there may be issues with us changing current environment prior to 
7/1/2000 that we need to consider.)

Thanks
Cb

   
	
	

Okay, so what is our next step?  Who can get the company set up?

Thanks,

Jane

Michael B Jones@ENRON
12/16/99 03:40 PM
For the employees to be provided with domestic benefits, they could just be 
placed on the standard domestic payroll, whereas the employees not to have 
domestic benefits could be on the new company.  As Cynthia states below, the 
new company (as a whole) would not be adopting benefit plans.  Logistically, 
there would just need to be different procedures for setting up the new hires 
on the correct company.

Also, the administration of the cross charges will be much easier once SAP 
Payroll comes online 7/1.  Currently, there is some manual intervention when 
charging from one company (like Expat Services) to the appropriate accounting 
company.

Mike

   
	
	

Good point, we would want to pick and choose as some may not want to remain 
on home country payroll or a home country payroll may not exist.

Michelle, can you comment from a legal perspective?

Thanks,

Jane

Cynthia Barrow@ENRON
12/16/99 11:16 AM
The not making them eligible for domestic benefits is easy.  The new payroll 
company will simply not adopt the plans.  I am assuming that the number of 
employees (nor associated demographics) in this company will not create a 
discrimination problem.    

One question though, will we treat all foreign nationals the same or will you 
want to pick and choose who receive domestic benefits and who does not.  If 
the answer is yes to this we will probably need to run some legal traps.

Let me know if we can help.
Cb

   
	
	

As Enron expands globally, we are faced with a growing issue of more and more 
foreign nationals entering the US on varied lengths of assignment.  For some, 
it is necessary that they remain on their home country payroll to maintain 
retirement benefits, as our domestic benefits structure (401(k), cash 
balance, etc.) does not provide them with equivalent benefits based on the 
fact they will return to their home country to retire.  If they remain on 
their home country payroll system, we are struggling with a convenient method 
to have them pay US taxes (both income and possibly social security) as well 
as receive US $.

Currently, David Oxley is on such an arrangement.  He is paid by the UK a 
portion of his pay to maintain UK benefits.  The remainder of his salary is 
paid on US payroll.  This allows him to pay in FIT withholding.  No 
FICA/Medicare is necessary due to the totalization agreement with the UK.  
Unfortunately, this created some extra work on the domestic benefits group as 
they had to code the HR system not to provide him with Flex dollars, 
health/welfare and retirement benefits.  We indicated in his employment 
agreement that he was not eligible for these benefits.

I am looking for an easier and more efficient way to do this.  Would it be 
possible to create a payroll company here in the US for arriving foreign 
nationals that remain on their home country payroll that would allow them a 
mechanism to:

receive a portion of their pay in US $ into a US account
pay in FIT and possibly FICA/Medicare
not make them eligible for domestic benefits

I would appreciate you and the others I have copied looking into this.

Thanks,

Jane

I think we should have someone from the tax group also attend this meeting -- 
contact Jordan Mintz for the appropriate representative since he and I have 
discussed this issue already.

Thanks.  Michelle

   

Please let me know if you are available for this meeting.

  Tuesday, January 25th @ 2:00
  Conference Room TBD

Thanks!
Sheri
   
	
	

That sounds great.  Thanks again.

Jane

Cynthia Barrow@ENRON
12/16/99 06:06 PM
I'd like to wait until we get legal opinion first.  Once we know there are no 
DOL/ERISA issues (or at least some we can manage), we can set-out the process 
flow and then the companies.  I'll coordinate a conference call -- but let's 
do this after the holidays.  So many of the players are not here at the same 
time and I am sure payroll has as many year end issues as we do right now.

(Sheri, please contact Michelle Cash and Pat Mackin to get available dates 
and then set-up a conference call including the above people as well as Mikie 
Rath and Dolores Lenfest.  We probably need to do this as soon as possible in 
the new year.  Can you also include Jane Pleli, Joann Hill and Sherry 
Lessner, there may be issues with us changing current environment prior to 
7/1/2000 that we need to consider.)

Thanks
Cb

   
	
	

Okay, so what is our next step?  Who can get the company set up?

Thanks,

Jane

Michael B Jones@ENRON
12/16/99 03:40 PM
For the employees to be provided with domestic benefits, they could just be 
placed on the standard domestic payroll, whereas the employees not to have 
domestic benefits could be on the new company.  As Cynthia states below, the 
new company (as a whole) would not be adopting benefit plans.  Logistically, 
there would just need to be different procedures for setting up the new hires 
on the correct company.

Also, the administration of the cross charges will be much easier once SAP 
Payroll comes online 7/1.  Currently, there is some manual intervention when 
charging from one company (like Expat Services) to the appropriate accounting 
company.

Mike

   
	
	

Good point, we would want to pick and choose as some may not want to remain 
on home country payroll or a home country payroll may not exist.

Michelle, can you comment from a legal perspective?

Thanks,

Jane

Cynthia Barrow@ENRON
12/16/99 11:16 AM
The not making them eligible for domestic benefits is easy.  The new payroll 
company will simply not adopt the plans.  I am assuming that the number of 
employees (nor associated demographics) in this company will not create a 
discrimination problem.    

One question though, will we treat all foreign nationals the same or will you 
want to pick and choose who receive domestic benefits and who does not.  If 
the answer is yes to this we will probably need to run some legal traps.

Let me know if we can help.
Cb

   
	
	

As Enron expands globally, we are faced with a growing issue of more and more 
foreign nationals entering the US on varied lengths of assignment.  For some, 
it is necessary that they remain on their home country payroll to maintain 
retirement benefits, as our domestic benefits structure (401(k), cash 
balance, etc.) does not provide them with equivalent benefits based on the 
fact they will return to their home country to retire.  If they remain on 
their home country payroll system, we are struggling with a convenient method 
to have them pay US taxes (both income and possibly social security) as well 
as receive US $.

Currently, David Oxley is on such an arrangement.  He is paid by the UK a 
portion of his pay to maintain UK benefits.  The remainder of his salary is 
paid on US payroll.  This allows him to pay in FIT withholding.  No 
FICA/Medicare is necessary due to the totalization agreement with the UK.  
Unfortunately, this created some extra work on the domestic benefits group as 
they had to code the HR system not to provide him with Flex dollars, 
health/welfare and retirement benefits.  We indicated in his employment 
agreement that he was not eligible for these benefits.

I am looking for an easier and more efficient way to do this.  Would it be 
possible to create a payroll company here in the US for arriving foreign 
nationals that remain on their home country payroll that would allow them a 
mechanism to:

receive a portion of their pay in US $ into a US account
pay in FIT and possibly FICA/Medicare
not make them eligible for domestic benefits

I would appreciate you and the others I have copied looking into this.

Thanks,

Jane

looks good to me.  Thanks!  Michelle

Marty,

Rainer Cockrell has called to ask that we put the Corporate Services 
Agreement in place before the end of the year.  My most recent draft of the 
agreement, dated 11/3/2000, is attached.  Please give it a final look .  
After I hear back from you I will arrange to get David Howe to sign for GSP 
and Bryan Burnett for ENA.

Thanks,

Pete

Twanda, please calendar.  Thanks a lot!!  Michelle

This meeting is set for Tuesday, January 25th @ 2:00 in EB15C1.

Pat - We will conference you in.
	
	

Please let me know if you are available for this meeting.

  Tuesday, January 25th @ 2:00
  Conference Room TBD

Thanks!
Sheri
   
	
	

That sounds great.  Thanks again.

Jane

Cynthia Barrow@ENRON
12/16/99 06:06 PM
I'd like to wait until we get legal opinion first.  Once we know there are no 
DOL/ERISA issues (or at least some we can manage), we can set-out the process 
flow and then the companies.  I'll coordinate a conference call -- but let's 
do this after the holidays.  So many of the players are not here at the same 
time and I am sure payroll has as many year end issues as we do right now.

(Sheri, please contact Michelle Cash and Pat Mackin to get available dates 
and then set-up a conference call including the above people as well as Mikie 
Rath and Dolores Lenfest.  We probably need to do this as soon as possible in 
the new year.  Can you also include Jane Pleli, Joann Hill and Sherry 
Lessner, there may be issues with us changing current environment prior to 
7/1/2000 that we need to consider.)

Thanks
Cb

   
	
	

Okay, so what is our next step?  Who can get the company set up?

Thanks,

Jane

Michael B Jones@ENRON
12/16/99 03:40 PM
For the employees to be provided with domestic benefits, they could just be 
placed on the standard domestic payroll, whereas the employees not to have 
domestic benefits could be on the new company.  As Cynthia states below, the 
new company (as a whole) would not be adopting benefit plans.  Logistically, 
there would just need to be different procedures for setting up the new hires 
on the correct company.

Also, the administration of the cross charges will be much easier once SAP 
Payroll comes online 7/1.  Currently, there is some manual intervention when 
charging from one company (like Expat Services) to the appropriate accounting 
company.

Mike

   
	
	

Good point, we would want to pick and choose as some may not want to remain 
on home country payroll or a home country payroll may not exist.

Michelle, can you comment from a legal perspective?

Thanks,

Jane

Cynthia Barrow@ENRON
12/16/99 11:16 AM
The not making them eligible for domestic benefits is easy.  The new payroll 
company will simply not adopt the plans.  I am assuming that the number of 
employees (nor associated demographics) in this company will not create a 
discrimination problem.    

One question though, will we treat all foreign nationals the same or will you 
want to pick and choose who receive domestic benefits and who does not.  If 
the answer is yes to this we will probably need to run some legal traps.

Let me know if we can help.
Cb

   
	
	

As Enron expands globally, we are faced with a growing issue of more and more 
foreign nationals entering the US on varied lengths of assignment.  For some, 
it is necessary that they remain on their home country payroll to maintain 
retirement benefits, as our domestic benefits structure (401(k), cash 
balance, etc.) does not provide them with equivalent benefits based on the 
fact they will return to their home country to retire.  If they remain on 
their home country payroll system, we are struggling with a convenient method 
to have them pay US taxes (both income and possibly social security) as well 
as receive US $.

Currently, David Oxley is on such an arrangement.  He is paid by the UK a 
portion of his pay to maintain UK benefits.  The remainder of his salary is 
paid on US payroll.  This allows him to pay in FIT withholding.  No 
FICA/Medicare is necessary due to the totalization agreement with the UK.  
Unfortunately, this created some extra work on the domestic benefits group as 
they had to code the HR system not to provide him with Flex dollars, 
health/welfare and retirement benefits.  We indicated in his employment 
agreement that he was not eligible for these benefits.

I am looking for an easier and more efficient way to do this.  Would it be 
possible to create a payroll company here in the US for arriving foreign 
nationals that remain on their home country payroll that would allow them a 
mechanism to:

receive a portion of their pay in US $ into a US account
pay in FIT and possibly FICA/Medicare
not make them eligible for domestic benefits

I would appreciate you and the others I have copied looking into this.

Thanks,

Jane

Sharon/Kriste,

If there are going to be revisions to the leave policy, I suggest that we 
make major ones, including a segregation of FMLA leave from other types of 
leave --i.e., two separate policies.  Let's talk about this on Tuesday ----- 
Majorly important!!

Michelle

Sharon Butcher@ENRON
01/13/2000 05:38 PM
Dear Michelle and Kriste:   Please review and let me have your comments.   
Thanks.  Sharon
Elaine Paul
12/14/99 08:57 PM
Here are a few edits to the Approved Time Off and Leaves of Absence policy.

Benefits has not included a "second or third opinion by another health care 
provider paid for by the Company" as it has significant implications to our 
LTD plan and has created at least one problem that I am aware of in the past.
We will need to think through what the certification document might look like 
and would look to you for some guidelines.   The concern I have is around 
privacy and use of information given potential regulation.
Cynthia believes that we should run FMLA concurrent with sick time.  I agree 
and have noted that in the document.   

Sharon, could you please review the wording to ensure I haven't missed 
something here from a legal perspective.  I will follow-up with you by phone 
shortly.  

Susan, here are the "long-since promised" wording changes we propose.     

Thanks,

Elaine  

Privileged & Confidential

David,

As far as I can tell, Mike McCall is not under a current employment 
agreement.  I sent you a draft agreement for him on December 2, 1999, and 
have heard nothing more about the status of that agreement.

I do not have any other information about the terms of his employment 
(salary, options, etc.).

Let me know if you would like any other information from me.

Michelle

David Oxley
01/12/2000 02:42 PM
	

Mike McCall

What are his current employment terms?

If we were to let him go what would be your advice on deal?

David

Attached are some notes from Michelle Cash.

David,

As we discussed, Mark Haedicke and I discussed the possibility of providing 
Kevin McConville with some sort of indemnity in order to make sure that he 
remains available and cooperative during the pendency of the NSM case and 
other litigation matters.

We could agree to enter into a Consulting Services Agreement with Kevin.  The 
terms of that Agreement would include:

1. He agrees to be available and cooperative with Enron and its counsel 
regarding litigation matters.  He will agree to meet with counsel, prepare 
for testimony, review documents, testify, and provide other assistance, as 
needed.

2. Through February 1, 2001, Kevin would not be directly compensated for this 
cooperation/testimony (because he is to be receiving his salary pursuant to 
the terms of his employment agreement).  After Feb.1, 2001, he will be paid a 
rate of $125 per hour for his services in this regard.

3. Enron would agree to indemnify Kevin for his conduct taken in the ordinary 
course and scope of his employment with Enron, up to the last date of his 
employment with Enron.  Excluded from this indemnity would be allegations or 
claims based upon the following:

  -- any conduct that is outside the course and scope of Kevin's employment, 
  -- any conduct violating policies of Enron or ENA,
  -- Kevin's intentional acts, 
  -- Kevin's gross negligence,
  -- Kevin's reckless conduct,
  -- conduct that is in violation of any law, statute, regulation, or other 
legal obligation, or 
  -- the commission of an unlawful or illegal act.

4. Kevin would invoice Enron for time spent in performing the services after 
2/1/01.  The invoice would be paid within 30 days of receipt.  In addition, 
all related expenses would be reimbursed throughout the term of  the 
agreement.

Let me know if you have any questions or require additional information.  I 
am available to participate in your call with him, if you would like me to 
attend.

Michelle

Gene and Susan,

Here is the draft award agreement for the plan.  Let me know if you have 
comments. 

I will be getting with Brian Bloom this week with our comments to the plan 
document.

Michelle

I am forwarding, by attachment to this e-mail a draft, dated February 11,
2000, of the form Award Agreement Under the Enron Investment Partners
Incentive Plan.  Once you have had a chance to review the draft, please call
me at (713) 758-4505 or Brian Bloom at (713) 758-2623 with any comments or
questions.  We look forward to hearing from you.

 <<125080_1.doc>>

 - 125080_1.doc

Thanks for the draft.

Delaware is the proper state.

I thought the deferral information was sent to you already.   There is no 
"plan" document per se.  Instead, there is a description of the program.  I 
will re-send that to you today if you don't already have it.

Please contact my assistant, Twanda Sweet, for a time to have a conference 
call on the other question.  My morning today is wild; tomorrow probably is 
better.  

Thanks.

Michelle

Michelle Cash asked that I forward copies of these documents to you.  I have
also forwarded copies to Gene Humphrey and Aaron Brown.  Please call me at
(713)758-4505 or Brian Bloom at (713) 758-2623 with any questions or
comments.

Dear Michelle,

 Attached are the latest drafts of the Enron Investment Partners
Company Incentive Plan (the "Plan") and the form Award Agreement Under the
Enron Investment Partners Company Incentive Plan.  To aid in your review, I
have also attached redlines of each document highlighting the changes since
the first drafts.  Please note the following points with respect to the
latest drafts:

(1) We need to know what state Enron Investment Partners Company is
incorporated in.

(2) We need a copy of the Enron Deferral Plan.

(3) We need to discuss Gene Humphrey's suggested revisions to Section
7.3(c) of the Plan.

 Once you have had a chance to review the drafts, please call me or
Brian Bloom to discuss your comments and questions.

Very truly yours,
Jeanne Wilson

PRIVILEGED AND CONFIDENTIAL:
Contains attorney-client communications
and/or attorney work product

 - Redline - Incentive Plan.DOC
 - Redline - Award Agreement.DOC
 - Word 2nd Draft Award Agreement for Enron Investment Partners Incentive 
Plan.DOC
 - Word 2nd Draft Enron Economic Development Corp. Incentive Plan.DOC

Tony, the lawyer's name is Gary Herrmanns at Orrick.  His number is 
415-773-5451.  Thanks for the message about Trey!  Michelle

Tony Jarrett@ENRON
03/20/2000 01:17 PM
Michelle:

Will you please forward me the name and number of the attorney who suggested 
we try to structure payments under this plan in a manner that would result in 
capital gains treatment to participants?  Thanks.

Tony

Just when you thought it was safe . . . 

I have received a question from NEPCO about Project 50.  Apparently, they 
have temporary employees who work on projects and then leave the company.  
These are hourly employees who do not work regularly.  Originally, these 
employees were thought to be included in the scope of Project 50 by corp.  
Mike Indivero called me and said that these people should not receive the 50 
options because they are not "regular, full-time or regular part-time 
employees" as described in the memo from the Office of the Chairman.

What are  your thoughts on that?  Should they be included or not? My reading 
of the email to all employees is that it does not include temporary 
employees.  Do you know how other temporary employees were treated?

Let me know what you think.

Thanks, as always.

Michelle

Tara,

You are right -- those changes were not included.  For Vice President level 
employees, corporate comp.does not promote guaranteed performance bonuses.  

The request that he be able to "get out" of his employment contract if he is 
not promoted also is not something that we can do; otherwise, it will 
undermine the enforceability of our non-competes across the board.

 I spoke with David Oxley on both of those points, and he concurred that 
these changes could not be made. 

Michelle

Tara Rozen
04/05/2000 12:23 PM
Thanks for this, Twanda

I have two comments; 

1)I cannot find the exception clause which indicates that David Pope can 
resign if he doesn't make MD as described in previous email. Am I missing 
this or can we not put this in?

2)Danny McCarty wanted guaranteed bonus for 2000 rather than performance 
target bonus as per email. Is this possible?

Thanks
Tara

Hello!

An ENA employee wrote a book that was published in Russia.  There have been 
three editions, and the publisher wants her to do a 4th.  The topic is 
technical analysis, which is what she does here at Enron.  In this 4th 
edition, she will be using public data, her own PC, and working on her own 
time.  However, given that she has been at Enron for 6 months, she obviously 
would apply some of the knowledge she has gained here in the revision of the 
book.  She would not divulge any Enron confidential or proprietary 
information, however.

What are your thoughts on whether she could be able to do this?  She is 
willing to let Enron be a co-author, although as a practical matter, I do not 
think that would be worthwhile.  My opinion at this point is that she can do 
it, so long as it is on her own time and using her own resources, and, of 
course, provided that she reveals no Enron-specific  information.  I welcome 
your perspective, however, given that this is a new one to me.

Thanks for your thoughts.

Michelle

fyi
Tara Rozen
04/10/2000 12:09 PM
Thanks.  Nigel has now spoken with David and Nigel has gone to Danny with the 
result. We shall see how he responds!!

Thanks
Tara

Michelle Cash
10/04/2000 18:00
Tara,

You are right -- those changes were not included.  For Vice President level 
employees, corporate comp.does not promote guaranteed performance bonuses.  

The request that he be able to "get out" of his employment contract if he is 
not promoted also is not something that we can do; otherwise, it will 
undermine the enforceability of our non-competes across the board.

 I spoke with David Oxley on both of those points, and he concurred that 
these changes could not be made. 

Michelle

Tara Rozen
04/05/2000 12:23 PM
Thanks for this, Twanda

I have two comments; 

1)I cannot find the exception clause which indicates that David Pope can 
resign if he doesn't make MD as described in previous email. Am I missing 
this or can we not put this in?

2)Danny McCarty wanted guaranteed bonus for 2000 rather than performance 
target bonus as per email. Is this possible?

Thanks
Tara

FYI re:  FMLA policy
Michelle Cash
01/13/2000 06:46 PM
Sharon/Kriste,

If there are going to be revisions to the leave policy, I suggest that we 
make major ones, including a segregation of FMLA leave from other types of 
leave --i.e., two separate policies.  Let's talk about this on Tuesday ----- 
Majorly important!!

Michelle

Sharon Butcher@ENRON
01/13/2000 05:38 PM
Dear Michelle and Kriste:   Please review and let me have your comments.   
Thanks.  Sharon
Elaine Paul
12/14/99 08:57 PM
Here are a few edits to the Approved Time Off and Leaves of Absence policy.

Benefits has not included a "second or third opinion by another health care 
provider paid for by the Company" as it has significant implications to our 
LTD plan and has created at least one problem that I am aware of in the past.
We will need to think through what the certification document might look like 
and would look to you for some guidelines.   The concern I have is around 
privacy and use of information given potential regulation.
Cynthia believes that we should run FMLA concurrent with sick time.  I agree 
and have noted that in the document.   

Sharon, could you please review the wording to ensure I haven't missed 
something here from a legal perspective.  I will follow-up with you by phone 
shortly.  

Susan, here are the "long-since promised" wording changes we propose.     

Thanks,

Elaine  

Please keep your file open.  We still are talking with her, and probably will 
need additional revisions to the document, as well as your advice and 
counsel.  Thanks.  Michelle

Michelle:
 I sent you a revised settlement agreement on the Lynda Clemmons matter
last week, and I know you were ready to get this one closed out. Is there
anything further I need to be doing on it now? Let me know.
 Best regards,
 Bill

Felicia,

In general, you are correct that the salary basis test must be met before 
someone can be classified as exempt.  However, because there are certain 
exceptions to the salary basis test (for example, licensed attorneys do not 
have to meet that test), it depends on what the employees are doing as to 
whether this situation creates a problem under the FLSA.

My recommendation would be to obtain information about the jobs performed by 
these 29 employees so that we can determine whether there is an issue.  If 
they do not fit within one of the exceptions, we probably should have them 
affirmatively report time so that hours worked over 40 can be paid at the 
overtime rate. You would use the hourly rate they are paid to determine the 
overtime rate.  If they are not working over 40 hours in a week, it will not 
be an issue.

Let me know if you have questions.

Michelle

Felecia Acevedo@ENRON
04/27/2000 05:40 PM
Sharon and Michelle,

We have 29 employees in the payroll system that are part-time exempt 
employees and their pay is calculated on an hourly rate.  Unless I understand 
the FLSA incorrectly we cannot in any way calculate salaries on exempt 
employees on an hourly basis.  If they are reduced hours we would need to 
determine how we would value their job based on a salary basis otherwise we 
are treating them as hourly employees and not exempt employees.   An exempt 
employee should only be tracking exception time (i.e. sick, vacation, etc -- 
any off duty time) but not work hours during the day.   An exempt worker 
according the FLSA can only be paid on a fee basis or salary basis -- not on 
an hourly basis.  If I am off base let me know, otherwise I would like your 
help with how we should approach getting this corrected and possibly having 
this covered in a policy on how to deal with employees performing exempt jobs 
that are working part-time or reduced schedules. 

Look forward to hearing back from you.

Felecia

TWanda, please print for me.  Thanks.  Michelle
Mary Overgaard
03/31/2000 05:37 PM
Here is a corrected chart.  Have a great weekend!
Mary
Please note we have corrected this chart under the section

"Certification."
We have deleted the language "Employer pays for both the second and third
opinion" and replaced it with
"Employer must pay the cost of the medical verification not covered by
insurance or other benefit plan"

- Those of you who have requested to receive the document by fax will
receive it later today.

- Please note OFLA applies to employers with more than 25 employees in
Oregon. FMLA applies to employers with more than 50 employees.

-I apologize for some of you who may have received the previous e-mail
twice. Our server hiccuped this morning! You should only receive this
message once.
 <<oflachartell032000.doc>>
Thanks so much.

Aaron Kirk Douglas
Client Services Director

 - oflachartell032000.doc

FYI.  Michelle
Mary Ann Long@ENRON COMMUNICATIONS
05/03/2000 01:56 PM
I will sign off on request forms for EBS.
Thanks
Mary Ann

	Mary Joyce@ENRON
	05/03/00 01:19 PM
		 
Effective May 8, the guidelines outlined in our April 14th training session 
will be officially implemented.  This means that employment agreements for 
VPs and above are not to be generated unless you have received a completed 
and approved request form.  Each business unit should call Mary McKendree 
(713-345-8085)  for the form and we will fax or hand deliver it to them.  The 
form must  be signed by the appropriate HR personnel for the business unit 
(names to be provided to Mary McKendree by each business unit) and then 
returned to Mary McKendree.  The form will be initialed by someone in 
Executive Compensation (Mary McKendree, Mary Joyce, or Pam Butler) and 
delivered to you for generating drafts.  Please do not distribute a draft to 
anyone without a signed and initialed request form.

Also, as discussed, requests for signing bonuses, retention bonuses, up-front 
grants by number of options rather than value, and guaranteed LTI awards are 
exceptions to the rules that the business units will need to justify before 
they will be approved.  Please do not make changes to these items or add any 
provisions to the standard short form without contacting Executive 
Compensation.

These procedures have been implemented at the request of the Office of the 
Chairman.  Consistent application of compensation standards and attention to 
the One Enron goal are key to our success.

Please pass this memo on to others who are impacted by this implementation.  
Sheila, would you please ensure that all Compensation Staff receive this?

T:  Would you please set up a meeting with Shanna?  Thanks. mhc
Shanna Funkhouser
05/04/2000 11:03 AM
Hi Michelle,

Could we get together briefly to discuss employment agreements, etc.   Brad 
has given me a general orientation to the processes, but I would like to hear 
from you how you and Twanda prefer to receive things, expected turnaround, 
etc.

I am free anytime tomorrow after 9:30 in the am or between 1:30 and 3:30 in 
the afternoon OR just about any time next week.

Thanks,
Shanna

Michelle Cash@ECT
05/04/2000 10:24 AM
FYI.  Michelle
Mary Ann Long@ENRON COMMUNICATIONS
05/03/2000 01:56 PM
I will sign off on request forms for EBS.
Thanks
Mary Ann

	Mary Joyce@ENRON
	05/03/00 01:19 PM
		 
Effective May 8, the guidelines outlined in our April 14th training session 
will be officially implemented.  This means that employment agreements for 
VPs and above are not to be generated unless you have received a completed 
and approved request form.  Each business unit should call Mary McKendree 
(713-345-8085)  for the form and we will fax or hand deliver it to them.  The 
form must  be signed by the appropriate HR personnel for the business unit 
(names to be provided to Mary McKendree by each business unit) and then 
returned to Mary McKendree.  The form will be initialed by someone in 
Executive Compensation (Mary McKendree, Mary Joyce, or Pam Butler) and 
delivered to you for generating drafts.  Please do not distribute a draft to 
anyone without a signed and initialed request form.

Also, as discussed, requests for signing bonuses, retention bonuses, up-front 
grants by number of options rather than value, and guaranteed LTI awards are 
exceptions to the rules that the business units will need to justify before 
they will be approved.  Please do not make changes to these items or add any 
provisions to the standard short form without contacting Executive 
Compensation.

These procedures have been implemented at the request of the Office of the 
Chairman.  Consistent application of compensation standards and attention to 
the One Enron goal are key to our success.

Please pass this memo on to others who are impacted by this implementation.  
Sheila, would you please ensure that all Compensation Staff receive this?

Twanda, would you please print for my review?  Thanks.  MHC

Kari Oquinn
05/04/2000 03:53 PM
Attached is a 12-Month Direct Compensation Profile document which we have 
asked Chris Tull to program (final programs need to be completed by 8/30/00).

Michelle:  We'd appreciate it if you will review the document and write the 
appropriate legal disclaimer that should be placed on the bottom of the 
document.

Chris:  The document includes the revisions we talked about.  Also, the 2nd 
page of the 1st worksheet includes all the add'l cash comp to include (by 
codes).

Pam:  This is the document Robert shared with you.  Do you foresee any 
problem with the data to be reflected in the document?

FYI.  Michelle
Michelle Cash
04/28/2000 10:51 AM
Felicia,

In general, you are correct that the salary basis test must be met before 
someone can be classified as exempt.  However, because there are certain 
exceptions to the salary basis test (for example, licensed attorneys do not 
have to meet that test), it depends on what the employees are doing as to 
whether this situation creates a problem under the FLSA.

My recommendation would be to obtain information about the jobs performed by 
these 29 employees so that we can determine whether there is an issue.  If 
they do not fit within one of the exceptions, we probably should have them 
affirmatively report time so that hours worked over 40 can be paid at the 
overtime rate. You would use the hourly rate they are paid to determine the 
overtime rate.  If they are not working over 40 hours in a week, it will not 
be an issue.

Let me know if you have questions.

Michelle

Felecia Acevedo@ENRON
04/27/2000 05:40 PM
Sharon and Michelle,

We have 29 employees in the payroll system that are part-time exempt 
employees and their pay is calculated on an hourly rate.  Unless I understand 
the FLSA incorrectly we cannot in any way calculate salaries on exempt 
employees on an hourly basis.  If they are reduced hours we would need to 
determine how we would value their job based on a salary basis otherwise we 
are treating them as hourly employees and not exempt employees.   An exempt 
employee should only be tracking exception time (i.e. sick, vacation, etc -- 
any off duty time) but not work hours during the day.   An exempt worker 
according the FLSA can only be paid on a fee basis or salary basis -- not on 
an hourly basis.  If I am off base let me know, otherwise I would like your 
help with how we should approach getting this corrected and possibly having 
this covered in a policy on how to deal with employees performing exempt jobs 
that are working part-time or reduced schedules. 

Look forward to hearing back from you.

Felecia

David, on point 2, that type of arrangement has to be approved by the Enron 
Executive Committee.  Let me know if you want a copy of the note describing 
that process, which was sent by Cindy Olson a few weeks ago.    Michelle

David Oxley
05/10/2000 07:27 PM
Spoke with him about his contract on Monday. We agreed following changes and 
he would sign;

1 - Should read Michael L Brown throughout
2 - He would us to have Mark F send him a note (separately) that says why we 
will rank him as a VP he can continue to use the MD title externally and 
maintain any related travel perq's associated with that.
3 - We should change cash sign-on to 12 months pay back.

 Can you get him final asap. Also Kim/Mel lets draft email for Mark F.

David

Sure, Twanda, would you please forward? Thanks!  Michelle

Don Iacobell@ENRON
12/06/2000 04:49 PM
Y'all:

Can we get them a standard Consulting Services Agreement?  If not, please 
give me a call so we can continue working with them.

Thanks!

Don Iacobell
53962
Don - We can't sign this agreement, it is strictly for retained search and we 
don't fall under that category. 
Do you have a Consulting Services agreement or a Professional Services 
agreement?? These are the categories we usually fall under.? Please get back 
to me as soon as possible so we can get the legal wrangling out of the way.

Thanks, 
Jocelyn Scott 
Senior Consultant 
TalentPoint, Inc. 
(610) 971-6423 

?<< File: 023Retainedsearchfirmservices.doc >> << File: 
023Retainedsearchfirmdata.doc >> << File: Enron - IT Staffing Project 
Proposal - November.doc >> 

Jocelyn: 

Our legal department came back with a contrac tof their own.? Let me know 
what you think of this so we can be ready to move forward when the time 
comes.? I'm thinking we can set up this contract and perhaps include the 
addendums from yours.? Let me know what you think. 

Don 

Twanda Sweet@ECT 
11/29/2000 06:48 PM 

Please fint the attached Retained Search Services Agreement. 

This is a merge document. 

(See attached file: 023Retainedsearchfirmservices.doc) 

(See attached file: 023Retainedsearchfirmdata.doc)Click on this data 
document if it asks you to find the data source. 

Twanda Sweet 
Twanda, please forward our standard Retained Search Agreement to Don and to 
Gary Buck.? Thanks.? Michelle 

Don Iacobell@ENRON 
11/21/2000 02:05 PM 

Michelle: 

Here's the TalentPoint contract I was speaking to you about. 

Don 
Attached you will find the finalized contract with Addendum.? Addendum "A" 
covers qualified candidate criteria, please have Jay Webb review and 
approve.? Addendum "B" covers performance milestones, or activity 
guarantees.? I have only set the milestones for the first four weeks, if 
you decide to move forward with this project I will make additions to the 
milestones as requested.? We are prepared to forward a minimum of 30 
qualified, interested candidates by December 18th, if we can start 
immediately (Monday, 11/20). 

I look forward to your response. 
Sincerely, 
Jocelyn Scott 
Senior Consultant 
TalentPoint, Inc. 
"Innovative Talent Acquisition Solutions" 
610-971-6423 - direct 
jocelyn.scott@TalentPoint.com 
?<<Enron - IT Staffing Project Proposal - November.doc>> 

(See attached file: Enron - IT Staffing Project Proposal - November.doc) 

We are in the process of promulgating a data protection policy.  It should be 
out  in the next few weeks.  It addresses all of those privacy, etc. issues.  
Let me know if you would like a copy of the draft policy.  MIchelle

   

This has been looked at by our HR IT department for many years as we have 
been transmitting data back and forth in our Compensation and HR systems.  I 
am copying Sherry Lessner who at one time lead the group dealing with this 
issue, as well as Sharon Butcher and Michelle Cash from our legal department.

Ladies, can you provide any additional information on what we are doing?  Do 
we need additional research in this area?

Thanks,

Jane

Stephen D Burns@ENRON
05/10/2000 07:29 PM
Jane:

I participated in a lunch yesterday on Capitol Hill which discussed the 
recently concluded bilateral negotiations between Europe and the US on the 
issue of data privacy/safe harbor.  I admit that I don't fully understand the 
issue, but in essence I'm told it's an internal EU directive passed a few 
years ago (not all countries within the EU have come into compliance yet, by 
the way) that has strict bearing on issues pertaining to the protection of 
the privacy of transmitted data (eg, over the internet).   The EU wants to 
forbid transmitting certain types of data to countries that don't "adequately 
protect" the information.  As always, the EU wants to regulate the issue, 
while the US prefers self-regulation.  After two years of negotations, they 
agreed a few weeks ago that data transmitted from the EU to the US could be 
put in "safe harbors", which are basically approved bodies that would check 
the recipient's ability to protect the privacy of the information, ie, an 
American company receiving privelaged data from its European affiliates or 
offices.  

How does this affect Enron?  A couple of other company reps said it is 
especially pertinent to HR issues, such as transmitting personnel 
information, salary, etc. from Europe back to the home office in the US.

Given our large presence in London and elsewhere in Europe, does this affect 
us, and do you want us to track down more information?

Regards,
Steve Burns

We should get it today;  I'll messenger it over when it arrives.  mhc

Thanks.  Also, where are we on the check for Malme?  Anne Marie inquired a
couple of days ago.

Kerry E Notestine
Littler Mendelson, PC
1900 Chevron Tower
1301 McKinney Street
Houston, Texas 77010
713.652.4748
713.951.9212 (fax)
knotestine@littler.com
www.littler.com

I'll look into it for you. Michelle

Michelle:

Enron has not paid us for the work we did for them related to the NJ law
issue.  The amount is $  8115.84.  Any thoughts about what we can do to
collect that amount?

Kerry E Notestine
Littler Mendelson, PC
1900 Chevron Tower
1301 McKinney Street
Houston, Texas 77010
713.652.4748
713.951.9212 (fax)
knotestine@littler.com
www.littler.com

----
This email may contain confidential and privileged material for the sole
use of the intended recipient(s). Any review, use, distribution or
disclosure by others is strictly prohibited. If you are not the intended
recipient (or authorized to receive for the recipient), please contact the
sender by reply email and delete all copies of this message.

To reply to our email administrator directly, send an email to
postmaster@littler.com

Littler Mendelson, P.C.
http://www.littler.com

----
This email may contain confidential and privileged material for the sole use 
of the intended recipient(s). Any review, use, distribution or disclosure by 
others is strictly prohibited. If you are not the intended recipient (or 
authorized to receive for the recipient), please contact the sender by reply 
email and delete all copies of this message.

To reply to our email administrator directly, send an email to
postmaster@littler.com

Littler Mendelson, P.C.
http://www.littler.com

FYI.  I have sent them a copy of the draft policy.  I think it will address 
their concerns.  Michelle
Sherry Lessner@ENRON
05/11/2000 08:53 AM
Jane, this issue continues to be 'worked' here at Enron.  In relation to a 
current initiative which includes a new employee directory, we are working 
with the business unit leaders (Cindy Olson, Steve Kean, Mark Palmer, Vision 
and Values Task Force) and Sharon Butcher, Kelly Higgason, and Brian 
Schaffer.  Michelle Cash and Sharon have been involved in several discussions 
relating to our global data collection efforts through HR-GIS.  We have a 
meeting scheduled next week and I will ask Sharon to include the information 
below in the discussion.  

In general, I understood Sharon and Kelly to indicated that research has been 
done for some locations and may have to be continuously updated.  Other Enron 
locations have not been researched and will have to be prioritized and 
evaluated for research, i.e., it was recommended that we focus our efforts on 
locations with the higher employee populations.

   
	
	

This has been looked at by our HR IT department for many years as we have 
been transmitting data back and forth in our Compensation and HR systems.  I 
am copying Sherry Lessner who at one time lead the group dealing with this 
issue, as well as Sharon Butcher and Michelle Cash from our legal department.

Ladies, can you provide any additional information on what we are doing?  Do 
we need additional research in this area?

Thanks,

Jane

Stephen D Burns@ENRON
05/10/2000 07:29 PM
Jane:

I participated in a lunch yesterday on Capitol Hill which discussed the 
recently concluded bilateral negotiations between Europe and the US on the 
issue of data privacy/safe harbor.  I admit that I don't fully understand the 
issue, but in essence I'm told it's an internal EU directive passed a few 
years ago (not all countries within the EU have come into compliance yet, by 
the way) that has strict bearing on issues pertaining to the protection of 
the privacy of transmitted data (eg, over the internet).   The EU wants to 
forbid transmitting certain types of data to countries that don't "adequately 
protect" the information.  As always, the EU wants to regulate the issue, 
while the US prefers self-regulation.  After two years of negotations, they 
agreed a few weeks ago that data transmitted from the EU to the US could be 
put in "safe harbors", which are basically approved bodies that would check 
the recipient's ability to protect the privacy of the information, ie, an 
American company receiving privelaged data from its European affiliates or 
offices.  

How does this affect Enron?  A couple of other company reps said it is 
especially pertinent to HR issues, such as transmitting personnel 
information, salary, etc. from Europe back to the home office in the US.

Given our large presence in London and elsewhere in Europe, does this affect 
us, and do you want us to track down more information?

Regards,
Steve Burns

Cindy,

FYI regarding the labor/employment lawyer for EBS -- according to Sharon, she 
was asked to be point person for EBS.  I'll let you know when I talk with 
Mark, which should be early next week upon his return from London.

Have a great weekend!  Is Chelsea giving you a mother's day gift?

Michelle

	Sharon Butcher@ENRON
	05/11/2000 07:33 PM
		
Dear Kriste:  I agree we need point persons.  I think you might have reversed 
the groups as Rex Rogers and Kristina Mordaunt asked me to be the point 
person for EBS.   I have been the point person for Corp. and Azurix.  It is 
my understanding that you are the point person for EES and Wind Corp.  I 
don't know the status with respect to GPG, EE&CC, APACHI, CALME, South 
America, and India.  During the past year, upon request, I have worked on 
employment agreements for all of these entities.  Thanks.  Sharon

Kriste Sullivan
05/11/2000 06:01 PM
Although we did not discuss it today in our meeting, I believe that Mary's 
group was looking for a point person for each operating company for the 
purpose of division of labor of the preparation of the executive employment 
agreements,  I recommended to Courtney today that  you  be the point person  
for Corp., Azurix, GPG and EE&CC.  I would like to be the point person for 
EES, EBS and Wind.  Of course,  as usual, we will continue to cover for each 
other and  work on what ever agreements come our way in order to get the 
agreements done.  I am sure that there are other operating companies that we 
should divide up but the big ones are noted above.  What do you think? 

Please print for me .  Thanks. MHC
	Pam Butler@ENRON
	04/24/2000 11:05 AM
		 
FYI.  Please give me a call.
 - 196052_2.doc

Linda, great job!!!!  I am happy with that result.  It makes things much 
easier.  Have a great weekend.  Michelle

	"Linda Broocks" <lbroocks@ogwb.com>
	05/12/2000 10:17 AM
	Please respond to lbroocks
		 
Dear Tom:
 The fully executed copy is on its way to you.  Thanks for all of your
cooperation in bringing this matter to a close.  I will file the dismissal
papers and will copy you on them.
Best regards,
Linda

I have no problem with a non-notarized signature if it meets with your
approval.

Thomas F. Fine
Assistant General Counsel
ET 10A-K
865-632-2061; 865-632-6718 (fax)
tffine@tva.gov

John,

Thanks for including me on the distribution of this -- I received your voice 
mail and was glad to be in the loop.

In general, we try to avoid any type of personality/psych testing because of 
issues relating to the Americans with Disabilities Act, which prohibits 
pre-employment medical testing.  It does apply to US citizens working for 
Enron in foreign locations (i.e. extraterritorially).  

Before we go forward and do this type of testing, it is useful to ascertain 
the purpose/goal of the tests.  Why do they want this information?  Is there 
another, less intrusive, way to obtain that information (e.g., references 
from prior employers, etc.)?  

As noted below, there may be Japanese labor/employment law issues that 
address this type of activity as well.  I suggest that we obtain the 
information above as well as the opinion requested below and then determine 
how to proceed.

Michelle

	John Viverito@ENRON
	05/11/2000 02:44 PM
		 
Michelle-

Pursuant to my voicemail, I am forwarding the attached e-mail traffic for 
your consideration.  I am unsure as to the types of testing contemplated, but 
want to ensure that such activities are permitted under Enron's policy.

Your comments on the attached agreement would also be appreciated.  

Thanks,

John
	Phillip -SYDNEY- Taylor@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	05/10/2000 05:13 PM
		 
Hi John

  Enron will be using PDI in Tokyo for candidate abilities testing prior to 
employment.  The outcome of the testing is a confidential report that comes 
to me (as HR) and I then send to the participant(s) in the recruitment 
decision making process for their confidential consumption.  PDI have agreed 
to me doing this via email, however are seeking some reassurance as to our 
use of and maintenance of confidentiality of the final product.  Can you 
review the attached and come back to me with your thoughts?  I would also 
appreciate a local (Japan) opinion on the legal issues associated with 
abilities/psych testing prior to employment (I know you guys shy away from it 
in the US although it is quite widely accepted "down under").

Thanks and regards

Phil   
Phil, 
With the e-mail transmission (using .pdf files), we'll need you or someone 
else in Enron to sign a document similar to the attached letter. Please read 
it and let me know if you want to make any changes before we fill in all the 
details.

Thanks very much, 
Douglas 
 
 - emailrelease.doc

Very good response!!!  It struck the right chord, I thought.  MHC

Twanda, we need executables.  Michelle

	Jennifer Jordan@ENRON
	05/15/2000 11:05 AM
		 
Michelle - Kim asked that I get this date to you for Larry Gagliardi.  His 
Form B sign date is 5/2/00.  If you have any questions please feel free to 
call.

Thank you,

Jennifer

Enclosed is another draft of the proposed Agreement and Release.  It has 
incorporated some, but not all, of your changes.  It is my hope that this 
draft is the final one; if it is not, I believe that it would be most 
efficient for you to meet with me and David Oxley before the end of this 
week, as I will be out of the office next week.  

Please let me or David know if you have any questions or comments.

Thanks.  I frequently pick up my first job after I complete my second shift 
at home.  That's why I got the nifty flat screen for my computer -- 
jealous??  Michelle

Michelle

What are you doing replying to emails at 12:00 on a school night?

I had not seen any of this before they sent it to you, other than him
telling me he was sending you the standard forms.  I am sure everything can
be worked out.  Let me talk to him and get back to you.

Kerry E Notestine
Littler Mendelson, PC
1900 Chevron Tower
1301 McKinney Street
Houston, Texas 77010
713.652.4748
713.951.9212 (fax)
knotestine@littler.com
www.littler.com

Kerry, is this necessary?  I don't agree to all the terms in here, and I
really don't want to spend a lot of time with ELT to negotiate the
agreement.  For example, the part where we will be billed for developmental
costs if we cancel within a certain period of time.  From my perspective,
that is inappropriate since I spent more time than ELT on developing this
product, and  you are simply delivering a product that you and I already
prepared and completed on several occasions across North America.  There
will be one new scripted section, but that should be from the actors, and
it should not be significant.  Also, there are not appropriate
confidentiality provisions, etc.  So, I would have to negotiate it with ELT
for it to be acceptable to us.

The last time, you just billed for time, and the actors billed separately.
I prefer that approach, if we can do it that way.  If I am being a major
prima donna and it creates a big problem for you internally, let me know,
and I can review it and comment back to ELT.

Thanks.  Michelle

 (Embedded     Marty Chrisman @ ENRON
 image moved   11/22/2000 02:48 PM
 to file:      (Embedded image moved to file:
 pic24464.pcx) pic05705.pcx)

Michele,
I can start working on the dates and location as soon as we have the "go
ahead."

Marty
Marty, here is a copy of the engagement letter.  The fees include the
actors
where as before they billed separately. Please try to have signed and
returned no later than the end of the month.  Please fax a copy to my
attention at 214-880-0181.  Then fax a copy to Gary Meisner at 415-982-1203
and finally mail the signed copy directly to our SF office:  ELT-Attn:
David Goldman
          650 California Street, Suite 2000
          San Francisco California 94108.

Thanks Marty. I will contact you next week to start working on the Computer
Based Programs.  Have a great weekend.

 <<Enron Engagement Letter.doc>>

Jim Staley
Account Executive
Employment Law Learning Technologies
Phone: (214) 880-8166
Fax: (214) 880-0181
jstaley@elt-inc.com
www.elt-inc.com

(See attached file: Enron Engagement Letter.doc)

----
This email may contain confidential and privileged material for the sole use 
of the intended recipient(s). Any review, use, distribution or disclosure by 
others is strictly prohibited. If you are not the intended recipient (or 
authorized to receive for the recipient), please contact the sender by reply 
email and delete all copies of this message.

To reply to our email administrator directly, send an email to
postmaster@littler.com

Littler Mendelson, P.C.
http://www.littler.com

Thank you!!  Michelle

FMackin@aol.com on 12/06/2000 05:17:24 PM
Michelle,

Attached is the document I sent you in Feb, 2000 regarding the waiver for
Oxley.

It is a single document and you don't have to unzip it.

Pat

 - Waiver Benefits1.doc

Trey, I want to go . . .  I wonder if that is possible.  Let's talk about 
it.  M

	Trey Cash@ENRON
	06/05/2000 12:14 PM
		 
Here is my itenerary for the Napa trip in a few weeks.

L, T
Lee DeLong <lee.delong@travelpark.com> on 06/05/2000 09:39:24 AM
                                                   SALES AGT: LD/YI8WV3

                                          EB 4612

  ENRON CORP

  DATE:  JUN 05 2000

SERVICE               DATE  FROM           TO             DEPART  ARRIVE

CONTINENTAL AIRLINES  18JUN HOUSTON        SAN F          0220P   0421P
CO 1262    B          SUN   G.BUSH INTERCO SAN FRANCISCO
                            TERMINAL C     TERMINAL S
                            SNACK                         NON STOP
                            RESERVATION CONFIRMED         4:01 DURATION
                  AIRCRAFT: BOEING 737-800
                            SEAT 26A NO SMOKING CONFIRMED CASH III/WARREN

CAR                   18JUN NATIONAL               SAN F
                      22JUN CONFIRMATION: 306614012COUNT
                            TELEPHONE: (650) 616-3000
                            FAX: 1-650-616-3016
                            INTERMED CAR AUTOMATIC AIR
                            RATE: USD40.25DY-UNL MI
                            RATE QUOTED
                            BASE RATE: *ZL*USD161.00 BR-4DY
                            PICK-UP: SAN FRANCISCO INTL ARPT, SAN FRANCI
                            DROP-OFF: SAN FRANCISCO INTL ARPT, SAN FRANC

CONTINENTAL AIRLINES  22JUN SAN F          HOUSTON        1200N   0559P
CO 1502    B          THU   SAN FRANCISCO  G.BUSH INTERCO
                            TERMINAL S     TERMINAL C
                            SNACK                         NON STOP
                            RESERVATION CONFIRMED         3:59 DURATION
                  AIRCRAFT: BOEING 757-200/300
                            SEAT 34A NO SMOKING CONFIRMED CASH III/WARREN

RESERVATION NUMBER(S)  CO/IFYPTP

CASH III/WARREN P(IDS0C0011R100027)

CO  FREQUENT FLYER COKE906736
INTL TVLRS: CARRY SOS WALLET CARD W/ENRONASSISTANCE INFO
CALL SOS: IN U.S 800 523-6586/INTL 215 245-4707 (COLLECT)

Kerry, this is the second of two messages.   Do you have any thoughts?  
Michelle

Michelle  - Can you review the following examples as well?  USO means 
unscheduled overtime, UPG means upgrade and the UO1 means Upgrade Overtime.
If I should be forwarding these to someone else, please let me know.

Thanks,
Diane

Diane Taylor
04/20/2000 06:00 PM
See answers below in blue.  Shawn - can you please review as well.  The first 
example is a tough one.

Ken Mueller
04/11/2000 10:31 AM

Diane,

Regarding Example 2 below - The employee's time sheet from ETA in question 
was Christopher Tracy for Period 1-16 thru 1-31.

Thanks, 

Ken
Jarrod Haughn
04/11/2000 10:00 AM
Diane,

I.  We need help with the following:

1) Employee works night shift  (12 SH2)
     Same employee is on an upgrade (12 UPG)
     Same employee works overtime

What would the overtime entry look like, and what would be the rate 
computation for the above employee?  

Assumptions:

A Rate $3949.57 $22.79/hour
B Rate $4234.00 $24.43/hour
SH2   $1/hr
UO1 $350  $   5.40/hour (I am assuming a 88 hour period)
UPG $350  $   2.19/hour (I am assuming a 88 hour period)

  W F S S

REG   12 12 12
SH2  N N N N
UPG  12 12 12 12 
USO  12
UO1  12  

It is my understanding that we would need to add the $48 ($1/hr) of shift pay 
to the regular rate of pay ($24.43/hr) to obtain his regular rate of pay 
($25.53).  His USO would then be paid at $457.74 (12 x 25.43 x 1.5).

The UO1 would be calculated at $64.80 (5.40x12).

Second example for this scenario:

A Rate $3949.57 $22.79/hour
B Rate $4234.00 $24.43/hour
SH2   $1/hr
UO1 $350  $   5.40/hour (I am assuming a 88 hour period)
UPG $350  $   2.19/hour (I am assuming a 88 hour period)

  W F S S

REG   12 12 12
SH2  N N N N 
UPG  12 12 
USO  12    2
UO1  12       

It is my understanding that we would need to add the $48 ($1/hr) of shift pay 
to the regular rate of pay ($24.43/hr) to obtain his regular rate of pay 
($25.53).  His USO would then be paid at $457.74 (12 x 25.43 x 1.5).

The UO1 would be calculated at $64.80 (5.40x12).

The USO would be calculated at $76.59 (25.53x1.5x2 hours)

2)  Employee works night shift
      Same employee works overtime

     Does the overtime rate take shift differential into account?

     We've got timesheets that show an employee who worked on a night shift 
for 12 hours.  This was the employee's off day.

     The code was 12 SH2 (for night shift)
                                   12 USO (for overtime)

      Are these time entries correct? Yes.  What would be the rate 
computation for the above employee?

The overtime would need to account for the shift differential.  For the week 
in question Jan 17-23 he has the following hours:

  W F S S

REG   12 12 12 
SH2  N N N N 
USO  12 
                                     
This ees salary is as follows:

A Rate $3949.57 $22.79/hour
B Rate $4234.00 $24.43/hour

It is my understanding that we would need to add the $48 ($1/hr) of shift pay 
to the regular rate of pay ($24.43/hr) to obtain his regular rate of pay 
($25.53).  His USO would then be paid at $457.74 (12 x 25.43 x 1.5).

Jarrod

David/Diane,

I am with you.  In fact, I sent these questions to outside counsel early this 
week because I simply have not had time to focus on them given everything 
else that is going on.  I expect an answer by early next week -- I hope 
Monday.  Sorry about not letting you know where this was . . . .

Michelle

	David O'Dell@ENRON
	06/09/2000 09:46 AM
		 
Michelle,

This is the second of 2 messages..   We have been trying to get a response on 
this since April, I understand you are very busy, as are we, is there someone 
you can assign to us to work on these issues?  Some type of response would be 
appreciated.

Thanks - David
David O'Dell
05/30/2000 07:26 AM

Michelle,

This is the second of 2 messages we are looking for your input on, can you 
advise when can we anticipate a response to Diane's questions?  At this point 
it is too late to make configuration changes for the 7/1 go-live but we 
wanted to get your feedback so that if we are not in compliance we can get 
the corrections on the schedule for post 7/1. 

Your assistance, as always,  is greatly appreciated.

Thanks - David

Diane Taylor
05/09/2000 08:10 AM
Michelle,

Here is another question we need resolved as well. 

Thanks for your assistance,
Diane
Diane Taylor
04/24/2000 04:29 PM
Michelle  - Can you review the following examples as well?  USO means 
unscheduled overtime, UPG means upgrade and the UO1 means Upgrade Overtime.
If I should be forwarding these to someone else, please let me know.

Thanks,
Diane

Diane Taylor
04/20/2000 06:00 PM
See answers below in blue.  Shawn - can you please review as well.  The first 
example is a tough one.

Ken Mueller
04/11/2000 10:31 AM

Diane,

Regarding Example 2 below - The employee's time sheet from ETA in question 
was Christopher Tracy for Period 1-16 thru 1-31.

Thanks, 

Ken
Jarrod Haughn
04/11/2000 10:00 AM
Diane,

I.  We need help with the following:

1) Employee works night shift  (12 SH2)
     Same employee is on an upgrade (12 UPG)
     Same employee works overtime

What would the overtime entry look like, and what would be the rate 
computation for the above employee?  

Assumptions:

A Rate $3949.57 $22.79/hour
B Rate $4234.00 $24.43/hour
SH2   $1/hr
UO1 $350  $   5.40/hour (I am assuming a 88 hour period)
UPG $350  $   2.19/hour (I am assuming a 88 hour period)

  W F S S

REG   12 12 12
SH2  N N N N
UPG  12 12 12 12 
USO  12
UO1  12  

It is my understanding that we would need to add the $48 ($1/hr) of shift pay 
to the regular rate of pay ($24.43/hr) to obtain his regular rate of pay 
($25.53).  His USO would then be paid at $457.74 (12 x 25.43 x 1.5).

The UO1 would be calculated at $64.80 (5.40x12).

Second example for this scenario:

A Rate $3949.57 $22.79/hour
B Rate $4234.00 $24.43/hour
SH2   $1/hr
UO1 $350  $   5.40/hour (I am assuming a 88 hour period)
UPG $350  $   2.19/hour (I am assuming a 88 hour period)

  W F S S

REG   12 12 12
SH2  N N N N 
UPG  12 12 
USO  12    2
UO1  12       

It is my understanding that we would need to add the $48 ($1/hr) of shift pay 
to the regular rate of pay ($24.43/hr) to obtain his regular rate of pay 
($25.53).  His USO would then be paid at $457.74 (12 x 25.43 x 1.5).

The UO1 would be calculated at $64.80 (5.40x12).

The USO would be calculated at $76.59 (25.53x1.5x2 hours)

2)  Employee works night shift
      Same employee works overtime

     Does the overtime rate take shift differential into account?

     We've got timesheets that show an employee who worked on a night shift 
for 12 hours.  This was the employee's off day.

     The code was 12 SH2 (for night shift)
                                   12 USO (for overtime)

      Are these time entries correct? Yes.  What would be the rate 
computation for the above employee?

The overtime would need to account for the shift differential.  For the week 
in question Jan 17-23 he has the following hours:

  W F S S

REG   12 12 12 
SH2  N N N N 
USO  12 
                                     
This ees salary is as follows:

A Rate $3949.57 $22.79/hour
B Rate $4234.00 $24.43/hour

It is my understanding that we would need to add the $48 ($1/hr) of shift pay 
to the regular rate of pay ($24.43/hr) to obtain his regular rate of pay 
($25.53).  His USO would then be paid at $457.74 (12 x 25.43 x 1.5).

Jarrod

Kim, Have you asked Brian to review it as well?  I think his input would be 
valuable.  Michelle

	Kimberly Rizzi
	06/09/2000 02:37 PM
		 
Bob/Michelle,

This is a memo that has been proposed to be given to the employees who are 
needs improvement to clarify their status and probabtionary situation.  Let 
me know if wording changes need to be made.

Thanks,
Kim

T:  Please print these for me.  Thanks.  MHC

	Bob Sparger@ENRON
	06/09/2000 04:05 PM
		 
Michelle:

FYI, per our conversation.  Wanted to set the agreement to do a project and 
the overall expectations.

Need to go back to each person since they were allowed to choose their 
project -- accepted is an inaccurate word.

Regards,

Bob
	
	

Walt:

Per our conversation this afternoon, you have accepted the PRC Historical 
Information and Historical Bonus Information as your project.  These are 
separate activity sets which are closely related.  We have "joined" these 
activity set due to commonality of the PRC and Bonus with Enron, and to 
ensure that you have an adequate workload for your project period.  

As part of this project initialization, you need to:

Determine the Objectives (set with Kathy Schultea, any other individual(s) 
she may indicate as being key to the processes at hand, and Bob Sparger)
List Activities/Tasks
Set Timelines with Key Dates
Set Deliverables and Targets
Establish Status Reporting

The primary focus is on the  PRC Historical Information set.  It is very 
important that you determine the data sources early on in your project to see 
how you might run all activities in parallel.  If this is not possible, you 
will need to communicate what the issues may be.

The first step is to schedule a meeting with Kathy Schultea, any other 
individual(s) she may indicate as being key to the processes at hand, and me 
to go through the list above and begin to setup the various components to 
meet the needs of the future staffing teams in the BUs. 

As part of our toolkit, Project Status Report sheets follow.

We need to setup the project status reporting ASAP. 

Upon completion of the project initialization steps, we will meet to discuss 
the performance evaluation process for your project.  Your evaluation will be 
based on several criteria related to the project and your individual 
performance.  Key items that are part of this process include:

Handling of the project initialization stage (includes project planning and 
setup);
Overall quality of the project deliverables (includes work products and 
documentation accuracy and clarity);
The quantity of the overall project work effort (based on volume of the 
effort targeted and completion);
Project management and communication (based on timeliness, accuracy, and 
communication);
Feedback from the project customer base (based on teaming, communication, 
responsiveness, and initiative); and
Other criteria (to be agreed, as appropriate).

The vehicle for evaluation will be the standard PEP form and criteria as used 
in the PRC process.  The items listed above are measurable against the 
specific skills/behaviors that Enron uses in performance evaluation.  
Following are the forms and criteria which will be used in the evaluation 
process.

If you have any questions or concerns, please call me at ext. 31858.

Regards,

Bob

Mr. Mackin, Michelle Cash has asked me to forward the language below to you 
for your comments.  Please review and email Michelle your comments to this 
paragraph.

Thanks
Twanda

Subject to the above, at a Committee meeting after this Agreement is signed, 
Employee shall receive a second grant of Enron Corp. Common Stock options 
with a value of $175,000.00 (the number of stock options shall be determined 
by the Committee, which will use the Enron-approved Black-Scholes valuation). 
The second grant is intended to reimburse Employee for value Employee lost 
upon leaving his prior job.  The vesting schedule for these options will be 
described in the grant agreement, which shall govern.

t:  please print this and the attachment.  Then, file under "Japan -- 
Pre-Employment Testing."   thanks!

	Phillip -SYDNEY- Taylor@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	05/15/2000 12:52 AM
		
Hi John

The battery of tests includes the following:

a. Global Personality Inventory (GPI) 
description: The GPI is a leadership personality inventory based on data 
collected and developed by a team of industrial/organizational psychologists 
from around the world. The GPI measures personality for the work context in 
general and for professional for the work context and contains 37 distinct 
scales that can be combined to form dimensions relevant to most job models. 
Japan norms: Japanese mid-level, front-line manager, and individual 
contributor norms available. 

b. Advanced Progressive Matrices (Ravens)  
description: This nonveral test is the same as that used by Enron Australia 
through Coyne-Didsbury/PDI, and correlates highly with other tests of problem 
solving capacity. Global PDI manager/executive norms available.

c. Leadership Inventory-plus 
description: a PDI-structured tool used in the selection of entry and 
mid-level managers, measuring those basic abilities, traits, values, 
interests, and motivations that are critical to effective leadership. The LI+ 
includes both personality and cognitive ability (i.e., numerical, analytical, 
and verbal reasoning) components. U.S. manager norms available.

The intention is to use the testing on local hires (not US nationals) to 
confirm/expand on information gained in the interviewing process.  Reference 
checking is a very poor substitute for interviews accompanied by some 
objective abilities testing against standard norms.  The important thing is 
that we don't use this information as a be all and end all test of whether we 
take on a candidate or not.  

The bottom line is in my professional opinion these tests are an important 
part of a high quality recruiting effort (and have been demonstrated as such 
in Australia on several occasions); unless there are significant legal 
impediments I want to proceed with them.

Thanks

Phil-

I have raised the issue of testing with Michelle Cash, an ENA labor lawyer, 
whose comments and queries are set forth below, for your review.  Please 
reply to Michelle's specific queries in paragraph 3 of her e-mail.

Paul-

Following your review of the attached e-mail traffic, please provide us with 
the Japanese legal perspective on undertaking these types of activities.  
Also, based on your experience, inform us as to how testing of this nature 
may be perceived in the Japanese market.

Best regards,

John
	Michelle Cash@ECT
	05/12/2000 10:59 AM
		
John,

Thanks for including me on the distribution of this -- I received your voice 
mail and was glad to be in the loop.

In general, we try to avoid any type of personality/psych testing because of 
issues relating to the Americans with Disabilities Act, which prohibits 
pre-employment medical testing.  It does apply to US citizens working for 
Enron in foreign locations (i.e. extraterritorially).  

Before we go forward and do this type of testing, it is useful to ascertain 
the purpose/goal of the tests.  Why do they want this information?  Is there 
another, less intrusive, way to obtain that information (e.g., references 
from prior employers, etc.)?  

As noted below, there may be Japanese labor/employment law issues that 
address this type of activity as well.  I suggest that we obtain the 
information above as well as the opinion requested below and then determine 
how to proceed.

Michelle

	John Viverito@ENRON
	05/11/2000 02:44 PM
		 
Michelle-

Pursuant to my voicemail, I am forwarding the attached e-mail traffic for 
your consideration.  I am unsure as to the types of testing contemplated, but 
want to ensure that such activities are permitted under Enron's policy.

Your comments on the attached agreement would also be appreciated.  

Thanks,

John
	Phillip -SYDNEY- Taylor@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	05/10/2000 05:13 PM
		 
Hi John

  Enron will be using PDI in Tokyo for candidate abilities testing prior to 
employment.  The outcome of the testing is a confidential report that comes 
to me (as HR) and I then send to the participant(s) in the recruitment 
decision making process for their confidential consumption.  PDI have agreed 
to me doing this via email, however are seeking some reassurance as to our 
use of and maintenance of confidentiality of the final product.  Can you 
review the attached and come back to me with your thoughts?  I would also 
appreciate a local (Japan) opinion on the legal issues associated with 
abilities/psych testing prior to employment (I know you guys shy away from it 
in the US although it is quite widely accepted "down under").

Thanks and regards

Phil   
Phil, 
With the e-mail transmission (using .pdf files), we'll need you or someone 
else in Enron to sign a document similar to the attached letter. Please read 
it and let me know if you want to make any changes before we fill in all the 
details.

Thanks very much, 
Douglas 
 
 - emailrelease.doc

T:  Please print and put in file "Japan -- PreEmployment Testing"  thanks.  
mhc
	John Viverito@ENRON
	05/15/2000 01:13 PM
		
Hi Phil-

The tests appear to be quite comprehensive and are likely to be useful.  Paul 
Davis, from Baker & McKenzie is currently looking into the Japanese legal 
issues and stated that he will be able to respond to us in a couple of days.  
Michelle Cash will be looking at your responses to her queries from the Enron 
perspective.

Best regards,

John

	Phillip -SYDNEY- Taylor@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	05/15/2000 12:52 AM
		
Hi John

The battery of tests includes the following:

a. Global Personality Inventory (GPI) 
description: The GPI is a leadership personality inventory based on data 
collected and developed by a team of industrial/organizational psychologists 
from around the world. The GPI measures personality for the work context in 
general and for professional for the work context and contains 37 distinct 
scales that can be combined to form dimensions relevant to most job models. 
Japan norms: Japanese mid-level, front-line manager, and individual 
contributor norms available. 

b. Advanced Progressive Matrices (Ravens)  
description: This nonveral test is the same as that used by Enron Australia 
through Coyne-Didsbury/PDI, and correlates highly with other tests of problem 
solving capacity. Global PDI manager/executive norms available.

c. Leadership Inventory-plus 
description: a PDI-structured tool used in the selection of entry and 
mid-level managers, measuring those basic abilities, traits, values, 
interests, and motivations that are critical to effective leadership. The LI+ 
includes both personality and cognitive ability (i.e., numerical, analytical, 
and verbal reasoning) components. U.S. manager norms available.

The intention is to use the testing on local hires (not US nationals) to 
confirm/expand on information gained in the interviewing process.  Reference 
checking is a very poor substitute for interviews accompanied by some 
objective abilities testing against standard norms.  The important thing is 
that we don't use this information as a be all and end all test of whether we 
take on a candidate or not.  

The bottom line is in my professional opinion these tests are an important 
part of a high quality recruiting effort (and have been demonstrated as such 
in Australia on several occasions); unless there are significant legal 
impediments I want to proceed with them.

Thanks

Phil-

I have raised the issue of testing with Michelle Cash, an ENA labor lawyer, 
whose comments and queries are set forth below, for your review.  Please 
reply to Michelle's specific queries in paragraph 3 of her e-mail.

Paul-

Following your review of the attached e-mail traffic, please provide us with 
the Japanese legal perspective on undertaking these types of activities.  
Also, based on your experience, inform us as to how testing of this nature 
may be perceived in the Japanese market.

Best regards,

John
	Michelle Cash@ECT
	05/12/2000 10:59 AM
		
John,

Thanks for including me on the distribution of this -- I received your voice 
mail and was glad to be in the loop.

In general, we try to avoid any type of personality/psych testing because of 
issues relating to the Americans with Disabilities Act, which prohibits 
pre-employment medical testing.  It does apply to US citizens working for 
Enron in foreign locations (i.e. extraterritorially).  

Before we go forward and do this type of testing, it is useful to ascertain 
the purpose/goal of the tests.  Why do they want this information?  Is there 
another, less intrusive, way to obtain that information (e.g., references 
from prior employers, etc.)?  

As noted below, there may be Japanese labor/employment law issues that 
address this type of activity as well.  I suggest that we obtain the 
information above as well as the opinion requested below and then determine 
how to proceed.

Michelle

	John Viverito@ENRON
	05/11/2000 02:44 PM
		 
Michelle-

Pursuant to my voicemail, I am forwarding the attached e-mail traffic for 
your consideration.  I am unsure as to the types of testing contemplated, but 
want to ensure that such activities are permitted under Enron's policy.

Your comments on the attached agreement would also be appreciated.  

Thanks,

John
	Phillip -SYDNEY- Taylor@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	05/10/2000 05:13 PM
		 
Hi John

  Enron will be using PDI in Tokyo for candidate abilities testing prior to 
employment.  The outcome of the testing is a confidential report that comes 
to me (as HR) and I then send to the participant(s) in the recruitment 
decision making process for their confidential consumption.  PDI have agreed 
to me doing this via email, however are seeking some reassurance as to our 
use of and maintenance of confidentiality of the final product.  Can you 
review the attached and come back to me with your thoughts?  I would also 
appreciate a local (Japan) opinion on the legal issues associated with 
abilities/psych testing prior to employment (I know you guys shy away from it 
in the US although it is quite widely accepted "down under").

Thanks and regards

Phil   
Phil, 
With the e-mail transmission (using .pdf files), we'll need you or someone 
else in Enron to sign a document similar to the attached letter. Please read 
it and let me know if you want to make any changes before we fill in all the 
details.

Thanks very much, 
Douglas 
 
 - emailrelease.doc

Kelly,  I am handling Mexico and Canada.  Thanks.  Michelle

	Kelly Noel Higgason@ENRON
	06/07/2000 02:21 PM
		 
Michelle:
 I got the answer to the voicemail message I left for you about which lawyer 
would be the contact for the Enron Europe countries for the new Enron 
employee stock option plan.  Jon Chapman will be responsible for Norway, 
Poland, Spain, Sweden and Turkey (and any other Enron Europe countries that 
are added between now and December).  I assume you are the appropriate lawyer 
for Mexico.  (If not, please forward this message to the right lawyer, and cc 
me so that I know who it is!)  Please read the message below for an 
explanation of the first action item (due June 23rd).  The Mexico spreadsheet 
is contained in the file marked "CALME AESOP" at the  end of Jana's message.  
Thanks for your help!

Kelly
	Kelly Noel Higgason
	06/07/2000 01:14 PM
		 
Jonathon:
 I was in a meeting this morning concerning the new Enron employee stock 
option plan that will be implemented at the end of this year, and Melissa 
Laing (who participated by telephone) informed me that you were the lawyer to 
support Enron Europe HR on this project.  I recently joined the Enron Corp. 
legal staff from Enron International legal.  My role in this project is to 
coordinate the international legal support for the new option plan.  As such, 
I have contacted lawyers in various international business units to work with 
local counsel in each of the countries in which Enron has employees who will 
participate in the plan, to ensure that the plan does not run afoul of any 
legal restrictions.  Based on current information (which is likely to change 
between now and December, per Melissa Laing), the relevant countries in the 
Enron Europe group are Norway, Poland, Spain, Sweden and Turkey.  In the 
attachment labeled "asiapac" at the end of Jana Domke's message, you will 
find spreadsheets for all five of the Enron Europe companies.  Please review 
(with local counsel, if necessary) the information in the "Legal Compliance" 
section of each spreadsheet to confirm that the information therein is 
accurate.  Please forward any changes or comments to me and Jana Domke (Jana 
has requested that the review be complete by June 23rd).  The Public 
Relations department is currently preparing the written material that will 
communicate the details of the plan to the participating employees.  When 
that is available, I will send it to you so that you may make any 
modifications that are necessary to comply with local laws in each of the 
Enron Europe countries.  The communication documents will be available in 
English, Spanish, Portuguese, German and Greek.  Please call me at 
713-853-5698 with any questions.  Thank you for your assistance!

Kelly
	Jana Domke
	06/02/2000 04:13 PM
		 
If you attended the recent AESOP meeting, you are aware that the approval for 
establishing an Enron AESOP 2000 Program was granted by the Executive 
Committee on April 6, 2000.  In most instances, the plan design replicates 
the prior Plan parameters.  However, on an international basis, there have 
been numerous regulatory and legislative changes which may impact this 
program.

Attached are individual Country Summary Highlights which consolidate the 
various accounting/tax/legal/banking/human resource, etc. details and issues 
into one document.  This consolidated document is based not only on 
information gleaned from the previous AESOP inplementation, but it also 
reflects the most recent local tax changes - at least based upon the 
information we have here.

Because successful Plan implementation and rollout is predicated upon solid 
information, understanding and interpretation, we need your assistance.  
Please coordinate review of the your appropriate country documents with your 
local financial, legal, tax and/or other professionals, as required.  We want 
to ensure that AESOP incents our employees and reinforces the "One ENRON" 
philosophy - but at the same time, we need to ensure this program is cost 
effective, tax efficient, legally defensible and culturally acceptable in 
your areas of responsibility. 

Please document any specific issues and/or concerns, and where appropriate, 
provide input on viable options, corrective action, etc.. Also, if you have 
plans to be in other foreign locations prior to AESOP implementation and they 
need to be included, please advise ASAP.  Please send your responses via 
e-mail to either Dung Huynh or myself or by fax to (713) 646-7203.  If you 
have questions or if you need to discuss further, please call me @ (713) 
345-6142.  Our timeline is tight so would appreciate your responses at the 
latest by June 23rd - earlier if possible.  

Once we have the input, we'll roll this information up into a revised Summary 
Document, identifying issues that need further assessment/discussion and move 
forward to coordiinate final resolution with the AESOP team members.

Appreciate your assistance!

Regards/Jana Domke & Dung Huynh

PS - I apologize ahead of time for not getting all the countries correctly 
sorted by region.  You may need to extrapolate your specific locations from 
one or more of the following attachments. 

Attachments 

                

Scott, would you be available in the next couple of weeks to meet with me and 
some of the HR reps regarding follow-up for employees who leave the company?  
I would like us to be proactive in those situations.  Let me know your 
availability.  Thanks.  Michelle x36401.

please calendar.  thanks.  mhc

Sarah Reyna@ENRON on 12/07/2000 08:44:33 AM
Please mark your calendar for the following meeting.

   When:    Friday, December 8th

   Where:   EB27C2

   Time:      10:00am -11:00am 

Thank you,

Sarah Reyna

   When:    Wednesday, December 6th

   Where:   EB27C2

   Time:      10:00am -11:00am 

Thank you,

Sarah Reyna

Please print this one  only!!!!!

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.
	Peter del Vecchio
	06/19/2000 02:53 PM
		 
Attached is the June 16 drafts of the Purchase Agreement.  The June 16 draft 
closely tracks the June 15th version which was used for internal review.

PdV
	"GEORGE T. LEE" <GTLEE@LLGM.COM>
	06/16/2000 04:36 PM
		 
Attached is the Purchase and Sale Agreement that we forwarded today to Media 
General.  Please call George Lee at 713-287-2066 if you have any difficulty 
opening the attached or call me at 713-287-2004 if you have any comments or 
questions.

Sincerely,
Benjamin G. Clark

This e-mail, including attachments, contains information that is confidential 
and it may be protected by the  attorney/client or other priviliges.  This 
e-mail, including attachments, constitutes non-public information intended to 
be conveyed only to the designated recipient(s).  If you are not an intentded 
recipient, please delete this e-mail, including attachments, and notify me by 
return mail, e-mail or at 713-287-2066.  The unauthorized use, dissemination, 
distribution or reproduction of this e-mail, including attachments is 
prohibited and may be unlawful.  George T. Lee, gtlee@llgm.com.
Date: Fri, 16 Jun 2000 17:30:35 -0400
Attached are revised drafts of the Purchase and Sale Agreement relating to 
Garden State Paper Company, Inc., one of which has been marked to show 
changes from the initial draft (6/07/00) distributed to you.  Pleae recognize 
that this draft is being distributed prior to the completion of Enron's due 
diligence review.  In particular, bracketed provisions merit furrther 
discussion and/or review.  Please contact us with your comments at 
713-287-2004 or 713-287-2066
Sincerely,

Benjamin G. Clark

This e-mail, including attachments, contains information that is confidential 
and it may be protected by the  attorney/client or other priviliges.  This 
e-mail, including attachments, constitutes non-public information intended to 
be conveyed only to the designated recipient(s).  If you are not an intentded 
recipient, please delete this e-mail, including attachments, and notify me by 
return mail, e-mail or at 713-287-2066.  The unauthorized use, dissemination, 
distribution or reproduction of this e-mail, including attachments is 
prohibited and may be unlawful.  George T. Lee, gtlee@llgm.com.

 - Purchase.DOC
 - Purchas1.DOC

Pat,

Given that the new AESOP has been approved by the comp. committee, do you 
think the language attached below should be revised?  (Or, should I ask -- 
has it been revised?).  If so, would it be possible for you to revise for 
inclusion in offer letters, etc.? 

Thanks a lot!

Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.
	Scott Gilchrist@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	06/20/2000 04:47 PM
		 
This is what we have -but it now seems dated. Do you have a more current 
version I could cut and paste into the Japan offer letter. Thanks
Catherine Huynh

06/20/2000 04:27 PM

All-Employee Stock Option Program
Enron Corp. has previously awarded stock options to full time and part-time 
regular employees in designated domestic and international locations through 
the All Employee Stock Option Program (AESOP).  Stock option grants were made 
under this program to eligible employees hired prior to January 1, 2000.  The 
grants represented value for the time period of 12/31/94 through 12/31/00 or 
a pro-rata portion if hired after 12/31/94.  A replacement program for beyond 
the year 2000 is under consideration and will likely be reviewed at the May, 
2000 Board meeting.  If approved, this could result in stock option award 
grants to eligible employees.  Program awards are subject to and effective 
upon the approval by the Compensation and Management Development Committee of 
the Enron Corp. Board of Directors.  Such stock awards shall be made pursuant 
to the appropriate Enron Corp. Stock Plan as determined by the Committee.  
The exercise price for grants of stock options shall be determined according 
to the provisions of the Stock Plan under which the award is granted.  This 
program may or may not be offered in certain domestic and international 
locations based upon management discretion and/or local labor and employment 
laws. 

Fran,

I am not sure that I ever had an executed document on the loans.  By copy of 
this email, I am asking Twanda to send you what she has that has been signed 
by Dosier.  I will let you fight the payment battles!

Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.
	Fran L Mayes
	06/20/2000 06:39 PM
		 
Michelle, I do not have a copy of the executed document.   Can you provide me 
with the amount due so that I can issue instructions - is this through A/P or 
payroll (with taxes withheld).

Fran

Hi Fran,

Wade Dosier is now in EBS and informed me that he has a forgiveable loan from 
ENA.  He asked me to make sure that the funds were being processed and that 
they were being paid by ENA.  Can you please confirm?  thanks

Pat, thanks for the revisions to the AESOP language.  I have another one for 
you.  The attached is a proposed retention program for persons in HR who may 
be facing outsourcing.  There is a need to incentivize these key personnel to 
stick around now and, if there is an outsourcing, to help with the 
transition.  Your comments/thoughts would be appreciated.  Thanks.  Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.
	Kimberly Rizzi
	06/21/2000 12:19 PM
		 
	

Michelle and Brian,

Please review the attached draft memo for distribution to employees to 
communicate the project completion program.  We would present each employee 
with an individualized memo showing their award amount and the terms.  The 
department head would be responsible for filling in the project term.  Let me 
know what changes need to be made to the memo before we use it.  They would 
like to communicate to their folks as soon as possible.

Also, please look over the revised presentation for the project completion 
incentive for the final time - no significant changes have been made.

Thanks,
Kim

Here, at last, is the email response to the OT questions.  I haven't had a 
chance to study it, but I am sending it "hot off the press"  upon receipt by 
me.  

Let's discuss if there are any problems. 

Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.
	"Thomson, Mary Lee" <MLThomson@LITTLER.com>
	06/21/2000 04:06 PM
		 
As we discussed on the telephone last week, the federal Fair Labor Standards
Act and Department of Labor regulations prescribe the calculation of the
regular rate of pay for overtime pay calculation.  Shift differentials and
other adjustments for working particular hours or on particular tasks are
included in the regular rate of pay.  If, as set forth in the e-mail
forwarded to me from Kerry, an employee is paid a shift differential for
night shift work, that differential becomes part of the regular rate of pay
for the night shift work.  If the same employee rotates between day and
night shifts, she/he will be working at two different rates of pay.  This is
acceptable but poses special issues for the calculation of overtime.

Federal law permits two methods of calculating overtime for employees who
work at two (or more) different regular rates of pay.  Employers may use
either a weighted average (29CFR 778.115) or a rate-in-effect (29CFR
778.419) calculation.

l. Weighted Average Calculation

This calculation involves add multiplying the number of hours worked in a
workweek at rate 1 times rate 1 and adding the sum to the number of hours
worked at rate 2 times the number of hours worked at rate 2.  The sum is
then divided by the total number of hours worked to obtain the weighted
average regular rate paid for each hour worked.  Overtime premiums of 1/2
the weighted average regular rate are then paid to bring the overtime rate
to 1.5 times the weighted average regular rate.   If, as in California,
double time rates apply, the premium would be one times the weighted average
regular rate.

Example:

Employee works four 8-hour day shifts at $10 per hour and two 8-hour night
shifts with a shift premium of $! per hour within the same workweek.

The weighted average calculation would be:

32 (hours) times 10 (dollars) plus 16 (hours) times 11 (dollars) = 496
(dollars)

496 (dollars) divided by 48 (hours) = $10.33 (the weighted average regular
rate)

1/2 of $10.33 = $5.17 (the additional overtime premium due for each overtime
hour worked).

The weekly pay for this employee would be:

$584.00 for straight time
$ 41.36 for overtime premium
or

$625.36 for the week.

2. Rate-in-effect
With this method, the overtime pay is calculated at the rate in effect at
the time the overtime is worked.

In the above example, if the last 8 hours of the week were worked on a day
shift, the overtime rate would be 1.5 x $10 or $15 and the employee would be
entitled to $120 in overtime pay.  If the last shift was worked on the night
shift, the overtime rate would be 1.5 x $11 or $16.50 and the employee would
be due $130 in overtime pay.

Please note: These are the federal standards.  State law must also be
considered, since the employee is entitled to the most favorable provision
is there is a conflict.  For example, California does not permit the use of
the rate-in-effect method; employees who work at different rates must be
paid on the weighted average overtime pay calculation.

I hope this is helpful.  Please do not hesitate to call if you questions or
need clarification.
Mary Lee Thomson
Sacramento, CA

----
This email may contain confidential and privileged material for the sole use 
of the intended recipient(s). Any review, use, distribution or disclosure by 
others is strictly prohibited. If you are not the intended recipient (or 
authorized to receive for the recipient), please contact the sender by reply 
email and delete all copies of this message.

To reply to our email administrator directly, send an email to
postmaster@littler.com

Littler Mendelson, P.C.
http://www.littler.com

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

	Michelle Hargrave
	06/23/2000 08:40 AM
		
Matthias - the executables were Fed-Ex'd to Lillian on June 6th.  We have 
just been waiting for Rich to sign them and return them!  Would you have any 
idea as to why he has not signed yet?? As for it being Eron Expat or Enron 
North America I will let Michelle Cash in our legal dept. respond to that.

Michelle - can you respond on whether or not it matters as to Enron Expat or 
Regards,
Michelle

Matthias Lee
06/22/2000 11:03 PM
Michelle / Kimberly

Please allow me to introduce myself - I am Legal Counsel for ECT Singapore. 

It has just been brought to my attention by our HR Specialist Lilian Low that 
the employment contract for our new trader Rich Slovensky has not been 
executed. You would appreciate that that gives us a slew of control, 
compliance and legal issues. Apart from confidentiality issues, Rich does not 
presently have authority to bind ECT Singapore in contracts.

Please let me have your very urgent advice whether we can expect Rich's 
employment contract to be in place immediately to regularise the situation or 
whether we have to implement measures to stop Rich's trading activity. 

Additionally, I noticed that the cover letter offering employment to Rich 
refers to employment with Enron Expat Services but the employment contract 
states that ENA is the employer. Please clarify or rectify as appropriate.

Regards
Matt Lee

Tara, It is ok for Mark to sign this in lieu of David.  Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

	Tara Rozen
	06/23/2000 05:25 AM
		 
Michelle 

Again, not sure about these new procedures! 

The signing authority at the back of Mark's agreement says David Oxley. We 
have always had a member of Office of the Chair in London sign these, ie 
Frevert, Sherriff and I was hoping Mark Frevert's signature would do in this 
case as well.

Please confirm, thanks
Tara

Kriste, which business unit would have handled this?  I would need to confirm 
with them on it.  I have no problem with the dollar amount.  

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

	Kriste Sullivan@ENRON
	06/23/2000 02:42 PM
		 
Please note the counter settlement offer set forth in the email below by our 
local counsel in the Gignilliat Charge of Discrimination matter.

I recommend that we settle the matter for $7,500 or a little less if we can 
get there.

I think it is your Company's money so I will defer to you on this one. 

Please advise.

Kriste K. Sullivan
Enron Corp. Legal
EB 4861
Ext. 37557
	"Suppa, Suzanne M." <SuppaSM@bingham.com>
	06/23/2000 01:43 PM
		 
Hi Kriste,
As we discussed, I offered Gignilliat a $5,000 nuisance value settlement.
Gignilliant's counsel, after consulting with his client, said he would take
$7,500 to settle the case.  While I think Enron has a very strong defense to
the disability claim, I am less certain about the aiding and abetting claim.
As we discussed, the Mass. Commission Against Discrimination allowed
Gignilliat to amend his charge to add this claim.  Gignilliat may be able to
create enough of a fact contest about what the plant manager (Dennis
Sherrin) told ANP  about his disability to at least get past the probable
cause stage.  While I still think that in the end, Enron has a very good
chance of prevailing on the aiding and abetting claim, $7,500 is a good,
final resolution to avoid further litigation.  Let me know what you think.
Thanks,

Suzanne M. Suppa
Bingham Dana LLP
150 Federal Street
Boston, MA 02110
(617) 951-8976

Scott, here is new language for the inclusion in the Japan agreement.   It 
still is long, but it is more current.  Let me know if you need any thing 
else at this time.  Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.
	FMackin@aol.com
	06/21/2000 10:55 AM
		 
Michelle,

The new program still needs final approval by the Enron Corp. board of
directors.  The design was tentatively approved last month, subject to final
review.  The following revised provision should serve you well in the
meantime:

All-Employee Stock Option Program

Enron Corp. has previously awarded stock options to full time and part-time
regular employees in designated domestic and international locations through
the All Employee Stock Option Program (AESOP).  Stock option grants were made
under this program to eligible employees hired prior to January 1, 2000.  The
grants represented value for the time period of 12/31/94 through 12/31/00 or
a pro-rata portion if hired after 12/31/94.  Subject to final approval by the
Enron Corp. board of directors, a one time award of non-qualified stock
options under a replacement program is proposed to be made to eligible
employees as of December 29, 2000, in value equal to 25% of annual base
salary (5% of annual base salary for a 5-year period; salary valuation and
value may vary in some international locations).  Program awards are subject
to and effective upon the approval by the Compensation and Management
Development Committee of the Enron Corp. Board of Directors.  Such stock
awards will be made pursuant to the appropriate Enron Corp. Stock Plan as
determined by the Committee.  The exercise price for grants of stock options
will be determined according to the provisions of the Stock Plan under which
the award is granted.  The program may or may not be offered in certain
domestic and international locations based upon management discretion and/or
local labor and employment laws.

Enclosed is new language for offer letters regarding the AESOP.  

Let me know if you have any questions.

Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.
	FMackin@aol.com
	06/21/2000 10:55 AM
		 
Michelle,

The new program still needs final approval by the Enron Corp. board of
directors.  The design was tentatively approved last month, subject to final
review.  The following revised provision should serve you well in the
meantime:

All-Employee Stock Option Program

Enron Corp. has previously awarded stock options to full time and part-time
regular employees in designated domestic and international locations through
the All Employee Stock Option Program (AESOP).  Stock option grants were made
under this program to eligible employees hired prior to January 1, 2000.  The
grants represented value for the time period of 12/31/94 through 12/31/00 or
a pro-rata portion if hired after 12/31/94.  Subject to final approval by the
Enron Corp. board of directors, a one time award of non-qualified stock
options under a replacement program is proposed to be made to eligible
employees as of December 29, 2000, in value equal to 25% of annual base
salary (5% of annual base salary for a 5-year period; salary valuation and
value may vary in some international locations).  Program awards are subject
to and effective upon the approval by the Compensation and Management
Development Committee of the Enron Corp. Board of Directors.  Such stock
awards will be made pursuant to the appropriate Enron Corp. Stock Plan as
determined by the Committee.  The exercise price for grants of stock options
will be determined according to the provisions of the Stock Plan under which
the award is granted.  The program may or may not be offered in certain
domestic and international locations based upon management discretion and/or
local labor and employment laws.

Sure, you could ask.  I think that Kriste's draft was prepared before my 
draft, which I sent to Rosen in executable form.  Britt, by copy of this 
email, I'll ask Twanda to send you the copies from my file here.

Thanks for the update.

Michelle

Dorie and Michelle,

This will confirm my telephone conferences with Dorie this morning.  Again, I 
was able to contact Rodney Tow, and Tow reported to me that he spoke with Joe 
Walker of TMAC this morning and told him that Enron did not want him at the 
party.  Tow will follow that up with a note to Walker.

I believe Walker's confusion was created by Diane Neilsen.  Before he called 
Walker, Tow read to me a telefax that Neilsen had sent to Walker after 
hearing from Tow that we did not want Walker at the party.  The fax simply 
said that Enron did not want any type of religious orientation in the show, 
but never said that Enron didn't want him at the party.

I also asked Walker how he was doing on getting our security in place.  Tow, 
who had just walked into the office when I called, said that he was working 
on it, that he had just received a letter from Neilsen regarding it (which he 
apparently had not read), and that he had to let me go because he had clients 
on the line.

On another note:  I received a copy of a transmittal memorandum from Kriste 
Sullivan to Mike Rosen, which attaches an unexecuted copy of a confidential 
draft of the Master Consulting Services Agreement between Enron Corp. and 
Event Resources Inc. in this matter.  Kriste says in the memo that her 
records do not indicate that execution copies were prepared.

The signature blanks are for Mark Palmer of Corp. and Ken Price of ERI (who 
has left).  I was going to try to interview Price anyway regarding such 
things as where ERI kept its money, whether he believed that when he signed 
the Hilton agreement he was signing as an agent, and other matters.  I can 
also ask him if he ever signed any master agreement with Enron.  What do you 
think?

Britt

Kerry, I think I sent a letter and a check for partial payment last week.  
Let me know if you don't get it in the next few days.  Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

	"Notestine, Kerry" <KNotestine@littler.com>
	06/25/2000 12:10 PM
		 
Michelle:

Remember the issue with the second opinion on antitrust that we had on the
Pittsburg California matter?  We have about a $10,000 bill that we paid to
the other law firm that did the opinion.  You indicated that you had known
about the opinion, but expected something much less expensive.  Of course,
we also sent you the bill several months after the matter concluded.  Any
indication if Enron will pay any part of that bill?  If not, let me know, so
that I can write it off and you will not continue to get reminder notices.
Thanks.

Kerry E Notestine
Littler Mendelson, PC
1900 Chevron Tower
1301 McKinney Street
Houston, Texas 77010
713.652.4748
713.951.9212 (fax)
knotestine@littler.com
www.littler.com

----
This email may contain confidential and privileged material for the sole use 
of the intended recipient(s). Any review, use, distribution or disclosure by 
others is strictly prohibited. If you are not the intended recipient (or 
authorized to receive for the recipient), please contact the sender by reply 
email and delete all copies of this message.

To reply to our email administrator directly, send an email to
postmaster@littler.com

Littler Mendelson, P.C.
http://www.littler.com

Tara,

We can make the salary retroactive as part of the contract.  Have we already 
sent you executables?  If so, we can re-run with a provision that states, 
"Effective 3/1/00, Employee's Monthly Base Salary shall be $xxxx."  The 
effective date still can be 6/1.

Twanda, would you please make that change and run executables?

Thanks.

Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

	Tara Rozen
	06/26/2000 12:33 PM
		 
Michelle/Twanda

On the nomination form for Mark Schroeder's agreement, it requests to 
backdate the salary to March 1st, even though the effective date of the 
agreement is not until June 1st. Can this be incorporated into the agreement 
or do we need to do a side letter to Mark?

Thanks
Tara

T:  Please print and file in Japan file.  Thanks.  MHC

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.
	John Viverito@ENRON
	05/12/2000 11:28 AM
		
Michelle-

Thank you for your input.  In a separate e-mail, I will attempt to obtain 
responses to the queries raised.

Best regards,

John

	Michelle Cash@ECT
	05/12/2000 10:59 AM
		
John,

Thanks for including me on the distribution of this -- I received your voice 
mail and was glad to be in the loop.

In general, we try to avoid any type of personality/psych testing because of 
issues relating to the Americans with Disabilities Act, which prohibits 
pre-employment medical testing.  It does apply to US citizens working for 
Enron in foreign locations (i.e. extraterritorially).  

Before we go forward and do this type of testing, it is useful to ascertain 
the purpose/goal of the tests.  Why do they want this information?  Is there 
another, less intrusive, way to obtain that information (e.g., references 
from prior employers, etc.)?  

As noted below, there may be Japanese labor/employment law issues that 
address this type of activity as well.  I suggest that we obtain the 
information above as well as the opinion requested below and then determine 
how to proceed.

Michelle

	John Viverito@ENRON
	05/11/2000 02:44 PM
		 
Michelle-

Pursuant to my voicemail, I am forwarding the attached e-mail traffic for 
your consideration.  I am unsure as to the types of testing contemplated, but 
want to ensure that such activities are permitted under Enron's policy.

Your comments on the attached agreement would also be appreciated.  

Thanks,

John
	Phillip -SYDNEY- Taylor@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	05/10/2000 05:13 PM
		 
Hi John

  Enron will be using PDI in Tokyo for candidate abilities testing prior to 
employment.  The outcome of the testing is a confidential report that comes 
to me (as HR) and I then send to the participant(s) in the recruitment 
decision making process for their confidential consumption.  PDI have agreed 
to me doing this via email, however are seeking some reassurance as to our 
use of and maintenance of confidentiality of the final product.  Can you 
review the attached and come back to me with your thoughts?  I would also 
appreciate a local (Japan) opinion on the legal issues associated with 
abilities/psych testing prior to employment (I know you guys shy away from it 
in the US although it is quite widely accepted "down under").

Thanks and regards

Phil   
Phil, 
With the e-mail transmission (using .pdf files), we'll need you or someone 
else in Enron to sign a document similar to the attached letter. Please read 
it and let me know if you want to make any changes before we fill in all the 
details.

Thanks very much, 
Douglas 
 
 - emailrelease.doc

Twanda, please print this and file in Japan file.  Thanks a lot.  MHC

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.
	Paul.TYO.Davis@BakerNet.com
	05/19/2000 11:53 PM
		 
John

This note is to confirm our recent telephone conversation.

There are no rules restricting the use of such testing in Japan and it is
becoming more common.

However, it is still likely to viewed askance by potential employees above a
certain level, e.g. those being hired as director, or because of their 
standing
in the business community.  This is probably the same as for similar level
employees in other countries.

Regards

Paul Davis/Hideo Ohta

John

Our team does not know the answer off hand but we will check and come back in 
a
couple of days.

Regards

Paul Davis

Phil-

I have raised the issue of testing with Michelle Cash, an ENA labor lawyer,
whose comments and queries are set forth below, for your review.  Please
reply to Michelle's specific queries in paragraph 3 of her e-mail.

Paul-

Following your review of the attached e-mail traffic, please provide us
with the Japanese legal perspective on undertaking these types of
activities.  Also, based on your experience, inform us as to how testing of
this nature may be perceived in the Japanese market.

Best regards,

John
                    Michelle
John,

Thanks for including me on the distribution of this -- I received your
voice mail and was glad to be in the loop.

In general, we try to avoid any type of personality/psych testing because
of issues relating to the Americans with Disabilities Act, which prohibits
pre-employment medical testing.  It does apply to US citizens working for
Enron in foreign locations (i.e. extraterritorially).

Before we go forward and do this type of testing, it is useful to ascertain
the purpose/goal of the tests.  Why do they want this information?  Is
there another, less intrusive, way to obtain that information (e.g.,
references from prior employers, etc.)?

As noted below, there may be Japanese labor/employment law issues that
address this type of activity as well.  I suggest that we obtain the
information above as well as the opinion requested below and then determine
how to proceed.

Michelle

                    John
Michelle-

Pursuant to my voicemail, I am forwarding the attached e-mail traffic for
your consideration.  I am unsure as to the types of testing contemplated,
but want to ensure that such activities are permitted under Enron's policy.

Your comments on the attached agreement would also be appreciated.

Thanks,

John
                    Phillip
                    05/10/2000
                    05:13 PM

Hi John

  Enron will be using PDI in Tokyo for candidate abilities testing prior to
employment.  The outcome of the testing is a confidential report that comes
to me (as HR) and I then send to the participant(s) in the recruitment
decision making process for their confidential consumption.  PDI have
agreed to me doing this via email, however are seeking some reassurance as
to our use of and maintenance of confidentiality of the final product.  Can
you review the attached and come back to me with your thoughts?  I would
also appreciate a local (Japan) opinion on the legal issues associated with
abilities/psych testing prior to employment (I know you guys shy away from
it in the US although it is quite widely accepted "down under").

Thanks and regards

Phil
Phil,
With the e-mail transmission (using .pdf files), we'll need you or someone
else in Enron to sign a document similar to the attached letter. Please
read it and let me know if you want to make any changes before we fill in
all the details.

Thanks very much,
Douglas

(See attached file: emailrelease.doc)

Twanda, please print and file Japan file.  Thanks.  MHC

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.
	Scott Gilchrist@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	06/08/2000 09:44 AM
		 
Please see first part
Nigel Sellens@ECT
06/08/2000 07:13 AM
Terms and Conditions

Clause 6.  I raised the issue of a reasonableness test regarding place of 
work and whether we should include some wording.  I was advised that it was 
not required as it is implicit.

Clause 7.  They will include a no obligation to award an increase sentence.

Options, bonus and sign-on wording will be the ENE wording.

Clause 8. I asked to have wording made clear that it was ".. otherwise as 
required by the Company..."

Clause 9.  This will only apply to more senior levels.  The para will be 
omitted where overtime is relevant and this will be covered under work rules 
and be the statutory amounts.

Clause 10.  We agreed to go flat rate for holidays although we did discuss a 
two level approach as 20 days is generous for non managerial staff who will 
not use it all anyway.  You and I need to agree on this.

Clause 13.  I was right, it does read that we can only terminate for just 
cause and even then it is difficult to prove (there is a case that states 
that mere incompetence does not constitute Just Cause).  The definition 
examples are those recommended by the Lawyers although they are going to take 
up with them a couple of my suggestions to get their view.  Again I will talk 
you through this.  As far as employees giving notice, the statutory limit is 
2 weeks so the period in the contract is a moral agreement only, although 
this is taken more eriously in Japan than elsewhere.  We also discussed the 
exec agreement concept which they think will not work but are reviewing the 
wording with their lawyers.

Clause 19.  Although in the template, they would recommend including it as 
part of the normal terms and conditions so we need to wait for their comments 
on the exec agreement.

They are revising template for tomorrow morning.

Work Rules

Fairly standard and not required initially.  They are working on a draft for 
us to review and comment on.

Benefits including Pension

They agree with our selection of benefits although they recommend a lump sum 
allowance type all employee pension plan which is  a book reserve which pays 
out on termination based on salary and length of service.  This is very 
common and supplements the Government pension scheme.  This would in in 
addition to SRAP and they are sending me more details.

Issues

Corporate/Employment Filings.  They mentioned that there are a number of 
filing requirements that need to be done to get businesses underway.  Do we 
know what we have doen to date on this front?

Options.  Although these schemes are common there is a lot of legal prep work 
involved so I intend to see if Enron Corp HR has started this with Japn, if 
not I will get it rolling.

Expat Contracts.  They would like to review our expat contract terms, can you 
provide these or do I have them?

I will call you to discuss.  Ihave another conference call with them tomorrow 
morning.

Hello, all.  Please wait on including this language in the offer letters 
until we hear further on this issue.  Thanks a lot!  Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

	Sharon Butcher@ENRON
	06/26/2000 06:57 PM
		
Hello everyone:  Please make sure that Rex Rogers has reviewed and approved 
the language so as to avoid any SEC issues.  Thanks.  Sharon

Michelle Cash @ ECT   06/23/2000 05:16 PM

Enclosed is new language for offer letters regarding the AESOP.  

Let me know if you have any questions.

Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.
	FMackin@aol.com
	06/21/2000 10:55 AM
		 
Michelle,

The new program still needs final approval by the Enron Corp. board of
directors.  The design was tentatively approved last month, subject to final
review.  The following revised provision should serve you well in the
meantime:

All-Employee Stock Option Program

Enron Corp. has previously awarded stock options to full time and part-time
regular employees in designated domestic and international locations through
the All Employee Stock Option Program (AESOP).  Stock option grants were made
under this program to eligible employees hired prior to January 1, 2000.  The
grants represented value for the time period of 12/31/94 through 12/31/00 or
a pro-rata portion if hired after 12/31/94.  Subject to final approval by the
Enron Corp. board of directors, a one time award of non-qualified stock
options under a replacement program is proposed to be made to eligible
employees as of December 29, 2000, in value equal to 25% of annual base
salary (5% of annual base salary for a 5-year period; salary valuation and
value may vary in some international locations).  Program awards are subject
to and effective upon the approval by the Compensation and Management
Development Committee of the Enron Corp. Board of Directors.  Such stock
awards will be made pursuant to the appropriate Enron Corp. Stock Plan as
determined by the Committee.  The exercise price for grants of stock options
will be determined according to the provisions of the Stock Plan under which
the award is granted.  The program may or may not be offered in certain
domestic and international locations based upon management discretion and/or
local labor and employment laws.

Twanda, please print for my review.  Thanks.  Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.
	Teresa G Bushman
	06/27/2000 09:50 AM
		 
Teresa G. Bushman
	"Tipton, Rell" <rtipton@velaw.com>
	Sent by: "Cortinas, Birdie" <ecortinas@velaw.com>
	06/26/2000 07:19 PM
		 
Attached is the initial draft of the Principal Agreement which is subject to
the approval and further comment of the Enron representatives.

Birdie Cortinas
Secretary to Rell Tipton
Phone:  713-758-2753
E-Mail:  ecortinas@velaw.com

 - Houston_254195_1.DOC

Privileged and Confidential -- Advice Covered by the Attorney-Client Privilege

K2: 

I have copied this email to Sharon & Kriste, who are supporting the CALME 
region.  My recommendation is to exclude contractors/consultants because 
their inclusion would increase the risk that they would be deemed to be 
employees, and that a court could determine that they are owed employee 
compensation and benefits (a la Microsoft).  This exposure could be high.  
Depending on the other indicators of independent contractor status, rating 
them along side our employees could be a factor to tilt the balance.

Let me know if you have any questions.

Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

	Kathryn McLean
	06/27/2000 10:01 AM
		 
Hi Michelle, 

Please see my note below regarding including JV employees and Consultants in 
our PEP system and the PRC. Could you please give us more expert legal advice 
(from my own : - )!!) in relation to this? We want to ensure that we cover 
ourselves.

Thanks, K2.
	Kathryn McLean
	06/26/2000 09:12 AM
	
	

David, 

I've been forwarded a voicemail on Friday from David Haug where he has 
requested that we include CALME's JV employees and Consultants who are at the 
VP level. (He knows that they should not be pulled into the VP meeting).  
Monica and I initially pushed back on this due to the requirement that only 
AIP employees are involved in our mid year process, however, due to David's 
instance I'm reverting to you for a decision. 

Although I do not have a strong opinion on including the JV's - my concern is 
primarily with the Consultants.

Below are my concerns in accommodating this request:-

- The PEP system has officially told employees that the feedback stage has 
finished. Although the system is still open we are going to turn off the 
system message requesting reviewers to access PEP to review employee.  In 
this instance, there would need to be an effort within Janie's team to 
communicate to all reviewers of the JV's that they are required to give 
feedback.

- The way PEP is set up, we would need to load the consultants as employees 
in order to generate the 360 feedback functionality. Due to US law on how to 
describe employees/non employees in a database, this comes with legality 
issues and I want us to be aware of what we're doing regarding this.

Call me to discuss or if you wish for me to forward the voicemail, 

K2

Matt, 

Thanks for your email.  I believe that there is an agreement in place between 
ENA and Enron Expat Services.  In general, the contract is between ENA and 
the employee, if the person is an expat.  The assignment letter covers the 
employee's transfer to Expat Services.  We haven't usually amended/assigned 
the agreement over to Expat Services, because the payroll/benefits, etc. are 
through ENA. 

If there are changes to his ENA agreement, it is very easy for me to do them, 
and I am happy to handle it.

If Mr. Slovenski is a VP level or above employee (I simply cannot remember 
right now), then Executive Compensation needs to be involved.

I hope this answers your questions.  I have copied Sharon Butcher on this 
email because she has been involved with assignments/expats for several 
years.  If you have further questions, please reply to both of us so that we 
can be aware of questions.

Thanks a lot.

Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

	Matthias Lee
	06/27/2000 03:48 AM
		
Michelle

Subject to any views Michelle Cash has, I would be happy to assist by 
drafting the agreed amendments to the Rich's Contract. I understand from 
Lilian that changes would only be to the Annex and would not affect the main 
body of the Contract. I can work with Lilian on this once she is able to 
finalise the agreed amendments with John Nowlan. 

I note your advice that ENA is the correct employing entity and the intended 
arrangement is a secondment from Enron Expat Services to ENA.  However, your 
suggestion for a clause in the Contract to reference the secondment would not 
be sufficient to put the arrangement in place. Rather, there should be an 
agreement between Enron Expat Services and ENA. I believe such an agreement 
is likely to be in place as Rich is not the first expat here in Singapore 
from ENA - John Chismar and John Thomas who are here precede him. 

Because I do not have the background to the relevant inter-company 
arrangement between ENA and Enron Expat Services, I would suggest  you 
discuss with Michelle Cash on to clarify this issue, and perhaps make the 
necessary amendments to the letter of offer which presently provides that 
Enron Expat Services is the employer and that Rich will be expected to 
provide services for ENA, instead of secondment from ENA to Enron Expat 
Services

Regards
Matt

Michelle Hargrave

06/26/2000 09:40 PM

Lillian,

We were discussing this with our International HR Rep and we feel that since 
the offer letter indicates Enron Expat Services as the employe, the 
employment agreement should reflect employment by ENA and we need to add a 
clause secunding Mr. Slovinski to Enron Expat Service.  PLEASE have Matthias 
make the amendments so we can get this in place as soon as possible.  I am 
sure that as long as Legal in Singapore makes the necessary changes it will 
be fine.  The important thing is to get Rich to sign the contract!

You did receive the employment agreements we fed-ex'd you on June 6th didn't 
you?  Make the necessary changes and send a copy to us.

This was our first Expat and it has been a real learning experience.

Regards,
Michelle

Lilian Low
06/23/2000 09:18 PM
Michelle,

Per my email to you and Kim (copied John Nowlan and John Chismar) dated 22 
June, there were some amendments to his package which was only approved that 
day.  I do not have the soft copy of the executables to make the changes nor 
am I sure if I m allowed to make amendments to them without legal reviewing 
them.

Since Legal Singapore is aware of the situation, and if it is agreeable, we 
can make amendments to the existing hard copies and have Matthias review 
them.  This should expedite this.  However, we still need to know who would 
be the employers of Rich - ENA or Expat services.

Lilian

Michelle Hargrave

23/06/2000 21:40

Matthias - the executables were Fed-Ex'd to Lillian on June 6th.  We have 
just been waiting for Rich to sign them and return them!  Would you have any 
idea as to why he has not signed yet?? As for it being Eron Expat or Enron 
North America I will let Michelle Cash in our legal dept. respond to that.

Michelle - can you respond on whether or not it matters as to Enron Expat or 
Regards,
Michelle

Matthias Lee
06/22/2000 11:03 PM
Michelle / Kimberly

Please allow me to introduce myself - I am Legal Counsel for ECT Singapore. 

It has just been brought to my attention by our HR Specialist Lilian Low that 
the employment contract for our new trader Rich Slovensky has not been 
executed. You would appreciate that that gives us a slew of control, 
compliance and legal issues. Apart from confidentiality issues, Rich does not 
presently have authority to bind ECT Singapore in contracts.

Please let me have your very urgent advice whether we can expect Rich's 
employment contract to be in place immediately to regularise the situation or 
whether we have to implement measures to stop Rich's trading activity. 

Additionally, I noticed that the cover letter offering employment to Rich 
refers to employment with Enron Expat Services but the employment contract 
states that ENA is the employer. Please clarify or rectify as appropriate.

Regards
Matt Lee

Here is another opinion to support my earlier thoughts.  Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.
	Sharon Butcher@ENRON
	06/27/2000 08:23 PM
		
Dear Michelle:  I agree with you and Kriste.  I thought we put this issue to 
bed several years ago.  Consultants and Contractors are to be reviewed, if at 
all, by their respective employers.  If the Consultant and/or Contractor is 
not an employee of a third party employer, then Enron has the right to 
determine if they are meeting the terms and provisions of their contract.  
However, this does not mean they are to be included in the PEP and PRC 
process. 

To include them opens too many doors with respect to the proper 
classification of these individuals.  If we treat them like employees, we may 
find that a court determines they should be employees and thus eligible for 
all employee benefits, a la MicroSoft.  

Thanks.  Sharon

06/27/2000 02:33 PM
Kriste Sullivan
Kriste Sullivan
Kriste Sullivan
06/27/2000 02:33 PM
06/27/2000 02:33 PM
I agree with your recommendation Michelle that consultants and contractors 
should not participate in the PRC or the PEP process.  If  you treat 
consultants and contractors like "employees", they will soon become them in 
the eyes of the law, along with all of the costs, bonuses, and benefits.

Kriste K. Sullivan
Enron Corp. Legal
1400 Smith, EB 4861
Houston, TX  77002
(713) 853-7557
(713) 646-5847 Fax
KSulliv@Enron.com

This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

	Michelle Cash@ECT
	06/27/2000 01:03 PM
		
Privileged and Confidential -- Advice Covered by the Attorney-Client Privilege

K2: 

I have copied this email to Sharon & Kriste, who are supporting the CALME 
region.  My recommendation is to exclude contractors/consultants because 
their inclusion would increase the risk that they would be deemed to be 
employees, and that a court could determine that they are owed employee 
compensation and benefits (a la Microsoft).  This exposure could be high.  
Depending on the other indicators of independent contractor status, rating 
them along side our employees could be a factor to tilt the balance.

Let me know if you have any questions.

Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

	Kathryn McLean
	06/27/2000 10:01 AM
		 
Hi Michelle, 

Please see my note below regarding including JV employees and Consultants in 
our PEP system and the PRC. Could you please give us more expert legal advice 
(from my own : - )!!) in relation to this? We want to ensure that we cover 
ourselves.

Thanks, K2.
	Kathryn McLean
	06/26/2000 09:12 AM
	
	

David, 

I've been forwarded a voicemail on Friday from David Haug where he has 
requested that we include CALME's JV employees and Consultants who are at the 
VP level. (He knows that they should not be pulled into the VP meeting).  
Monica and I initially pushed back on this due to the requirement that only 
AIP employees are involved in our mid year process, however, due to David's 
instance I'm reverting to you for a decision. 

Although I do not have a strong opinion on including the JV's - my concern is 
primarily with the Consultants.

Below are my concerns in accommodating this request:-

- The PEP system has officially told employees that the feedback stage has 
finished. Although the system is still open we are going to turn off the 
system message requesting reviewers to access PEP to review employee.  In 
this instance, there would need to be an effort within Janie's team to 
communicate to all reviewers of the JV's that they are required to give 
feedback.

- The way PEP is set up, we would need to load the consultants as employees 
in order to generate the 360 feedback functionality. Due to US law on how to 
describe employees/non employees in a database, this comes with legality 
issues and I want us to be aware of what we're doing regarding this.

Call me to discuss or if you wish for me to forward the voicemail, 

K2

Shanna, we certainly can hire and manage him out if the performance is not 
there.  Do we not think he'll be a good performer?   Michelle

Shanna Funkhouser@ENRON
12/06/2000 09:47 PM
Michelle,

Don't know that this alternative would be too appealing to the candidate, but 
I can explore it with Mark.

What would happen if we hire him as an Enron employee, he has a mid year 
review that is not stellar, and then by September of next year we decide to 
terminate for non-performance?

Shanna

Michelle Cash@ECT
12/05/2000 11:29 PM
What about payrolling through an agency so that he is on a contract-to-hire 
basis?  That way, we can say that the intent is to hire, but that we are 
evaluating the situation before making a regular, full-time offer.  Customers 
understand contract-to-hire concept, so it may not raise "lack of commitment" 
jitters.

What do you think?

Michelle

Shanna Funkhouser@ENRON
12/05/2000 07:05 PM
Michelle,

Mark Tawney has a situation where he wants to hire a Manager level person in 
the Chicago office on a trial basis as a Marketer of Weather products.

This is a trial effort and if it fails, there would be no job for him in 
Houston or otherwise.  Mark is thinking that a 6-9 month evaluation period 
would be adequate to determine success.  How would you recommend that we 
structure an offer that gives us an out if the initiative fails.  We thought 
about hiring him as a contractor or consultant in order to minimize our 
commitment, but we're concerned that if our potential customers learn of his 
employment status, it may appear to our customers that we are not committed 
to the effort or the market.  Mark is willing to be completely above board 
with the candidate that this may or may not work.

My belief is that we are going to have more of this exact situation in EGM.  
Kevin McGowan is also looking for a Marketer for Coal.  The people they are 
targeting have sales backgrounds and would not be re-deployable in other 
parts of Enron.

My goal is to minimize our exposure on the front end!

Shanna

Jane, I am glad that you knew the situation, as I was clueless!  Thanks.  
Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

	Jane Allen
	06/28/2000 09:45 AM
		
No, it is a European Agreement since she is remaining on UK payroll.  Tara 
found out Michele Small prepared the agreement.  Jon C. reviewed it then but 
now has comments again, plus he is questioning some of our changes.

As you recall, the file that Louise had and has signed is just a draft.  We 
kept making changes based on her request and it has not been reviewed by 
Legal before she signed last week.

Jane J. Allen
Enron Corp
Global Employee Services
Phone - 713/345-5064
Fax - 713/646-7203

	David Oxley
	06/28/2000 09:23 AM
		
Thought this was drafted here by Jane and Michelle? Maybe we get Mich to 
initial and Greg to sign?

David

Tara Rozen
06/28/2000 05:01 AM
David/Jane

Jon Chapman has come back with several changes/questions on the agreement. I 
am not sure who drafted this or what you want me to do with this now. Mark F 
won't sign without Jon C's signature and Jon C won't sign as it is. 

Jane - Please provide your fax number and I will fax it to you asap.

Thanks
Tara

David Oxley
26/06/2000 13:56
Could you do the deed with Mark?

D-

Can you get  Mark's signature?  Once signed, I will get it to London for 
process and sorting out the money.

Thanks for all your help on this.

Robert

 

David Oxley@ECT
06/23/2000 07:41 AM
I think I have a hard copy of this agreement in my mail. WHat do I need to do?

David
Louise Kitchen
06/21/2000 06:17 PM
Just so its finally over!

Electronic copy of the agreement I signed:

I updated:

1. Registered office of Enron Europe is now 40 Grosvenor.
2. Mark Frevert as signatory as he is here.
3. $=sterling.  Up on the numbers but down on the house!
etc

Louise

Same password with a 2 on the end (eg ****2)

Tara,  if you didn't know, our phones/computer systems were down for a 
while.  I think Twanda has sent this.  Let me know if not.  Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

	Tara Rozen
	06/28/2000 11:29 AM
		
I still haven't seen this!! Please, please could I have this before we go 
home, ie within the next hour?

Thank you!!
Tara

Sorry, Tara that I have not sent this to you yet.  I have made the changes 
already.  Let me get Michelle to take a final look at this and I will send it 
to you this morning.

Twanda

	Tara Rozen
	06/28/2000 04:55 AM
		
Michelle

Can I do this myself? I used to just run with the draft that you/Twanda sent 
and removed the confidential header. Can I no longer do this? I would like to 
get this to Mark today so please let me know.

Thanks
Tara

Michelle Cash   26/06/2000 20:04

Tara,

We can make the salary retroactive as part of the contract.  Have we already 
sent you executables?  If so, we can re-run with a provision that states, 
"Effective 3/1/00, Employee's Monthly Base Salary shall be $xxxx."  The 
effective date still can be 6/1.

Twanda, would you please make that change and run executables?

Thanks.

Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

	Tara Rozen
	06/26/2000 12:33 PM
		 
Michelle/Twanda

On the nomination form for Mark Schroeder's agreement, it requests to 
backdate the salary to March 1st, even though the effective date of the 
agreement is not until June 1st. Can this be incorporated into the agreement 
or do we need to do a side letter to Mark?

Thanks
Tara

FYI:  Tim O'Rourke has developed a new form for PIPs.

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

	Kimberly Rizzi
	06/28/2000 05:31 PM
		 
Julie - this is just a simple template.  We'll probably want to beef it up a 
bit.  If you want to take a first run at it then we can sit down and talk.
Thanks - Kim

Attached is a copy of our California Separation Agreement and Release.

This is a merge document it may prompt you to open up this data source.

California Agreement

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the 
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

Hello!

Here is the latest draft on Garden State/Project Barbed Wire.  As I mentioned 
to Dee, the agreement is due to be signed on Tuesday, 7/11.

Dee/Rick, I just learned that there are multi-employer plans for the 
unionized employees.   I'll provide details as I learn them.

I guess you can forward your comments to me, with a copy to Stuart Zisman.

Thanks.  Michelle

Peter asked me to forward this most recent draft to each of you.

Stuart

	"VIVIAN FARRELL" <VFARRELL@LLGM.COM>
	07/05/2000 05:50 PM
		 
 Dear Mr. Zisman

Attached is the latest draft of the Purchase & Sale Agreement.  It is in Word 
format, and is 62 pages long.

Should you require any assistance, please call me on 713 287 2075 or George 
Lee on 713 287 2066.

Thanks.

* * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * *
This email, including attachments, contains information that is confidential 
and may be protected by the attorney/client or other privileges.  
Additionally, this e-mail, including attachments, constitutes non-public 
information intended to be conveyed only to the designated recipient(s).  If 
you are not an intended recipient, please delete this e-mail, including 
attachments, and notifiy me by return mail, e-mail or at 713 287 2000.  The 
unauthorized use, dissemination, distribution or reproduction of this e-mail, 
including attachments, is prohibited and may be unlawful.

VIVIAN G FARRELL (Mrs)
LeBoeuf Lamb Greene & MacRae LLP
1000 Louisiana
Houston, Texas  77002
vfarrell@llgm.com

 - G1112!.DOC

Dee/Pat/Rick:  Here is the diligence memo.  Michelle
Michelle, attached is our June 22nd due diligence memo that we thought we had 
forwarded to Dolores Linfest.  Perhaps we did not have a correct e-mail 
address.  Please call me at 713-287-2066 if you have any questions.

This e-mail, including attachments, contains information that is confidential 
and it may be protected by the  attorney/client or other priviliges.  This 
e-mail, including attachments, constitutes non-public information intended to 
be conveyed only to the designated recipient(s).  If you are not an intentded 
recipient, please delete this e-mail, including attachments, and notify me by 
return mail, e-mail or at 713-287-2066.  The unauthorized use, dissemination, 
distribution or reproduction of this e-mail, including attachments is 
prohibited and may be unlawful.  George T. Lee, gtlee@llgm.com.
Date: Thu, 22 Jun 2000 09:04:50 -0400
Ms. Lenfest,

Benjamin Clark requested that we forward the attached employee benefits due 
diligence directly to you.  As you will note from the highlighted text, the 
information provided thus far raises numerous questions relating to employee 
benefits matters.

Please let us know if you have any questions.

Ann Murray

CONFIDENTIALITY NOTICE:

This e-mail, including attachments, contains information that is confidential 
and it may be
protected by the attorney/client or other privileges.  This e-mail, including 
attachments,
constitutes non-public information intended to be conveyed only to the 
designated recipient(s).  If
you are not an intended recipient, please delete this e-mail, including 
attachments, and notify me
by return mail, e-mail or at (904) 630-5336.  The unauthorized use,
dissemination, distribution or reproduction of this e-mail, including 
attachments, is prohibited and
may be unlawful.

Ann E. Murray
LeBoeuf, Lamb, Greene & MacRae
50 N. Laura St. Suite 2800
Jacksonville, FL 32202
(904) 630-5336
amurray@llgm.com

 - 0151526.02

Pat,

Thanks for your comments on the agreement.  As an FYI, the stock awards 
already have been made, so we had to soften the language in the agreement to 
address that situation.

I appreciate your other thoughts.  

Mary, could you or someone in your group help me in putting together an 
example as suggested by Pat?

Thanks.

Michelle

I agree with Brian.  I recently learned that someone can "hack" into the 
emeet site and pretend to be Jeff Skilling (as I discussed with you, Brian, 
this morning).  So, we probably should start with that group to see if there 
are any gaps in the email system.  

I would suggest that someone from Net Works -- Roberto DeLeon or his crew-- 
would be the appropriate technical support for this endeavor.  I agree with 
Brian that the focus should be on the impersonation of the office of the 
chairman and not the content of the email itself.

I am happy to assist in any way you would like.

Michelle

Brian Schaffer@ENRON
07/13/2000 10:28 AM
David:

 I am less concerned about the substantive comments of the message as I am 
about the "forgery" of the ECT OTC mailbox.  Unless Michelle or another 
opines differently, I believe it is incumbent upon us to determine who 
mis-used that e-mail address.  This is not to say that an employee should be 
disciplined for raising complaints; obviously that would be retaliatory in 
nature.  And so, if this person had simply left an anonymous voice message or 
old-fashioned letter with OTC, I would have no issue.  But, here, this person 
has sent a communication ostensibly from ECT's OTC and apparently has access 
to do so in the future.  In my mind, that activity must be addressed and 
ceased.

 I suspect that it is technologically feasible to determine the source of the 
message.  Unless there is objection, I would recommend an investigation 
(which my group can do) to determine the author.

Brian

David Oxley@ECT
07/13/2000 09:59 AM
Can we discuss below please? Please review message and give me your comments.

Given it is anonymous it's difficult to respond. 

David

This memo went to Corp and Sherri forwarded for us to handle.

Thanks,

Kay

   

Kay, per our discussion, here's the e-mail.  You should probably find out who 
has access to that ECT Office of the Chairman mailbox and who forwarded this 
up to the Corp. Office of the Chairman.  This should be handled with ENA.  
Thanks, SRS
Office Chairman on 07/13/2000 08:04:17 AM
Office of the Chairman@ECT
07/06/2000 10:01 AM
After having lived through another PRC process, it has become exceedingly 
obvious that there are several issues that need improvement in the process.  
With all our discussions about Communication within Enron, I am now 
communicating to your level issues that I have communicated in years past to 
other parties without change.

1)  Enron needs to lay out the groundrules in total that will pertain to the 
upcoming review period and communicate them in advance of the review period, 
not during the PRC process to be applied after the performance has already 
occurred and upon which each employee cannot change their behavior for such 
review period.  This is only fair to our employees so that they know the 
criteria upon which they will be evaluated in advance.

2)  The PRC system needs to be changed whereby any and all people that are 
willing to provide input on performance of any individual can be done without 
a bunch of red tape.  There is this idea that unsolicited input works within 
the system, but it requires too much effort to get throught the hurdles and 
it still requires that the supervisor approve such input.  There needs to be 
an unobstructed communication line for this input.  The theory of upward 
feedback should also be questioned.  I have never been asked to provide input 
to my direct boss (President of Houston Pipe Line) in all the years that I 
have worked for that position.  Are Managing Directors exempt from this 
process?  This issue is also addressed in #3 below in a different manner.  
How can appropriate feedback be given if those that work directly with 
individuals are not given the opportunity to communicate?

3)  There is still way too much preferrential selection of reviewers in the 
process.  There should be set out for each employee a listing of absolute 
minimum reviewers (certain people) that must be solicited, depending upon the 
job function.  I have seen too many circumstances where the obvious people to 
provide input were not even solicited.  There was one individual that 
partially worked directly for another during this past review period and was 
not even asked for input.

4)  What constitutes an average employee and what that category is within our 
PRC definitions is still being debated.  It has been described by several HR 
representatives that it is either/and both Strong or Satisfactory.  Neither 
one of the definitions describes such performance as "simply doing the job".  
Because of such confusion, the reviewers when they provide input do not 
effectively and precisely rate the employee.  What we end up with in the PRC 
is an over-inflated representation of each employee and the committee has to 
pull the entire group back a notch.  With better definitions and 
communication to our employees on how to interpret the definitions, it will 
give us a better process and set the standards in writing that seem to be 
lacking.

Thanks for your listening ear.

Dick, Here are the details about the GPG PRC meeting.  Please note that these 
people have not been involved in the process for very long and thus, this may 
not be the best example of how the process works.  Nonetheless, it should 
give you a flavor of how it works.  When you get to the Enron Building, 
please ask for me or my assistant, Twanda Sweet, and one of us will take you 
to the conference room.  Thanks a lot!  Michelle

Jennifer Milligan
07/18/2000 01:35 PM
GPG says that it is fine to have the consultant at their meeting.  The GPG 
Managers PRC meeting will be held in EB49C2 at 1:00  p.m.  Please let me know 
if I should contact him with additional directions.
(Is he flying in for this or located here?)

Thanks,
Jennifer

Gina Corteselli@ENRON
07/18/2000 12:53 PM
Woul;d you kindly send the info to Michelle Cash and ask her whether she will 
contact him or whether she wants us to do it?

Jennifer Milligan@ECT
07/18/2000 10:40 AM
GPG says its OK and the location is EB49C2 at 1:00 p.m.  Who is contacting 
him with this information?

Thanks,
Jennifer

Jennifer, Dave has OK'd this.
Jennifer Milligan@ECT
07/17/2000 10:53 AM
Dave,

Michelle Cash (ENA Employment Attorney) has asked if the consultant described 
below could sit in and observe during the GPG Managers PRC meeting.  Would 
this be acceptable to you?  

Thanks,
Jennifer
Gina Corteselli@ENRON
07/17/2000 09:48 AM
Michelle Cash has asked whether Dick Jeanrette might sit in on a PRC meeting 
as an observer.  We proposed that he attend  the GPG Managers meeting on 20 
July.  Jennifer, please square this with GPG and get back to Michelle?  Many 
thanks.     
Michelle Cash@ECT
07/14/2000 02:00 PM
David/Cindy, 

I have arranged for Dick Jeanrette, who is an industrial psychologist 
specializing in employment matters, to assist us in the performance 
evaluation process.  Dick has worked for years with Exxon, which has a 
process that sounds similar to ours, and has many ideas regarding the 
process.  The Exxon process has been challenged in court, and Dick has 
testified about its process; the cases have been in favor of the company.  
Thus, I believe his experience and insight will help us in our performance 
management process.

I will be arranging a meeting with Dick in the next two weeks.  Besides the 
persons identified in this email, who should attend?  You had mentioned Steve 
Kean.  Should he be involved as well?  (FYI, he worked with Dick on Project 
One).

Let me know if you have any questions.

Michelle

David Oxley
06/13/2000 06:55 PM
Michelle,

I had a voicemail from Cindy and Steve Kean relating to the change of wording 
on the Satisfactory and Needs Improvement descriptors for this mid-year 
review. Concern surrounds the apparent toughening of Satisf in particular and 
a belief that this makes distributing names into bottom 2 categories harder.

I recall we changed wording due to some concerns you had expressed. Perhaps 
you can restate them here for everyone.

However, regardless of above I remain of opinion that descriptors and labels 
are proving a distraction from what should be a more relative process. 
Perhaps the main message here is to convey something that helps us put these 
descriptors in the context of a guide only (starting point or indicative 
illustration) rather than absolute scale. 

Bottom-line it is rather difficult to see how we could change any of this for 
the mid year.

David

Jennifer Milligan
07/20/2000 09:29 AM
Michelle,

Here are the pertinent materials:

Thanks,
Jennifer

Michelle Cash
07/19/2000 05:29 PM
Just send them to me -- I'll give them to him when he arrives for gpg 
meeting.  thanks. mhc

Jennifer Milligan
07/19/2000 04:04 PM
I will start gathering these materials.  Where can I find him tomorrow 
morning?  

Thanks,
Jennifer

Michelle Cash
07/19/2000 03:33 PM
Also, could you provide all feedback forms, with instructions, as well as the 
final performance evaluation form for Dick to review?  THanks.  Michelle

Jennifer Milligan
07/19/2000 11:12 AM
Michelle,

I certainly have the training and informational materials and can enlist Roy 
and Derek (technical side of the team) to run the reports.  I know Kathryn 
McLean has been providing overall statistical reports to Cindy Olson, so 
these probably already exist and are being finalized for the VP/MD meeting 
7/31 and 8/1.

Let me know when you want me to provide these materials.

Thanks,
Jennifer

Michelle Cash
07/19/2000 10:54 AM
Jennifer, would you be the best person to help gather this data?  Michelle

Dick Jeanneret <dick@jeanneret.com> on 07/19/2000 09:22:26 AM
Please respond to Dick@jeanneret.com
Michelle,
Can you arrange for me to obtain  the various documents available re the
perfomance appraisal process,i.e. forms, instructions, training
materials, summaries of the distributions of the ratings, etc.
Thanks,
Dick

Peter, here are preliminary comments from Pat Mackin on the PSA.  Michelle

FMackin@aol.com on 12/07/2000 01:10:56 PM
Michelle, I reviewed the Project Canary Asset Purchase and Sale Agreement and
offer the following observations:

In an asset transaction, where the buyer did not want to acquire or assume
the employee benefit plans of the seller, I have always recommended to
include such plans and liabilities in the statement of excluded assets.
Based on the recitals for this transaction, and other provisions of the
Agreement (Sections 7 and 10) it appears that the employee benefit plans are
not excluded.

Generally, when such employee benefit plans are included in an asset
transaction, the buyer wants to obtain representations as to the funding,
compliance and administration of the plans.  These kinds of representations
are not in the Agreement.

The bottom line is that the buyer needs to rely on Canadian counsel and
actuaries to gives buyer the level of comfort it desires to have with respect
to these issues of funding, compliance and administration so that they can be
inserted into the financial model for determining the offering price.

You may wish to obtain a formal opinion letter from the Canadian counsel and
actuary regarding the level of comfort the buyer requires.

Pat

Attached is a draft memo regarding the above-referenced.

Hoyt, I suggest that we get Aaron Brown and Sheila Knudsen working on the 
issue of deferred comp. to work with Dee on this comparison.  Thanks.  
Michelle

Hoyt Thomas@ENRON
08/06/2000 12:05 PM
Dee, we did not find anything that worried us on the benefits side in NYC, 
other than FLSA violations and things like that (which is really a comp 
issue) and I did not hear anything from you regarding things to look at . . . 
.they have just requested a plan amendment to the 401K so that the Rudolph 
Wolff employees can get into the Vanguard 401K immediately rather than 
waiting three months, should you be involved in that (by the way, these are 
our employees now, the folks in London convinced me that we own the company . 
. . . so the benefit plans are our now also)

One issue that keeps coming up is the deferred comp plan for 12 or so 
employees . . . we have to figure out what the value of that plan is and how 
we will keep their benefits substantially similar even though we are not 
going to have a deferred comp plan for them.  And I told the employees that 
we would have some sort of response for them on the 17th when we do the 
"intro to enron" package that is described inthe other email I sent you.  
Would you be able to look at the three benefits packages (Rudolph Wolff, 
MG-USA and Enron) and do a comparison?  also, will you have some time this 
week to talk about any benefits issues?  We really need to get these people 
feeling like they are Enron employees ASAP, they feel neglected now.  Please 
ring me at 57801, I am here M-Th of this week.

Thanks.

Patrick, do you have any comments to this?  Michelle

Kari Oquinn
07/27/2000 09:41 AM
As we had talked about last week, I'd appreciate if you would have the 
attached document (proposed IT Retention Equity program) reviewed for legal 
purposes.  Particular attention needs to be paid to the area that addresses 
employees on leave of absence.  The excel document includes 3 worksheets 
which are the attachments to the Write-Up.

Attached is a one-page outline summarizing the issues relating to Jim Ajell=
o,=20
who recently left ENA to work for Reliant Energy.

By hard copy, I am sending you the following:  (1) a copy of the lawsuit EN=
A=20
filed against Ajello, and (2) a copy of Ajello=01,s Employment Agreement, w=
hich=20
is highlighted for your convenience.

If you have any questions or require additional information, please call me=
=20
at (713) 853-6401.

Gina,

Have we figured out what happened here?  I haven't heard anything in a while.

Michelle

Michelle Cash
07/13/2000 11:04 AM
I agree with Brian.  I recently learned that someone can "hack" into the 
emeet site and pretend to be Jeff Skilling (as I discussed with you, Brian, 
this morning).  So, we probably should start with that group to see if there 
are any gaps in the email system.  

I would suggest that someone from Net Works -- Roberto DeLeon or his crew-- 
would be the appropriate technical support for this endeavor.  I agree with 
Brian that the focus should be on the impersonation of the office of the 
chairman and not the content of the email itself.

I am happy to assist in any way you would like.

Michelle

Brian Schaffer@ENRON
07/13/2000 10:28 AM
David:

 I am less concerned about the substantive comments of the message as I am 
about the "forgery" of the ECT OTC mailbox.  Unless Michelle or another 
opines differently, I believe it is incumbent upon us to determine who 
mis-used that e-mail address.  This is not to say that an employee should be 
disciplined for raising complaints; obviously that would be retaliatory in 
nature.  And so, if this person had simply left an anonymous voice message or 
old-fashioned letter with OTC, I would have no issue.  But, here, this person 
has sent a communication ostensibly from ECT's OTC and apparently has access 
to do so in the future.  In my mind, that activity must be addressed and 
ceased.

 I suspect that it is technologically feasible to determine the source of the 
message.  Unless there is objection, I would recommend an investigation 
(which my group can do) to determine the author.

Brian

David Oxley@ECT
07/13/2000 09:59 AM
Can we discuss below please? Please review message and give me your comments.

Given it is anonymous it's difficult to respond. 

David

This memo went to Corp and Sherri forwarded for us to handle.

Thanks,

Kay

   

Kay, per our discussion, here's the e-mail.  You should probably find out who 
has access to that ECT Office of the Chairman mailbox and who forwarded this 
up to the Corp. Office of the Chairman.  This should be handled with ENA.  
Thanks, SRS
Office Chairman on 07/13/2000 08:04:17 AM
Office of the Chairman@ECT
07/06/2000 10:01 AM
After having lived through another PRC process, it has become exceedingly 
obvious that there are several issues that need improvement in the process.  
With all our discussions about Communication within Enron, I am now 
communicating to your level issues that I have communicated in years past to 
other parties without change.

1)  Enron needs to lay out the groundrules in total that will pertain to the 
upcoming review period and communicate them in advance of the review period, 
not during the PRC process to be applied after the performance has already 
occurred and upon which each employee cannot change their behavior for such 
review period.  This is only fair to our employees so that they know the 
criteria upon which they will be evaluated in advance.

2)  The PRC system needs to be changed whereby any and all people that are 
willing to provide input on performance of any individual can be done without 
a bunch of red tape.  There is this idea that unsolicited input works within 
the system, but it requires too much effort to get throught the hurdles and 
it still requires that the supervisor approve such input.  There needs to be 
an unobstructed communication line for this input.  The theory of upward 
feedback should also be questioned.  I have never been asked to provide input 
to my direct boss (President of Houston Pipe Line) in all the years that I 
have worked for that position.  Are Managing Directors exempt from this 
process?  This issue is also addressed in #3 below in a different manner.  
How can appropriate feedback be given if those that work directly with 
individuals are not given the opportunity to communicate?

3)  There is still way too much preferrential selection of reviewers in the 
process.  There should be set out for each employee a listing of absolute 
minimum reviewers (certain people) that must be solicited, depending upon the 
job function.  I have seen too many circumstances where the obvious people to 
provide input were not even solicited.  There was one individual that 
partially worked directly for another during this past review period and was 
not even asked for input.

4)  What constitutes an average employee and what that category is within our 
PRC definitions is still being debated.  It has been described by several HR 
representatives that it is either/and both Strong or Satisfactory.  Neither 
one of the definitions describes such performance as "simply doing the job".  
Because of such confusion, the reviewers when they provide input do not 
effectively and precisely rate the employee.  What we end up with in the PRC 
is an over-inflated representation of each employee and the committee has to 
pull the entire group back a notch.  With better definitions and 
communication to our employees on how to interpret the definitions, it will 
give us a better process and set the standards in writing that seem to be 
lacking.

Thanks for your listening ear.

Andrea, 

You are right.  I remember that you wanted to be included, but somehow, as I 
was trying to get away for vacation, I failed to remember to tell Twanda, who 
was setting up the meeting.  I apologize for the oversight -- it was not 
intentional.  I will make sure that you are included in any subsequent 
meetings.  I am sorry about this one.  

Basically, the discussion revolved around the purpose of the PRC -- is it a 
compensation system or a feedback system?  Because the process tries to 
address both, there is a tension between the organization's interests (comp, 
promotion, etc) and that of the employee (feedback, development, etc.)  This 
tension is really reflected by the current categories and descriptors and the 
fact that we have a comparative rating system.  This tension has given people 
lots of heartburn.  

To address this tension and to provide an immediate tweak that doesn't create 
too much change, Gina is going to draft new descriptors that reflect that 
comparative nature and also that reflect a more consistent view of how we 
evaluate employees.  The preference was to go to numbered categories instead 
of a descriptor because of the possible disconnect between the descriptor and 
the comparative rating.  For example, a "strong" performer really could be 
excellent, but compared to others in the group, ended up in the third 
category.  For this reason, the descriptor identifiers were found to be 
problematic.  Also, there will be a revamping of the explanations of the 
categories to get away from the old "HR" language.  For example, a category 1 
performer would have a descriptor that said something like:  "Always raises 
the bar; franchise player," etc. rather than a "HR" definition relating to 
demonstrating criteria.  Also, people had the view that needs improvement and 
issues probably should be collapsed because there wasn't much difference 
between the two.

There was a general discussion about whether going to numbers made it seem 
more competitive.  Also, there was discussion about the fact that the PRC 
appeared to be a "black box," and the desire to explain and communicate more 
about the process.

This was only the first meeting.  I will make sure that you are invited to 
attend any subsequent ones, and I apologize for the first one.

Let me know if you have any questions.

Michelle

Andrea Yowman@ENRON
08/25/2000 06:13 AM
Michelle, 
I had previously asked to be involved in this meeting but do not recall 
getting a invitation.  Would you please send me a copy of the details of this 
meeting?  Are there any other follow-up meetings scheduled?

Gina Corteselli
08/24/2000 05:28 PM
As I noted, I attended a meeting yesterday to discuss the possibility of 
changing the current descriptors used in PRC (Superior through Issues) to a 
numeric rating 1-6 (or possibly 1-5 by combining the Needs Improvement and 
Issues categories).  The numeric ratings would be based on more relative 
behavioral descriptors to categorize an employee's performance, and not the 
absolute standards that the current descriptors represent.  

I have been tasked with drafting the verbiage for this possible change which 
will, of course, require review and approval by the senior levels of the 
organization.  In the interim I would appreciate knowing how this change 
might affect the system and current development  and compatibility of the 
data from mid-year to year end, assuming the change is approved.

I look forward to your comments and input.  Thanks in advance,

Gina
  

I think that gathering this information at interview makes the most sense.  
Obviously, new hire orientation is too late!  I prefer an original, signed 
document, but a fax is an ok substitute, provided that the applicant mails us 
the originals after faxing.  Thanks.  MHC

Cynthia Gonzalez@ENRON
08/28/2000 08:20 AM
Having the candidate fill out the employment application and authorization to 
complete a background check at the time they are interviewed.
Or, told they have to return these two documents along with their signed 
offer letter by mail/fax.

I think faxing would be quicker.  

Some candidates are being told they can complete these forms during new hire 
orientation.

Hope this helps.
Thanks
Cynthia

   
	
	

Cynthia & Toni, 
What changes or processes can we implement so that we can have background 
checks before the employee starts?
hgm

Cynthia Gonzalez
08/25/2000 02:07 PM
The following are scheduled to start on Monday, 8/28, we have either not 
recevied their completed background checks or have not processed them because 
we have not received necessary paper work to process.

Chris Price   processed - not complete He says there is nothing to worry 
about.
Patricia Houston processed - not complete
Stanton Brown  not processed
Beverly Filer  not processed
Prescilla Hamic  not processed

As soon as the paper work is received, the background checks will be 
processed.

Please advise if okay.
Thanks
Cynthia
ext. 5-8891

Gina, I will leave this to your discretion.  I agree that the OD&T people 
could help us in the communication/training side of any changes that are 
made.  Comp. probably will not be affected much, since Needs Improvement and 
Issues both are no bonus/no merit categories.  Thanks.  Michelle

Andrea Yowman@ENRON
08/27/2000 09:48 AM
Thanks Michelle.
One question:  Since this issue surrounds compensation and OD&T, have we 
considered a compensation and OD&T person to participate in this review?  I 
would recommend the leaders of the appropriate councils be involved.

Michelle Cash@ECT
08/25/2000 10:22 AM
Andrea, 

You are right.  I remember that you wanted to be included, but somehow, as I 
was trying to get away for vacation, I failed to remember to tell Twanda, who 
was setting up the meeting.  I apologize for the oversight -- it was not 
intentional.  I will make sure that you are included in any subsequent 
meetings.  I am sorry about this one.  

Basically, the discussion revolved around the purpose of the PRC -- is it a 
compensation system or a feedback system?  Because the process tries to 
address both, there is a tension between the organization's interests (comp, 
promotion, etc) and that of the employee (feedback, development, etc.)  This 
tension is really reflected by the current categories and descriptors and the 
fact that we have a comparative rating system.  This tension has given people 
lots of heartburn.  

To address this tension and to provide an immediate tweak that doesn't create 
too much change, Gina is going to draft new descriptors that reflect that 
comparative nature and also that reflect a more consistent view of how we 
evaluate employees.  The preference was to go to numbered categories instead 
of a descriptor because of the possible disconnect between the descriptor and 
the comparative rating.  For example, a "strong" performer really could be 
excellent, but compared to others in the group, ended up in the third 
category.  For this reason, the descriptor identifiers were found to be 
problematic.  Also, there will be a revamping of the explanations of the 
categories to get away from the old "HR" language.  For example, a category 1 
performer would have a descriptor that said something like:  "Always raises 
the bar; franchise player," etc. rather than a "HR" definition relating to 
demonstrating criteria.  Also, people had the view that needs improvement and 
issues probably should be collapsed because there wasn't much difference 
between the two.

There was a general discussion about whether going to numbers made it seem 
more competitive.  Also, there was discussion about the fact that the PRC 
appeared to be a "black box," and the desire to explain and communicate more 
about the process.

This was only the first meeting.  I will make sure that you are invited to 
attend any subsequent ones, and I apologize for the first one.

Let me know if you have any questions.

Michelle

Andrea Yowman@ENRON
08/25/2000 06:13 AM
Michelle, 
I had previously asked to be involved in this meeting but do not recall 
getting a invitation.  Would you please send me a copy of the details of this 
meeting?  Are there any other follow-up meetings scheduled?

Gina Corteselli
08/24/2000 05:28 PM
As I noted, I attended a meeting yesterday to discuss the possibility of 
changing the current descriptors used in PRC (Superior through Issues) to a 
numeric rating 1-6 (or possibly 1-5 by combining the Needs Improvement and 
Issues categories).  The numeric ratings would be based on more relative 
behavioral descriptors to categorize an employee's performance, and not the 
absolute standards that the current descriptors represent.  

I have been tasked with drafting the verbiage for this possible change which 
will, of course, require review and approval by the senior levels of the 
organization.  In the interim I would appreciate knowing how this change 
might affect the system and current development  and compatibility of the 
data from mid-year to year end, assuming the change is approved.

I look forward to your comments and input.  Thanks in advance,

Gina
  

Pat, thanks for the update.  By the way, did you talk with  Fran Mayes, who 
went to the management presentations last week?  She may have some of the 
missing information.  Dee, you might want to check with her for data.  
Thanks.  Michelle

Mary, yes, it merely is a form issue.  Sharon and Kriste have consolidated 
those paragraphs in their form.  I will follow suit in mine to minimize 
confusion and to keep the "one template" concept intact.  Michelle

Mary McKendree@ENRON
09/21/2000 10:14 AM
Michelle --

As I am validating these contracts, I am seeing inconsistent language.  Can 
you help me here?  

It has to do with a severance payout after involuntary term.  In some cases 
it may be saying the same thing, but is showing up in different paragraphs.  
I'd prefer to have all the templates alike, if that's not a legal issue.

For VP & Above:

2.1b gives him one year's annual base and bonus
2.3    offsets the severance with the agreement payments

(i.e. Ozzie Pagan/ENA)

OR

1.3  states "Employee is not eligible for severance . . ."
2.1b gives him one year's annual base and bonus

(i.e. Franklin Bay/EBS)

OR

1.3  offsets the severance with agreement payments
2.1b gives him one year's annual base and bonus

(i.e. Mohan Gurunath/India -- contract dated July 27, 2000 -- but just 
received, so may be old language)

Under VP:

2.1b indicates payment continues under full term of contract
2.3   offsets the severance with the above

(i.eJohn Guerriero//Canada)

OR

1.3  states "Employee is not eligible for severance under the Enron Corp . . 
. . "
2.1b provides payments continue for the full term of contract
(2.3 Offset paragraph doesn't exist)

(a slew of EBS contracts just received)

It looks like there's two different templates floating around that are being 
used at random.  They may be saying similar things, but the calculations 
could be entirely different.

Can you let me know which ones are the correct combinations to be using?  
And, is there any way we can get all the templates to reflect it?

Thanks so much for your help.  And let me know if the above is about as clear 
as mud.  Just give me a call and we can talk about it.

Mary

Mark, 

The pay equity issue sounds like the reviews we do every year to ensure that 
people are being paid equitably.  Given that the company has until November 
of next year to get in compliance and to report out on the compliance issue, 
it should be no big deal -- unless there currently are pay inequities.  A 
list of persons in each job, with salary and gender, could allow us to 
determine whether an issue even exists.

Michelle

Mark Greenberg@ENRON
12/07/2000 09:08 PM
Christopher -

Based upon your memo and our due diligence effort to date, is there any 
indication of (a) any steps Daishowa has taken to put the committee required 
under the Pay Equity Act or (b) any increase in compensation that would be 
consistent with the Pay Equity Act and therefore enable Daishowa to dispense 
with the need for a committee?  Is there any way to currently assess what 
potential liabilities could be or to view any industry data on this issue 
that may indicate how extensive liability could be???

The main concern is that we are negotiating with Daishowa to be in a position 
to undertake, as of closing, all responsibilities associated with all matters 
disclosed, unless there is a legal noncompliance issue (e.g., failure to 
maintain proper permits).  Since the requirements of the Pay Equity Act have 
not been identified to management as a concern, I need to ensure that this is 
a real issue (mostly from a $'s exposure standpoint) vs. something so remote 
that it should not even be discussed.

Please let me know your thoughts.  Thanks.

Mark
Senior Counsel, ENA
Phone:     713-345-8897
Facsimile: 713-646-3940
E-Mail:      Mark.Greenberg@enron.com
	Johanne Berthiaume <berthiaumej@lapros.qc.ca>
	12/07/2000 10:32 AM
		 
 <<d4s_03!.DOC>>
Memo re: Quebec Labour Issues

Regards

Christopher Deehy
e-mail: deehyc@lapros.qc.ca
tel:  (514) 925-6353

>  ___________________________________
>  Le pr,sent courrier ,lectronique (courriel) et les documents qui y
> sont  attach,s peuvent contenir de l'information confidentielle; ils
> s'adressent exclusivement au destinataire mentionn, ci-dessus et nulle
> autre personne ne doit en prendre connaissance ni les utiliser ou les
> divulguer.  Si vous recevez le pr,sent courriel par erreur, veuillez en
> aviser l',metteur imm,diatement par courrier ,lectronique et le d,truire
> avec les documents qui y sont attach,s.
>
>  The information contained in this e-mail and all attachments is
> confidential and is for the sole use of its intended recipient. It may not
> be disclosed to or used by anyone other than the addressee. If received in
> error, please contact the sender by return e-mail and delete this e-mail
> and all attachments from your system.
>
>
>
> 
 - d4s_03!.DOC

Sharon, Kriste, and I discussed this, and agreed that simple was better.  We 
also thought that a reference to the Enron Employee Data Protection Policy 
and the Code of Ethics provisions on data should be referenced, with a link, 
if possible.  Thanks. Michelle

If we place this on every page, I'd recommend we keep it simple and clear as 
is below.  

If we need to establish an accept/decline box I'd recommend we build it so 
the user only has to accept once, after which an intranet cookie would 
remember that the user accepted and wouldn't burden the user with the 
question each and every time.

	Sharon Butcher
	09/25/2000 12:28 PM
		
Dear Andrea:  I am in agreement with the proposed statement.  Does anyone 
believe that we need a longer statement.

Thanks. 

Sharon

Andrea Yowman
09/24/2000 09:47 AM
Dear all, 

We are about to embark on opening up more Enron people data to the general 
Enron population (i.e. expertfinder).  I want to ensure the appropriate risks 
have been identified, documented and agreed upon by the Enron executive 
staff.  Michelle mentioned last week that we may want to consider putting 
some proprietary statement on our applications that house people data. 
Therefore, I would like to have an agreed upon statement that can be posted 
in our applications. 
Here's one to get you started.  I would like to have this finalized by 
Tuesday September 25th.  Thanks. ay

'Enron proprietary information, for internal use only.'

Mary, I won't be able to call her until next week because I'm going to be 
out/tied up the rest of this week.  I am fine if you want to call her.  My 
only caution would be that you give her data only about our structure -- not 
why we set it up the way we did or anything else that would be privileged and 
confidential.  The structure itself would not be privileged -- only our 
strategies and basis for setting it up that way would be.  If you don't mind 
a delay in the return call, I'll do it next week.  Just let me know.  
Thanks.  Michelle

Mary Joyce@ENRON
09/25/2000 08:45 PM
Is it more appropriate for you to call?

Thanks!

Mary
While You Were Out
Contact:
of:
Phone:
FAX:
Linda Rorr
Proctor Gamble
513-983-8697
513-983-2611

Message:
Mary, the above called Peggy Menchaca (who passed the message to me.) They 
are in the process of doing a benchmarking study on non-compete clauses. 
Could you help them out?

please print for me as well as attachemnts.  thanks. mhc

Mark Greenberg@ENRON
09/08/2000 04:41 PM
Dee/Fran -

I just received the attached information which are the labor/pension reports 
from Roland Massicotte.  

Mark
Senior Counsel, ENA
Phone:     713-345-8897
Facsimile: 713-646-3940
E-Mail:      Mark.Greenberg@enron.com
	Johanne Berthiaume <berthiaumej@lapros.qc.ca>
	09/08/2000 03:17 PM
		 
 <<ctf001!.DOC>>  <<ctm601!.DOC>>   <<ctk701!.DOC>>
Collective Agreements   Separation Allowances     Outstanding Labour Issues
     to non-unionized employees

See attached documents.

From Roland Massicotte, Lapointe Rosenstein
Tel (514) 925-6326
massicotter@lapros.qc.ca

>  ___________________________________
>  Le pr,sent courrier ,lectronique (courriel) et les documents qui y
> sont  attach,s peuvent contenir de l'information confidentielle; ils
> s'adressent exclusivement au destinataire mentionn, ci-dessus et nulle
> autre personne ne doit en prendre connaissance ni les utiliser ou les
> divulguer.  Si vous recevez le pr,sent courriel par erreur, veuillez en
> aviser l',metteur imm,diatement par courrier ,lectronique et le d,truire
> avec les documents qui y sont attach,s.
>
>  The information contained in this e-mail and all attachments is
> confidential and is for the sole use of its intended recipient. It may not
> be disclosed to or used by anyone other than the addressee. If received in
> error, please contact the sender by return e-mail and delete this e-mail
> and all attachments from your system.
>
>
>
> 
 - ctf001!.DOC
 - ctm601!.DOC
 - ctk701!.DOC

Attached is a draft of the Agreement for Recruiting or Contract Personnel 
Services.  This draft combines the Master Services Agreement, the Agreement 
for Project Services, and the Staffing Services Agreement into a single, 
comprehensive document.

Attached to this, as applicable, will be a Project Work Description ("PWD") 
and/or a Staffing Services Description ("SSD").  I understand that HR is 
working on a revised PWD.

I will circulate the SSD in the near future.  It will contain a more specific 
description of staffing services (e.g. retained/contingency) as well as pay 
rates.

Please review this draft to determine if it fits your needs.  Feel free to 
throw darts!  Let me know by return email if you have comments or questions.  
I will resolve as many as possible based upon your comments as well as those 
of others in Legal, and circulate a revised draft based upon those comments.

Thank you.

Kay, 10/10 works for me at 4:00.  If that date doesn't work, would you please 
include my assistant, Twanda Sweet, on the distribution, given that I will be 
out at the law conference for the rest of the day and tomorrow?  Thanks.  
Michelle

   
	
	

Seems that  tomorrow isn't good.   How does Tuesday October 10th  @ 4:00 pm 
sound ?

Kay 3-0643

Sarah will be on vacation tomorrow.

	Kay Chapman
	10/05/2000 11:08 AM
		
Could you please let me know your availability for the meeting David is 
requesting.  Tomorrow, Friday, October 6th looks good for us.  If you are 
booked for tomorrow, early next week is our next option.  

Please call me or email at your earliest convenience so we can get this 
meeting setup before all our calendars get full.

Thanks in advance for your quick response.

Kay 3-0643  

David Oxley
10/05/2000 10:20 AM
I notice my calender doesn't yet seem to have this meeting scheduled. I will 
ask Kay Chapman (since Rhonna has now deserted me!) to help put a time 
together. Drew/Mary, FYI sorry I didn't get a chance to send you this before. 
Let me know if you want to attend, happy to have you there.

Gerry, can you help me put an agenda together so that everyone knows what we 
are looking to achieve here. In broad terms I am looking to do the following:

Update all on project we set HR Associate group and their recommendations
Discuss their recommendations and look at any refinements or ideas we think 
we should also incorporate (see my thumb nail sketch notes inspired by 
Associate group below).
Reaffirm commitment to take this project forward and agree:
Team for doing so
Resources and timimg
Methodology for agreeing final version.
My ambition is that we (but in particular Andrea, Bob, Gerry, Tim, Tana, Dan, 
Neil, myself and possibly Suzanne if she can given the work she had already 
done in this area) all agree to contribute to this and get it done without 
the need for a formation of a new team or group. Obviously everyone welcome 
to participate.

Tana/Dan,

Can you cicruclate a summary of your teams proposals to this group so we they 
can review before meeting. Could you also agree within your team who you 
would like to attend this meeting (I would suggest 2 or 3 of you attend 
rather than all).

Thanks

David

David Oxley
09/26/2000 11:38 AM
Rhonna,

Please arrange a meeting later this week for all of those addressed by this 
message (Vince, it would great if one of your team could attend since we will 
need some heavy statistical and analytical help to complete this project).

The prupose of the meeting will be to discuss and delegate next steps 
required to implement the HR Associate groups recommendations for the 
development of an HR "value index" at Enron.

I would anticipate we will need approx 45minutes.

David

I'm here til 3:30, when meetings begin. . .  thanks!  mhc

   

Michelle, 

I have completed this analysis.  Are you in your office this afternoon?  If 
so, I will drop it by.

Felecia

fyi.

Michelle, 

I have completed this analysis.  Are you in your office this afternoon?  If 
so, I will drop it by.

Felecia

Ben, there should be a standard form for this -- check with Candace.  If not, 
let me know.  Michelle

Ben Herman@ENRON
10/13/2000 01:26 PM
Pardon my forgetfullness.!
 

Michelle,

Please review the attached letter.  I will be using this in my termination of 
a contract this afternoon.

Thanks for your help.

Ben  3.4822

As we discussed, attached is a confidential draft of the Corporate Services 
Agreement between Garden State Paper Company LLC and ENA.

Corporate Services Agreement

cover memo

Clark, Thank you; I received this and will look over your comments.  If I 
have any questions, I'll give you a call.  I appreciate being included.  
Michelle

Michelle:

 Here is copy of email message to Mark with redlined version of
proposed services agreement.

     Clark

 - AGREEMT.DOC

please calendar for me.  Thanks!!  You also should attend if you are 
interested.  Michelle

Sally Alvarez, Charla Stuart, Karen Moore and Mark Wilson have been working 
on the development of concepts for the new Enron daycare center scheduled to 
open the fall of 2001.  They have developed 3-5 alternatives and will be 
holding open forum type focus groups on:

December 11th and 12th in room EB49C3 from 11 am to 1 pm.

If your schedule allows we would love to have you stop by and provide your 
feedback.  In addition, if you know of employees within your companies that 
would like to provide input please extend the offer to them.  

Our Wellness group is also working with Karen Moore to develop potential new 
names for the Body Shop.  If they are ready by the 11th, we will also solicit 
input on these as well.

Thanks in advance for your help
Cb

Cathy, let's talk about the outstanding issues on Monday so that we can wrap 
these up.  Thanks.  Michelle

   

Michelle,

Please let know what you thing regarding the following:

1) Two of the RW employees have called asking about their Cobra coverage and 
whether or not they are due money for the coverage.  One could argue ( and 
they obviously are ) that health and welfare coverage constitutes part of 
their employment and should be paid to them as part of their separation.

If we provide it to one then we really need to be consistent and apply it to 
everyone.  I'm sure they are speaking to each other on a daily basis.

2) Russell Gilardi's attorney has made comment that one could interpret his 
contract to mean that he has a fixed term contract through the end of the 
year.  Here is the wording verbatim: 

'Commencing on your agreement to the terms of this letter, both you and the 
Company will be required to give not less than 3 months notice in writing to 
terminate your employment, such notice to expire at any time on or after 1st 
January 2001.'

I think Hoyt missed this last part when he sent you the info for the 
separation agreements.  For your info, other RW employees with this 
particular type of wording had their contracts fully paid out.

3) Joel Insinga is requesting that his non-compete be reduced from 6 months 
to 3 months.   He was with MG for a little over a month.  I've asked the SVP 
of the division for his thoughts and should hear something tomorrow.   

Thanks and hopefully we are nearing the end.!

Cathy

Dave,

Is this the proposed, revised policy that OLER is working on?  The reason I 
ask is that OLER is revising all Enron policies right now, and I think that 
the harassment prevention policy is being revised as well.  I'd just as soon 
we use the latest and greatest instead of the one that is soon to be 
replaced.  Check with Valeria Hope or Susan Tosoni about the status.

Thanks.

Michelle

   

Michelle,

Here is Enron's harassment policy and the modification I made for CGAS.  Let 
me know what you think.

Thanks,
Dave

No, I have not sent any information.  I doubt that Hoyt has, either.  You 
send them the information before they sign.  I would just do a cover memo and 
references the agreement, where there is a specific provision about receipt 
of information.
Thanks.  MHC

   

Michelle,

What's the protocol?  Do we wait for them to sign before I send the the ODWP 
info or should I send it now.  The only people this applies to are Mo and 
Leying Sheng.  I thing you or Hoyt have already sent the info to Mo, right?

Do you have a memo that usually goes out with the information?

Thanks
Cathy

Michelle Cash@ECT
10/13/2000 05:24 PM
Cathy,

Also, for persons over 40 who are signing waivers, we must provide them with 
the census data about persons under 40/over 40 who were offered a package, as 
well as their title and age.  Please make sure that happens, or our waivers 
will not be valid.

Thanks. 

Michelle

What about Paskoff?  His lawyer is calling me.  Michelle

   

Michelle,

Regarding the items below,  here is the current status:

COBRA, we agreed to address it on an individual basis.

Gilardi - Once I get the  new agreements from you he is ready to sign.  Do 
you know if these have been sent?

Insigna - We stood fast ont he 6 month non-solicitation and he is coming in 
today  sign the agreements.

Thanks
Cathy

Michelle Cash@ECT
10/15/2000 07:57 PM
Cathy, let's talk about the outstanding issues on Monday so that we can wrap 
these up.  Thanks.  Michelle

   

Michelle,

Please let know what you thing regarding the following:

1) Two of the RW employees have called asking about their Cobra coverage and 
whether or not they are due money for the coverage.  One could argue ( and 
they obviously are ) that health and welfare coverage constitutes part of 
their employment and should be paid to them as part of their separation.

If we provide it to one then we really need to be consistent and apply it to 
everyone.  I'm sure they are speaking to each other on a daily basis.

2) Russell Gilardi's attorney has made comment that one could interpret his 
contract to mean that he has a fixed term contract through the end of the 
year.  Here is the wording verbatim: 

'Commencing on your agreement to the terms of this letter, both you and the 
Company will be required to give not less than 3 months notice in writing to 
terminate your employment, such notice to expire at any time on or after 1st 
January 2001.'

I think Hoyt missed this last part when he sent you the info for the 
separation agreements.  For your info, other RW employees with this 
particular type of wording had their contracts fully paid out.

3) Joel Insinga is requesting that his non-compete be reduced from 6 months 
to 3 months.   He was with MG for a little over a month.  I've asked the SVP 
of the division for his thoughts and should hear something tomorrow.   

Thanks and hopefully we are nearing the end.!

Cathy

sounds fine to me.  Michelle

Dave Hill@ENRON
10/16/2000 03:52 PM
Michelle,

Susan Tosoni said the revisions will not be out before Jan. 2001.  Valeria 
said any changes will be minor.  Do you want to just proceed with this one?

Thanks,
Dave

Michelle Cash@ECT
10/15/2000 08:02 PM
Dave,

Is this the proposed, revised policy that OLER is working on?  The reason I 
ask is that OLER is revising all Enron policies right now, and I think that 
the harassment prevention policy is being revised as well.  I'd just as soon 
we use the latest and greatest instead of the one that is soon to be 
replaced.  Check with Valeria Hope or Susan Tosoni about the status.

Thanks.

Michelle

   

Michelle,

Here is Enron's harassment policy and the modification I made for CGAS.  Let 
me know what you think.

Thanks,
Dave

those look good.  Has Sheng already signed?  Let me know.

Also, we need an answer on Paskoff; his lawyer called again.  Thanks.  MHC

   

Michelle,

FYI, Attached is what I'm fed exing to Mo and Leying Sheng.

Cathy

Dave, why don't you send it to Steve for review.  The consultant doing the 
training will be working from this.  

When do we want to set up the training?  Our lawyers are ready to go.

Thanks.  Michelle

Dave Hill@ENRON
10/17/2000 06:03 PM
Do you want me to forward this as is to Steve Pruett or are you going to send 
it to the consultant doing the training?
Dave

Michelle Cash@ECT
10/16/2000 05:04 PM
sounds fine to me.  Michelle

Dave Hill@ENRON
10/16/2000 03:52 PM
Michelle,

Susan Tosoni said the revisions will not be out before Jan. 2001.  Valeria 
said any changes will be minor.  Do you want to just proceed with this one?

Thanks,
Dave

Michelle Cash@ECT
10/15/2000 08:02 PM
Dave,

Is this the proposed, revised policy that OLER is working on?  The reason I 
ask is that OLER is revising all Enron policies right now, and I think that 
the harassment prevention policy is being revised as well.  I'd just as soon 
we use the latest and greatest instead of the one that is soon to be 
replaced.  Check with Valeria Hope or Susan Tosoni about the status.

Thanks.

Michelle

   

Michelle,

Here is Enron's harassment policy and the modification I made for CGAS.  Let 
me know what you think.

Thanks,
Dave

Drew,

Louise and Robert have brought me into the loop on the employee in London who 
has had some issues.  I would appreciate it if you would fax me a copy of his 
agreement.  I will be out of the office tomorrow, so, if possible, could you 
fax it to my house first thing in the morning?  713-218-7355 is the fax 
number.  If you send it around 5:30 am Houston time, then I can have time to 
review it and incorporate its provisions into the draft correspondence that I 
will prepare on this topic.  I am going to be attending a seminar out of the 
office starting around 8:00 am Houston time.

I will prepare draft correspondence and circulate it to you, Robert, and 
Louise for comment and dart-throwing.  I can be reached via my cell phone 
during the day at 713-302-5522.

Thanks, Drew.

Michelle

Drew, thanks, I got it.  I'll be sending out an email on this in the next 
couple of hours.  I'll send it to you and Robert first.  You can run it by 
Chapman and/or outside counsel in London today. If everyone is in agreement 
as to the approach, we can send it to Louise asap.  More to come . . . .  
Michelle

Drew C Lynch
10/19/2000 05:33 AM
Done. Let me know that you received the document.

DCL

Michelle Cash
19/10/2000 01:45
Drew,

Louise and Robert have brought me into the loop on the employee in London who 
has had some issues.  I would appreciate it if you would fax me a copy of his 
agreement.  I will be out of the office tomorrow, so, if possible, could you 
fax it to my house first thing in the morning?  713-218-7355 is the fax 
number.  If you send it around 5:30 am Houston time, then I can have time to 
review it and incorporate its provisions into the draft correspondence that I 
will prepare on this topic.  I am going to be attending a seminar out of the 
office starting around 8:00 am Houston time.

I will prepare draft correspondence and circulate it to you, Robert, and 
Louise for comment and dart-throwing.  I can be reached via my cell phone 
during the day at 713-302-5522.

Thanks, Drew.

Michelle

Dee,

I assume that you will go through these documents for benefits/plan issues 
and then send relevant ones to Pat this week.  If that is not your plan, let 
me know.

Thanks!

Michelle

Craig Hiddleston@ENRON
10/24/2000 06:58 PM
The information that we have requested from the Georgia Pacific data room has 
been sent to us here in Houston and is available for your review in EB2943. 
We are obligated under the confidentiality agreement that Enron has signed to 
keep all information provided to us confidential and to return all 
information, including any reproductions, at the end of this process. 
Therefore, I ask that where possible you minimize photocopying (we have 
EB2943 set aside for our exclusive use) and let me know what photocopies you 
have made.

Based on the management presentations and other information available we have 
changed the scope for our potential acquisition of the GP assets. We will: 
Proceed with the Leaf River mill with the expectation of submitting a binding 
bid 
Perform some additional due diligence to determine whether we should further 
pursue the Woodland mill, and
Not pursue the Brunswick mill.

Given the altered scope no work is required in evaluating Brunswick. By Oct. 
1st we will decide whether to submit a bid for Woodland. GP still requires 
that binding bids be submitted by mid-November and this date will apply to 
both Leaf River and Woodland. Regardless of the delayed decision with respect 
to Woodland we have little time to understand the issues/risks and to 
conclude on the impact on whether Enron would want to own these assets and at 
what cost. 

We want your feedback as soon as possible so that we can incorporate that 
information into the internal management approval process and consequently 
the bid(s) that we will be submitting. Our current schedule has the 
management approval process beginning on November 9th.

If you have any questions, please contact me.

Craig

More info about Bond.  Michelle

Amanda Curless@ENRON
12/06/2000 05:53 PM
Michelle,
This is Scott Williamson's reponses. I talked with him about the number of 
times he travels out of the US for work and he said for Enron he has and will 
not travel for work. For Conchango he does. Right now he is in the UK trying 
to get his visa situation straightened out?? I don't know what that means.
Mandy
1. I need Steve until I'm able to hire someone to fulfill that role.  We are 
actively recruiting and interviewing candidates for his activities.
2. I simply do not have an answer for your second question. We have not 
discussed or agreed upon a set number of trips.

Scott

	Amanda Curless@ENRON
	12/06/2000 02:55 PM
		 
Scott,
Once again we need some more information about Stephen Bond. How long will he 
be here? and how many trips in and out of the US will he make? Please let me 
know as soon as possible so we can bring this to a conclusion. Thanks Scott!!
Mandy

Here is the agreement for Lutz.  Michelle

Please see attached.

Anne C. Koehler
Sr. Counsel, ENA
EB 3832
713-853-3448

David,

I am in agreement with you on this.  This week, we lost an agreement that had 
options to be granted.  It did not make it to the Administrative Committee 
until 2 months after signing, and only because the employee came forward and 
asked about her grant.  Luckily for us, the strike price was better/lower.  
If it had been the other way around, we may have had a much bigger issue.

Michelle

David Oxley
10/18/2000 09:03 AM
	

I remain very, very nervous that we have this covered. I need you to get to 
grips with the following and go through it with me asap:

Who is appointed person who is going to co-ordinate all contract activity in 
ENA, EGM, EIM etc., (make sure database is up to date, make sure parameters 
are clear, make sure B/C's know what process is, make sure Corp Comp are in 
loop on VP and above deals, who liaises with legal and makes sure they are in 
loop on all,  etc.,)
Where is the accurate report of existing contracts, those under discussion 
and those top performers who we should think about.
How do we circulate this via HR leads to the OTC's to make sure that we are 
ahead of the game
How do we track the overall numbers, efforts and issues in regards to these 
contracts so that we can feedback a macro picture of their effectiveness.

I suggest we meet before weekend.

David

Thanks.  What about the COBRA amounts?  Are they correct?  

I will be glad to close this one out, too!

Michelle

   

Michelle,

Got your fax.  I've asked the Metal's MD to approve the additional 10K so we 
can finally close out this issue with Paskoff.

Will let you know when he replies.

Thanks
Cathy

hi, Trang,

I would like to have a little more information about this.  Who is she 
sending emails to?  When were they sent?  Have all the bills been paid?  etc.

Thanks.

Michelle

   
	
	

Per your request, please find Flavia's contact information below.

Flavia Shroeder
FS Language Services, Inc.
5401 Loch Lomond
Houston, TX 77096
(713) 721-7442
(713) 721-6364

fax : (713) 721-7440
email: fslang@neosoft.com
flavia@neosoft.com

Attached is a revised draft of the Employee Data Protection Policy.

Pat,

Here is the latest PSA draft for a 

We've agreed to pay $1mm of the severance.  We also have agreed to pay the 
cost of 2000 bonuses.  On options, there is a proposal for Enron to supervest 
the employees' options at closing -- can we agree to that? I didn't think 
so.  

your comments would be appreciated.

Michelle

This is the version of the Triple Lutz Purchase and sale Agreement that we 
have prepared in response to Bidder D's comments.  Please review and provide 
me  with your comments by this afternoon, if possible.  If you will not be 
able to respond that quickly, just let me know.  Thanks.

Anne C. Koehler
Sr. Counsel, ENA
EB 3832
713-853-3448
	"Collins, Christopher" <chriscollins@velaw.com>
	Sent by: "Lowell, Katrina" <klowell@velaw.com>
	10/19/2000 11:09 AM
		 
 <<Enron Bidder D Redlined PSA.DOC>>

 - Enron Bidder D Redlined PSA.DOC

David,

The "gardening leave provision would apply beyond the term.

I will make your tweak to 3.4.

I checked the 12-months with Clayton Utz, and they thought it was ok.

I'll forward a new draft in the next day or so.  Hope you had a good trip 
back.

MIchelle

David Minns@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
10/29/2000 10:44 PM
Michelle thanks, Only one point -  it was my understanding that the 
"gardening leave" provision would also apply to a resignation after the end 
of the 2 year period. In other words if I resigned in 4 years (and assuming 
no further service contract had been put in place) the company could prevent 
me taking another job for upto 3 months after the termination if there was 
pay for that period.

Two other points;
The new paragraph in 3.4 could be read to infer that the Monthly Base Salary 
for the non-compete period would be paid up-front. Would it be safer to pay 
monthly conditional upon compliance with the obligations?
Have we thought about the enforcability of the 12 month non-compete for 
resignations during the term? This is not a concern to me and I am content 
with the existing arrangement for my contract. However, as a far as the 
precedent is concerned I would like a provision we could definitely enforce.

I will call you tomorrow to discuss.

Have him interview with Dan Rogers, Alan Aronowitz, Barbara Gray, and ask 
them who else they would like to have talk with him.  Thanks.  Michelle

   

Got your voicemail with Carlos' attached, and will be happy to schedule the 
interviews for him on Monday and/orTuesday.   Who did you decide he should 
interview with?

Molly

Michelle Cash
12/05/2000 11:33 AM
no, hold all of them until I speak with him -- we've obviously got a lot of 
interest!  Michelle

   

I'll wait to hear from you for all interviews for him--or did you want me to 
go ahead and schedule him with Barbara anyway?

Michelle Cash
12/05/2000 11:00 AM
Here are others who want to interview Carlos.  I tell you what -- before you 
schedule any of these, let me talk with Carlos first to see where his 
interests lie.  Keep these names, and I'll keep you posted on who to schedule 
with him.  Thanks.  Michelle

Alan Aronowitz
12/05/2000 10:46 AM
Dan Rogers and I would each like to meet with Carlos for a potential position 
with EGM. Could you arrange?

Alan

Michelle Cash
12/04/2000 10:04 PM
Attached is the resume of Carlos Sole, who currently is working for EECC.  He 
is interested in pursuing opportunities within EWS, and we received excellent 
references about his work performance from John Schwartzenburg and Kay Mann.  
I am meeting with him on Friday of this week (he is out of town until then).  
If you have an interest in talking with him, let me know, and I will arrange 
a meeting.

Thanks.  Michelle

Michelle, per my voicemail as I indicated, I am trying to pursue what 
opportunities may be available at EWS and both Julia Murray and Kay Mann 
recommended that I contact you.  As background, I have been at EECC since 
October last year where I have focused on traditional EPC contracts and joint 
venture agreements with construction partners, cross-border financing 
agreements principally in Mexico and merger and acquisition/strategic 
investment transactions.  Before coming to Enron, I worked with the Houston 
office of a New York based firm (Curtis, Mallet-Prevost, Colt & Mosle)  where 
I focused mostly on transactions in Mexico since we represented Pemex on 
their transactions involving long and short term oil supply agreements and 
CFE (Mexico's electricity commission) on its public bids for EPC and IPP 
projects.  Lastly, I started my legal career in 1994 at Patton Boggs in 
Washington, DC where I focused on general domestic corporate transactions 
such as establishing new business entities (ie, joint venture work, 
partnerships etc.), m & a work, and securities offerings.  Thanks for your 
consideration and I look forward to talking with you when you return from 
vacation (my extension is 6-6127).  

please preparre a "no thanks" letter to this person.  Thanks.  Michelle

Here's our standard decline letter.  

Molly

Michelle Cash
12/05/2000 11:46 PM
Molly, could you please forward the "thanks, but no  thanks" template letter 
to me?  I will send it to her since she interviewed.  For persons who don't 
interview,  I think the "no thanks" letter can come from HR.

Thanks for your assistance on this. 

Michelle

ARLGin48@aol.com on 11/30/2000 10:09:04 PM
Dear Michelle---Just a note to tell you I thoroughly enjoyed meeting you
today.  Thank you for taking time to learn more about my background and
experience and to share your Enron story with me.  I am very interested in
the available position because I welcome the opportunity to learn new things
and improve my skills.  Although I have not worked at a law firm, I am
fortunate to say that my in-house experience has been very hands-on with most
of the transactions and all of the labor matters handled without outside
counsel.  I discussed this point at some length with Elizabeth Sager and left
a reference list with Molly McGee in HR.  Looking forward to hearing from you
soon,

Alice Ginsburgh

Dan, what is the status of this deal?  I hadn't heard anything for a few 
days, and I knew we were on a tight time frame.  Thanks.  Michelle

Kathy Neal@ENRON
11/16/2000 03:27 PM
FYI
John Howton@ECT
11/16/2000 03:12 PM
Kathy,

Here is Wayne's response to the HR due diligence questions that Michelle 
proposed.  What are your thoughts?  Let me know what you need, and I will 
push him for adequate answers.  I will forward you the e-mail of the employee 
manual.  In addition, I believe Maribel Mata in due diligence has a hard copy 
of Power System's employee manual; you may call her and see if you can get it 
(I left her a message letting her know you may be calling her).

Thanks,

John H.
John,

This list relates to an acquisition which is not the case.  I think you're
all set from the benefit information we are giving you.  I'll have Lori
email you the employee manual (you have it in hard copy already).

Wayne

Wayne,

I know some of the items on this list may not apply, but please take your
best shot at responding to each of the items on this list.  You can send
your answers/comments back to me, and I will make sure they get to the
appropriate party.

Thanks,

John H.
3-7875
Michelle Cash
11/15/2000 03:22 PM

For AMPS:  Here are the HR questions for diligence.  Michelle

(See attached file: 2000duediligencewksheet.doc)

David,

The document you gave me is the form assignment letter that I have prepared 
for many Bridgeline personnel.  Do we need to do anything to tweak it?  How 
do you want me to proceed?

Thanks.

Michelle

   

I faxed the sample down earlier today.

Michelle Cash
12/05/2000 11:03 AM
David, I did not receive the package in interoffice mail.  Could you email it 
to me or re-send it by fax at 646-3490?  Thanks!  Michelle

   

Did you receive my interoffice mail?  It had an example of the contract 
Bridgeline wants to create for Risk.

Dave

please save, run spell check, and print for my review.  I think that Robert 
Jones or Oxley will have to sign it instead of me, since I am not an 
officer.  Thanks.  MHCC

Michelle, here is the letter that Kerry and I were able to put together this
morning.  Hopefully this is exactly what you wanted.  If all is o.k., please
sign and fax a copy back to me at 214-880-0181 and send the original to:
      ELT
      Attn: Gary Meisner
      650 California Street

      San Francisco California
94108

Please date the letter for November 30th since we have already started the
preparation for the materials and scheduling.  Thanks

 <<Enron Extension Letter2.doc>>

Jim Staley
Account Executive
Employment Law Learning Technologies
Phone: (214) 880-8166
Fax: (214) 880-0181
jstaley@elt-inc.com
www.elt-inc.com

 - Enron Extension Letter2.doc

Add Tweed to the persons to interview Carlos Sole.  Thanks.  MHC

I am interested in Carlos.  I would also like to run some references on 
Bonnie Nelson.

Sheila, 

HR is setting up interviews with Carlos next week, and you will be on the 
interviewer list.  Thanks!

How would you like references run on Bonnie?  Internally or pre-Enron.  Let 
me know, since this is the first time I have received that request (given 
that I am new in this role!).

Thanks.

Michelle

I am interested in Carlos.  I would also like to run some references on 
Bonnie Nelson.

Barbara, HR should be contacting you about interviewing him next week..  A 
number of folks are interested in Carlos!  Thanks for the response.  Michelle

 I think we should speak with this candidate about a position in our 
group..................working with Peggy on Mexican matters

	Michelle Cash
	12/04/2000 10:04 PM
		 
Attached is the resume of Carlos Sole, who currently is working for EECC.  He 
is interested in pursuing opportunities within EWS, and we received excellent 
references about his work performance from John Schwartzenburg and Kay Mann.  
I am meeting with him on Friday of this week (he is out of town until then).  
If you have an interest in talking with him, let me know, and I will arrange 
a meeting.

Thanks.  Michelle

Michelle, per my voicemail as I indicated, I am trying to pursue what 
opportunities may be available at EWS and both Julia Murray and Kay Mann 
recommended that I contact you.  As background, I have been at EECC since 
October last year where I have focused on traditional EPC contracts and joint 
venture agreements with construction partners, cross-border financing 
agreements principally in Mexico and merger and acquisition/strategic 
investment transactions.  Before coming to Enron, I worked with the Houston 
office of a New York based firm (Curtis, Mallet-Prevost, Colt & Mosle)  where 
I focused mostly on transactions in Mexico since we represented Pemex on 
their transactions involving long and short term oil supply agreements and 
CFE (Mexico's electricity commission) on its public bids for EPC and IPP 
projects.  Lastly, I started my legal career in 1994 at Patton Boggs in 
Washington, DC where I focused on general domestic corporate transactions 
such as establishing new business entities (ie, joint venture work, 
partnerships etc.), m & a work, and securities offerings.  Thanks for your 
consideration and I look forward to talking with you when you return from 
vacation (my extension is 6-6127).  

Mark, as an update, I am meeting with Carlos tomorrow.  He will interview 
with a number of folks next week, including Sheila, Barbara, Alan, and Dan 
(all of whom expressed an interest in talking with him about working in their 
groups).  Assuming all goes well, I'll schedule a meeting with you after 
that.  Michelle

What is the status of our discussions with Carlos?   Mark
	John Schwartzenburg@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	12/04/2000 01:29 PM
		
Mark,  although I will hate to lose  Carlos and everyone here at EECC and 
NEPCO wants him to stay, in point of fact he has repaid his debt to society 
and is entitled to look at opportunites outside of EECC now. Please feel free 
to talk with him. He is discussing matters with Vicki et al now, and  she is 
aware that he will be contacting ENA (EWS?)as well.  

 As background, it was understood at the time we took Carlos on board that 
his long term career interests were not limited to our construction work, 
and, consistent with his resume, I have kept him mostly focused on our equity 
and finance related matters (including work-outs).  I do think well of 
Carlos, and certainly believe that he is a lawyer that Enron wants to keep.

	Carlos Sole
	12/01/2000 09:36 AM
		 
Michelle, per my voicemail as I indicated, I am trying to pursue what 
opportunities may be available at EWS and both Julia Murray and Kay Mann 
recommended that I contact you.  As background, I have been at EECC since 
October last year where I have focused on traditional EPC contracts and joint 
venture agreements with construction partners, cross-border financing 
agreements principally in Mexico and merger and acquisition/strategic 
investment transactions.  Before coming to Enron, I worked with the Houston 
office of a New York based firm (Curtis, Mallet-Prevost, Colt & Mosle)  where 
I focused mostly on transactions in Mexico since we represented Pemex on 
their transactions involving long and short term oil supply agreements and 
CFE (Mexico's electricity commission) on its public bids for EPC and IPP 
projects.  Lastly, I started my legal career in 1994 at Patton Boggs in 
Washington, DC where I focused on general domestic corporate transactions 
such as establishing new business entities (ie, joint venture work, 
partnerships etc.), m & a work, and securities offerings.  Thanks for your 
consideration and I look forward to talking with you when you return from 
vacation (my extension is 6-6127).  

Fran,

What was the resolution of the payments  to the LRC people?

Michelle

Thanks!  Michelle

Hello Michelle,
?
Attached is a summary of further information we have reviewed.  
?
As you may know, next week our firm will be presenting to  Enron a 
comprehensive due diligence memorandum. The human resources component  will 
contain the information I've sent you to date and additional information I  
obtain. I'll?continue to send you information as I receive it, however, so  
that you can continue your own review.
?
?
Date: Thu, 07 Dec 2000 19:37:26 -0800
 - Static copy of Other Employment Matters - Union and Non-Union Employees.doc

Will do, sorry you're working so late!  

I think that Enron internal would be fine.  I have spoken with one commrcial 
person (Ron Coker)  about her and got rave reviews.  She worked very closely 
with Anthony Duenner so maybe you could call him and Bruce Lundstrum.  Also 
Rob Walls.  Thanks for doing this for me.  I'm still a hostage.

Gene, sorry I didn't cc you on this.  Here is the info.  Have a great 
weekend!  Michelle

Michelle Cash
12/07/2000 01:55 PM
Sheila,

The correct name of the fund is Houston Economic Opportunity Fund II, L.P.

Thanks. 

Michelle

Please ask Kristen Walsh if they can find him in Dallas.  Then, let's re-send 
it.  Thanks.  Michelle

   

Just a note to let you know that Alonzo Williams letter (request for signing 
bonus repayment) that we sent certified mail was returned.  It was deemed as 
unclaimed.  Do you want to do anything else with it?

What is the answer?  Michelle

Steve Hamilton <Steve@ECOGAS.com> on 12/08/2000 10:18:44 AM
Michelle:

Could you please answer this question?

Thanks,

Steve

What happens to those people that are currently on Ecogas cobra when Ecogas
is no longer in existence? They have not utilized the 18 months that they
would be entitled to receive those benefits. Is Enron going to pick them up
like they did for the 10/13/00 layoff? Do we need to direct this question to
someone at Enron?

Marie

Jeff, Good luck with the EES rotation.  I would like to clarify one thing:  
at this point, I don't know for sure if we are having law students work with 
us during the summer.  Why don't you check with me in April or May to see 
whether we are hiring summer associates.  If so, you are welcome to go 
through the interview process.  Thanks.  Michelle

	
	Jeff M Gray @ ENRON
	
	12/08/2000 09:40:49 AM
	
Michelle:

Thanks for speaking with me yesterday.  I'm leaning toward accepting a 
position at EES, which is the business unit that I believe offers the best 
fit with my background.  Let's plan on speaking again in a few months, 
because I would enjoy devoting the summer to your group.  I can probably 
bounce from EES to Legal, then back to EES to finish out the Associate 
program.  If possible, pencil me in.

Jeff

	
	Jeff M Gray
	
	12/06/2000
	
Michelle:

I'm close to the point when I need to accept an offer.  Adding value to the 
legal function would be my first choice.  Is this still a possibility?  
Please let me know if I can provide any additional information, or if you 
would like to meet.  I'll be out of the office tomorrow, but will return on 
Friday.

By the way, I recognize that our legal group doesn't have training and 
development resources like those devoted to new Associates in law firms.  
That's not what I'm looking for, and it doesn't apply to me at my age and 
experience-level.  My proposition is to use primarily my non-legal 
intellectual capital to add value to your group, and only secondarily the 
legal intellectual capital, which I'm still developing, and which will 
improve through osmosis if I'm in your group.

Thanks,

Jeff

	
	Jeff M Gray
	
	11/15/2000
	
Michelle:

To confirm my voicemail, my current rotation ends December 31.  I'm 
interested in a six-month rotation in the legal department beginning January 
2.  I completed 46 hours at the University at Buffalo Law School, before my 
teaching contract expired and the Enron opportunity arose.  The ABA allows 30 
credits to be transferred between law schools, so I began at South Texas 
College of Law with 30 credits, and will complete nine credits this 
semester.  A total of ninety are required.

My schedule tomorrow afternoon and late morning is open.  If you can schedule 
time to meet, I'd appreciate the opportunity.

Jeff

Let me know if you would have any interest in talking with this candidate.  
Michelle

Daniel R Rogers@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
12/08/2000 04:43 PM
Alan,

Attached is the resume of Charles Glizzard, a candidate that would like to be 
considered for a Global Markets legal position.  We should probably consider 
him for the role of Marine Transportation specialist, but it appears his 
skill set also shows an ability to do quite a bit more for us.

Kind regards,
Dan

	"Sandy Baird" <sbaird@davis.ca>
	12/08/2000 01:39 PM
		 
The following is a message and attachments from Brian Hiebert:

Re:  Project Canary - Interim Legal Due Diligence and Transaction Analysis 
for the Celgar Pulpmill.

Further to our e-mail of last evening forwarding the above report and the 
enclosed hard copies of this report which you will have received by courier 
this morning, enclosed for replacement of the existing document at Tab 1 is a 
revised version of our overview memorandum.  At the time of sending our 
document last evening I did not yet have our real estate report.  This 
portion of the report has been incorporated.  This document should therefore 
replace the existing document at Tab 1.

Second, enclosed is a more detailed labour/employment due diligence report 
which should replace the existing document at Tab 4 of your binder.

Third, enclosed is a more detailed real estate due diligence report which 
should be placed at Tab 5 of your binder.

Finally, enclosed is a more detailed review of the banking documents and 
security which should be placed at Tab 10.

If you have any questions please feel free to give me a call.

 - Static copy of DUE DILIGENCE REPORT - CELGAR PULPMILL.doc
 - Static copy of Summary of Celgar's Collective Agreement....doc
 - tab10.doc
 - tab5.doc

Dan,

I have been working with James McMillan on the LNG project in Venezuela.  I 
would like to have some additional information about structure, project 
company, etc., and figured you would know where I could obtain that 
information.  

Thanks.

Michelle

please print this plus attached in color.  Thanks.  Michelle

Gracie S Presas
12/11/2000 03:11 PM
Michelle,

Please see the attached for changes approved by Tim.  Anything showing in 
green should be included.  

If you have any questions, please call us.  Paige will be here the rest of 
the week.

Gracie
3-3985

please do a consulting agreeement with this group.  Michelle

James McMillan@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
12/11/2000 01:27 PM
Michelle,

As most Engineering Contractors are beginning to staff up, it is prudent for 
us to have more than one Professional Services Agreements in place for the 
VLNG Front End Engineering Design effort.  Another Company that I have delt 
with in the past, and which also provided assistance to Enron on the Dabhol 
Power Project, is Paragon Engineering Services, Inc.  As requested for 
Technip USA in my e-mail of 5 Dec, please begin negotiations with Paragon 
Engineering Services for a Professional Services Agreement, to be in place in 
the Feb/March timeframe.  The contact person at Paragon is:

 Richard Durfee
 Project Manager
 Paragon Engineering Services, Inc.
 10777 Clay Road
 Houston, Texas 77041
 Phone: (713) 570-8068
 Fax: (713) 570-8068
 E-mail:  rdurfee@paraengr.com

Thanks and regards
James

James McMillan
12/05/2000 09:48 AM
Michelle,

Following up on our meeting last week, we need to get a Professional Services 
Agreement in place with Technip USA Corp.  We do not anticipate a need for 
utilizing their resources until Feb/March at the soonest, but as these 
agreements sometimes take a while to negotiate, I believe it appropriate to 
start this one soon.  The contact person at Technip USA is:

 Gerald W. Alves, P.E.
 Commercial Vice President
 Technip USA Corporation
 1990 Post Oak Boulevard, Suite 200
 Phone: 713 548 4263
 Fax: 713 548 4013
 Email:  jalves@Technip.com

As discussed, we need a general type Professional Services Agreement so that 
we can draw upon any of their resources at previously established rates, on 
an as required basis.  

Please let me know how we should proceed with getting this agreement in place,

Regards
James

Never mind about the scarf -- My mother got one for him. Michelle

Michelle Cash
12/10/2000 05:54 PM
If you're thinking about the scaft, it probably should be grey or a dark 
plaid.   I am giving him a black overcoat, so grey probably would go the 
best.  (He wouldn't like a contrasting color like red).

He also wants a really nice manicure set -- one that has tweezers.  

A few more ideas for my Christmas list:

1.  Scarf:  A nice, not too thick, scarf to wear with an overcoat -- i.e. a
little more formal than the old red plaid
2.  Gloves: Leather, again to use with business attire, black

Brooks Brothers would be a good source for both of the above items, but is
not the only place they might be found.  Polo might be another source.

Dean, to whom did you send the package last week?  

Michelle,
?
Sorry, I should have been more clear on the 4 - 6 % vacation  pay. That is 
the statutory minimum under the Employment Standards Act. It  applies to 
non-union employees. It only applies to union employees if the  equivalent 
provisions in the collective agreement do not "meet or exceed" the  Act's 
provisions. Since the collective agreement's provisions are better than  the 
provisions in the Act, the Act's vacation pay provisions do not apply to  
union employees.
?
In terms of the payment schedule, for union employees the  collective 
agreement stipulates they may take their vacation pay at the start of  the 
year. I believe Celgar applies a similar policy for non-union employees, but  
I'll check on that. When their actual time for vacation comes up, they may  
actually have to take that time off without any pay if they've already 
elected  to take the pay earlier.
?
For both union and non-union employees, vacation pay is earned  and accrued 
in one year and paid out the next. So in 2001, all Celgar employees  will be 
entitled to vacation pay based on a percentage of their 2000  earnings.
?
With respect to the standard employment contract, there really  isn't one, 
save for the letter of employment that KPMG sent out to all  employees. The 
letter from KPMG to Doug Cargill is a sample. It was in the  package I sent 
on Friday last week. If you don't have it, please let me know and  I'll send 
it.
?
There are also position descriptions for every union and  non-union employees 
that are given to the employees upon hiring. These might  also be considered 
part of the contract of employment, though they are not  incorporated into a 
letter of employment.
?
Hope that answers your questions. Please let me know if I may  be of further 
assistance.
?
Dean

>>>  <Michelle.Cash@enron.com> 12/11/00 01:25PM >>>

Thanks,  Dean.

Two questions have arisen based upon your diligence  summary:

1.? Do you have a copy of the "standard" employment  letter?? We haven't
seen it (or, at least I haven't).
2.? What  is meant by the 4-6% vacation pay?? How does that work?? How  are
the pre-payments made?? Does the person get the money early and then  not
get paid for time off later on?? Additional explanations would be  helpful.

Thanks.

Michelle

"Dean Crawford"  <dcrawford@davis.ca> on 12/11/2000 02:10:27 PM

Peter & Michelle,

Brian Hiebert forwarded to me  Peter's questions regarding the risk of
asbestos litigation at  Celgar.

Under the Workers Compensation Act, employers in British?  Columbia are
required to contribute to an accident fund which provides?  compensation for
injuries or occupational diseases arising out of employment.  In? turn,?the
Act?provides employers statutory immunity  from?damages? in respect of any
personal injury, disablement or  death arising out of and in? the course of
employment.

The  accident fund would cover asbestos claims. There are no
exceptions?which  would allow asbestos litigation?against employers.? The
Act  does?not prohibit?litigation against third parties, eg.?  manufacturers
of asbestos, but employers, as stated, are immune from  such? actions.

Compensation is payable if the worker sustains  pulmonary injury by a
disabling form of asbestosis. We will make the  appropriate enquires about
any? compensation paid to Celgar  employees.

Dean, do you have any information to respond to the highlighted portions?  
Thanks!  Michelle

Linda Hallmark@ENRON
12/12/2000 11:05 AM
We have completed the benefits portion of the due diligence report on Project 
Canary.  The highlighted portions require additional information and 
documentation.  As per our discussion yesterday, there are numerous questions 
regarding Compensation in the Benefits section.  It is my understanding that 
Compensation is responding to those issues.  If you have any questions or if 
we can be of assistance, please let us know.

 

Linda 

Hello, everyone.  Please let me know which of these dates works best for 
you.  It would be most helpful if you give me a range of available dates for 
both preparation and the deposition itself.  That way, I can find overlapping 
dates on which you all are available.  

Thanks a lot.

Michelle

Michelle,

 Yesterday, counsel for Richard Clonch called, requesting January
dates for the Enron depositions.  He provided me with the following dates
possible dates; 1/3, 1/4, 1/5, 1/8, 1/9, 1/10, 1/11, 1/12, 1/22, 1/23, 1/24,
1/25, 1/26.

 I told him that I would forward these dates to Enron.  I will send
counsel for Richard Clonch availability dates for Enron Officials as soon as
I hear from you.

 Thanks

Tim C. Carrico
Spilman Thomas & Battle, PLLC
email: tcarrico@spilmanlaw.com
phone:             (304)-340-3856
cell phone:       (304)-549-2681
fax:                  (304)-340-3801
address:           300 Kanawha Blvd., East
                       Charleston, W.Va. 25301

fyi.  mhc
Michelle Cash
12/12/2000 11:11 AM
Dean, do you have any information to respond to the highlighted portions?  
Thanks!  Michelle

Linda Hallmark@ENRON
12/12/2000 11:05 AM
We have completed the benefits portion of the due diligence report on Project 
Canary.  The highlighted portions require additional information and 
documentation.  As per our discussion yesterday, there are numerous questions 
regarding Compensation in the Benefits section.  It is my understanding that 
Compensation is responding to those issues.  If you have any questions or if 
we can be of assistance, please let us know.

 

Linda 

Sharon, Mark has said he sees no problem with this.  Do you have any 
thoughts?  Michelle

Michelle Cash
12/06/2000 05:02 PM
Hello!

An ENA employee wrote a book that was published in Russia.  There have been 
three editions, and the publisher wants her to do a 4th.  The topic is 
technical analysis, which is what she does here at Enron.  In this 4th 
edition, she will be using public data, her own PC, and working on her own 
time.  However, given that she has been at Enron for 6 months, she obviously 
would apply some of the knowledge she has gained here in the revision of the 
book.  She would not divulge any Enron confidential or proprietary 
information, however.

What are your thoughts on whether she could be able to do this?  She is 
willing to let Enron be a co-author, although as a practical matter, I do not 
think that would be worthwhile.  My opinion at this point is that she can do 
it, so long as it is on her own time and using her own resources, and, of 
course, provided that she reveals no Enron-specific  information.  I welcome 
your perspective, however, given that this is a new one to me.

Thanks for your thoughts.

Michelle

Is this for Diane?  Thanks.  Michelle

Enron IT Purchasing
12/12/2000 11:33 AM
Please respond to Enron IT Purchasing
Sent by: Linda Zhou
This is an automatic confirmation of the order you have placed using IT 
Central. 

Request Number:   ECTH-4RXNL5
Order For:               Diane Goode

1 x ( Standard Desktop     $1262 ) Enron IT Purchasing

sounds good.  I do plan to attend if you have a meeting!  MHC

Mark Greenberg@ENRON
12/12/2000 11:13 AM
To All -

We have a meeting scheduled for tomorrow at 2:30 in EB38C2.  I am hoping to 
have a test version of the site available - especially since it is due for 
release on Friday.  I have not been able to confirm its availability at this 
time.  If it is not available, there is probably not a reason to meet 
tomorrow as I am sure we all have other projects.

I will let you all know what the status is by late today or early a.m. 
tomorrow.

Mark
Senior Counsel, ENA
Phone:     713-345-8897
Facsimile: 713-646-3940
E-Mail:      Mark.Greenberg@enron.com

I was trying to lowball it!  Michelle

Lisa Mellencamp
12/12/2000 01:32 PM
Lisa J. Mellencamp
	Lisa Mellencamp
	12/12/2000 01:12 PM
		
she knows that.

Lisa J. Mellencamp
	Randal Maffett
	12/12/2000 12:05 PM
		
I was just told by F&J that Michelle called and told them to try and settle 
for $15K +/-.  I told Butch he could go up to $25K which = the amount we've 
got budgeted in the closing funds uses.

I understand that Nigel is working this one.  MHC

David Oxley
12/12/2000 01:23 PM
URGGGHHH!
Gentlemen,

 Thought you might want to know about this.  As I understand, Dr. Mo is still 
on the payroll.

Regards,

Gary

Trena McFarland@ENRON
12/12/2000 12:07 PM
FYI

Dr Mo got onto MG trading floor the other day and was taking photos!
Did a loop of the floor and then left.
HR have been notified.

T

please handle for me.  thanks.  mhc

ARSystem@mailman.enron.com on 12/12/2000 02:59:26 PM
You have received this email because the requester specified you as their 
Manager. Please click 
http://itcapps.corp.enron.com/srrs/auth/emailLink.asp?ID=000000000010092&Page=
Approval to review and act upon this request.

Request ID          : 000000000010092
Request Create Date : 12/12/00 3:00:54 PM
Requested For       : diane.goode@enron.com
Resource Name       : Unlisted Application/Software
Resource Type       : Applications

please handle.  thanks.  mhc

ARSystem@mailman.enron.com on 12/12/2000 02:59:25 PM
You have received this email because the requester specified you as their 
Manager. Please click 
http://itcapps.corp.enron.com/srrs/auth/emailLink.asp?ID=000000000010092&Page=
Approval to review and act upon this request.

Request ID          : 000000000010092
Request Create Date : 12/12/00 3:00:54 PM
Requested For       : diane.goode@enron.com
Resource Name       : VPN
Resource Type       : Applications

please handle for me.  thanks. mhc

ARSystem@mailman.enron.com on 12/12/2000 02:59:23 PM
You have received this email because the requester specified you as their 
Manager. Please click 
http://itcapps.corp.enron.com/srrs/auth/emailLink.asp?ID=000000000010092&Page=
Approval to review and act upon this request.

Request ID          : 000000000010092
Request Create Date : 12/12/00 3:00:54 PM
Requested For       : diane.goode@enron.com
Resource Name       : Westlaw
Resource Type       : Applications

please handle for me.  thanks.  mhc

ARSystem@mailman.enron.com on 12/12/2000 02:59:22 PM
You have received this email because the requester specified you as their 
Manager. Please click 
http://itcapps.corp.enron.com/srrs/auth/emailLink.asp?ID=000000000010092&Page=
Approval to review and act upon this request.

Request ID          : 000000000010092
Request Create Date : 12/12/00 3:00:54 PM
Requested For       : diane.goode@enron.com
Resource Name       : Lexis Nexis Research - Legal
Resource Type       : Applications

Possible contract candidate.  

         What do you think... I am OK for the time being now that Steve is on board.  Julia
Julia,

I just thought that I would check back with you regarding Karen
Pettigrew as a candidate for your company.  She is interested in a
full-time position ,but is also open to doing some contract work while
she  looks for a permanenet position.

I also wondered if your area might need any secretaries with
transactional experience.  I do have some highly qualified candidates
right now.

Carol
Lawyers Per Diem

please respond.  MHC

Please let me know your availability for Tuesday, September 18th, so that a meeting regarding Hanover Measurement Services can be scheduled.  The meeting should be no longer than an hour.  The attendees would be:

Patrick Hickey
Gil Melman
Kevin Howard
Brian Redmond
Michelle Cash
Barbara Gray

Thank you,
Lilia Roman

Lance,  Kim was here on Friday.  I have asked Mark Taylor for his thoughts.  Michelle

New contact information for Kim Jacobson: home office is 713/666-1230; and email address is kajlaw@swbell.net  Any update on her taking a part-time position?  Thanks for all the help.  Lance.

W. Lance Schuler

Will do.  I've asked Diane to send you the legal advice we received.

I've finalized the template today, and should have a draft out tomorrow (Monday).

Michelle

Micelle,
Can you please let me know what the status of the contract template for Japan is?  I understand you are working on this with Baker & McKenzie for Jane McBride.  I would be intersted in seeing the advice from B&M on this matter, because it would be helpful for me as the HR person in Tokyo.   As well, once the contract template is complete, if you could send it to me and Melissa Laing for our reference, that would be great.
Thank you for your help.
Caroline

Caroline Schaeffer
Sr. HR Representative
Enron Japan
caroline.schaeffer@enron.com

Here is teh e-mail I told you about...

Date:		July 12, 2001

Since its inception, EBS has seen dramatic changes in the communications industry.  The growth and opportunity anticipated in this industry two years ago has significantly changed in the past nine months.  While Enron remains committed to extending our business model into telecom, we need to quickly respond to these changes in the market to achieve our objectives.

The Enron Corp. earnings release issued today states that we will be adjusting the EBS business to better match the revenue opportunities.  This means that we must reduce our overall cost structure and better focus our commercial efforts.

To achieve this, we will take the following steps:

EBS will become a business unit within Enron Wholesale Services.  This will involve the integration of all EBS commercial support functions into those units within EWS, and will enable us to better manage the resources and costs of the support functions.

All EBS commercial functions will be consolidated into the following units:

Europe - headed by Matthew Scrimshaw
Asia - headed by Anthony Duenner
Americas - headed by Rich DiMichele
We will consolidate the North American EBS origination teams into one group, led by Stewart Seeligson.  
North American trading and risk management will continue to report to Paul Racicot.  Paul will also oversee the global portfolio from a risk management perspective.

Global Network Operations will continue to report to the EBS Office of the Chairman.

All EBS asset positions will continue to be reviewed and repositioned to most effectively meet the future needs of EBS.

The Portland office will be closed by October 1.  Portland employees will be advised by their supervisors of their relocation or redeployment status by July 27.

These changes will affect many EBS employees through relocation, redeployment, severance or movement to another part of Enron.  We have not yet worked out all of the details of these changes, but your supervisor will apprise you of how this affects you as soon as possible, and no later than July 27.

No, this is not.  I am curious as to how this got to you.  I will give it a review and get back with you.

Is this the draft that you prepared?

Alan

Attached is the Employment Agreement for Matthias Lee, for your approval. Do let us know when you have presented to Matt so that we could give him the original to sign and thereafter, send to Houston for your signature.
 << File: Executive Agreement_SIN_Matthias Lee.doc >> 

Need your advice on the effective date of the agreement. Tentatively, i have used 15 May, given that this is the date for changes in title, salary, etc. 

regards,

Chor-Lim Goh
391B Orchard Road #10-03
Ngee Ann City Tower 1
Singapore 238874
DID : 65-838 9064
Mobile: 65- 967 888 42
Fax : 65-835 4291
email: chor.lim.goh@enron.com

Freudian slip, I'm sure.  See you tomorrow!  Michelle

Did you catch the subject line?  I'll need to be pre-medicated for this meeting...Jeff
Okay, we've finally got it.  This meeting (in regards to the EOC charge for Claude Straub) is set up for this Friday, 7/20 from 2:00-3:00 p.m. in EB3824.
 
I have left a message with John Nowlan's assistant (Helen Taylor) to let us know when would be a good time for John to be contacted in London on either Monday or Tuesday.
 
Thanks,
Angie O'Brian
36547

FYI -- see what you can find out about this -- perfect opportunity to market OLER's services.  Thanks  MHC
As many of you know, Enron is an active participant in the National Black MBA convention.  The national convention is slated to be held in Orlando, Florida the week of September 24th.  Please be advised that Kimberly Shoaf, the Analyst and Associate Diversity recruiter will be leading this effort for Enron.  Please direct any inquiries concerning the convention to Kimberly who can be reached at extension 5-1580.  Sally Beck and Jeff Shankman have agreed to be the executive sposors for the convention and Neil Davies and me will be the project leads on this effort (we can be reached at 3-7229 and 3-5275 respectively).  Thank you for your participation and we are looking forward to a successful convention.  Ted

Fran, would you mind pulling the data for GSP on this.  It is strange that we should be paying unemployment rates for GSP, since it is its own entity, separate and apart from Enron.

Do you know anything about the other transactions?

Michelle,

As I indicated in my voice mail this morning, I am working with Janice
Priddy, Manager of Enron Corporate Payroll, on a significant employment tax
refund project.  We are in the process of quantifying potential FICA,
federal unemployment and state unemployment tax refunds related to both
internal and external acquisitions involving employees.  Essentially, if we
are able to determine that the predecessor company had beneficial
unemployment tax rates, we may be in a position to either retroactively or
prospectively take advantage of those rates.  In addition, mid-year
transactions may also result in a refund of amounts paid by Enron in excess
of certain federal and state wage bases (Enron may be entitled to take
credit for those wages paid by the acquired company prior to, but during
the same calendar year, as the transaction).

We obtained Enron Corporate Data Sheets from Kate Cole and Deborah Korkmas
was designated as a legal contact related to several external acquisitions.
We have prepared a short, one page questionnaire, which will assist us in
determining whether a significant refund opportunity exists related to
these particular acquisitions.  According to the Corporate Date Sheets,
Deborah is the legal contact for the following acquisitions:

2000 - Garden State Paper Company, LLC (FEIN: 94-3371710)
2000 - KUCC Cleburne, LLC (FEIN: not listed)
2000 - Tenaska IV Partners, Ltd. (FEIN: not listed)
2000 - Harrier Power Corporation (FEIN: not listed)

Please complete the attached questionnaire for each acquisition with as
much information as possible.  If the acquisition did not involve
employees, just complete the top portion of the questionnaire and answer
questions 1 and 2.  In reference to question 5, since it is unlikely that
you have access to such detailed payroll information, if you could provide
the states in which the predecessor had employment, we will then be in a
position to contact state agencies to gather more detailed information.

Thank you for your assistance in this process.  If you have any questions,
please call me at (713) 237-5346 or Janice at x37839.  Once the
questionnaires have been completed, please return them to me via e-mail at
alexa.r.cutter@us.andersen.com.

Sincerely,

Alexa

(See attached file: Acquisition Ques.doc)
*******************Internet Email Confidentiality Footer*******************

Privileged/Confidential Information may be contained in this message.  If
you are not the addressee indicated in this message (or responsible for
delivery of the message to such person), you may not copy or deliver this
message to anyone. In such case, you should destroy this message and kindly
notify the sender by reply email. Please advise immediately if you or your
employer do not consent to Internet email for messages of this kind.
Opinions, conclusions and other information in this message that do not
relate to the official business of my firm shall be understood as neither
given nor endorsed by it.
 - Acquisition Ques.doc 

Sure, sounds like a good plan to put the flag in Personic to discuss the time limitations.  Other than the specific gas-related folks, I am not aware of a non-solicit of AEP employees.  I'll double check to confirm, though.  MHC

Have told recruiters
 
Will get all their resumes into personic ( if not already in their ) and put a precautionary note against their record.  Michelle is this ok ? 
 
Have you or Michelle been able to find out if we can hire from AEP ( non ex HPL employees ?)
 
Thanks
 
Neil

        Attached is the final list of employees who transferred to AEP.  If any of these employees are considered for re-hire, please ensure 

        that the following procedure is followed: 

        1.      Any former HPL rehired into Enron must come in via a resume submitted to an open posted position.  (i.e. No slam dunks)

        2.      The candidate should be interviewed with other qualified candidates. (i.e. No single candidate on the job applicant summary).

        3.      If the candidate is offered a position, it cannot be at a higher level and/or higher salary (i.e Inducement).  FYI, all HPL

                employees received an increase when they started at AEP.   The exception to this is if they are being rehired into a 

                higher level position. 

        4.      All re-hires must sign a letter stating they were not solicited by Enron to return. 

        Please share this information with all recruiters, staffers and generalists. 

        <<HPL_Rehire_list.xls>>        

Fran Mayes 
HR Manager 
Phone (713) 853-7211 
Fax (713) 646-8100 
Cell/Pager  713 875-3820 or 
7138753820@messaging.nextel.com 

Alan,
 
I understand that you have approved the request below.  Is this because they are WRA personnel?
 
Thanks.  

Michelle
Hi Michelle, please see below.  Should I just take this for face value or inquire as to why?  I've only been asked to take off 1 person for harrassment before.  This just seems strange getting a list of people without any explaination.

Kathryn, 

I need to have the following individuals removed from both People & Expert Finder.  Jeff Jones at HRGIM informs me that you are the contact to have this done.

Users Name      Phone Number   
Rick Boehm      713-751-7945   
Dan Orbeck Jr   713-654-0197   
Ken Kooser      713-654-4039   
Don Chancey     713-654-4032   
Angela J Wingo  713-751-7925   
John F Anderson 713-853-3188   
Jeremy Waggenspack      713-853-6161   
Brian Mihura    713-654-4032   
Junichi Sugiura 713-853-6161   

This request has been approved by Alan Aronowitz (EN-Legal Emerging Markets) 

Regards 
Roberto DeLeon 
Manager, IT Security & Controls 

FYI, with apologies if I already sent this to ya'll.

Attached is a handout on the HIPAA privacy regulations that our firm
prepared for the employee benefits session of the 2001 National Employer
conference.  The emphasis is on the regulations as they affect employers who
administer group health plans for their employees.  In many cases plan
amendments will be required.   In addition the regulations mandate training
of personnel and the development of internal complaint procedures.

If you have difficulty accessing this document, please contact me and I can
send you a hard copy. In addition, feel free to forward this summary to
others within your organization or others at different companies or
organizations. If you do not wish to receive these notices, contact me by a
reply to this email and I will delete you from my circulation list.

Littler Mendelson is the nation's largest law firm representing management
in employment and labor matters. With approximately 400 lawyers in 31
offices in the country, we have more lawyers practicing in this field than
anyone else. Please let me know if you have questions about these
regulations or any other employment or labor issue.

Kerry E Notestine
Littler Mendelson, PC
1900 Chevron Tower
1301 McKinney Street
Houston, Texas 77010
713.652.4748
713.951.9212 (fax)
knotestine@littler.com
www.littler.com
 <<hipaa handout.doc>>

----
This email may contain confidential and privileged material for the sole use of the intended recipient(s). Any review, use, distribution or disclosure by others is strictly prohibited. If you are not the intended recipient (or authorized to receive for the recipient), please contact the sender by reply email and delete all copies of this message.

To reply to our email administrator directly, send an email to
postmaster@littler.com

Littler Mendelson, P.C.
http://www.littler.com

 - hipaa handout.doc 

please print this plus all attachments.  MHC

The first draft...Ron, please distribute to the appropriate VE folks...those of you scheduled for the Monday pm meeting to discuss, see you there....XOXOXO
George, attached for Enron's review and comments, please find initial drafts of the following documents:

1.	LLC Operating Agreement
2.	Black Liquor Exchange Agreement
3.	Tall Oil Purchase Agreement
4.	Turpentine Broker Agreement
5.	Wood Fiber Supply Agreement
6.	Leaf River Services Agreement
7.	Material Spreading Agreement
8.	Pulp Supply Agreement

Please note that in the interest of time we are circulating these documents prior to complete review by G-P.  Accordingly, the attached agreements remain subject to further review and comment.

G-P plans to distribute an initial draft of the Human Resources Agreement and a Railroad Services Agreement next week.  If you have any questions, please let me know.

Please also copy Tony Rothermel at trothermel@KSLAW.com.  Just you and I, and maybe one lawyer from each side, should schedule time next week for an initial Enron/GP video conference call review of the attached agreements and your draft of the contribution agreement.  After next weeks discussion and any resulting changes, we can convene a larger meeting with all the lawyers to work through the second versions of all agreements.  Thanks!

 - OPERATING AGREEMENT.DOC 
 - BLACK LIQUOR EXCHANGE AGREEMENT.DOC 
 - TALL OIL AGREEMENT.DOC 
 - TURPENTINE AGREEMENT.DOC 
 - WOOD FIBER SUPPLY AGREEMENT.DOC 
 - LEAF RIVER SERVICES AGREEMENT.DOC 
 - MATERIAL SPREADING AGREEMENT.DOC 
 - PULP AGREEMENT.DOC 

The consent form should be kept in PH file.   The background check results should be maintained separately.  MHC

Unfortunately I was unable to attend the session today regarding background checks.  Can you please tell me what we are supposed to do with the original signed consent forms?  I thought we were supposed to shred them, but I was told that we are supposed to file them with the original background check report in the PH file.  I know from several of the staffers that today you clarified that we are not supposed to keep the background check reports in the PH file, but in a separate file.  I would appreciate your clarification of where the consent forms are to be kept.

Thank you,
Cheryl Arguijo
EWS Staffing
713-345-4016

Not a problem if the employee does not date it.  The issue of signature by the company that the agreement is not fully executed until it is signed by company.  MHC

Michelle,
I have run across a few agreements where the employee has signed the agreement but not dated it.  Is this something that could potentially be a problem?
I think that, for our (exec comp) purposes, the agreement is not actually in effect until it is signed by the person "offering" the terms.  Is this true?
Thank you

Dana

Kathy, we should go ahead and remove these people.  They are employed by WRA, which is in a transition process on a confidential matter.  Please remove them.  Thanks.  Michelle

Hi Michelle, please see below.  Should I just take this for face value or inquire as to why?  I've only been asked to take off 1 person for harrassment before.  This just seems strange getting a list of people without any explaination.

Kathryn, 

I need to have the following individuals removed from both People & Expert Finder.  Jeff Jones at HRGIM informs me that you are the contact to have this done.

Users Name      Phone Number   
Rick Boehm      713-751-7945   
Dan Orbeck Jr   713-654-0197   
Ken Kooser      713-654-4039   
Don Chancey     713-654-4032   
Angela J Wingo  713-751-7925   
John F Anderson 713-853-3188   
Jeremy Waggenspack      713-853-6161   
Brian Mihura    713-654-4032   
Junichi Sugiura 713-853-6161   

This request has been approved by Alan Aronowitz (EN-Legal Emerging Markets) 

Regards 
Roberto DeLeon 
Manager, IT Security & Controls 

Looks fine with me.

Michelle,

Dovie Keprta suggested I send this attachment to you for your approval.  I have revised an existing PRC Evaluation form.  I am going to use the attached form to evaluate the summer GTT interns.  Will you let me know if this is an appropriate tool for recording their performance and the supervisors hire/no hire opinion.

Thanks!

 << File: Intern Evaluation.doc >> 

Lara

Twanda, please handle.  MHC

Michelle,

Jonathan Whitehead has requested that we extend Jim Fernie's contract through February 2002; his current contract expires the end of August 2001.

Thanks,
Dave 

I've sent this to litigation unit.  MHC

I meant to include you on this email.  EDD
This is resume for a good guy and a friend of mine from my judicial clerkship days who is looking to move back to Houston (he was with VE here for several years) and is hoping to find a litigation position in house.  Sanders says EWS isn't looking.  Any ideas re Corp. or our other subs.?  

Eddy:

Attached is Field's resume.  Obviously, give him or me a call as you see
fit.

Again, thanks for your help.

Jeff
 <<FIELDS.wpd>> 
 - FIELDS.wpd << File: FIELDS.wpd >> 

Cathy,

I have been getting this question a lot!

It has been communicated to every employee that if they are in Category 5, they will get a PIP.  Therefore, I recommend putting one in place.  If you are more comfortable, you can re-name it to reflect goals and objectives for the next review period -- something like "Performance Objectives" or something to that effect. 

Because it has been communicated that everyone will get a plan, we really should follow through.

Michelle

Hi Michelle,

For those employees that landed in Category 5 due to misclassification of job group, is it sufficient to address in the evaluation and not complete a PIP?  The employee is by no means performing poorly and presenting her with a PIP would be a contradicting message.

Through the process of the PRC, we identified that this particular person who is a Specialist was really doing an Entry Specialist job and would have faired fairly well in the lower job group, however because we had them in the Specialist job group, she did not fair so well relative to her Specialist peers.

Just want to make sure I'm not breaking any policy by making this exception.

Thanks,
Cathy

I believe that these involve issues of intellectual property and thus are more appropriately decided by you.  In principle, I have no issue with Enron indemnifying Accenture for intellectual property litigation relating to content ownership.  On the logo issue, I would have to defer to you and the PR/branding folks.

Michelle

Mark, a few issues have risen in the Accenture Arrangement Letter I'm
working on with Yevgeny.

Background.  Accenture is going to create video and other content for a
training module for Enron.   Part of the deal is that Enron is suppose to
license the training module to Accenture for Accenture's internal training.
The issues are this:

1.  Accenture has now asked for a warranty and indemnity regarding ownership
of the content by Enron.  What, if any, warranty or indemnity will Enron
give regarding the content.  (Initially, I drafted that Enron will not give
any warranties or indemnities, but Accenture is now asking for them.)

2.  Due to the content, Enron employees and Enron names and logos will be
displayed.  Accenture wants to display the content to its employees and in
another agreement display the content to third parties.  Whose approval does
Yevgeny need to allow such use of the content?

Please advise on Enron's position.

Ed Steakley
esteakley@fulbright.com
Fulbright & Jaworski LLP
1301 McKinney, Suite 5100
Houston, Texas 77010
713/651-5423

This email message and any attachments are for the sole use of the intended
recipient(s) and  contain confidential and/or privileged information. Any
unauthorized review, use, disclosure or distribution is prohibited. If you
are not the intended recipient, please contact the sender by reply email and
destroy all copies of the original message and any attachments.

To reply to our email administrator directly, send an email to
postmaster@fulbright.com

FULBRIGHT & JAWORSKI LLP

who knows.  I can't imagine that a customer would somehow owe insurance to the provider's employees.  Michelle

God I hope not!  However, we do include a portion of leased employees in our 410(b) tests for 'insurance'.  I'd like to know who he talked with.  

Cynthia, do you know anything about this type of requirement?  Michelle

Michelle, I was presented with some interesting information yesterday
and I wanted to run it by you . . . I was not told this by an ERISA
attorney but it was a person who works with Benefits frequently.  The
person told me that, if a company only had one customer, the company's
employees had to be included in the control group of the customer for
discrimination testing purposes on the benefits plans.  It sounded a
little iffy to me . . . could you verify?  Thanks.

Hoyt

--
Hoyt H. Thomas
713.668.3122
713.201.1622 Mobile

so, would we have an issue?

I think the issue is that if they only have one client then they could be considered employees from a 'discrim/coverage' standpoint.  The issue is probably not in the area of insured plans but the qualified plans.  The 410(b) is our adequate coverage test for the pension plan.

Cb

who knows.  I can't imagine that a customer would somehow owe insurance to the provider's employees.  Michelle

God I hope not!  However, we do include a portion of leased employees in our 410(b) tests for 'insurance'.  I'd like to know who he talked with.  

Cynthia, do you know anything about this type of requirement?  Michelle

Michelle, I was presented with some interesting information yesterday
and I wanted to run it by you . . . I was not told this by an ERISA
attorney but it was a person who works with Benefits frequently.  The
person told me that, if a company only had one customer, the company's
employees had to be included in the control group of the customer for
discrimination testing purposes on the benefits plans.  It sounded a
little iffy to me . . . could you verify?  Thanks.

Hoyt

--
Hoyt H. Thomas
713.668.3122
713.201.1622 Mobile

Thanks for the resume.  This person's background won't work for us -- we need more transactional work experience for them to be successful here, particularly M&A, major real estate, financing, etc.  Thanks.  Michelle

 
 - Initial Presentation for Temp PT Atty 09.17.01.dot << File: Initial Presentation for Temp PT Atty 09.17.01.dot >> 
 - Resume of Douglas Hillegeist.doc << File: Resume of Douglas Hillegeist.doc >> 

Please arrange as many of these as you can.  Michelle
 
Attached is the email between Robin Johnson and Melissa Becker I described to you.
 
Also, while at Nepco, I would suggest you have an introductory meeting with:
 
    John Gillis (President) 
    Dan Haas (SVP of Operations)   (#2 guy)
    Mike Indivero (Sr. Dir. - HR)
    Robin Johnson (Lead Generalist)
    Gloria Rivas (HR Training & Dev.)
    David Lund (AGC)
 
 
 

Mike:
 
I was somewhat disturbed by Robin's email below and unclear as to why Melissa Becker needed to know how NEPCO participated in the PRC process.  I would like to discuss this with you as soon as you return from your trip.  I realize NEPCO is a little different.  However, Robin and the rest of the NEPCO team need to understand that as long as they are part of Enron, they will, in some form or fashion, participate in the current performance management process.  Robin needs to discontinue using the term "forced" and begin using the term "preferred".  Also, please explain to Robin that in the overall EEOS PRC meeting held in Houston, in which both John Gillis and Dan Haas participated as voting committee members,  the Enron-wide preferred distribution process was adhered to.  I would like to clear up this confusion as soon as possible.  
 
Thanks,
 
Cindy
 
FYI.  Is it wise to put this in writing??? 

Sheila 

FYI 

Hi Melissa: 

Sorry for the late response.  NEPCO did not participate in the preferred 
distribution for PRC.  The only group that I am aware of within NEPCO that 
was "forced" to recognize it was the HR department and we are still 
discussing the outcome of that exercise and forced ratings.  Let me know if 
you have any other questions! 

THANKS! 

Robin Johnson 
HR Manager 
11831 North Creek Parkway, North 
Bothell, WA  98011 
425-415-3178 
Fax:  425-415-3199 

Hi Robin.  Hope all is going well in Bothell.  I have a quick question 
about PRC ( the performance review process we use in Houston).  Does 
NEPCO use the same process of 360 feedback, followed by assigning 
employee ratings based on a preferred distribution, followed by 
communication with the employee?  I heard that some parts of NEPCO use 
it and some don't.  Could you give me the "lowdown?"  Thanks! 

this looks fine with me.  Michelle

Michelle, here is the letter Dale Rasmussen mentioned on the voice mail.  This is in response to the bonus recommendation from Ken Gerhart.  We will be sending it out today. Thanks.

 << File: Sunco 2000-2001 incentive.doc >> 

Please save as a MHC document -- I think that some of this will be used for powerpoint for Nepco trip next week.  Thanks.  MHC

 
Regards,
Jo Ann Matson
Enron Corp
jo.ann.matson@enron.com
(713) 345-7237

Mike,

Would you please provide me information on which attorney is handling the NEPCO charge?  I would like to obtain information from him and be "in the loop" on all legal matters involving NEPCO's employment practices issues.

Thanks a lot.  I am looking forward to visiting with you in person next week.

Michelle

Twanda, please print this for me - -I've been having problems when I try to print.  Thanks.  Michelle

Hi Michelle,

Mandy Curless, Ben Herman, Marty Chrisman, and I have tweaked this handout just a bit for our upcoming PRC Feedback training sessions this Thursday and Friday.  We just wanted to get your blessing on the wording before going forth.

Thanks so much for your time and assistance!
Karen

 

Karen Phillips
HR Associate
Enron Net Works
713-345-4953

Pat, what do you think of this?  I view it as problemmatic because I believe the grant agreements and the stock plan should govern.  Your comments and suggested revisions would be appreciated.  Thanks.  Michelle

Dear All,

please find attached hereto the draft of the stock option agreement
according to our call held last Thursday and the subsequent electronic
messages. Modification includes (i) item 1 - ref. to the Committee and
Black-Scholes valuation; (ii) item 4 - ref. to the former vesting scheduled;
(iii) item 6 - expanded non-compete clause; (iv) item 7 - expanded
confidentiality clause; and (v) new item 8 - non-soliciting
(customers/employees) clause (please confirm/decide the terms for those
obligations). Having everything decided, please let me know so as to change
the Portuguese version.

Should you need any clarification, please write or call.

Kind Regards,

Eduardo Ribeiro Toledo
Veirano & Advogados Associados
Attorneys-at-Law
Av. Presidente Wilson 231 - 23rd floor
20.030-021 - Rio de Janeiro - RJ
Brazil

toledo@veirano.com.br

tel + 55 21 3824-4747
fax + 55 21 262-4247

> Eduardo Toledo's email address is: toledo@veirano.com.br
>
> Please make sure you correct it on your files.
>
>
 - retention 2001 options3.doc 

Sharon, I suggest that we ask Valeria Hope to investigate the fact situation here and report back to us jointly.  What do you think?  Michelle

Michelle -

Since this is in Venezuela and thus part of wholesale, I am sending you a copy of this letter for you to review.  I'm not sure who should take the lead between you and Sharon but I'll leave that to you guys to work out.  Please let me know who is taking the lead on this.  Thanks.

I'm not sure I understand what has happened to this guy, but it's something that should be handled post haste.  Thanks, SRS
 << OLE Object: Picture (Device Independent Bitmap) >> 
Anonymous

 << File: Ken Lay - Jeff Skilling.doc >> 

sounds great!  I've asked Twanda to set something up.  MHC

Michelle,

We are interested in developing a "Manger's Notebook" that would allow Managers to keep notes on employee's performance throughout the six month period of PEP.  Issues surrounding the use and storage need to be discussed before we begin our project.

Please let me know when you are available to meet and I'll make the arrangements.

Thanks,

Dave

Valeria is looking into it.  Michelle

Does OLER deal with these or should I go straight to Gilchrist?

David
Steve Kean asked me to forward this to you.

I'm not sure I understand what has happened to this guy, but it's something that should be handled post haste.  Thanks, SRS
 << OLE Object: Picture (Device Independent Bitmap) >> 
Anonymous

 << File: Ken Lay - Jeff Skilling.doc >> 

FYI -- He tried to call me today, but missed me.  I have returned his call and left a voice mail for him.  I'll let you know if we have a chance to visit.  Michelle

Kim/Michelle -

Chuck will be contacting you on the non-solicitation language.  I asked him to coordinate directly as I am in meetings all day and would just hold up the process. 

Chuck started out y-day indicating that he just could not live with the language and then this am I told him that If he couldn't live with the language I would ask whether or not we could offer them the 1/2 Restructuring package.  when he realized that he may be stuck with a package that would yield 1/2 the $$$ he changed his tune.  Now he is saying that all he needs is assurance that our intent is not to keep him out of work at a competitor.  In fact, he said he REALLY wanted to sign this today.  

I think all we need to do is explain our intent with the non-solicitation language.  I do not feel we should change the language for him but would like to see us come to an agreement.

Thanks,
Rogers

The Enron Wholesale Services Legal Conference will be held at The Woodlands=
 Resort & Conference Center on October 11-12, 2001.

Attached is a PowerPoint file containing the reply form for this event.
There are two options for completing this form: =20
First Option
Open file
Print page
Type or print information
Fax reply to (713) 646-5800

Second Option
Open file
Enter information directly onto the page by using text boxes
Save file
E-mail reply to dorie.hitchcock@enron.com

Please note that each box should be completed in its entirety.

Reply forms should be sent to Dorie Hitchcock no later than Friday, Septemb=
er 21.
Thank you for your assistance.

=20

Dorie Hitchcock
Event Manager
Enron
1400 Smith Street
Suite 3640a
Houston, TX  77002
Telephone:  (713) 853-6978
Fax:  (713) 646-5800
Cell:  (713) 594-7093
E-Mail:  dorie.hitchcock@enron.com

Thanks, but we got it from the vault late yesterday.  Michelle

twanda

I'll have a copy of his employment agreemend delivered to your office.

thanks

Michelle, 

Margaret advises that you need info on Joe Kishkill.  Here's all that is on the EI drive.  If you are looking for an executive employment agreement, we don't have access to those.

 << File: BrazilTerm.doc >>  << File: BrazilTermRev9.99.xls.doc >>  << File: ext.doc >> 

If you need anything additional, Robin Treadwell may be able to assist.

Thanks, 

Michael B. Jones
Global Employee Services
Tel.  713-345-5859
Fax.  713-646-9501

Thanks.  I'll do an assignment letter formalizing the relationship.  Michelle

Michelle 

Attached is the information I received from Alfredo Bottone (HR, Elektro) that includes Britaldo Soares' compensation related to his contract/employment with Elektro.

It is my understanding from Scott that you need to complete the new employment agreement.

Please call me if you have questions.  

Robin
X67895

 << File: Soares Comp.doc >> 

FYI, it looks like you are on the way to approval.  Until that time, if you have any excess capacity in terms of time, get with Valeria on HR Employee Relations efforts.  Thanks.  MHC

Approved.
 
Thanks!
Mary -- I met with Michelle today to review the needs of her group's access.  As the appropriate way to address this, Michelle is requesting the HR_VIEW_BASIC_DATA_ORG-ENTERPRISE role, which includes salary, for only one person in her group.  The HR Risk Management Group does require this access in their roles.  However, Michelle is limiting the access to only one person in her group who will then provide the data to the requestor as needed.  
 
This is the first request that I would say that should be approved.  LaQuitta Washington, for whom the request is being made, had the access before and it was removed during the audit.
 
If you approve, please return to me and I'll send to Steve and David Oxley.
Thanks.
Jo Ann

For your review.
 
Thanks!
Mary,
 
I think that LaQuitta should have enterprise-wide access.  What do I do to get approvals for that?
 
Thanks.
 
Michelle
Hi Michelle, 
 
As we discussed in our meeting this morning I need to have enterprise-wide access in order to run my reports.  I run the Quarterly Utilization, EEO-1 and VETS100 reports for all business units.  I also need this access to run the reports for the Affirmative Action Plans and to be able to provide Personnel History reports for Valeria Hope when she needs them for terminated employees that have filed complaints.  90% of the reports I run are companywide.  We also get various requests from different business units to provide ad hoc reports.  I filled out and submitted a SAP Security Request Form on 7/12.  It was assigned ticket #513575 but I'm not sure when they will get around to it.  If you need any more information, please give me a call.  
 
Thanks, 
LaQuitta M. Washington
HR Coordinator
AAP Audit & Reporting Dept.
(713) 853-3086 - Office
(713) 646-2144 - Fax

These changes look fine to me for employees working in Japan.  Thanks.  Michelle

Kriste/Michelle,
We are in the process of integrating 7 Enron Metals Far East Ltd employees from their former payroll to the Enron Japan payroll.  As part of this process, we are requiring them to sign the attached standard Confidentiality Agreement.  I'm getting a lot of pushback re: non-solicitation, and the fact that it governs all terminations (including involuntary).  Is there any possibility of amending?  Jane McBride and I have reviewed, and while we haven't yet sought advice on the matter, feel it would likely not be enforceable in Japan in case of involuntary termination without cause.  
Are we able to make the proposed change (redlined in purple in the attachment - I guess a lot of changes have been made to this document before either Jane or I were involved)?  As well, would it be an issue to insert something about jurisdiction?
If you could let me know as soon as possible, it would be most helpful.
Thanks,
Caroline
 << File: CnfidIPAgtRevised.doc >> 

Caroline Schaeffer
Sr. HR Representative
Enron Japan
caroline.schaeffer@enron.com

FYI, these should be in our form files for Japan -- this is the new Form B for Japan.  Michelle

Kriste/Michelle,
We are in the process of integrating 7 Enron Metals Far East Ltd employees from their former payroll to the Enron Japan payroll.  As part of this process, we are requiring them to sign the attached standard Confidentiality Agreement.  I'm getting a lot of pushback re: non-solicitation, and the fact that it governs all terminations (including involuntary).  Is there any possibility of amending?  Jane McBride and I have reviewed, and while we haven't yet sought advice on the matter, feel it would likely not be enforceable in Japan in case of involuntary termination without cause.  
Are we able to make the proposed change (redlined in purple in the attachment - I guess a lot of changes have been made to this document before either Jane or I were involved)?  As well, would it be an issue to insert something about jurisdiction?
If you could let me know as soon as possible, it would be most helpful.
Thanks,
Caroline
 

Caroline Schaeffer
Sr. HR Representative
Enron Japan
caroline.schaeffer@enron.com

Shanna, Botchlett is not interested in mediating at this time.  He wants to go for the jugular, I guess.  MHC

Hi, all.

On the budget for HR Risk Management (formerly OLER), Cindy told me to keep things flat for next year.  I would appreciate seeing the numbers for budget projections and actuals for the group year to date, though.  

Thanks.

Michelle

Sheila/Michelle,
fyi

Stacey/ Suzanne, 
Please incluce Sheil and Michelle on furture budget communications. 
ay

[Brown, Suzanne]  
PLS SEND YOUR 2002 Operating & Strategic Plan - Corp. OM AND CAPITAL TO STACEY DEMPSEY-7/30. THANKS.

Dan, Wayne Perry has issues with the consulting agreement I drafted for him and wants to use a form that you drafted some time in the past.  Do you want to pick it up?  By copy of this, I am asking Twanda to send you a copy of the agreement we submitted for him.  Michelle

per my voice mail, can we use this version?

Thanks,
Dave 

Dave, Have spoken to Wayne, He would much prefer to use this form of agreement, which Dan Rogers has developed. I'll call you to discuss

Thanks,
Jonathan

Les,

Attached please find a draft Consulting Services Agreement for Gary Gentry.  I'll need some input from you on Exhibit A, as well as the rate to use in the compensation section (Section 2.01).  Otherwise, this document should be in a form that will facilitate quick negotiation/execution with Gary.  I'm still waiting on a response from EE&CC Legal (John Schwartzenburg) re getting a release from some of the continuing obligations that Gary has under his previous CSA with them.  I suggest that we obtain any such release in a separate document in order not to slow our progress on this document.

Please let me know if you have any questions or comments at your convenience. 

Kind regards,
Dan

 

I'll be there!  Do we have a meeting with Shankman for tomorrow?  

Teresa,

The employment lawyer at Littler, Mendelson is named Kerry Notestine.  He is in the loop on this and has copies of the relevant agreements.  I also will have emailed him my summary of the Bob Henderson agreement, so he is up to speed on where we are going from the employment arena.  His number, in case you need an immediate response while I am at NEPCO next week, is 713-652-4748.

Michelle

yes, we still own the IP.

Point well taken.  I softened the language up after sending out the e-mail, but can probably go further.  As to protection of intellectual property, the employees still have that obligation correct? Our concern is that we spent $17MM for the IP, and we now have a former employee brazenly declaring that he can use our IP to start his own business.

Although all employees did sign the non-compete, I believe (without doing any research on Florida law) that it would be difficult, if not impossible, to enforce since there is no ongoing business of AMPS to protect.  As such, I believe that such a statement is kind of like rubbing salt into the wounds of these employees.  
 
A gentle reminder of confidentiality would be appropriate, but any mention of a non-compete probably would not be well received.
 
Michelle

I would like to include the following paragraph in the termination letter to AMPS employees: 
Please advise. 

NON-COMPETE/CONFIDENTIALITY AGREEMENT

When you became an AMPS employee, you signed a confidentiality and non-compete agreement promising to maintain company information in strict confidence.  The provisions of the confidentiality agreement include a non-compete agreement, which is in effect for 24 months after you leave AMPS.  The non-compete and confidentiality provisions are in effect, and we would like to remind you of your responsibility not to share proprietary company information with new employers or competitors of AMPS until the expiration of the 24-month period.  If you have any questions, please refer to the employment agreement which you signed when you became an AMPS employee.

Patrick Johnson 
1400 Smith, EB3624 
Houston, TX 77002 
713.853.9453 (o) 
713.646.3577 (f) 
713.857.2652 (c) 

Hi, David!

I look forward to meeting with you this week when I visit NEPCO.

I wanted to alert you to an OSHA investigation that was served on us here in Houston.  Specifically, an employee named Jason Davis claims that he was fired from  his job in Jenks because he complained about unsafe conditions there.  OSHA has sent a request for information, as it is going to conduct an investigation.

Have you heard of this?  How would you like to handle it?

We can discuss in more detail on Thursday.

Michelle

Pat, would you please give this a look and provide comments?  Thanks.  Michelle

Attached are the latest versions of the SPA, letter of credit language, and disclosure schedules.  Please contact Angela Davis with any revisions as soon as possible as we hope to be finalizing the language on Monday afternoon.

Thanks-
Bill

   

Diane, would you please send Valeria the recent (positive) article on PRC?  Thanks.  Michelle

Pat, I think this isolates the employment-related comments for the Brooklyn Navy Yard transaction.  Your comments would be appreciated.  Thanks.  MHC

Michelle,  Attached is a rider we intend to insert into the stock
purchase agreement for the Brooklyn Navy Yard transaction.  I think
Angela Davis may have already talked to you about this transaction.  We
just found out yesterday that the company we are buying, which is a
subsidiary of Edison Mission Energy, has three or four employees.  We
and the seller had previously thought that they were employees of the
parent, not of the subsidiary that we are buying.  Please let me know if
you have any comments to these sections.  I will be in New York on
Monday working through the final changes to the agreement with David
Marks, Bill Keeney, Angela Davis and Stuart Zisman from Enron and the
seller and their counsel.  If you respond to this e-mail, I will pick it
up with my Blackberry, so that will probably be the best way to get in
touch with us.  Thanks, and sorry for the late notice.

Regards,
Mark Young
Andrews & Kurth L.L.P.
713-220-4323

The information contained in this email message is legally privileged
and confidential information intended only for the use of the
recipient(s) named above.  If the reader of this email is not an
intended recipient, you have received this email in error and any
review, dissemination, distribution or copying is strictly prohibited.
If you have received this email in error, please notify the sender
immediately by return email and permanently delete the copy you
received.

 <<BNY Rider.doc>> 
 - BNY Rider.doc 

I don't know if you heard, but Kim and I spoke with him, and he is ok with everything.  I guess you can consider this one closed, except that I would appreciate it if you would complete a performance review on him and forward it to Kim and me for review and placement in the file.  Thanks!

Michelle -

This is weird, but he signed today and said he would coordinate with Kim Melodick to get in touch with you for you to explain the intent of Section 5.5.  He indicated that he had a 7 day out provision in case he did not get comfortable.  When I indicated that I could explore the possibility of offering an agreement without the language but at 1/2 the pay-out I think he got scared.  I think he must have another opportunity in the wings that he does not want to miss.  

Please let me know the outcome.

Rogers

FYI -- He tried to call me today, but missed me.  I have returned his call and left a voice mail for him.  I'll let you know if we have a chance to visit.  Michelle

Kim/Michelle -

Chuck will be contacting you on the non-solicitation language.  I asked him to coordinate directly as I am in meetings all day and would just hold up the process. 

Chuck started out y-day indicating that he just could not live with the language and then this am I told him that If he couldn't live with the language I would ask whether or not we could offer them the 1/2 Restructuring package.  when he realized that he may be stuck with a package that would yield 1/2 the $$$ he changed his tune.  Now he is saying that all he needs is assurance that our intent is not to keep him out of work at a competitor.  In fact, he said he REALLY wanted to sign this today.  

I think all we need to do is explain our intent with the non-solicitation language.  I do not feel we should change the language for him but would like to see us come to an agreement.

Thanks,
Rogers

sounds good to me.

I spoke with Catherine this a.m..  The vendor is actually a compnay called Bates Churchill. Willaims offices at their facility.  Catherine thought Bates Churchill had an agreement with us, but the company can't find it.  I'm checking the vault, but don't expect to find one. 

Should I just put together a consulting agreement and have Doug Williams sign the Confidentiality Agreement? Thanks.

It sounds like we are asking him to do it -- more like a consultant than it originally appeared.  MHC

Catherine's number is 55649.
Hi Kay,

Here is the information you requested. Enron has been asked to write a chapter for the Euro money book. We have hired Doug Williams to put this chapter together on Trading and Investment Perspectives. He will be interviewing several of our weather traders. Thank you for all your help.

Catherine

Douglas W. Williams
Principal
Lone Star Writers Group
P.O. Box 7689
Houston, TX 77270

Physical address is 300 Reinicke, Houston, 77007.

Cameron sleeps in a real bed, but would be happy on the floor as well.  No more cribs, yea!!

Great news about the tix.  We easily can have Cam sit on our laps, so no need to get any great seats -- if we can buy bleacher tickets to get him in the door, that works for us.

We are so excited!!

Good news, Rich got the tickets for Sat. (the 18th) at 1:05 p.m.
against Atlanta, it's only four tickets so we will have to find one more or
smuggle Cameron in, I'll try my friends Kathy and Don or our neighbors,
shouldn't be a problem getting one more.

Hey, what do you suggest for a bed for Cameron when you visit?  Is he in a
crib type bed or a real bed now? I can't remember.

Cheryl Brinkman
McKesson HBOC
Sr. National Product Manager
Generic Rx
415-983-7501
415-732-2699 - Fax

I just realized I misspelled Rich's name -- oops!

    -----Original Message-----
[mailto:IMCEANOTES-+22Brinkman+2C+20Cheryl+22+20+3CCheryl+2EBrinkman+40McKes
son+2Ecom+3E+40ENRON@ENRON.com]

   Sent:   Thursday, July 26, 2001 12:23 PM
   Rich is checking right now, I'll let you know!

   Cheryl Brinkman
   McKesson HBOC
   Sr. National Product Manager
   Generic Rx
   415-983-7501
   415-732-2699 - Fax

   -----Original Message-----
   Were you able to get Giants' tickets from Rick's company?  If not, no
   big
   deal.  MHC

       -----Original Message-----
[mailto:IMCEANOTES-+22Brinkman+2C+20Cheryl+22+20+3CCheryl+2EBrinkman+40McKes
   son+2Ecom+3E+40ENRON@ENRON.com]

      Sent:   Thursday, July 26, 2001 11:46 AM
      Sounds perfect! we can't wait to see you all!

      Cheryl Brinkman
      McKesson HBOC
      Sr. National Product Manager
      Generic Rx
      415-983-7501
      415-732-2699 - Fax

      -----Original Message-----
      Hello there!

      Proposed plans are as follows:  We arrive in SF on 8/15, rent a car,
   and
      then go to Carmel for a couple of days.  We're back in SF on Friday
   for
      the
      weekend with you.  We leave on Monday.  How does that work with
   ya'll?

      More later.

      Mich

          -----Original Message-----
[mailto:IMCEANOTES-+22Brinkman+2C+20Cheryl+22+20+3CCheryl+2EBrinkman+40McKes
      son+2Ecom+3E+40ENRON@ENRON.com]

         Sent:   Thursday, July 26, 2001 10:10 AM
         Got your message on the voicemail at home but haven't been home in
      the
         evening to call you back, and won't be home this evening either!
      I've
         been
         so busy at work since we got back from vacation.  We had a great
   time
      I
         love
         Scandinavia, can't wait to go back.

         Hannah and Erik and the two boys are great, the kids are cute - so
      very
         blonde, but Hannah is thinking of having a third....and if she
   does
      her
         doctor has said she will be in a wheelchair for half the pregnancy
   -
      she
         has
         that pelvic thing, she was on crutches with Frankie.  Sounds like
   a
      bid
         idea
         to me, but she is a stubborn little one.

         So what's up?  Still coming out to see us I hope?  Everything else
      going
         well?

         Cheryl Brinkman
         McKesson HBOC
         Sr. National Product Manager
         Generic Rx
         415-983-7501
         415-732-2699 - Fax

   **********************************************************************
      This e-mail is the property of Enron Corp. and/or its relevant
   affiliate
      and
      may contain confidential and privileged material for the sole use of
   the
      intended recipient (s). Any review, use, distribution or disclosure
   by
      others is strictly prohibited. If you are not the intended recipient
   (or
      authorized to receive for the recipient), please contact the sender
   or
      reply
      to Enron Corp. at enron.messaging.administration@enron.com and delete
      all
      copies of the message. This e-mail (and any attachments hereto) are
   not
      intended to be an offer (or an acceptance) and do not create or
   evidence
      a
      binding and enforceable contract between Enron Corp. (or any of its
      affiliates) and the intended recipient or any other party, and may
   not
      be
      relied on by anyone as the basis of a contract by estoppel or
   otherwise.
      Thank you.

   **********************************************************************

will do

Chor Lim:

Michelle has completed the draft Contract after consultation with Singapore local counsel, David Yeow, with Rajah & Tann. I will be presenting the contract details to Matt later this week. I have his review scheduled on Thursday, August 2.

You will note that the sign-on bonus and stock options are to be in USD, which is how it was approved here in Houston by Mark Haedicke (EWS Mangaing Director & General Counsel), et al.

Michelle: Please e-mail to Chor Lim the last version of the draft Contract. Thanks.

Regards, Alan

Alan and Michelle
Would you kindly advise when the employment agreement for Matthias is ready ? I'll be glad to help, if needed.

cheers,
chor-lim

Chor Lim:

Michelle Cash, our in-house employment lawyer here in Houston, has been working on a draft Contract for Matt after obtaining advice from outside counsel (Rajah & Tann) in Singapore.This draft is almost finished, but has not been presented to Matt yet. It would be our preference to use the draft that Michelle has been preparing here in Houston in lieu of the draft attached. As soon as the draft is available, we can send to you.

Alan 
Alan

Attached is the Employment Agreement for Matthias Lee, for your approval. Do let us know when you have presented to Matt so that we could give him the original to sign and thereafter, send to Houston for your signature.
 << File: Executive Agreement_SIN_Matthias Lee.doc >> 

Need your advice on the effective date of the agreement. Tentatively, i have used 15 May, given that this is the date for changes in title, salary, etc. 

regards,

Chor-Lim Goh
391B Orchard Road #10-03
Ngee Ann City Tower 1
Singapore 238874
DID : 65-838 9064
Mobile: 65- 967 888 42
Fax : 65-835 4291
email: chor.lim.goh@enron.com

No, I know about that one and agree with you that it is critical!  I just wanted to know when we were meeting with Shankman.

This meeting was to discuss the evolution or history of Crude and Products from EEL to EGM, who the players were, etc.  

This history really applies to Michael L. Brown, Botchlett and Straube.

Let me know if you decide that the meeting is not critical at this time; otherwise we will leave it scheduled as is.

Thanks,
Shanna

I'll be there!  Do we have a meeting with Shankman for tomorrow?  

I'd like to have access, but I don't have access to "O" drive.  Can that be rectified, or is that beyond your role?

Hello everyone!
The purpose of this e-mail is to tell you about a new program which we are rolling out that will benefit the ENTIRE ENRON HR COMMUNITY.
It is called the HR Warehouse.
It is a collection of folders located on the O Drive  which have been set up to increase communication between the various BUs' HR groups.
The idea was born out of our experiences in the HR Forum, where various members of the Enron HR community would share ideas, goings on, etc.
The primary goal is to increase efficiency.  Why re-create the wheel when it is already on the road elsewhere?
We all have a variety of programs, processes, forms, etc. which we use in our daily work life.
Through this repository, you can now share your ideas with others, and put their ideas to work for you.
Also, there is a parking lot for HR related questions, where you will be able to get answers/ advice for whatever problems/ issues you are dealing with.
The document below is the framework for this program.
The only way this will be effective, however, is for people to use it!
I am in the process of setting up security access for these folders, and need your assistance.
Can you please e-mail me a list of EE's who you feel would benefit from the HR Warehouse (actually, everyone could, but we need to restrict access!).
Also, if you have any suggestions or feedback, please let me know. 
Thank you!

Sunjay

 
                  << File: Proposed HR Website.ppt >> 

Sarah,

At this time, I do not believe that this is a legal issue.  Mary Joyce, in Executive Compensation, approves all terms and conditions of VP employment agreements.  Before we agree to modify any non-compete, there must be buy-in from Mary first.  Only then would we consider the request from the legal perspective.  Even then, I am not sure that it is a precedent we would want to set for someone under a US agreement.

Michelle

I left a message with you earlier but I don't know if you are around today.

As you know, Andrew Makk is to be a seconded employee from the US to London. I understand there is some debate about the restricitive covenant which has been agreed with Andrew will be 6 months in all circumstances.  Could we discuss how we might achieve this result as soon as possible.

Many thanks

Sarah Gregory
Assistant General Counsel
Telephone +44 20 7783 6974
Facsimile  +44 20 7783 9037

I have not.  I'll send a follow-up email today.

Have we gotten Bake & McKenzie's reply/comments to the draft contract? Please advise.

Caroline, as you know, since Joe and I spoke with Jane last Thursday about the details of the contract without presenting a draft, I think we need to present the draft very soon.

Alan

Absolutely!  I agree that it would be great for you.  

Last night Sheila Walton asked if I would be interested in being the Generalist for Corporate HR (just an extra assignment along with my other responsibilities).  I told her I would be interested but would need to talk with you about it and of course she would need to discuss it with David.

The reason I'm interested is because it would allow me to keep up with what is happening in the Generalist world.  When I was the HR Rep for HR North America, I mostly dealt with Employee Relations type issues for the HR group.  Although those type problems with HR occur infrequently it requires someone who could handle information confidentially and with sensitivity.  Sheila feels that someone from our group would also lend a certain amount of neutrality since our group is somewhat separate from the other Corporate functions.  Also it is right in line with my primary responsibility now, dealing with Employee Relations issues.  Sheila said she would provide all the administrative support needed and there is staffing to deal with hiring.  

I expect that the added duties would take less than 5% of my time.  Although I already have my hands full now with the OLER duties I think I could make it work even if it means extending my work day or doing more week-end work.  I recognize the big undertaking that we have going with the Employee Relations and would not compromise the quality of work that would be needed to be successful.

What do you think?  Do you think we could make this work?

Valeria

I know we had some sensitivity in the past; let me check on it and get back with you.  mhc

Do you know of any restrictions ?
 
 
Neil

Neil;

One of my remote VPs is interviewing an employee at NEw Power.  What courtesy protocol do we employ when considering New Power employees?

Thanks

Judy

Rick, I believe that this probably is a duplication of efforts -- almost everyone has emailed me with that information already, pursuant to my prior request.  I'll forward those to you for your information.  I would like to institute some limitations on training for the group, due to costs and out-of-office considerations, but I have not finalized those recommendations yet.  Stay tuned!  MHC

Please fill in the training and/or developmental seminars, classes, or professional conferences that you have attended to date and any you have planned through year end.  Please return to me as soon as possible.  Regards, Rj.
 << File: HRRM training inventory 2001.doc >> 

Pat, I am keeping you busy these days.  Any comments on below?  Michelle

Michelle, can you give this opinion or arrange to get one?  Please let me k=
now how we need to proceed and and expected turnaround.  Thanks!

Michelle, I've been seeking an accounting opinion from a FIN 44 perspective=
 the impact on delaying vesting of options if someone goes on an unpaid lea=
ve of absense (like a sabbatical).  Besides below documentation, I've made =
the case verbally that we can point to the following to show that someone o=
n leave is still an employee:
401k account distribution is not triggered
can continue in Enron medical benefits
Cash balance vesting continues i.e. service is bridged
employee can't compete or work for someone else, will sign waiver to that a=
ffect

Accountants will not answer my question unless I obtain legal opinion that =
employment status is maintained.  Can you give legal opinion?    If not, Da=
vid, shall we incur expense of seeking outside opinion of counsel to get th=
is question answered?

Tracy, currently someone is placed on inactive status when they go on unpai=
d leave of absence; they cease participation in all plans but can continue =
to have medical coverage if they choose to make the necessary 100% contribu=
tions; since they are on no pay status, no FICA or SUTA/FUTA is paid in; fo=
r headcount purposes they cease to be included in total headcount reporting=
.  So it is hard to say whether it qualifies under the below provisions.

For the sake of this opinion, however, if we wanted to pursue sabbaticals f=
or a select few and could code them as "active - sabbatical" and thus show =
them up for headcount purposes, then what would the answer be?
Pam,

Just to make sure we are clear on our end, what you are saying is that the =
grantee would be considered an Enron employee under common law under the st=
andards set forth in Question 1(b) in FIN 44 as follows:

 A grantee is an employee if the grantor exercises or has the right to exer=
cise sufficient control over that individual to establish an employer-emplo=
yee relationship. That relationship shall be determined based on common law=
 as illustrated in case law and currently under U.S. Internal Revenue Servi=
ce Revenue Ruling 87-41. Accordingly, for purposes of applying Opinion 25, =
a grantee meets the definition of an employee if the grantor consistently r=
epresents that individual to be an employee under common law. The definitio=
n of an employee for payroll tax purposes under the U.S. Internal Revenue C=
ode includes common law employees. Accordingly, a grantor that classifies a=
 grantee potentially subject to U.S. payroll taxes as an employee under Opi=
nion 25 must also (except as provided in paragraph 6) represent that indivi=
dual as an employee for payroll tax purposes. A grantee does not meet the d=
efinition of an employee under Opinion 25 solely because the grantor repres=
ents that individual as an employee for some, but not all, purposes. For ex=
ample, a requirement or decision to classify a grantee as an employee for U=
.S. payroll tax purposes does not, by itself, indicate that the grantee is =
an employee for purposes of Opinion 25 because the grantee must also be an =
employee of the grantor under common law.
We will base part of our conclusion on the answer we are provided. Thanks f=
or the clarification in advance.
Tracy A. Tyler
Manager=20
Enron Corporate Transaction Support
direct: 713-345-2860
mobile: 832-651-3121

Tracy, someone on leave of absence without pay is changed to inactive statu=
s but is not terminated.  During this inactive phase, no payments generally=
 would be made to the employee.  If any payment were made to the employee, =
he/she would be charged US FICA/Medicare, etc.  For example, an employee on=
 inactive status could exercise vested options while on leave; this income =
would be reported as employee compensation and to the extent FICA limits ha=
d not been reached, would be FICA/Medicare taxed at time of payout.  Since =
they are not earning a salary, per se, during the leave, no FUTA/SUTA taxes=
 are withheld.

What other additional information do I need to provide?  Would a screen pri=
nt of someone who's on leave from our SAP system be helpful?

Pam,=20

Stan Farmer and I have been working per your request on the compensation is=
sue related to leaves of absence.  We need further legal clarification rega=
rding one point before we can properly assess the situation you described i=
n your previous e-mail. =20

When you state, "It is also assumed that employees on unpaid leaves maintai=
n their "active" employment status," we need to know the manner in which yo=
u are defining an active employee.  For purposes of evaluation under FIN 44=
, the definition of an employee is a person under common law as illustrated=
 under US Internal Revenue Ruling 87-41 potentially subject to US payroll t=
axes as an employee of the grantor of the options.  During the leave of abs=
ence, does the grantee continue to meet the definition of an employee under=
 this statute?=20

We need a legal opinion as to employee qualification under the Revenue Ruli=
ng above before we can further investigate proper accounting procedure.  As=
 soon as we receive your response we will continue our research and provide=
 you with the requested guidance in a timely manner.

Thanks for your assistance.
         =20
Tracy A. Tyler
Manager=20
Enron Corporate Transaction Support
direct: 713-345-2860
mobile: 832-651-3121

Mike / Connie - Please send discrimination charge info to my Houston Office -  EB 1676:  I will not pursue fact finding until we establish privilege with legal counsel.  Michelle Cash is out of the office on vacation.  I will contact Kriste Sullivan in her absence.
I will be in Houston through Thursday 6/14 and back for the  following week. Please ask Lakeland office to send duplicates of charge notice, info, exhibits etc. to my Houston location. 
Regards, Rj. 
Houston Ph. 713-853-9253    

we have a new disc charge this is at our lakeland office...asked the office
to get things together and to me by 6/18....where are you so we can send you
the charge and talk about it?...pls advise

connie...pls handle as a to do for tuesday...thanks  

Mike Indivero has indicated that NEPCO received a discrimination charge emanating from their Lakeland Florida office.  I anticipate assisting Mike in the investigation and subsequent response to the charges received.  Privilege will be warranted for matter and the subsequent OLER inquiries.  In Michelle's absence, would you to establish the initial instructions and subsequent privilege governing this effort?  Regards, Rj.    

Hi Michelle... just wanted to follow-up to see if you were planning on
attending the HR NEPCO training on August 2 and 3rd (Thursday and Friday) or
if Rick was planning on attending.  If you could let me know via e-mail or
phone (425-415-3099) it would be helpful.  Also, if you have a presentation
(30 - 60 minutes) that you would like to present we have blocked you some
time.  If you have the presentation in power-point and would like to e-mail
that in advance to me as we are compiling everything together for this
meeting it would be helpful.

Thanks Michelle and I look forward to meeting you.
Connie Brown

Michelle, attached is the agenda for the NEPCO  HR field training that
Mike Indivero has scheduled for his Team.  They have allotted
approximately 30 -  45 minutes to help us introduce ourselves to the
team.  Mike and I had briefly discussed using the time to explain the
subject matter expertise and services that OLER is prepared to provide.
You indicated that you would use the opportunity to go out to Seattle,
given that I had contemplated using vacation on August  1& 2.  I can
easily alter my vacation dates and attend if the trip fails to
compliment your work / travel schedule.   Mike Indivero has a widely
dispersed HR organization and they face many challenges unique to the
merit shop / construction world.  I'm sure they will enjoy the
opportunity to meet you. 

Neither did I.  I just got the comments yesterday.  I'll review the issues on the plane today and provide comments.  Michelle

FYI.

Have you reviewed the suggestions/comments raised?

Also, I did not know that HR in Singapore had shown the draft to Matt.

Alan

Alan

Chor Lim has been working with me on my draft Employment Agreement (which is quite different from the Singapore Employment Agreement I have seen). Chor Lim forwarded amendments for Houston's consideration yesterday (see Chor Lim's e-mail below), but she was re-sent the original draft overnight (without comment on the amendments) advising that you will be speaking to me about it in our call tomorrow. I'm not sure if you have seen the amendments, so I requested Chor Lim for a copy for your reference.

Looking forward to speaking with you tomorrow.

Regards
Matt

   
 
Twanda and Fran

Matt and I have reviewed the document and made some changes in line with local practice. Pls advise if we could proceed on this. Also, in Singapore we do not use Form B but have employee signed Certificate of Compliance. Matthias signed this on 7 Sep 99.
 << File: Executive Agreement_SIN_Matthias Lee1.doc >> 

regards,
Chor-Lim Goh
391B Orchard Road #10-03
Ngee Ann City Tower 1
Singapore 238874
DID : 65-838 9064
Mobile: 65- 967 888 42
Fax : 65-835 4291
email: chor.lim.goh@enron.com

Pursuant to Fran Mayes request, attached is a confidential draft of the Employment Agreement for Matthias Lee.

If you have any questions, please feel free to contact Michelle Cash at (713) 853-6401.

Thanks.

 << File: 5263mhc.doc >> Cover Memo

 << File: 5211mhc.doc >> Employment Agreement

Twanda Sweet
Sr. Administrative Assistant
Enron Wholesale Services
1400 Smith Street, EB 3822
Houston, Texas 77002
(713) 853-9402
tsweet@enron.com

I'm handling the afternoon -- I think that Harry has this morning.  MHC

	Can you cover for me today? I am in mediation.  I left a voicemail for Sharon Butcher, as well, just to make sure it is handled. My schedule shows an afternoon session. Do we have 2 sessions today? If so, you may want to split and cover.

Thanks a ton. I will take you next one in August.

Thanks,

Kriste

Kriste K. Sullivan
Enron Corp.  -  Legal
EB 4861
(713) 853-7557 Phone
(713) 646-5847 Fax

I got this.  I assume this is 12:30 Central Time?

When: Wednesday, September 19, 2001 10:30 AM-11:30 AM (GMT-08:00) Pacific
Time (US & Canada); Tijuana.
Where: Conf. Call

*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*

10:30-11:30 PST

Call-in #:  800/711-8000
Passcode:  4153030

Here is the overview of Bob Henderson's Employment Agreement.

 

What do you think?  MHC

Michelle, please comment. 

Please send me an email response about whether you and Michelle Cash are OK with what he's written.  After that, what do we do?

Brad

After a conversation with Ryan Seleznov I herewith like disclose in writing my intentions in respect to Dealbench.

Please see attached Word file

Best regards

Tobias Munk

 

Please see the attached.

Teresa

 

Please send David Lund copies of our standard corporate services agreement and the standard assignment letter (use Bridgeline example -- with and without non-compete).  Michelle

We're formatting one this week, and we'll send it when it's done.  Michelle

Thanks very much.
Do you also have a SSD we can use?
Jane

 << File: 220b - dg - Agreement for Recruiting Services.doc >>  << File: 220a DG - Agreement for Contract Services .DOC >> 

Here are the sample Agreements.  Please let us know if you need anything else.  Thanks.

Diane Goode
Senior Specialist

I agree also, but I don't know all the parties or complications involved.  Should there be a (groan) meeting on this?

Can you please help with this one?  I agree with what the concern is below.  We have GIS ids, and Eid (external id - just like GIS id).  I think we should try to migrate to one of these. Please let me know what type of statement I should make back to the customer.  Thanks.

Kathy,

Per my voicemail message, please review the note below.
I'd like to work with you on a response to this customer.

Thanks,

Brandee 

Brandee Sanborn
I.S.C. Customer Care
Design & Process Support
http://isc.enron.com/site

 << OLE Object: Picture (Device Independent Bitmap) >> 
Ngoc Luan Do@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
08/07/2001 12:36 PM
To Whom It May Concern:

Through TV and newspapers , I hear constantly about identity fraud using stolen social security information.    I am very concerned about this issue.

I have the following suggestion for our company.  Since Enron's employees are assigned an SAP identification numbers (P number) and an HR number, could Enron as a company use these IDs instead of the SS numbers?  This will be safer for all employees.

For example, I am concerned when I buy the monthly bus passes and I have to fill in my SS number.  I do not feel secure at all to see my SS in so many databases at Enron, especially when some databases are from third-parties (out-sourcing).  We could use our badge number there instead of our SS.

Please let me know how your organization can help the Enron employees feel safer about the safeguard of their SS number.

Please calendar and print for my files on this meeting.  Thanks.  MHC

All,

A reminder that the HR Associate Points Meeting will take place as below:

Thursday, 23rd August 3.30 pm - 5. 30 pm (EB46C1).    

The Leads who are responsible for Associates are as follows:

Sunjay Arya				Gary Buck
Khymberly Booth			Ryan Seleznov
Mecole Brown				Tim O'Rourke
Tana Cashion				Sheila Walton
Wendy Fincher				Sheila Knudsen
Karen Phillips				Neil Davies
Noel Ryan				Cindy Skinner
Simone Scott Walker			Shanna Funkhouser

Peer reviews are currently been gathered on the above.   Upon receipt, I shall forward to each of you a copy of the reviews for your respective associate.  In addition they will be contacting you to discuss their participation in projects outside their rotation.

Those who are not assigned an associate may also allocate points (a max of 150) at the meeting based on contribution to your areas for the first review period.   

If anyone has any questions on the above please let me know.

Kind regards,

Karen.
x54667

 

Shanna, I spoke with Per tonight about this.  Let's talk tomorrow.  Thanks.  Michelle

This is the background to my conversation with Shanna. I have a copy of the document I can give to you tomorrow. Thanks for following up on this. Per

Per -

I did not hear back from Shanna or Sharon Butcher. Could you please ask Shanna to take this situation to Sharon tomorrow?

John, Per and I discussed the hostile environment issue and we are both concerned that we may have some repercussions. I am vacation until the 22nd but Per is up to speed and I would like to make sure that you keep up with him and any HR / Legal activity that may occur. 

Thank you

Paula  

Let's discuss exactly what is involved here -- confidentiality, etc.  Thanks.  MHC

Hi Ya'll,
I wanted to let you know about this before I respond to her request.  Let me know if you have any questions.
 
Regards,
Sandra
Kathy McMahon suggested that I contact you in an effort to gather information on:
 

Enron's Affirmative Action Policy and plans; as well as 
demographic analysis of workforce (gender, age, ethnic origin, nationality)

 
Jeff Skilling has agreed to work with Harvard Business School (HBS) on a 5-year case study called 'Modern Giants'.  HBS will shadow Enron and a number of other companies over the next five years to assess how we react to market changes and to see how we morph during this time period.  
 
Please let me know at your earliest convience if you can help me.
 
Regards,
 
Cindy

please print all these for me.  Thanks.  MHC
 
Ryan, 
 
Try this. 
 
bob k

FYI re:  NEPCO picketing issues.  Michelle

Michelle,

Two in one day.  We understand that the pipe fitters are also planning to
picket the Lake Worth, Florida project as well.  Our execution team needs to
get some guidance and planning for this picketing should it interfere with
the progress of the work.  In that respect, we need to dial in Rick Johnson
and Olgletree to plan and communicate that plan to the execution team.  I
think the first step is a call between yourself, me, Mark Stubley and Mike
Indivero.  And then another call with all folks or a meeting at the jobsite
to lay out the plan.

Barbara, please organize a call for Mike, Michelle, Mark Stubley and me.
Thanks.
David,

I have been advised by our Construction Manager, Mr. Joe Osler that while he
was visiting the City of Lake Worth Building Planning and Zoning dept
regarding our permit status he learned that the pipefitters have inquired
about permit requirements to picket our site.  Apparently the City informed
them that no permit is required.  I have heard that the pipefitters have
established a picket line at the Payne Creek site today. We will need local
legal counsel to assist us in this regard.

Mike Indivero, I understand that Mr. Mike Croall's release date from NEPCO
is Oct 31, 2001.  Please advise as to who his replacement is and their
report date.

Thanks,

Galen J. Torneby

Project Manager

National Energy Production Corporation (NEPCO)

11831 North Creek Parkway North

Bothell,  WA  98011  USA

Tel:   425-415-3052

Cell:  425-922-0475

Fax:  425-415-3098

email:   <mailto:galent@nepco.com> mailto:galen.torneby@nepco.com

generally, we just go by the terms in the agreement and attach a brief position description. 

OK - we look forward to getting it but what are you using in the meantime I wonder when you do recruitment contracts?
Jane

The SSD is being developed. I'll send it as soon as it is finalized.

Thanks very much.
Do you also have a SSD we can use?
Jane

 << File: 220b - dg - Agreement for Recruiting Services.doc >>  << File: 220a DG - Agreement for Contract Services .DOC >> 

Here are the sample Agreements.  Please let us know if you need anything else.  Thanks.

Diane Goode
Senior Specialist

	I assume this has been calendared?

Let's meet with her and anyone else she would like to have attend.  Thanks.  MHC

Hi Michelle,
How do you want to have the discussion?  Do you want to have a meeting with her or do you to discuss before any meeting with her?
 
Sandra

Let's discuss exactly what is involved here -- confidentiality, etc.  Thanks.  MHC

Hi Ya'll,
I wanted to let you know about this before I respond to her request.  Let me know if you have any questions.
 
Regards,
Sandra
Kathy McMahon suggested that I contact you in an effort to gather information on:
 

Enron's Affirmative Action Policy and plans; as well as 
demographic analysis of workforce (gender, age, ethnic origin, nationality)

 
Jeff Skilling has agreed to work with Harvard Business School (HBS) on a 5-year case study called 'Modern Giants'.  HBS will shadow Enron and a number of other companies over the next five years to assess how we react to market changes and to see how we morph during this time period.  
 
Please let me know at your earliest convience if you can help me.
 
Regards,
 
Cindy

Mark, I understand that this is a copy of the latest agreement between Enron and Andersen Consulting.  I agree that a new master would be a good idea.  Michelle

==================================
Mike Baer
Accenture - Legal Group
100 South Wacker Drive, Ste. 515, Chicago, IL 60606-4006
Voice: 312-693-1512, Octel: 69/31512, Fax: 312-652-1512
eMail: michael.e.baer@accenture.com
==================================

This message is for the designated recipient only and may contain
privileged or confidential information.  If you have received it in error,
please notify the sender immediately and delete the original.  Any other
use of the email by you is prohibited.
 - B0033CF1.TIF 

Misha, I haven't yet received the details about the lunch on the 28th.  I'm out on vacation the end of next week, so I wanted to try to fill it early next week.  Could you forward me the invitation or details?  Thanks.  MHC

Thanks, Misha.  How many are at a table?  I've already got some folks who are interested.  Michelle

 
So sorry .... I thought we had you on this list!  
Take care,
Misha
Hello Everyone:
 
As you may know, Community Relations sends the "Tables Report" on a weekly basis. This is a detailed list that includes information about the tables which Enron has purchased to support various non-profits. If an Enron employee has volunteered to fill a table, their name will appear in the far right column. Please share this information with the Executive with which you work, as we would like to utilize every table that we buy. When an Enron employee volunteers to fill a table, we encourage them to leverage it by inviting co-workers, customers, community leaders, etc. 
 
If you volunteer to fill a table, it is important that you immediately let me know, and I will serve as the liaison with the non-profit organization.

Attached is the updated Community Relations Tables Report.  If you have any questions, please feel free to call me directly.

Thanks,

Hilda Bourgeois-Galloway, CPS
Enron - Community Relations
hbourge@enron.com <mailto:hbourge@enron.com>
713/345-6805 
 

In my dealings with Accenture, they have acted as if this is the agreement that governs them.  I don't know which Accenture group is involved, however.  Either way, I believe that it is time for an updated agreement, with better rates.  Have you been working with Global Strategic Sourcing on this?

Michelle -

This is the same agreement I referred to in my e-mail.  I understand this has been rolled to apply to the Accenture LLP group, which is a group that is separate and distinct from AA LLP.  If it is AA LLP's position that the below agreeement is effective, that is fine, but I am not sure this is the case.

Mark

Mark, I understand that this is a copy of the latest agreement between Enron and Andersen Consulting.  I agree that a new master would be a good idea.  Michelle

==================================
Mike Baer
Accenture - Legal Group
100 South Wacker Drive, Ste. 515, Chicago, IL 60606-4006
Voice: 312-693-1512, Octel: 69/31512, Fax: 312-652-1512
eMail: michael.e.baer@accenture.com
==================================

This message is for the designated recipient only and may contain
privileged or confidential information.  If you have received it in error,
please notify the sender immediately and delete the original.  Any other
use of the email by you is prohibited.
 - B0033CF1.TIF << File: B0033CF1.TIF >> 

I'll get it set up.  Michelle

Yes. I would think a phone interview next week would be in order.

Alan

Any interest in talking with this candidate?  Michelle

Michelle,

Attached is Joel's resume.  I'm sorry this took a while  -- I needed to
confirm his compensation requirments -- and learned that he will fit within
your range.  Please call if you have any questions.  I will be out of the
office until Monday, August 20, but  Trisha Lowery in our office will be
glad to assist you.

Elaine Makris Williams
ms legal search, l.l.c.
3327 D'Amico
Houston, Texas 77019
713/807-8500
713/807-8555 fax
emwilliams@mslegalsearch.com
www.mslegalsearch.com

 - Ross, Joel.doc << File: Ross, Joel.doc >> 

Indeed I will.  MHC

Michelle:

Will you be able to get to the McBride Contract so we can send to her on Monday?

Please let me know today. Thanks.

David,

Derrick approved the use of Charlie Caulkin.

Also, here is info on the Denver lawyer who should review the issues relating to the sharing of employees.  Do you want to call him, or would you like me to?

Good to see you this week.

Michelle

Larry Marquess
303.575.5840
fax 303.629.0200

I will alert him that you will be sending him something.  He is the managing
shareholder of that office and he either will do it or assign it to one of
his partners.

Thanks for thinking of us.  Any word on the Mariner Energy people?

Kerry E Notestine
Littler Mendelson, PC
1900 Chevron Tower
1301 McKinney Street
Houston, Texas 77010
713.652.4748
713.951.9212 (fax)
knotestine@littler.com
www.littler.com

Kerry,

We have a need to have a proposal/concept reviewed by Colorado lawyers.
Which lawyer at your firm should we contact?

Thanks.

Michelle

----
This email may contain confidential and privileged material for the sole use of the intended recipient(s). Any review, use, distribution or disclosure by others is strictly prohibited. If you are not the intended recipient (or authorized to receive for the recipient), please contact the sender by reply email and delete all copies of this message.

To reply to our email administrator directly, send an email to
postmaster@littler.com

Littler Mendelson, P.C.
http://www.littler.com

	FYI re:  NEPCO picketing issues.

Michelle,

This is a heads up to an issue developing this morning at a project site in
Payne Creek, Florida.  As far as we know, the union is directing the
picketing against the general contractor, OCI (a subsidiary of B&V), and not
NEPCO who is the subcontractor to OCI.  Rick Johnson may want to
investigate.

By copy to Gail, Seth Price will evaluate whether additional claims are
developed against OCI for any delay impacts caused by OCI to NEPCO or vice
versa depending on who the union pipe fitters are picketing.

David H. Lund, Jr.
Assistant General Counsel
National Energy Production Corporation
11831 North Creek Parkway N.
Bothell, WA 98011
425-415-3138
Fax: 425-415-3032
David.Lund@nepco.com or davidlu@nepco.com

Forgot about Lawyer Dave !!!!!!!!!

Thanks
Bob Black
bobb@nepco.com <mailto:bobb@nepco.com>
425-415-3157

I have also requested Lark to contact Seath for review of OCI requirement to
provide access to site.
Any other comments ?

Thanks
Bob Black
bobb@nepco.com <mailto:bobb@nepco.com>
425-415-3157

The pipefitters union is picketing OCI at the Payne Creek jobsite this
morning. There are 4 pickets at the gate on Ft. Green Road. The gate system
at the entrance has no designation as to union and non-union so they can
picket any gate. The picket signs reference low wages according to Greg
Renz. OCI has an agreement with Forida Maint. union ironworkers to perform
work. Pipefitters think they should be doing the work. I am going to Payne
Creek to meet with our supervisors on how to conduct themselves when they
enter and exit the jobsite. At this point no activity is being directed at
Nepco. We want to keep it that way.
Call me on my cell phone if you need me.
Mike

Frank,

I enjoyed meeting you when I was in Bothell last week.  

During our meeting, you indicated that you were going to put together a draft of the response to the OSHA charge and circulate a draft on Wednesday.  I haven't seen a draft, and I understand that the response deadline is today.  Perhaps you were able to obtain an extension, but I hadn't heard of that if you were.

Would you please let me know the status?

Thanks a lot!

Michelle

Twanda is out today and Monday; I'll do the best I can.

The term date is 8/10/01.

Thanks,
Shanna

Michelle,

Please draft a separation agreement for Andrea Hauser.  Nowlan/Shankman have agreed to compensate Andrea for the 6 month non-compete period.

Andrea will be in the office on Monday to sign the agreement and is leaving the country on Tuesday.  Will it be a problem to have the agreement by 10:30 on Monday?

Thanks,
Shanna

Please save these to a MHC document -- I've got edits.  Thanks.  MHC

 

Regards,
Jo Ann Matson
Enron Corp
jo.ann.matson@enron.com
(713) 345-7237

Dear Grandmother,

So sorry we didn't make it  yesterday.  We went shopping, and Cameron hurt his finger while he was riding on the shopping cart  -- nothing major, but it distracted me so much that all other things left my mind.  Oops!!!  He had to have a special kind of bandage, but it doesn't hurt him any more, so I think all is going to be ok.  So, I apologize for not making it yesterday.

Hope all is well with you.

Ryan, I think we should have some draft answers for these -- get with the MAD team to see what kinds of answers we have given in the past on these types of questions.  Thanks.  Michelle

Michelle, here is a first attempt at possible questions at the all employee meeting. Please let me know if you would like to get together for a few minutes to discuss.

R-
 
 << File: Q&A.doc >> 

Thanks for  the good words.  I appreciate your input.  Michelle

Michelle;
I have been working quite closely with Valeria these past few weeks on many difficult HR issues.  I wanted to let you know, that she is wonderful to work with.  Her calm, professional demeanor is a real asset in these times.  

Valeria has a difficult, but critical role here at Enron.  I consider her a true partner to my generalist duties.

Thanks
Judy

Valeria,

FYI -- here are kudos from one of your clients!  Keep up the good work!

Michelle

Michelle;
I have been working quite closely with Valeria these past few weeks on many difficult HR issues.  I wanted to let you know, that she is wonderful to work with.  Her calm, professional demeanor is a real asset in these times.  

Valeria has a difficult, but critical role here at Enron.  I consider her a true partner to my generalist duties.

Thanks
Judy

Not that I know of.  Michelle

	

Confidential Attorney/Client Communication:

Thank you for visiting with Marla re: Carolyn Barrett. I had previously spoken with Mary Joyce regarding the separation compensation and she was comfortable with the calculation, as well.  Let me know if any adjustment  is necessary? 

Kriste K. Sullivan
Enron Corp.  -  Legal
EB 4861
(713) 853-7557 Phone
(713) 646-5847 Fax

 

I don't know.  I would suggest that you ask Cynthia Barrow for starters.  Sorry I am so clueless.  MHC

I am working with Jeanie Slone on the Bridgeline rollover.  In working on the 401K plan, I need to know whether the Texaco/Enron employees will be treated as Terminated or will they fall under the Same Desk Rule. 

Thanks,
Sarah Zarkowsky
x53791

FYI.  Michelle

Michelle:

FYI, here is a survey done by one of our lawyers in California about the
military pay issue.  I replied to his original email and you may be the
"energy company" mentioned below.  You were referenced anonymously.

Kerry E Notestine
3300 Chevron Tower
1301 McKinney Street
Houston, Texas 77010
713.652.4748
713.951.9212 (fax)
knotestine@littler.com
www.littler.com

Christina:   Here's a synopsis of the replies I received from within the
firm so far:

  *  One Fortune 500 client told a Littler attorney that he had participated
in a 100-company conference call about the issue earlier this week. The
sense he got from the call was that almost every company was planning to pay
employees the difference between their normal wages and military base pay,
exclusive of allowances, for a certain period which varied among the
companies. Many were going to pay for 90 days; some, for 180 days, and a few
for a year. One of the companies that was opting for 180 days had previously
provided a pay differential for 4 weeks.

  *  Another attorney was advised by a major energy industry client that it
was paying the difference between the military pay and the employee's salary
for one year.

  *  One attorney has spoken to several firm clients over the past few days
about this, and almost all of them are going to exceed the legal
requirements by offering some form of continued compensation, but no
specifics as to duration.

  *  Another Littler lawyer was told by a large industrial client that it
would pay the difference between military pay and normal salary, and
continue benefit coverage, with no indication about maximum duration.

Thomas J. Dowdalls
Littler Mendelson
2175 N. California Blvd.Suite 835
Walnut Creek, CA  94596
(925) 932.2468
email: tdowdalls@littler.com

 Thanks.

Christina G. Cordoza
Senior Counsel
Law Department
McKesson HBOC, Inc.
One Post Street, 34th Floor
San Francisco, CA   94104
tel.  415.983.8328
fax  415.983.9369
christina.cordoza@mckhboc.com

Hi Christina-- I'll check it out. I've seen a few references to what
employers may be doing lately, and I'll see if there's anything there that
you may find useful.

Thomas J. Dowdalls
Littler Mendelson
2175 N. California Blvd.Suite 835
Walnut Creek, CA  94596
(925) 932.2468
email: tdowdalls@littler.com

Do you know what most of your clients are offering in terms of compensation
to reservists called up for duty?  We are trying to do a little informal
benchmarking in advance of drafting our final policy.  Thanks.

Christina G. Cordoza
Senior Counsel
Law Department
McKesson HBOC, Inc.
One Post Street, 34th Floor
San Francisco, CA   94104
tel.  415.983.8328
fax  415.983.9369
christina.cordoza@mckhboc.com

 <<Publications ASAP.html>> Military Leave Rights and Obligations

----
This email may contain confidential and privileged material for the sole use
of the intended recipient(s). Any review, use, distribution or disclosure by
others is strictly prohibited. If you are not the intended recipient (or
authorized to receive for the recipient), please contact the sender by reply
email and delete all copies of this message.

To reply to our email administrator directly, send an email to
postmaster@littler.com

Littler Mendelson, P.C.
http://www.littler.com

Confidentiality Notice: This e-mail message, including any attachments, is
for the sole use of the intended recipient(s) and may contain confidential
and privileged information. Any unauthorized review, use, disclosure or
distribution is prohibited. If you are not the intended recipient, please
contact the sender by reply e-mail and destroy all copies of the original
message.

----
This email may contain confidential and privileged material for the sole use
of the intended recipient(s). Any review, use, distribution or disclosure by
others is strictly prohibited. If you are not the intended recipient (or
authorized to receive for the recipient), please contact the sender by reply
email and delete all copies of this message.

To reply to our email administrator directly, send an email to
postmaster@littler.com

Littler Mendelson, P.C.
http://www.littler.com

Confidentiality Notice: This e-mail message, including any attachments, is
for the sole use of the intended recipient(s) and may contain confidential
and privileged information. Any unauthorized review, use, disclosure or
distribution is prohibited. If you are not the intended recipient, please
contact the sender by reply e-mail and destroy all copies of the original
message.

----
This email may contain confidential and privileged material for the sole use of the intended recipient(s). Any review, use, distribution or disclosure by others is strictly prohibited. If you are not the intended recipient (or authorized to receive for the recipient), please contact the sender by reply email and delete all copies of this message.

To reply to our email administrator directly, send an email to
postmaster@littler.com

Littler Mendelson, P.C.
http://www.littler.com

FYI

Please see the attached.

Teresa

 

FYI

please make changes.

Please adjust Edith Cross's employmemt agreement draft to have the options struck in November 2001.  Please prepare an executable once this change has been reflected. Thanks!

Diane, there are lots of emails about this topic.  Would you please print them and collect them in a file labelled for Tobias?  Thanks.  MHC

Dear Ross:

Thanks.  I believe that's a good idea.  If he is unable to find a job within Enron via redeployment, this may be an opportunity for him.

Sharon

Sharon,

Tobias is not associated with any of the team with whom we have scheduled a meeting.  However, I would be happy to add his team to the list of parties with which I discuss a potential sales transaction.

Regards,
Ross

Dear Ross:

Thanks for the information.   It does not appear that there would be a conflict of interest if Mr. Munk puts together a team for the propose of discussing the transaction and ultimately purchasing DealBench.com.

Is he associated with any of the teams with whom you are meeting to discuss the transaction?

Thanks.

Sharon

Sharon:

Enron Net Works is currently exploring alternatives as it relates to DealBench.com, which would include selling the platform to an independent third party.  I work for Brad Richter and have been asked to lead/manage the sales effort.

We have already begun to initiate discussions with third parties as it relates to the sale of DealBench.  A team from FreeMarkets, Inc. will meet with us next Tuesday to discuss such a transaction, and we are currently setting up a similar meeting with PurchasePro Com Inc.  We have also targeted several other companies that may be interested in buying DealBench and will be discussing the opportunity with them in the near future.

Please let me know if you need any additional information or clarification as it relates to your questions below.  

Regards,
Ross Mesquita
x3-3288

Ross--

Please answer the inquiries below.  You know our position.

Thanks,
Brad

Dear Brad and Michelle:

I have reviewed the letter from Tobias Munk.

Has Enron determined that it will no longer be involved with DealBench.com and given permission to allow Mr. Munk to independently raise funds for a proposed management buy-out or sale to an independent third party?  or Has Enron determined that it will not go forward with DealBench.com at this time, but it is possible in the future that it will still be involved with DealBench.com?  I note that Mr. Munk states that Enron is actively seeking a buyer for the platform.  What discussions have taken place with respect to a transaction for the purchase of DealBench.com.   

Regardless of Mr. Munk's intentions, as stated in his letter of August 7, 2001, Enron must make a determination to allow Mr. Munk to use Enron's idea, etc. for DealBench.com as it is proprietary and belongs to Enron and not Mr. Munk.  If Enron has made the decision to sell DealBench.com and Mr. Munk, now no longer an Enron employee, is able to put together a group to purchase this Internet platform, I don't believe that this would constitute a violation of the Conflict of Interests Policy as described in Enron's Code of Ethics. 

It appears that Mr. Munk is requesting permission from Enron to move forward with respect to DealBench.com as described in his letter. 

Please confirm Enron's intentions with respect to DealBench.   In addition, please advise of any communications/discussions with Mr. Munk regarding DealBench.com and his ability to be a part of DealBench.com in the event he finds a buyer or becomes part of a group which purchases DealBench.com.

Thanks.

Sharon

What do you think?  MHC

Michelle, please comment. 

Please send me an email response about whether you and Michelle Cash are OK with what he's written.  After that, what do we do?

Brad

After a conversation with Ryan Seleznov I herewith like disclose in writing my intentions in respect to Dealbench.

Please see attached Word file

Best regards

Tobias Munk

 << File: Enron Code of Ethics Compliance.doc >> 

I don't know -- I think we've categorized them as severance, but maybe we should get with Mackin.  MHC

	Can you help with this one?
Kriste - 

Could you clarify a payment classification question for me?  

Separation Agreement payments are being entered into SAP for future payments.  These payments are in lieu of severance payments.  When these payments get coded into SAP, should they legally be coded as:

	1. severance payments (since they are taking the place of severance) or 
	2. agreement payments (since it is an actual agreement)

Call me if you have any questions.  I just want to make sure that we are coding them properly.  

Thank you.
Cindy Simon

Diane, I've left a message for Brian Bloom about this -- would you please follow up, as he either didn't get my message or has not returned my call.  Basically, we did an incentive plan for Enron Investment Partners, and now we want to dissolve it.  Would you ask him to provide a brief overview via email as to what it would entail?  Thanks.  Michelle

I was going to ask Michelle Cash to take a look at it to see if we could dissolve it.  Pam Butler does not want Garland to know we had a carried interest plan.  

Michelle, since you initially were involved, can we quietly dissolve this plan since EIP is no more??  Please advise. Thanks. 

Sheila  Walton

Sheila - with the merging of EIP into Enron Principal Investments we need to discuss what happens with the incentive plan we developed for them last year. 

Sheila

Donna, I think this falls in your court.  Let me know if it should be handled elsewhere.  Thanks.  Michelle

Michelle:
My name is Andrew Greer and I am new on the Hrly power desk.  TJ Black gave me your name in order to get my NASD Series 7 & 63 transferred over.  Is that something you could help me out with?
Thanks,
Andrew Greer

please calendar -- I'd like to go. =20

=20

You are invited to hear Lloyd Will, Director Trading, speak to the HR commu=
nity on these topics:
?         Enron's history of trading
?         What makes Enron different in the market?
?         How is the trading organization organized?
?         What tools do we use to trade?
?         What does the future hold for our trading organizations?
?        What can HR do to help the trading organization?
=20
This is a great opportunity to learn about one of our core businesses
Come with questions - Lloyd is looking forward to an interactive discussion=
...
=20
We hope to see you there!
=20
Location:  5C2
When:  Friday, august 24.  3:30-5:00pm
=20
=20
Brought to you by the letter A and by the HR Associate & Analyst Program
=20
=20
=20

Let's discuss when we both can talk.  MHC

Michelle:

I wanted to follow up with some additional information regarding the child
porn issue.

The consensus seems to be that the company does not need to report the child
porn if it does not want to.  The only exception to this is individuals
engaged in an electronic communication service or a remote computing service
to the public are obligated under 42 U.S.C. 13032 to report child porn to
the Cyber Tip Line at the National Center for Missing and Exploited
Children.  I looked at the definitions of "electronic communication service"
and "remote computing service" and the second does not seem to apply
although the former could apply.  The statute appears to qualify both as
providing those services "to the public" so I would not think an email
system for employees would apply.  The definition of electronic
communication service is pretty broad though.  If you want me to investigate
this further let, me know, but I would think we have a good argument that we
do not provide these services to the public.

The child porn statute, 18 U.S.C. 2252A, covers pornography involving girls
under the age of 18, so much porn could be child porn.  There are enhanced
penalties for certain types of child porn and for child porn involving
children under the age of 12.  There is an affirmative defense under the
statute if the possessor of child porn destroys it or reports it to a law
enforcement agency.  Therefore, it seems the best course of action is to
destroy anything the company has and there does not appear to be a reporting
obligation.  Ashley anonymously called the FBI and the DA and their
responses are indicated below.  The information obtained from the FBI and
DA's office is consistent with my recommendations.

Kerry E Notestine
Littler Mendelson, PC
1900 Chevron Tower
1301 McKinney Street
Houston, Texas 77010
713.652.4748
713.951.9212 (fax)
knotestine@littler.com
www.littler.com

----
This email may contain confidential and privileged material for the sole use of the intended recipient(s). Any review, use, distribution or disclosure by others is strictly prohibited. If you are not the intended recipient (or authorized to receive for the recipient), please contact the sender by reply email and delete all copies of this message.

To reply to our email administrator directly, send an email to
postmaster@littler.com

Littler Mendelson, P.C.
http://www.littler.com

Here is the first part of Kerry's email.  MHC

Michelle:

Here are two good responses regarding the issue about which you called me
this morning.

I researched this issue under federal criminal law and did not find any duty
to report. You should know, though, that the penalties are pretty draconian.
Tell your client not to print anything, forward anything, etc. Just delete
it all.

Per the recent news stories re the arrest of individuals who have downloaded
child porn, the possession of same is itself unlawful, so the client should
systematically dispossess itself of it.  Brian

I received no comments to the contrary regarding these.  Thus, it appears
that you can delete the material and go forward.  I will do a little more
checking and get back to you with any supplements.  We have not checked the
law of PR, do you want me to do that?

Kerry E Notestine
Littler Mendelson, PC
1900 Chevron Tower
1301 McKinney Street
Houston, Texas 77010
713.652.4748
713.951.9212 (fax)
knotestine@littler.com
www.littler.com

----
This email may contain confidential and privileged material for the sole use of the intended recipient(s). Any review, use, distribution or disclosure by others is strictly prohibited. If you are not the intended recipient (or authorized to receive for the recipient), please contact the sender by reply email and delete all copies of this message.

To reply to our email administrator directly, send an email to
postmaster@littler.com

Littler Mendelson, P.C.
http://www.littler.com

Rick, would you mind getting on the transition of HRRM functions to the staffing and service center groups?  I think that you have the most familiarity with the processes and perhaps could facilitate that taking place next week.  Let's discuss.  Michelle

The contents of this email are privileged and confidential.

Below is a quick summary of the general guidance provided by Mark Stubley during the conference call today.  If you have questions, please feel free to give me a call at 713-853-6401.

IBEW, Pipefitters, and others have tried to "salt" jobs down there in Florida.

The business agents will try to get out early and visit with the site manager to get a pre-hire agreement, if possible.  The business managers will take notes/keep diaries of their conversations with site managers and supervisors, so be aware of that possibility when you are approached by unions.  We should keep our own notes of conversations as they occur.

Should we designate one person to handle union relations?  We should have a very small group of people to have such a discussions, perhaps the HR site lead or the construction site manager would be the appropriate liaisons.  That way, we don't have the unions approaching our employees.  We have no obligation to have such conversations, but it is a good idea not to be antagonistic with them.   Better to be polite, let them know that we are mobilizing the project, but that we bid this work as a merit shop project and will not sign a pre-hire agreement.  We should not give them any information about our hiring process or plans.

We should tell them that we will be glad to consider their people at the time we are hiring, but that we are not taking applications at this time.  We should inform them about how to apply for positions at the site, which will be at an off-site Human Resources office.  We also are going to use the state employment offices for clerical personnel, but not for other types because we have not had much success in receiving qualified candidates.

There is a need for HR to look at the off-site office before the lease is signed.

Other issues surround gating at the facility.  How will it be gated?  Who will control entry and exits?  What about the other ways into the site?  How do we prevent persons from using an alternative entrance and then getting into our site to talk with our people?  Parking area will be on the other side of the plant.  There are roads between the parking gate and the building site.  Because of all these issues, we should look at a plat for the site and then look at the gating situation.

Back to Mark's suggestions:

Be careful of calls coming into the project.  Make sure that the receptionist or office manager knows what to say to callers.  Those calls should be directed to that site HR lead.  Also, should inform those people how to answer questions about hiring plans.  E.g., "Are you hiring electricians out there?"  Those should be referred to HR's off site office.  Also, those people should know how to answer questions as to whether we hire union employees.  They should refer such questions to HR and not answer them.  We will have a script for the receptionist for such inquiries.

Be sure to follow the 30-day rule.  Also, follow our hiring practices consistently.

Ultimately, there will be training for others at the site after more employees are on site, perhaps the last week of October, on union avoidance and other issues.

One more follow up item is to make sure that our subcontracts have union harmony provisions.  Galen (Millie?) is going to send those to David Lund.

David Lund, Michelle Cash, and Mark Stubley will discuss the issue of which local counsel to get lined up in the event that we need someone locally.

I've received advice from Vinson & Elkins on this, which I will send your way.  It looks like we can.  MHC

I was going to ask Michelle Cash to take a look at it to see if we could dissolve it.  Pam Butler does not want Garland to know we had a carried interest plan.  

Michelle, since you initially were involved, can we quietly dissolve this plan since EIP is no more??  Please advise. Thanks. 

Sheila  Walton

Sheila - with the merging of EIP into Enron Principal Investments we need to discuss what happens with the incentive plan we developed for them last year. 

Sheila

Pat, do you have any insight as to the question below?

Bridgeline is a JV between Enron and Texaco.  Currently, Enron and Texaco have been assigning employees to work for Bridgeline, with no change in employment status.  Most employees rotate back to their "home" company within a few months.  Now, we are considering spinning off the entire arrangement and creating a separate entity.  The assigned employees would be part of the transaction and would become employees of Newco.  How does that impact the question below?

Thanks!

Michelle

Michelle, I am unaware of what is currently happening on the Bridgeline front......can you please answer Sarah's questions?

Best regards
bng
Barbara,

I have been trying to get a legal question answered and Jeanie Slone suggested I run the question by you.  Will the Bridgeline "employees" be considered terminated from Enron/Texaco OR will they fall under the Same Desk Rule?  I had assumed that this is a legal question...to be decided by the legal department.  Is that a correct assumption?  Any insight you have would be much appreciated!

Thanks
Sarah Zarkowsky
x53791

As you know this is not a simply question.  On the surface this sounds like a 'transfer' from one participating Enron employer to a non-participating Enron employer which would mean that the impacted employees are actually terminating one payroll company and being hired by another.  However, you all need to feret out the exact details and make sure if we know if there is any divestiture issues.  In addition to the 401(k) we need to make sure we know how the other benefits will be handled.

Please coordinate a call between yourself, Pat Mackin and Sarah to get the specifics before guidance is provided.  
Thanks
Cb

We are looking in to rolling over some Enron employees to Bridgeline (payroll + benefits) - for purposes of setting up the 401K I need to know whether the Texaco/Enron employees will be treated as Terminated or whether they will fall under the same desk rule.  I posed this question to legal first (Michelle Cash) and she suggested I ask you. (see below)

Thanks,
Sarah Zarkowsky
x53791
I don't know.  I would suggest that you ask Cynthia Barrow for starters.  Sorry I am so clueless.  MHC

I am working with Jeanie Slone on the Bridgeline rollover.  In working on the 401K plan, I need to know whether the Texaco/Enron employees will be treated as Terminated or will they fall under the Same Desk Rule. 

Thanks,
Sarah Zarkowsky
x53791

You are invited to sit at the Enron table for the Father of the Year luncheon on August 28 at 11:45 at the Hyatt Regency.   This event is a delightful one, where there are tributes paid to several "outstanding" fathers in the community.  

Please let me know if you would be able to attend. 

Pat, I hope you are feeling well.  Kidney stones sound painful!!  Take care of yourself.  Michelle

Tim, 
I am sorry I missed catching up with you this afternoon.  My afternoon was  
cut short by a kidney stone problem I am experiencing. 
Nevertheless, I reviewed retention 2001 options6.doc and made significant  
revisions to it.  Please see the attached. 
You sent two forms of letters and I only reviewed the one document as the  
other seemed to be very similar after a cursory review.  If the attached is  
acceptable to everyone, the second document can be conformed to it.   
I've copied Pam Butler and Michelle Cash on this memo. 
Regards, 
Pat 

 - Brazil Option Awrd1.DOC << File: Brazil Option Awrd1.DOC >> 

Twanda, please pull all emails on this subject matter out of my in box and print for the file.  Thanks.  MHC
Hi Sharon,
 
Brad's manager is aware that we are exploring the possibility of a conflict.  Brad is currently in the Freight Markets group where he has developed pricing models for this new business. Brad's current manager does not foresee a conflict and I believe Brad developed these models in between being an associate and a full time hire.  Brad did not create the models as a part of his job responsibilities and although Brad says we are not currently in the business of trading long distance minutes, it is not far-fetched to think that we may at some point.
 
If you have further questions, I would be happy to arrange a brief meeting with Brad and his manager - this is the extent of my knowledge on the subject.
 
Thanks,
Shanna

Dear Shanna: 

Thanks for your message.  Has Brad discussed his involvement with his manager?  What is the nature of Brad's position here at Enron.  Does his management foresee the possibility of a conflict with respect to his responsibilities here at Enron?  Did Brad develop the model while an Enron employee?  Does he create models as part of his job responsibilities at Enron?  Is Enron in this market?  Does Enron anticipate entering into this market?

Please advise. 

Thanks. 

Sharon 

Sharon, 

Have you had an opportunity to review this issue?  Brad is anxious to continue the employment agreement process, but we need to determine whether his involvement in this business poses any conflict first.

Thanks, 
Shanna 

Sharon, 

This is the write-up that Brad Romine prepared explaining his involvement with a communications company. 

Per our conversation last week, we are now trying to determine if this business involvement presents a conflict with Enron's Code of Conduct and if so, how to handle.  This situation arose when EGM offered Brad an employment agreement.   Brad reviewed the non-competition language and wondered how his involvement in this business would be handled.

Please advise as to next steps so that we may proceed with the employment agreement process. 

Thanks, 
Shanna 

Shanna, 
        Per your request here is a brief description of my relationship with Bluewater Communications. 

        Bluewater is a provider of prepaid calling cards. They purchase minutes from wholesale telcom carriers on a take or pay basis and then resell them to retail customers. Bluewater is responsible for marketing the minutes to the retail customers, and all volume and price risk for the minutes.

        I developed for Bluewater a model that allows them to structure their prepaid calling cards to maximize profitability while minimizing volume risk. The model uses their historical calling profiles and allows them to compute the expected profitability of a given calling card platform. The model utilizes statistics as well optimization theory.

        My current  working relationship with Bluewater is a licensing aggrement which allows them to use my model on an ongoing basis. They pay me a percentage of their monthly revenues for use of the model. As they collect more data from their switch I am occasionally asked to recalibrate the model (about once every 2 months). 

        That is the extent of my envolvment with Bluewater. 

Brad 

No.  I believe that the answer will be to destroy the materials, but I am double-checking the research on that this afternoon.  Thanks.  MHC

Michelle,

We have received the hard drive in question from Puerto Rico.  Should we route this to you?  Please advise what the next steps should be.

Roberto DeLeon

April 20

All:

Would you please provide your birthdates - month & date is sufficient. 

MeCole Brown -
Michelle Cash -
Bonne Castellano -
Ben Herman -
Valeria Hope  - 
Rick Johnson -
Sandra Lighthill-
Jo Ann Matson - 02/14
LaQuitta Washington - 

Regards,
Jo Ann Matson
Enron Corp
jo.ann.matson@enron.com
(713) 345-7237

FYI, the attached article and story is disturbing and surprising about Southern Company.
 
It also raises an issue that we could face if we are not careful.  The article discusses internal diversity studies, which the plaintiffs are using as evidence to support their claims.  The company claims that the studies were done by people who did not know how to conduct the appropriate analyses under the relevant legal standards.  
 
I have this concern here, as well, when we have people running analyses that do not factor in the legal standards and instead try to interpret data themselves.  I would like to talk about how to manage that.  Let me know who you think should be included in such a meeting, and I'll set something up.
 
Thanks.
 
Michelle
 
 
FYI,
This article recently aired on Dateline.  Southern Power's statistics don't look too good.
 
Sandra

This is the Dateline website with the article we discussed earlier today.  Interesting. 

                        <http://www.msnbc.com/news/617070.asp#BODY> 

Bonne 
EB1669B 

So, my question goes to the highest bidder . . .

Client received an FMLA leave request based on a Certified Nutritionist's
completion of the serious health condition form.  This does not appear to be
a person authorized by the regs to certify a person as having a serious
health condition.  Any thoughts on how to respond to this leave request.
Billable credit for the most helpful response(s).

Kerry E Notestine
Littler Mendelson, PC
1900 Chevron Tower
1301 McKinney Street
Houston, Texas 77010
713.652.4748
713.951.9212 (fax)
knotestine@littler.com
www.littler.com

----
This email may contain confidential and privileged material for the sole use of the intended recipient(s). Any review, use, distribution or disclosure by others is strictly prohibited. If you are not the intended recipient (or authorized to receive for the recipient), please contact the sender by reply email and delete all copies of this message.

To reply to our email administrator directly, send an email to
postmaster@littler.com

Littler Mendelson, P.C.
http://www.littler.com

 
 
Hi Michelle - 
 
I hope you vacation was wonderful!
 
Could you please draw up a non-compete agreement for Richard F. Ecklord who has an offer going out today for the EGM Trading Track.  
 
Please call with any questions - x57302.
 
Many thanks,
 
Adrianne Engler
HR Analyst
713-345-7302

 

Please note that we do not agree with the terms of the letter attached to the resume.  We have provided a contract for review by your company, and that agreement should govern.  With that, thanks for the resume.  Michelle Cash

 
 - Supplemental Presentation for Temp PT Atty 09.21.01.dot << File: Supplemental Presentation for Temp PT Atty 09.21.01.dot >> 
 - Resume of Amy Williams.doc << File: Resume of Amy Williams.doc >> 

Of course -- I was just giving you grief!

I wouldn't put it exactly that way but ...  Sometimes you need to let them
know that if they give a good response, the client can be billed a quarter
hour.  Otherwise, we may not get a response.  I also do not want to bill for
cursory or not well reasoned statements.

Kerry E Notestine
Littler Mendelson, PC
1900 Chevron Tower
1301 McKinney Street
Houston, Texas 77010
713.652.4748
713.951.9212 (fax)
knotestine@littler.com
www.littler.com

So, my question goes to the highest bidder . . .

    -----Original Message-----
[mailto:IMCEANOTES-+22Notestine+2C+20Kerry+22+20+3CKNotestine+40littler+2Eco
m+3E+40ENRON@ENRON.com]

   Sent:   Thursday, August 23, 2001 9:25 AM
   Client received an FMLA leave request based on a Certified
   Nutritionist's
   completion of the serious health condition form.  This does not appear
   to be
   a person authorized by the regs to certify a person as having a serious
   health condition.  Any thoughts on how to respond to this leave request.
   Billable credit for the most helpful response(s).

   Kerry E Notestine
   Littler Mendelson, PC
   1900 Chevron Tower
   1301 McKinney Street
   Houston, Texas 77010
   713.652.4748
   713.951.9212 (fax)
   knotestine@littler.com
   www.littler.com

   ----
   This email may contain confidential and privileged material for the sole
   use of the intended recipient(s). Any review, use, distribution or
   disclosure by others is strictly prohibited. If you are not the intended
   recipient (or authorized to receive for the recipient), please contact
   the sender by reply email and delete all copies of this message.

   To reply to our email administrator directly, send an email to
   postmaster@littler.com

   Littler Mendelson, P.C.
   http://www.littler.com

----
This email may contain confidential and privileged material for the sole use of the intended recipient(s). Any review, use, distribution or disclosure by others is strictly prohibited. If you are not the intended recipient (or authorized to receive for the recipient), please contact the sender by reply email and delete all copies of this message.

To reply to our email administrator directly, send an email to
postmaster@littler.com

Littler Mendelson, P.C.
http://www.littler.com

hard to offend me

Sometimes you never know.  Sorry if I overreated.

Kerry E Notestine
Littler Mendelson, PC
1900 Chevron Tower
1301 McKinney Street
Houston, Texas 77010
713.652.4748
713.951.9212 (fax)
knotestine@littler.com
www.littler.com

Of course -- I was just giving you grief!

    -----Original Message-----
[mailto:IMCEANOTES-+22Notestine+2C+20Kerry+22+20+3CKNotestine+40littler+2Eco
m+3E+40ENRON@ENRON.com]

   Sent:   Thursday, August 23, 2001 11:42 AM
   I wouldn't put it exactly that way but ...  Sometimes you need to let
   them
   know that if they give a good response, the client can be billed a
   quarter
   hour.  Otherwise, we may not get a response.  I also do not want to bill
   for
   cursory or not well reasoned statements.

   Kerry E Notestine
   Littler Mendelson, PC
   1900 Chevron Tower
   1301 McKinney Street
   Houston, Texas 77010
   713.652.4748
   713.951.9212 (fax)
   knotestine@littler.com
   www.littler.com

   -----Original Message-----
   So, my question goes to the highest bidder . . .

       -----Original Message-----
[mailto:IMCEANOTES-+22Notestine+2C+20Kerry+22+20+3CKNotestine+40littler+2Eco
   m+3E+40ENRON@ENRON.com]

      Sent:   Thursday, August 23, 2001 9:25 AM
      Client received an FMLA leave request based on a Certified
      Nutritionist's
      completion of the serious health condition form.  This does not
   appear
      to be
      a person authorized by the regs to certify a person as having a
   serious
      health condition.  Any thoughts on how to respond to this leave
   request.
      Billable credit for the most helpful response(s).

      Kerry E Notestine
      Littler Mendelson, PC
      1900 Chevron Tower
      1301 McKinney Street
      Houston, Texas 77010
      713.652.4748
      713.951.9212 (fax)
      knotestine@littler.com
      www.littler.com

      ----
      This email may contain confidential and privileged material for the
   sole
      use of the intended recipient(s). Any review, use, distribution or
      disclosure by others is strictly prohibited. If you are not the
   intended
      recipient (or authorized to receive for the recipient), please
   contact
      the sender by reply email and delete all copies of this message.

      To reply to our email administrator directly, send an email to
      postmaster@littler.com

      Littler Mendelson, P.C.
      http://www.littler.com

   **********************************************************************
   This e-mail is the property of Enron Corp. and/or its relevant affiliate
   and
   may contain confidential and privileged material for the sole use of the
   intended recipient (s). Any review, use, distribution or disclosure by
   others is strictly prohibited. If you are not the intended recipient (or
   authorized to receive for the recipient), please contact the sender or
   reply
   to Enron Corp. at enron.messaging.administration@enron.com and delete
   all
   copies of the message. This e-mail (and any attachments hereto) are not
   intended to be an offer (or an acceptance) and do not create or evidence
   a
   binding and enforceable contract between Enron Corp. (or any of its
   affiliates) and the intended recipient or any other party, and may not
   be
   relied on by anyone as the basis of a contract by estoppel or otherwise.
   Thank you.
   **********************************************************************

   ----
   This email may contain confidential and privileged material for the sole
   use of the intended recipient(s). Any review, use, distribution or
   disclosure by others is strictly prohibited. If you are not the intended
   recipient (or authorized to receive for the recipient), please contact
   the sender by reply email and delete all copies of this message.

   To reply to our email administrator directly, send an email to
   postmaster@littler.com

   Littler Mendelson, P.C.
   http://www.littler.com

----
This email may contain confidential and privileged material for the sole use of the intended recipient(s). Any review, use, distribution or disclosure by others is strictly prohibited. If you are not the intended recipient (or authorized to receive for the recipient), please contact the sender by reply email and delete all copies of this message.

To reply to our email administrator directly, send an email to
postmaster@littler.com

Littler Mendelson, P.C.
http://www.littler.com

please print these for me.  Thanks.  mhc

Attached are a memo regarding the dissolution of AMPS, and  proposed minutes to the board of managers meeting scheduled for August  27.
 
Please call me at (713) 221-1131 with your questions or  comments.
 
Thanks.
 
 
Scott L. Miller
Bracewell & Patterson, L.L.P.
Phone  (713) 221-1131
Fax (713) 222-3242
email:  smiller@bracepatt.com 
 - #1324667 v1 - MEMO RE WINDING UP.doc 
 - #1323966 v1 - PROPOSED BOARD RES (AUG 27, 2001).doc 

Thanks!!

FYI -  See attached. =20

Rose =20

Rose, I included links to case law at bottom if you want them.

8 Del. C. ? 145=20
DELAWARE CODE ANNOTATED=20
Copyright ? 1975-2001 by The State of Delaware=20
All rights reserved.=20
*** ANNOTATIONS CURRENT THROUGH JUNE 2001 ***=20
*** CURRENT THROUGH 2000 REGULAR SESSION ***=20
TITLE 8. CORPORATIONS=20
CHAPTER 1. GENERAL CORPORATION LAW=20
SUBCHAPTER IV. DIRECTORS AND OFFICERS=20

 << OLE Object: Picture (Metafile) >> GO TO CODE ARCHIVE DIRECTORY FOR THIS=
 JURISDICTION  </research/search/adf?_m=3D81d49c05eecba5d2c9c640b2affdf524&=
wchp=3DdGLSzS-lSlWk&_md5=3Da8ab54a933c6a3f1764cddf431861e83>
8 Del. C. ? 145 (2001)=20
? 145. Indemnification of officers, directors, employees and agents; insura=
nce=20

(a) A corporation shall have power to indemnify any person who was or is a =
party or is threatened to be made a party to any threatened, pending or com=
pleted action, suit or proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative =
or investigative (other than an action by or in the right of the corporatio=
n) by reason of the fact that the person is or was a director, officer, emp=
loyee or agent of the corporation, or is or was serving at the request of t=
he corporation as a director, officer, employee or agent of another corpora=
tion, partnership, joint venture, trust or other enterprise, against expens=
es (including attorneys' fees), judgments, fines and amounts paid in settle=
ment actually and reasonably incurred by the person in connection with such=
 action, suit or proceeding if the person acted in good faith and in a mann=
er the person reasonably believed to be in or not opposed to the best inter=
ests of the corporation, and, with respect to any criminal action or procee=
ding, had no reasonable cause to believe the person's conduct was unlawful.=
 The termination of any action, suit or proceeding by judgment, order, sett=
lement, conviction, or upon a plea of nolo contendere or its equivalent, sh=
all not, of itself, create a presumption that the person did not act in goo=
d faith and in a manner which the person reasonably believed to be in or no=
t opposed to the best interests of the corporation, and, with respect to an=
y criminal action or proceeding, had reasonable cause to believe that the p=
erson's conduct was unlawful.=20

(b) A corporation shall have power to indemnify any person who was or is a =
party or is threatened to be made a party to any threatened, pending or com=
pleted action or suit by or in the right of the corporation to procure a ju=
dgment in its favor by reason of the fact that the person is or was a direc=
tor, officer, employee or agent of the corporation, or is or was serving at=
 the request of the corporation as a director, officer, employee or agent o=
f another corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust or other enterpris=
e against expenses (including attorneys' fees) actually and reasonably incu=
rred by the person in connection with the defense or settlement of such act=
ion or suit if the person acted in good faith and in a manner the person re=
asonably believed to be in or not opposed to the best interests of the corp=
oration and except that no indemnification shall be made in respect of any =
claim, issue or matter as to which such person shall have been adjudged to =
be liable to the corporation unless and only to the extent that the Court o=
f Chancery or the court in which such action or suit was brought shall dete=
rmine upon application that, despite the adjudication of liability but in v=
iew of all the circumstances of the case, such person is fairly and reasona=
bly entitled to indemnity for such expenses which the Court of Chancery or =
such other court shall deem proper.=20

(c) To the extent that a present or former director or officer of a corpora=
tion has been successful on the merits or otherwise in defense of any actio=
n, suit or proceeding referred to in subsections (a) and (b) of this sectio=
n, or in defense of any claim, issue or matter therein, such person shall b=
e indemnified against expenses (including attorneys' fees) actually and rea=
sonably incurred by such person in connection therewith.=20

(d) Any indemnification under subsections (a) and (b) of this section (unle=
ss ordered by a court) shall be made by the corporation only as authorized =
in the specific case upon a determination that indemnification of the prese=
nt or former director, officer, employee or agent is proper in the circumst=
ances because the person has met the applicable standard of conduct set for=
th in subsections (a) and (b) of this section. Such determination shall be =
made, with respect to a person who is a director or officer at the time of =
such determination, (1) by a majority vote of the directors who are not par=
ties to such action, suit or proceeding, even though less than a quorum, or=
 (2) by a committee of such directors designated by majority vote of such d=
irectors, even though less than a quorum, or (3) if there are no such direc=
tors, or if such directors so direct, by independent legal counsel in a wri=
tten opinion, or (4) by the stockholders.=20

(e) Expenses (including attorneys' fees) incurred by an officer or director=
 in defending any civil, criminal, administrative or investigative action, =
suit or proceeding may be paid by the corporation in advance of the final d=
isposition of such action, suit or proceeding upon receipt of an undertakin=
g by or on behalf of such director or officer to repay such amount if it sh=
all ultimately be determined that such person is not entitled to be indemni=
fied by the corporation as authorized in this section. Such expenses (inclu=
ding attorneys' fees) incurred by former directors and officers or other em=
ployees and agents may be so paid upon such terms and conditions, if any, a=
s the corporation deems appropriate.=20

(f) The indemnification and advancement of expenses provided by, or granted=
 pursuant to, the other subsections of this section shall not be deemed exc=
lusive of any other rights to which those seeking indemnification or advanc=
ement of expenses may be entitled under any bylaw, agreement, vote of stock=
holders or disinterested directors or otherwise, both as to action in such =
person's official capacity and as to action in another capacity while holdi=
ng such office.=20

(g) A corporation shall have power to purchase and maintain insurance on be=
half of any person who is or was a director, officer, employee or agent of =
the corporation, or is or was serving at the request of the corporation as =
a director, officer, employee or agent of another corporation, partnership,=
 joint venture, trust or other enterprise against any liability asserted ag=
ainst such person and incurred by such person in any such capacity, or aris=
ing out of such person's status as such, whether or not the corporation wou=
ld have the power to indemnify such person against such liability under thi=
s section.=20

(h) For purposes of this section, references to "the corporation" shall inc=
lude, in addition to the resulting corporation, any constituent corporation=
 (including any constituent of a constituent) absorbed in a consolidation o=
r merger which, if its separate existence had continued, would have had pow=
er and authority to indemnify its directors, officers, and employees or age=
nts, so that any person who is or was a director, officer, employee or agen=
t of such constituent corporation, or is or was serving at the request of s=
uch constituent corporation as a director, officer, employee or agent of an=
other corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust or other enterprise, s=
hall stand in the same position under this section with respect to the resu=
lting or surviving corporation as such person would have with respect to su=
ch constituent corporation if its separate existence had continued.=20

(i) For purposes of this section, references to "other enterprises" shall i=
nclude employee benefit plans; references to "fines" shall include any exci=
se taxes assessed on a person with respect to any employee benefit plan; an=
d references to "serving at the request of the corporation" shall include a=
ny service as a director, officer, employee or agent of the corporation whi=
ch imposes duties on, or involves services by, such director, officer, empl=
oyee or agent with respect to an employee benefit plan, its participants or=
 beneficiaries; and a person who acted in good faith and in a manner such p=
erson reasonably believed to be in the interest of the participants and ben=
eficiaries of an employee benefit plan shall be deemed to have acted in a m=
anner "not opposed to the best interests of the corporation" as referred to=
 in this section.=20

(j) The indemnification and advancement of expenses provided by, or granted=
 pursuant to, this section shall, unless otherwise provided when authorized=
 or ratified, continue as to a person who has ceased to be a director, offi=
cer, employee or agent and shall inure to the benefit of the heirs, executo=
rs and administrators of such a person.=20

(k) The Court of Chancery is hereby vested with exclusive jurisdiction to h=
ear and determine all actions for advancement of expenses or indemnificatio=
n brought under this section or under any bylaw, agreement, vote of stockho=
lders or disinterested directors, or otherwise. The Court of Chancery may s=
ummarily determine a corporation's obligation to advance expenses (includin=
g attorneys' fees).=20

HISTORY: 8 Del. C. 1953, ? 145; 56 Del. Laws, c. 50; 56 Del. Laws, c. 186, =
? 6; 57 Del. Laws, c. 421, ? 2; 59 Del. Laws, c. 437, ? 7; 63 Del. Laws, c.=
 25, ? 1; 64 Del. Laws, c. 112, ? 7; 65 Del. Laws, c. 289, ?? 3-6; 67 Del. =
Laws, c. 376, ? 3; 69 Del. Laws, c. 261, ?? 1, 2; 70 Del. Laws, c. 186, ? 1=
; 71 Del. Laws, c. 120, ?? 3-11.=20

NOTES:=20
REVISOR'S NOTE. --Section 30 of 67 Del. Laws, c. 376, provides: "This act s=
hall become effective on July 1, 1990." Chapter 376 was signed by the Gover=
nor on July 17, 1990.=20
Section 3 of 69 Del. Laws, c. 261, provides: "This act shall become effecti=
ve July 1, 1994, and shall not apply to suits pending as of July 1, 1994."=
=20
Section 32 of 71 Del. Laws, c. 120, provides: "This act shall be effective =
on July 1, 1997, except that ? 5 of this act shall become effective with re=
spect to indemnification of expenses (including attorneys' fees) for acts o=
r omissions occurring on or after July 1, 1997."=20

EFFECT OF AMENDMENTS. --67 Del. Laws, c. 376, in (e), inserted "(including =
attorneys' fees)" in the first and second sentences and substituted "any ci=
vil, criminal, administrative or investigative" for "a civil or criminal" i=
n the first sentence.=20
69 Del. Laws, c. 261, effective July 1, 1994, rewrote the second sentence i=
n (d); and added (k).=20
71 Del. Laws, c. 120, neutralized gender-specific language in (c), (e), (f)=
, (g), (h) and (i); in (c), substituted "present or former director or offi=
cer" for "director, officer, employee or agent"; in (d), inserted "present =
or former" in the first sentence and rewrote the second sentence; and, in t=
he second sentence in (e), inserted "former directors and officers or" and =
substituted "corporation" for "board of directors."=20

PURPOSE OF INDEMNIFICATION STATUTES. --Indemnification statutes were enacte=
d in this State, and elsewhere, to induce capable and responsible businessm=
en to accept positions in corporate management. Merritt-Chapman & Scott Cor=
p. v. Wolfson, Del. Super. Ct., 264 A.2d 358 (1970). </research/buttonTFLin=
k?_m=3De9aa1ac1445d75454922819368e9e384&_xfercite=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%2=
2%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b8%20Del.%20C.%20%a7%20145%20%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_bu=
tType=3D3&_butStat=3D242&_butNum=3D2&_butInline=3D1&_butinfo=3D%3ccite%20cc=
%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b264%20A.2d%20358%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_fmt=
str=3DFULL&docnum=3D4&_startdoc=3D1&_startchk=3D1&wchp=3DdGLSzS-lSlWk&_md5=
=3D9b87026358b9ae7fd1b510e141679cb9>=20

PURPOSE OF SECTION. --This section is a new statute, enacted to clarify its=
 predecessor, and to give vindicated directors and others involved in corpo=
rate affairs a judicially enforceable right to indemnification. Galdi v. Be=
rg, 359 F. Supp. 698 (D. Del. 1973). </research/buttonTFLink?_m=3De9aa1ac14=
45d75454922819368e9e384&_xfercite=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDA=
TA%5b8%20Del.%20C.%20%a7%20145%20%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_butType=3D3&_butSt=
at=3D242&_butNum=3D3&_butInline=3D1&_butinfo=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%=
3c%21%5bCDATA%5b359%20F.%20Supp.%20698%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_fmtstr=3DFULL=
&docnum=3D4&_startdoc=3D1&_startchk=3D1&wchp=3DdGLSzS-lSlWk&_md5=3D77b3127f=
e477a9364de9fe4041424054>=20
The purpose of this section is not to encourage litigation or to deter the =
losing party in the underlying action from prescribed categories of conduct=
; rather, its purpose is to encourage capable persons to serve as officers,=
 directors, employees or agents of Delaware corporations, by assuring that =
their reasonable legal expenses will be paid. Mayer v. Executive Telecard, =
Ltd., Del. Ch., 705 A.2d 220 (1997). </research/buttonTFLink?_m=3De9aa1ac14=
45d75454922819368e9e384&_xfercite=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDA=
TA%5b8%20Del.%20C.%20%a7%20145%20%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_butType=3D3&_butSt=
at=3D242&_butNum=3D4&_butInline=3D1&_butinfo=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%=
3c%21%5bCDATA%5b705%20A.2d%20220%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_fmtstr=3DFULL&docnu=
m=3D4&_startdoc=3D1&_startchk=3D1&wchp=3DdGLSzS-lSlWk&_md5=3D7b14040ddc0f96=
3631fcf7ef69d594bb>=20

WHO IS ENTITLED TO INDEMNIFICATION. --Chairman of the board and president o=
f wholly owned subsidiary of parent corporation entitled to benefit of this=
 section. Merritt-Chapman & Scott Corp. v. Wolfson, Del. Super. Ct., 321 A.=
2d 138 (1974). </research/buttonTFLink?_m=3De9aa1ac1445d75454922819368e9e38=
4&_xfercite=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b8%20Del.%20C.%20%=
a7%20145%20%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_butType=3D3&_butStat=3D242&_butNum=3D5&_=
butInline=3D1&_butinfo=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b321%20=
A.2d%20138%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_fmtstr=3DFULL&docnum=3D4&_startdoc=3D1&_s=
tartchk=3D1&wchp=3DdGLSzS-lSlWk&_md5=3Dfd4897a2a16cd65d86bfe0634d4ea742>=20
Where the president and chairman of the board of a subsidiary corporation p=
articipated in the fraudulent stock repurchase plan, shared the inside info=
rmation, and was prosecuted because of his employment or agency relationshi=
p, he is entitled to indemnification. Merritt-Chapman & Scott Corp. v. Wolf=
son, Del. Super. Ct., 321 A.2d 138 (1974). </research/buttonTFLink?_m=3De9a=
a1ac1445d75454922819368e9e384&_xfercite=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21=
%5bCDATA%5b8%20Del.%20C.%20%a7%20145%20%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_butType=3D3&=
_butStat=3D242&_butNum=3D6&_butInline=3D1&_butinfo=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%=
22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b321%20A.2d%20138%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_fmtstr=3DFULL=
&docnum=3D4&_startdoc=3D1&_startchk=3D1&wchp=3DdGLSzS-lSlWk&_md5=3D34e79d1d=
fb66c10d942cab660e6ae7d5>=20
Subsection (a) of this section does not oblige Delaware corporations to ind=
emnify those who serve other enterprises at their request; if a corporation=
 wishes not to extend indemnification rights to those who serve elsewhere a=
t its request, it can say so in its bylaws, or it can say nothing at all, t=
hereby achieving the same result. VonFeldt v. Stifel Fin. Corp., Del. Supr.=
, 714 A.2d 79 (1998). </research/buttonTFLink?_m=3De9aa1ac1445d754549228193=
68e9e384&_xfercite=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b8%20Del.%2=
0C.%20%a7%20145%20%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_butType=3D3&_butStat=3D242&_butNu=
m=3D7&_butInline=3D1&_butinfo=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5=
b714%20A.2d%2079%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_fmtstr=3DFULL&docnum=3D4&_startdoc=
=3D1&_startchk=3D1&wchp=3DdGLSzS-lSlWk&_md5=3D476d5eff3f56300fbd15cdd64824a=
ec5>=20
The director of a subsidiary corporation who was successful in defending a =
derivative action against the subsidiary could not recover attorney fees in=
 an indemnification suit against the parent corporation which was not a suc=
cessor in interest to the subsidiary. Chamison v. Healthtrust, Inc., Del. C=
h., 735 A.2d 912 (1999), </research/buttonTFLink?_m=3De9aa1ac1445d754549228=
19368e9e384&_xfercite=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b8%20Del=
.%20C.%20%a7%20145%20%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_butType=3D3&_butStat=3D242&_bu=
tNum=3D8&_butInline=3D1&_butinfo=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDAT=
A%5b735%20A.2d%20912%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_fmtstr=3DFULL&docnum=3D4&_start=
doc=3D1&_startchk=3D1&wchp=3DdGLSzS-lSlWk&_md5=3Dfea49d11f5efe74e0094fe56a6=
1c4617> aff'd, Del. Supr., 748 A.2d 407 (2000). </research/buttonTFLink?_m=
=3De9aa1ac1445d75454922819368e9e384&_xfercite=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e=
%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b8%20Del.%20C.%20%a7%20145%20%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_butTyp=
e=3D3&_butStat=3D242&_butNum=3D9&_butInline=3D1&_butinfo=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%=
22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b748%20A.2d%20407%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_fmtstr=
=3DFULL&docnum=3D4&_startdoc=3D1&_startchk=3D1&wchp=3DdGLSzS-lSlWk&_md5=3Dc=
e778b0e7640ee0cc9e93cf3a9d30f21>=20

MUST BE A COVERED PROCEEDING. --First requirement for indemnification under=
 this section is that the expenses in question be incurred in connection wi=
th a covered proceeding as described in subsection (a) or (b) of this secti=
on. Shearin v. E.F. Hutton Group, Inc., Del. Ch., 652 A.2d 578 (1994). </re=
search/buttonTFLink?_m=3De9aa1ac1445d75454922819368e9e384&_xfercite=3D%3cci=
te%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b8%20Del.%20C.%20%a7%20145%20%5d%5d%3=
e%3c%2fcite%3e&_butType=3D3&_butStat=3D242&_butNum=3D10&_butInline=3D1&_but=
info=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b652%20A.2d%20578%5d%5d%3=
e%3c%2fcite%3e&_fmtstr=3DFULL&docnum=3D4&_startdoc=3D1&_startchk=3D1&wchp=
=3DdGLSzS-lSlWk&_md5=3D21651be108ba0efab1c14bdc2bffbf47>=20

JUDICIAL DETERMINATION OF INDEMNITEE'S CORPORATE POSITION NOT REQUIRED. --S=
ubsections (a) and (b) of this section do not require a prior judicial dete=
rmination of the validity of the indemnitee's position as to the proceeding=
 for which indemnification is sought. Green v. Westcap Corp., Del. Super. C=
t., 492 A.2d 260 (1985). </research/buttonTFLink?_m=3De9aa1ac1445d754549228=
19368e9e384&_xfercite=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b8%20Del=
.%20C.%20%a7%20145%20%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_butType=3D3&_butStat=3D242&_bu=
tNum=3D11&_butInline=3D1&_butinfo=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDA=
TA%5b492%20A.2d%20260%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_fmtstr=3DFULL&docnum=3D4&_star=
tdoc=3D1&_startchk=3D1&wchp=3DdGLSzS-lSlWk&_md5=3D4bfcdbce4415f9af8f49feac6=
9ec81b0>=20

PARENT AND SUBSIDIARY. --Where a 100 percent stockholder elects a director =
to the board of a subsidiary, that director thereafter serves the subsidiar=
y "at the request of" the stockholder, within the meaning of subsection (a)=
 of this section. VonFeldt v. Stifel Fin. Corp., Del. Supr., 714 A.2d 79 (1=
998). </research/buttonTFLink?_m=3De9aa1ac1445d75454922819368e9e384&_xferci=
te=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b8%20Del.%20C.%20%a7%20145%=
20%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_butType=3D3&_butStat=3D242&_butNum=3D12&_butInlin=
e=3D1&_butinfo=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b714%20A.2d%207=
9%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_fmtstr=3DFULL&docnum=3D4&_startdoc=3D1&_startchk=
=3D1&wchp=3DdGLSzS-lSlWk&_md5=3D18630983e072c4fdaeb97210c3513a35>=20

LANGUAGE "IN SUBSECTIONS (A) AND (B)," REFERRED TO IN SUBSECTION (C), incor=
porates those portions of subsections (a) and (b) of this section which def=
ine the type of action, suit or proceeding but does not incorporate the sub=
sequent qualifications required for indemnification. Green v. Westcap Corp.=
, Del. Super. Ct., 492 A.2d 260 (1985). </research/buttonTFLink?_m=3De9aa1a=
c1445d75454922819368e9e384&_xfercite=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5b=
CDATA%5b8%20Del.%20C.%20%a7%20145%20%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_butType=3D3&_bu=
tStat=3D242&_butNum=3D13&_butInline=3D1&_butinfo=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22=
%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b492%20A.2d%20260%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_fmtstr=3DFULL&d=
ocnum=3D4&_startdoc=3D1&_startchk=3D1&wchp=3DdGLSzS-lSlWk&_md5=3D071b63bd6f=
8dd54944b58a87514197a0>=20

SUBSECTION (C) IS MANDATORY. --Subsection (c) is a mandatory provision that=
 applies to all Delaware corporations and grants an absolute right of indem=
nification. Witco Corp. v. Beekhuis, 38 F.3d 682 (3d Cir. 1994). </research=
/buttonTFLink?_m=3De9aa1ac1445d75454922819368e9e384&_xfercite=3D%3ccite%20c=
c%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b8%20Del.%20C.%20%a7%20145%20%5d%5d%3e%3c%2=
fcite%3e&_butType=3D3&_butStat=3D242&_butNum=3D14&_butInline=3D1&_butinfo=
=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b38%20F.3d%20682%5d%5d%3e%3c%=
2fcite%3e&_fmtstr=3DFULL&docnum=3D4&_startdoc=3D1&_startchk=3D1&wchp=3DdGLS=
zS-lSlWk&_md5=3D412a2c0298fb960f188c1eac1b9a79b3>=20

INDEMNITY NOT RESTRICTED TO THOSE STANDING AS DEFENDANTS IN MAIN ACTION. --=
By the language of subsections (a) and (b) of this section, indemnity is no=
t limited to only those who stand as defendants in the main action. Hibbert=
 v. Hollywood Park, Inc., Del. Supr., 457 A.2d 339 (1983). </research/butto=
nTFLink?_m=3De9aa1ac1445d75454922819368e9e384&_xfercite=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%2=
2USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b8%20Del.%20C.%20%a7%20145%20%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%=
3e&_butType=3D3&_butStat=3D242&_butNum=3D15&_butInline=3D1&_butinfo=3D%3cci=
te%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b457%20A.2d%20339%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%=
3e&_fmtstr=3DFULL&docnum=3D4&_startdoc=3D1&_startchk=3D1&wchp=3DdGLSzS-lSlW=
k&_md5=3D0b52567e73502253ff84a8bace5801cd>=20

CLAIMANT ASSUMES RISK OF NOT BEING INDEMNIFIED. --Where indemnification is =
sought, the claimant will have usually assumed the risk of not being indemn=
ified. Merritt-Chapman & Scott Corp. v. Wolfson, Del. Super. Ct., 321 A.2d =
138 (1974). </research/buttonTFLink?_m=3De9aa1ac1445d75454922819368e9e384&_=
xfercite=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b8%20Del.%20C.%20%a7%=
20145%20%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_butType=3D3&_butStat=3D242&_butNum=3D16&_bu=
tInline=3D1&_butinfo=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b321%20A.=
2d%20138%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_fmtstr=3DFULL&docnum=3D4&_startdoc=3D1&_sta=
rtchk=3D1&wchp=3DdGLSzS-lSlWk&_md5=3Df6ee2f84d32c1ee02e0aca5f4db3a886>=20

CORPORATION CAN ALSO GRANT INDEMNIFICATION RIGHTS BEYOND THOSE PROVIDED BY =
STATUTE. Hibbert v. Hollywood Park, Inc., Del. Supr., 457 A.2d 339 (1983). =
</research/buttonTFLink?_m=3De9aa1ac1445d75454922819368e9e384&_xfercite=3D%=
3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b8%20Del.%20C.%20%a7%20145%20%5d%=
5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_butType=3D3&_butStat=3D242&_butNum=3D17&_butInline=3D1&=
_butinfo=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b457%20A.2d%20339%5d%=
5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_fmtstr=3DFULL&docnum=3D4&_startdoc=3D1&_startchk=3D1&wc=
hp=3DdGLSzS-lSlWk&_md5=3D92fc3731ca399f11233b123a976ace71>=20
Under subsection (c), to the extent a claimant has not been successful "on =
the merits or otherwise," the claimant may still be entitled to indemnifica=
tion of expense incurred in a covered proceeding, if a disinterested quorum=
 of the board, or legal counsel at the request of the board, or the shareho=
lders, specifically determines: (1) if the indemnification is sought in res=
pect to a civil matter; (2) that the proceeding was a covered proceeding; a=
nd (3) that the claimant acted in good faith and in a manner the claimant r=
easonably believed to be in or not opposed to the best interest of the corp=
oration. Shearin v. E.F. Hutton Group, Inc., Del. Ch., 652 A.2d 578 (1994).=
 </research/buttonTFLink?_m=3De9aa1ac1445d75454922819368e9e384&_xfercite=3D=
%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b8%20Del.%20C.%20%a7%20145%20%5d=
%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_butType=3D3&_butStat=3D242&_butNum=3D18&_butInline=3D1=
&_butinfo=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b652%20A.2d%20578%5d=
%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_fmtstr=3DFULL&docnum=3D4&_startdoc=3D1&_startchk=3D1&w=
chp=3DdGLSzS-lSlWk&_md5=3D58fb256be451214e02e026a9ba128209>=20

AUTHORITY MANDATED BY BYLAWS. --While permissive authority to indemnify its=
 directors, officers, etc., may be exercised by a corporation's board of di=
rectors on a case-by-case basis, most corporations and virtually all public=
 corporations have by bylaw exercised the authority recognized by this sect=
ion so as to mandate the extension of indemnification rights in circumstanc=
es in which indemnification would be permissible under this section. Advanc=
ed Mining Sys. v. Fricke, Del. Ch., 623 A.2d 82 (1992). </research/buttonTF=
Link?_m=3De9aa1ac1445d75454922819368e9e384&_xfercite=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22US=
A%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b8%20Del.%20C.%20%a7%20145%20%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&=
_butType=3D3&_butStat=3D242&_butNum=3D19&_butInline=3D1&_butinfo=3D%3ccite%=
20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b623%20A.2d%2082%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_=
fmtstr=3DFULL&docnum=3D4&_startdoc=3D1&_startchk=3D1&wchp=3DdGLSzS-lSlWk&_m=
d5=3D8b889d0987e225a464119d1116e3956d>=20

THIS SECTION DOES NOT REQUIRE COMPLETE SUCCESS but provides for indemnifica=
tion to the extent of success "in defense of any claim, issue or matter" in=
 an action. Merritt-Chapman & Scott Corp. v. Wolfson, Del. Super. Ct., 321 =
A.2d 138 (1974). </research/buttonTFLink?_m=3De9aa1ac1445d75454922819368e9e=
384&_xfercite=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b8%20Del.%20C.%2=
0%a7%20145%20%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_butType=3D3&_butStat=3D242&_butNum=3D2=
0&_butInline=3D1&_butinfo=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b321=
%20A.2d%20138%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_fmtstr=3DFULL&docnum=3D4&_startdoc=3D1=
&_startchk=3D1&wchp=3DdGLSzS-lSlWk&_md5=3D5069ecf3173b671060118beb8de89488>=
=20

A MANDATE TO INDEMNIFY DOES NOT INCLUDE AN OBLIGATION TO ADVANCE EXPENSES P=
RIOR TO A DETERMINATION OF WHETHER INDEMNIFICATION IS PERMITTED OR REQUIRED=
. Advanced Mining Sys. v. Fricke, Del. Ch., 623 A.2d 82 (1992). </research/=
buttonTFLink?_m=3De9aa1ac1445d75454922819368e9e384&_xfercite=3D%3ccite%20cc=
%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b8%20Del.%20C.%20%a7%20145%20%5d%5d%3e%3c%2f=
cite%3e&_butType=3D3&_butStat=3D242&_butNum=3D21&_butInline=3D1&_butinfo=3D=
%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b623%20A.2d%2082%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fc=
ite%3e&_fmtstr=3DFULL&docnum=3D4&_startdoc=3D1&_startchk=3D1&wchp=3DdGLSzS-=
lSlWk&_md5=3D13fa25192df7c06e083ecf41908b7c15>=20

ADVANCEMENT OF EXPENSES. --Subsection (e) leaves to the business judgment o=
f the board the task of determining whether the undertaking proffered in al=
l of the circumstances is sufficient to protect the corporation's interest =
in repayment and whether, ultimately, advancement of expenses would on bala=
nce be likely to promote the corporation's interests. Advanced Mining Sys. =
v. Fricke, Del. Ch., 623 A.2d 82 (1992). </research/buttonTFLink?_m=3De9aa1=
ac1445d75454922819368e9e384&_xfercite=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5=
bCDATA%5b8%20Del.%20C.%20%a7%20145%20%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_butType=3D3&_b=
utStat=3D242&_butNum=3D22&_butInline=3D1&_butinfo=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%2=
2%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b623%20A.2d%2082%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_fmtstr=3DFULL&d=
ocnum=3D4&_startdoc=3D1&_startchk=3D1&wchp=3DdGLSzS-lSlWk&_md5=3Dc66eb20418=
afe85d4363d2b6f1e0e45b>=20
This section does not afford a director a right to advancement of his litig=
ation expenses. VonFeldt v. Stifel Fin. Corp., Del. Supr., 714 A.2d 79 (199=
8). </research/buttonTFLink?_m=3De9aa1ac1445d75454922819368e9e384&_xfercite=
=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b8%20Del.%20C.%20%a7%20145%20=
%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_butType=3D3&_butStat=3D242&_butNum=3D23&_butInline=
=3D1&_butinfo=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b714%20A.2d%2079=
%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_fmtstr=3DFULL&docnum=3D4&_startdoc=3D1&_startchk=3D=
1&wchp=3DdGLSzS-lSlWk&_md5=3D1531afbc1e85edb0b7da46c1deb446e9>=20
The Business Trust Act does not prohibit a business trust from advancing li=
tigation expenses to trustees. Nakahara v. NS 1991 Am. Trust, Del. Ch. 770,=
 739 A.2d 770 (1998). </research/buttonTFLink?_m=3De9aa1ac1445d754549228193=
68e9e384&_xfercite=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b8%20Del.%2=
0C.%20%a7%20145%20%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_butType=3D3&_butStat=3D242&_butNu=
m=3D24&_butInline=3D1&_butinfo=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%=
5b739%20A.2d%20770%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_fmtstr=3DFULL&docnum=3D4&_startdo=
c=3D1&_startchk=3D1&wchp=3DdGLSzS-lSlWk&_md5=3D14fc3de4c2f74e029119283c3b6b=
06b5>=20

SUBSECTION (B) IS NOT GRANT OF ABSOLUTE IMMUNITY. --Subsection (b) of this =
section does not necessarily preclude personal liability of directors becau=
se it is not a grant of absolute immunity. Bergstein v. Texas Int'l Co., De=
l. Ch., 453 A.2d 467 (1982). </research/buttonTFLink?_m=3De9aa1ac1445d75454=
922819368e9e384&_xfercite=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b8%2=
0Del.%20C.%20%a7%20145%20%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_butType=3D3&_butStat=3D242=
&_butNum=3D25&_butInline=3D1&_butinfo=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5=
bCDATA%5b453%20A.2d%20467%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_fmtstr=3DFULL&docnum=3D4&_=
startdoc=3D1&_startchk=3D1&wchp=3DdGLSzS-lSlWk&_md5=3De1a817dc3856997bcddbb=
92c47126370>=20

IN CRIMINAL ACTION, ANY RESULT OTHER THAN CONVICTION MUST BE CONSIDERED SUC=
CESS. Merritt-Chapman & Scott Corp. v. Wolfson, Del. Super. Ct., 321 A.2d 1=
38 (1974). </research/buttonTFLink?_m=3De9aa1ac1445d75454922819368e9e384&_x=
fercite=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b8%20Del.%20C.%20%a7%2=
0145%20%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_butType=3D3&_butStat=3D242&_butNum=3D26&_but=
Inline=3D1&_butinfo=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b321%20A.2=
d%20138%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_fmtstr=3DFULL&docnum=3D4&_startdoc=3D1&_star=
tchk=3D1&wchp=3DdGLSzS-lSlWk&_md5=3Dc2757887bbfa2cffb397d954148788f0>=20
Claimants are entitled to partial indemnification if successful on a count =
of an indictment, which is an independent criminal charge, even if unsucces=
sful on another related count. Merritt-Chapman & Scott Corp. v. Wolfson, De=
l. Super. Ct., 321 A.2d 138 (1974). </research/buttonTFLink?_m=3De9aa1ac144=
5d75454922819368e9e384&_xfercite=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDAT=
A%5b8%20Del.%20C.%20%a7%20145%20%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_butType=3D3&_butSta=
t=3D242&_butNum=3D27&_butInline=3D1&_butinfo=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%=
3c%21%5bCDATA%5b321%20A.2d%20138%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_fmtstr=3DFULL&docnu=
m=3D4&_startdoc=3D1&_startchk=3D1&wchp=3DdGLSzS-lSlWk&_md5=3D9b31b41c9b47b3=
16eb0e1b297010fca1>=20

FINDING OR INFERENCE OF WRONGDOING HAS GENERALLY PRECLUDED INDEMNIFICATION =
under this section. McLean v. Alexander, 449 F. Supp. 1251 (D. Del. 1978), =
</research/buttonTFLink?_m=3De9aa1ac1445d75454922819368e9e384&_xfercite=3D%=
3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b8%20Del.%20C.%20%a7%20145%20%5d%=
5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_butType=3D3&_butStat=3D242&_butNum=3D28&_butInline=3D1&=
_butinfo=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b449%20F.%20Supp.%201=
251%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_fmtstr=3DFULL&docnum=3D4&_startdoc=3D1&_startchk=
=3D1&wchp=3DdGLSzS-lSlWk&_md5=3D6476dca9de54c2a3e775967f750776dd> rev'd on =
other grounds, 599 F.2d 1190 (3d Cir. 1979). </research/buttonTFLink?_m=3De=
9aa1ac1445d75454922819368e9e384&_xfercite=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%=
21%5bCDATA%5b8%20Del.%20C.%20%a7%20145%20%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_butType=3D=
3&_butStat=3D242&_butNum=3D29&_butInline=3D1&_butinfo=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22U=
SA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b599%20F.2d%201190%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_fmtstr=3D=
FULL&docnum=3D4&_startdoc=3D1&_startchk=3D1&wchp=3DdGLSzS-lSlWk&_md5=3D6ecc=
104dfd5ba9639fc8ccbba6bae75a>=20

WHAT CONSTITUTES JUDGMENT OF CONVICTION. --Although a plea of nolo contende=
re may not be used as an admission in another action, upon acceptance by th=
e court and imposition of sentence there is a judgment of conviction agains=
t the claimant. Merritt-Chapman & Scott Corp. v. Wolfson, Del. Super. Ct., =
321 A.2d 138 (1974). </research/buttonTFLink?_m=3De9aa1ac1445d7545492281936=
8e9e384&_xfercite=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b8%20Del.%20=
C.%20%a7%20145%20%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_butType=3D3&_butStat=3D242&_butNum=
=3D30&_butInline=3D1&_butinfo=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5=
b321%20A.2d%20138%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_fmtstr=3DFULL&docnum=3D4&_startdoc=
=3D1&_startchk=3D1&wchp=3DdGLSzS-lSlWk&_md5=3D0bf9f42586064154d7f5650e186f2=
830>=20

CONVICTION AFTER 1 ALLEGATION OF CRIMINAL INDICTMENT REMOVED. --Where an al=
leged violation under a count of a criminal indictment was removed, but def=
endant was still convicted under the count for other violations, defendant =
had not been "successful" on the merits or otherwise. Merritt-Chapman & Sco=
tt Corp. v. Wolfson, Del. Super. Ct., 264 A.2d 358 (1970). </research/butto=
nTFLink?_m=3De9aa1ac1445d75454922819368e9e384&_xfercite=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%2=
2USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b8%20Del.%20C.%20%a7%20145%20%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%=
3e&_butType=3D3&_butStat=3D242&_butNum=3D31&_butInline=3D1&_butinfo=3D%3cci=
te%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b264%20A.2d%20358%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%=
3e&_fmtstr=3DFULL&docnum=3D4&_startdoc=3D1&_startchk=3D1&wchp=3DdGLSzS-lSlW=
k&_md5=3D4c8a0cf69973b760772cf12452b16600>=20

WHEN CASE IS DISMISSED WITHOUT PREJUDICE SO THAT SAME ISSUE MAY BE LITIGATE=
D IN ANOTHER PENDING CASE, an indemnification award would be premature and =
contrary to the spirit of the statute. Galdi v. Berg, 359 F. Supp. 698 (D. =
Del. 1973). </research/buttonTFLink?_m=3De9aa1ac1445d75454922819368e9e384&_=
xfercite=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b8%20Del.%20C.%20%a7%=
20145%20%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_butType=3D3&_butStat=3D242&_butNum=3D32&_bu=
tInline=3D1&_butinfo=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b359%20F.=
%20Supp.%20698%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_fmtstr=3DFULL&docnum=3D4&_startdoc=3D=
1&_startchk=3D1&wchp=3DdGLSzS-lSlWk&_md5=3Daa95621494ae42b1ec4d6113e68c9a5c=
>=20

STANDARD OF REVIEW. --The reviewing court must treat the Court of Chancery'=
s findings under subsection (b) with substantial deference. Yiannatsis v. S=
tephanis ex rel. Sterianou, Del. Supr., 653 A.2d 275 (1995). </research/but=
tonTFLink?_m=3De9aa1ac1445d75454922819368e9e384&_xfercite=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d=
%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b8%20Del.%20C.%20%a7%20145%20%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcit=
e%3e&_butType=3D3&_butStat=3D242&_butNum=3D33&_butInline=3D1&_butinfo=3D%3c=
cite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b653%20A.2d%20275%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcit=
e%3e&_fmtstr=3DFULL&docnum=3D4&_startdoc=3D1&_startchk=3D1&wchp=3DdGLSzS-lS=
lWk&_md5=3D9fb8cb5841edd4815e9bcb79e3017d83>=20

COURT WHICH FINALLY RESOLVES ISSUE HAS AUTHORITY TO AWARD INDEMNIFICATION, =
if justified under subsection (b) of this section. Galdi v. Berg, 359 F. Su=
pp. 698 (D. Del. 1973). </research/buttonTFLink?_m=3De9aa1ac1445d7545492281=
9368e9e384&_xfercite=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b8%20Del.=
%20C.%20%a7%20145%20%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_butType=3D3&_butStat=3D242&_but=
Num=3D34&_butInline=3D1&_butinfo=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDAT=
A%5b359%20F.%20Supp.%20698%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_fmtstr=3DFULL&docnum=3D4&=
_startdoc=3D1&_startchk=3D1&wchp=3DdGLSzS-lSlWk&_md5=3Dd52f8c5d864e73d38a05=
d06b65cec7e0>=20

AND SUCH AWARD COULD INCLUDE REASONABLE FEES AND EXPENSES INCURRED IN DEFEN=
SE. Galdi v. Berg, 359 F. Supp. 698 (D. Del. 1973). </research/buttonTFLink=
?_m=3De9aa1ac1445d75454922819368e9e384&_xfercite=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22=
%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b8%20Del.%20C.%20%a7%20145%20%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_but=
Type=3D3&_butStat=3D242&_butNum=3D35&_butInline=3D1&_butinfo=3D%3ccite%20cc=
%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b359%20F.%20Supp.%20698%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3=
e&_fmtstr=3DFULL&docnum=3D4&_startdoc=3D1&_startchk=3D1&wchp=3DdGLSzS-lSlWk=
&_md5=3D40ed0254a559e64f6fdb785205cb9b9b>=20

STANDARDS USED IN DETERMINING WHETHER FEES HAVE BEEN "REASONABLY INCURRED" =
for purposes of this section are similar to standards used by courts in awa=
rding fees. Merritt-Chapman & Scott Corp. v. Wolfson, Del. Super. Ct., 321 =
A.2d 138 (1974). </research/buttonTFLink?_m=3De9aa1ac1445d75454922819368e9e=
384&_xfercite=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b8%20Del.%20C.%2=
0%a7%20145%20%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_butType=3D3&_butStat=3D242&_butNum=3D3=
6&_butInline=3D1&_butinfo=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b321=
%20A.2d%20138%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_fmtstr=3DFULL&docnum=3D4&_startdoc=3D1=
&_startchk=3D1&wchp=3DdGLSzS-lSlWk&_md5=3D780110a715d11f3ee47e3161376322ca>=
=20

CHARGING FLAT FEE FOR EACH TRIAL IS NOT INHERENTLY UNREASONABLE for indemni=
fication under this section. Merritt-Chapman & Scott Corp. v. Wolfson, Del.=
 Super. Ct., 321 A.2d 138 (1974). </research/buttonTFLink?_m=3De9aa1ac1445d=
75454922819368e9e384&_xfercite=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%=
5b8%20Del.%20C.%20%a7%20145%20%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_butType=3D3&_butStat=
=3D242&_butNum=3D37&_butInline=3D1&_butinfo=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3=
c%21%5bCDATA%5b321%20A.2d%20138%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_fmtstr=3DFULL&docnum=
=3D4&_startdoc=3D1&_startchk=3D1&wchp=3DdGLSzS-lSlWk&_md5=3D8208aae5fb9cdc4=
1b89f4c7f7328943c>=20

FEES DEDUCTED FROM AWARD. --Where the initial purchase of stock represented=
 usurpation of a corporate opportunity, the Court of Chancery properly dedu=
cted attorney's fees and past payments from the amounts to be paid to a cor=
porate shareholder for the repurchase of the stock. Yiannatsis v. Stephanis=
 ex rel. Sterianou, Del. Supr., 653 A.2d 275 (1995). </research/buttonTFLin=
k?_m=3De9aa1ac1445d75454922819368e9e384&_xfercite=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%2=
2%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b8%20Del.%20C.%20%a7%20145%20%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_bu=
tType=3D3&_butStat=3D242&_butNum=3D38&_butInline=3D1&_butinfo=3D%3ccite%20c=
c%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b653%20A.2d%20275%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_fm=
tstr=3DFULL&docnum=3D4&_startdoc=3D1&_startchk=3D1&wchp=3DdGLSzS-lSlWk&_md5=
=3D7ae454b4299abde045ea8b28938f94d2>=20

RECOVERY OF EXPENSES OF PROXY CONTEST, COUCHED IN TERMS OF BOARD ELECTION, =
INVOLVING SUBSTANTIVE DIFFERENCES ABOUT CORPORATE POLICY. --Where a proxy c=
ontest, though couched in terms of election to the board, was actually one =
involving substantive differences about corporation policy, former corporat=
e directors, determined to be the management group for the purposes of reel=
ection to the board and, therefore, entitled to use corporate funds to pres=
ent its position, had an equitable and legal right to recover from the corp=
oration their reasonable expenses resulting from the proxy contest. Hibbert=
 v. Hollywood Park, Inc., Del. Supr., 457 A.2d 339 (1983). </research/butto=
nTFLink?_m=3De9aa1ac1445d75454922819368e9e384&_xfercite=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%2=
2USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b8%20Del.%20C.%20%a7%20145%20%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%=
3e&_butType=3D3&_butStat=3D242&_butNum=3D39&_butInline=3D1&_butinfo=3D%3cci=
te%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b457%20A.2d%20339%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%=
3e&_fmtstr=3DFULL&docnum=3D4&_startdoc=3D1&_startchk=3D1&wchp=3DdGLSzS-lSlW=
k&_md5=3Dde930b183fe1e03fb1e327641bcb726b>=20

EXPENSES INCURRED IN ESTABLISHING ENTITLEMENT TO INDEMNIFICATION. --This se=
ction allows for indemnification of legal fees only in the underlying actio=
n against an officer or director, and does not allow for recovery of legal =
fees and expenses incurred in a proceeding to establish an entitlement to s=
uch indemnification. Mayer v. Executive Telecard, Ltd., Del. Ch., 705 A.2d =
220 (1997). </research/buttonTFLink?_m=3De9aa1ac1445d75454922819368e9e384&_=
xfercite=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b8%20Del.%20C.%20%a7%=
20145%20%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_butType=3D3&_butStat=3D242&_butNum=3D40&_bu=
tInline=3D1&_butinfo=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b705%20A.=
2d%20220%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_fmtstr=3DFULL&docnum=3D4&_startdoc=3D1&_sta=
rtchk=3D1&wchp=3DdGLSzS-lSlWk&_md5=3D5f7a88fc0ed17b1cb35e7f2322228208>=20

OFFICERS AS CORPORATE EMPLOYEES. --A corporate officer is not, as a matter =
of law, also a corporate employee merely by virtue of office; whether a cor=
porate officer is also an employee depends on the incidents of the relation=
ship to the corporation. Haft v. Dart Group Corp., 841 F. Supp. 549 (D. Del=
. 1993). </research/buttonTFLink?_m=3De9aa1ac1445d75454922819368e9e384&_xfe=
rcite=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b8%20Del.%20C.%20%a7%201=
45%20%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_butType=3D3&_butStat=3D242&_butNum=3D41&_butIn=
line=3D1&_butinfo=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b841%20F.%20=
Supp.%20549%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_fmtstr=3DFULL&docnum=3D4&_startdoc=3D1&_=
startchk=3D1&wchp=3DdGLSzS-lSlWk&_md5=3Df3c68088700b2563987656b669c40069>=
=20

FORMER DIRECTORS HELD ENTITLED TO INDEMNIFICATION FOR LEGAL FEES RELATIVE T=
O UNSUCCESSFUL REELECTION BID. --Former corporate directors were entitled t=
o indemnification for legal fees and related costs incurred with respect to=
 suits filed by them in their unsuccessful bid for reelection to the corpor=
ation's board where the pertinent corporation bylaw contained no limitation=
 on the type of action for which an individual, otherwise qualified under t=
he bylaw, must be indemnified and where indemnification would be consistent=
 with subsections (a) and (b) of this section. Hibbert v. Hollywood Park, I=
nc., Del. Supr., 457 A.2d 339 (1983). </research/buttonTFLink?_m=3De9aa1ac1=
445d75454922819368e9e384&_xfercite=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCD=
ATA%5b8%20Del.%20C.%20%a7%20145%20%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_butType=3D3&_butS=
tat=3D242&_butNum=3D42&_butInline=3D1&_butinfo=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3=
e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b457%20A.2d%20339%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_fmtstr=3DFULL&doc=
num=3D4&_startdoc=3D1&_startchk=3D1&wchp=3DdGLSzS-lSlWk&_md5=3D392b602f1875=
ecc021ee27ab53df148f>=20

WITHOUT INTEREST ON EXPENSES ACTUALLY PAID, INDEMNIFICATION WOULD BE INCOMP=
LETE. Merritt-Chapman & Scott Corp. v. Wolfson, Del. Super. Ct., 321 A.2d 1=
38 (1974). </research/buttonTFLink?_m=3De9aa1ac1445d75454922819368e9e384&_x=
fercite=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b8%20Del.%20C.%20%a7%2=
0145%20%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_butType=3D3&_butStat=3D242&_butNum=3D43&_but=
Inline=3D1&_butinfo=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b321%20A.2=
d%20138%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_fmtstr=3DFULL&docnum=3D4&_startdoc=3D1&_star=
tchk=3D1&wchp=3DdGLSzS-lSlWk&_md5=3D7bf7f1f5536e463fd87258977d03fbff>=20

THERE ARE SEVERAL FACTORS TO BE CONSIDERED IN INDEMNIFICATION FOR ATTORNEYS=
' FEES: (a) The time and labor required, the novelty and difficulty of the =
questions involved, and the skill requisite to perform the legal service co=
mpetently, (b) the likelihood that a particular retainer will preclude othe=
r employment by the attorney, (c) the fee customarily charged in the commun=
ity for similar services, (d) the amount involved in the litigation and the=
 results obtained, (e) the time limitations imposed by the litigation, (f) =
the nature and length of professional relationship with the client, (g) the=
 experience, reputation and ability of the lawyer performing the services, =
and (h) a consideration whether the fee is fixed or contingent. Galdi v. Be=
rg, 359 F. Supp. 698 (D. Del. 1973). </research/buttonTFLink?_m=3De9aa1ac14=
45d75454922819368e9e384&_xfercite=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e%3c%21%5bCDA=
TA%5b8%20Del.%20C.%20%a7%20145%20%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_butType=3D3&_butSt=
at=3D242&_butNum=3D44&_butInline=3D1&_butinfo=3D%3ccite%20cc%3d%22USA%22%3e=
%3c%21%5bCDATA%5b359%20F.%20Supp.%20698%5d%5d%3e%3c%2fcite%3e&_fmtstr=3DFUL=
L&docnum=3D4&_startdoc=3D1&_startchk=3D1&wchp=3DdGLSzS-lSlWk&_md5=3D0b7d8e7=
ea3d96e74d1a269c3b233dc90>=20

USER NOTE: For more generally applicable notes, see notes under the first s=
ection of this heading, subchapter, chapter, part or title.=20
Top of Form 1
 << OLE Object: Picture (Metafile) >>  << OLE Object: Picture (Metafile) >>=
  << OLE Object: Picture (Metafile) >>  << OLE Object: Picture (Metafile) >=
>  << OLE Object: Picture (Metafile) >>  << OLE Object: Picture (Metafile) =
>>  << OLE Object: Picture (Metafile) >>  << OLE Object: Picture (Metafile)=
 >>  << OLE Object: Picture (Metafile) >>  << OLE Object: Picture (Metafile=
) >>  << OLE Object: Picture (Metafile) >>  << OLE Object: Picture (Metafil=
e) >>  << OLE Object: Picture (Metafile) >>=20
Bottom of Form 1
=09

 << OLE Object: Picture (Metafile) >> =09
 << OLE Object: Picture (Metafile) >> =09

 << OLE Object: Picture (Metafile) >> =09Source: =09All Sources </research/=
sel?_m=3D53b9bcab390bd5354f8ae0ea50cc3faf&_fmtstr=3DFULL&docnum=3D4&_startd=
oc=3D1&_startchk=3D1&wchp=3DdGLSzS-lSlWk&_md5=3D9ba4b5c348c99792d1332cfc3fd=
55c2f> > / . . . / > DE - Delaware Code Annotated (including Constitution),=
 Court Rules Annotated and  </research/srcinfo?_m=3D53b9bcab390bd5354f8ae0e=
a50cc3faf&src=3D5083&_fmtstr=3DFULL&docnum=3D4&_startdoc=3D1&_startchk=3D1&=
wchp=3DdGLSzS-lSlWk&_md5=3D9ba4b5c348c99792d1332cfc3fd55c2f> << OLE Object:=
 Picture (Metafile) >>  </research/srcinfo?_m=3D53b9bcab390bd5354f8ae0ea50c=
c3faf&src=3D5083&_fmtstr=3DFULL&docnum=3D4&_startdoc=3D1&_startchk=3D1&wchp=
=3DdGLSzS-lSlWk&_md5=3D9ba4b5c348c99792d1332cfc3fd55c2f>=09
 << OLE Object: Picture (Metafile) >> =09TOC: =09Delaware Code Annotated </=
research/retrieve?_m=3D53b9bcab390bd5354f8ae0ea50cc3faf&_ansset=3DA-WA-A-WB=
-MsSEWE-UUW-EEYYCEDBA-CYBEWEZVV-WB-U&_src=3D5083&tcver=3D13&_tcinlni=3D43N1=
-9KV0-004D-4082&svc=3Dbl&_search=3DSection%20145&_srchVal=3Dsection%20145&_=
form=3Dbool&_stateList=3D_src%2csvc%2c_search%2c_srchVal%2c_form&dummy=3D1&=
_tcid=3D5080&_fmtstr=3DTOC&tcact=3Dinitial&docnum=3D4&_startdoc=3D1&_startc=
hk=3D1&wchp=3DdGLSzS-lSlWk&_md5=3Db9e0a063f47acaad9dbe1ed99a8696af> > / . .=
 . / <javascript:void 0> > =09
=09=09. . . / TITLE 8. CORPORATIONS </research/retrieve?_m=3D53b9bcab390bd5=
354f8ae0ea50cc3faf&_ansset=3DA-WA-A-WB-MsSEWE-UUW-EEYYCEDBA-CYBEWEZVV-WB-U&=
_src=3D5083&tcver=3D13&_tcinlni=3D43N1-9KV0-004D-4082&al=3DTAI&svc=3Dbl&_se=
arch=3DSection%20145&_srchVal=3Dsection%20145&_form=3Dbool&_stateList=3D_sr=
c%2csvc%2c_search%2c_srchVal%2c_form&tcbill=3D1&_tcid=3D5080&tcnid=3DTAI&_f=
mtstr=3DTOC&tcact=3Dbct&tcaid=3DTAI&docnum=3D4&_startdoc=3D1&_startchk=3D1&=
wchp=3DdGLSzS-lSlWk&_md5=3Db9e0a063f47acaad9dbe1ed99a8696af> > CHAPTER 1. G=
ENERAL CORPORATION LAW </research/retrieve?_m=3D53b9bcab390bd5354f8ae0ea50c=
c3faf&_ansset=3DA-WA-A-WB-MsSEWE-UUW-EEYYCEDBA-CYBEWEZVV-WB-U&_src=3D5083&t=
cver=3D13&_tcinlni=3D43N1-9KV0-004D-4082&al=3DTAIAB&svc=3Dbl&_search=3DSect=
ion%20145&_srchVal=3Dsection%20145&_form=3Dbool&_stateList=3D_src%2csvc%2c_=
search%2c_srchVal%2c_form&tcbill=3D1&_tcid=3D5080&tcnid=3DTAIAB&_fmtstr=3DT=
OC&tcact=3Dbct&tcaid=3DTAIAB&docnum=3D4&_startdoc=3D1&_startchk=3D1&wchp=3D=
dGLSzS-lSlWk&_md5=3Db9e0a063f47acaad9dbe1ed99a8696af> / . . . =09
=09=09SUBCHAPTER IV. DIRECTORS AND OFFICERS </research/retrieve?_m=3D53b9bc=
ab390bd5354f8ae0ea50cc3faf&_ansset=3DA-WA-A-WB-MsSEWE-UUW-EEYYCEDBA-CYBEWEZ=
VV-WB-U&_src=3D5083&tcver=3D13&_tcinlni=3D43N1-9KV0-004D-4082&al=3DTAIABAE&=
svc=3Dbl&_search=3DSection%20145&_srchVal=3Dsection%20145&_form=3Dbool&_sta=
teList=3D_src%2csvc%2c_search%2c_srchVal%2c_form&tcbill=3D1&_tcid=3D5080&tc=
nid=3DTAIABAE&_fmtstr=3DTOC&tcact=3Dbct&tcaid=3DTAIABAE&docnum=3D4&_startdo=
c=3D1&_startchk=3D1&wchp=3DdGLSzS-lSlWk&_md5=3Db9e0a063f47acaad9dbe1ed99a86=
96af> > ? 145. Indemnification of officers, directors, employees and agents=
; insurance =09
 << OLE Object: Picture (Metafile) >> =09Terms: =09section 145 (Edit Search=
 </research/form/bool?_m=3D36fba8926004720af18aca48dded6ca5&_fmtstr=3DFULL&=
docnum=3D4&_startdoc=3D1&_startchk=3D1&wchp=3DdGLSzS-lSlWk&_md5=3Dd40c9958f=
31f14d3c1ae6f897bc56a00>)=09
 << OLE Object: Picture (Metafile) >> =09View: =09Full=09
 << OLE Object: Picture (Metafile) >> =09Date/Time: =09Friday, August 24, 2=
001 - 5:01 PM EDT=09

Best regards,
Gina Karathanos
Sr. Legal Specialist
Enron Global Finance Legal
713-853-3376 phone
713-853-9252 fax

FYI.  I've left him a message that it is "no problem" in this instance.  But, I know that you were interested in having it reviewed before it went out, so I wanted to let you know what was happening.  MHC

No problem with the review process however it is worth noting that attempts
were made to contact you however you were out of the office for a few days.
Taking the next step, I tried to contact Dave Lund and or Dave Hattery and
they too were out.  In needing to get the response out I did not have the
luxury of waiting for everybody to return.  Thus, I went a head and sent it
out as we have historically.

Thank you for your time, assistance and input on this case.

Frank Garrard

Thanks, Frank, for the update.  It sounds like this one will go away.  If
you don't mind, in the future, I would appreciate the opportunity to review
the response before it goes to OSHA.  Thanks a lot.  Have a good weekend.
Michelle

    -----Original Message-----
[mailto:IMCEANOTES-Frank+2EGarrard+40nepco+2Ecom+40ENRON@ENRON.com]

   Sent:   Friday, August 24, 2001 11:20 AM
   Michelle,
   This is to advise of the  action taken by NEPCO and the current status
   of the claim mentioned in the  subject line of this e-mail.  In
   maintaining contact with the OSHA  Investigator on this case, I've had
   several amiable conversations regarding  She's status and stance in the
   matter.  As you know, by virtue of my  initial call to the Investigator
   (Randall L. Ounce) NEPCO satisfied the first  requirement of the 15 day
   response window.  I advised him during that call  that NEPCO was in the
   discovery phase whereby documentation was being collected  to support
   NEPCO's position.  He admitted to not yet having dialogue with  the
   claimant and therefore took no exception to our needing more time.  He
   in fact added one additional week to the two weeks I had requested.  He
   felt it may take this long for him to review the allegations and contact
   the  claimant.  In a subsequent conversation a week later, I advised him
   of the  fact that information was still coming in about the case.
   Again, he stated  he was unable to contact the claimant despite numerous
   calls to the claimants  home.  On August 15, 2001 I completed NEPCO's
   formal response to Mr.  Koonce's which was mailed the same day
   certified-return receipt.  I called  Mr. Ounce to advise him that our
   response had been mailed.  Once more he  said that he had been unable to
   contact the claimant.  She's plan is to  send written notification to
   the claimant with a set number of days in which the  claimant must
   respond.  In the event claimant doesn't, OSHA will close the  case.  At
   this time, Mr. Ounce does not have a strong feeling the  claimant will
   respond.  Additionally, after discussion of the supporting  documents,
   timelines and the lack of response by the claimant, Mr. Ounce  admitted
   to believing this to be a classic case of employee  disgruntlement.  My
   feeling is that the case will be closed by OSHA  with no further action.
   So that you may enter it into your file, I will  mail you a hard copy of
   NEPCO's formalized response.

   Regards,
   Frank Garrard
   Manager, EH&S
   NEPCO
   (425) 415-3033  (Direct)
   (425) 415-3000 (Main)

Today, I received a demand from Art Bieser's attorney.  He basically wants a year's pay, plus supervesting of options (which I told him was impossible).  I have given Fran a more detailed email with the specifics of his demand.  Let me know if you want to know the details. 

I suggest that Fran and I get together Monday with a proposed response, which we will run by you before responding to the demand.

In any event, Art will not be returning to the office at all.

Michelle

I have had some research done on the issue of what was found on the computers in the Ecoelectrica offices.  It looks like the best course of action is to destroy all of the identified materials.  Mere possession of these materials is a violation of law.  Our outside counsel called the FBI, which said that if the company does not know who put the materials out there, it does not have  a duty to report it.

We also received advice that the Puerto Rico office of the FBI might be able to assist in narrowing down the possible users to determine who actually was involved.  Our outside counsel suggested that we might want to call the local FBI office and talk with a duty agent.  The number is 787-754-6000.  Given the situation of the possible sale, however, we may choose not to take that route.

In any event, if we don't report it, all illegal materials must be destroyed and removed from our systems as soon as possible.

Michelle

Amy, at your convenience, please give me a call about Walter Coffer's review.  Thanks.  Michelle

Michelle Cash
Assistant General Counsel
Enron Wholesale Services
Legal Department
713-853-6401
Ass't:  Twanda Sweet -- 713-853-9402

Please forward me the following information as soon as possible:

Name:	
Title:
Company:
Group:
Phone Number:
Assistant's name and number:

Thank you for your prompt response.

Tara,

Thanks so much for sending me your friend's resume.  He certainly has a strong academic and work history.

Unfortunately, it is not Enron's practice to hire attorneys right out of law school.  We prefer that our candidates have at least 4-6 years (minimum) experience at a big law firm or substantial corporate law department before they are eligible for consideration here.  The rationale is that we have so much to do that we really cannot provide adequate training, which is critical for new lawyers; nor can we take the time necessary to supervise and review work of lawyers who don't have the requisite experience.

So, please thank your friend for his interest.  If you would like, I would be happy to visit with him about other types of opportunities in the legal profession, from law firms to some corporate legal departments that do hire straight out of law school.  Alternatively, he may be a candidate for the Associate and Analyst Program, if he doesn't want to practice law.

Call me with any questions.

Michelle

Michelle,
David Portz has referred me to you regarding a friend's resume.  Jon Solem is a friend who just recently graduated from Rutgers Law, and is looking to get into corporate law.  I told him that I would try to get his resume into the system for him.  It is enclosed.  Please let me know what else I can do to help in the process.
Thanks so much for your time,
Tara
 << File: SolemResume1.doc >> 
Tara E. Piazze
Enron Americas- Southeast Power Origination
1400 Smith St., 3107C
Houston, TX 77002
Phone:  713-853-5276
Fax:  713-646-4940
tara.piazze@enron.com

What do you mean by backdating?  I think our policy has been to make those current or close to current at the time of signing.

Hello, there. Hope you both are doing well.

Do we have any rules about backdating the US Exec agreements? We have someone who has been negotiating a contract for about 6 months now and he wants the contract backdated. I do not want to backdate it but need some support to say that we don't do this (if we don't, of course).

Thanks!
Tara

Valeria.  Thanks for handling this one.  Please keekp me posted.  Michelle

Cathy Bates contacted me earlier today and asked that I look into her conce=
rns.  I am in the process of investigating this matter and will contact you=
 back with my findings.  According to Fran Mayes, there were other issues i=
nvolved in the decision to end Ms. Bates' employment.

Valeria

THIS MESSAGE IS PERSONAL  AND CONFIDENTIAL
=20
Mr. Lay:
    After attending the  All Employee Meeting at The Hyatt on Thursday, Aug=
ust 16th during the Q&A  period, someone sent the comment stating "Redeploy=
ment is a  Joke". You commented and stated that if anyone had any questions=
 or  concerns regarding this matter to shoot a e-mail to you, and you would=
  respond .  After that statement regarding redeployment, I felt  compelled=
 to do just what you said-- send a message about my redeployment  experienc=
e.  I am doing this for two reasons: 1) to  prevent what has happened to me=
 (from the HR representatives side of  redeployment) from happening to any =
other Enron employee whether redeployment or  any other experience with Enr=
on's HR reps and,  2) to let  you know the redeployment process at Enron is=
 effective and efficient  and two of  the MAIN values of Enron must be exal=
ted higher.   Those values are Communication and  Respect.
=20
=20
    I received redeployment from  Enron Broadband Services- Investment grou=
p on Monday, June 18th, 2001.   Sheila Walton, a HR rep spoke to me regardi=
ng what the process would  entail.  During this meeting, Sheila mentioned t=
he redeployment process to  me, but discussed and stressed to me more, my o=
ptions  when I departed the company, rather than my options to locate anoth=
er  position with the company, not at all promoting the advantage of  redep=
loyment and its many success stories.  With no directions from Sheila  Walt=
on, I took it upon myself to contact Joyce Barrett in the redeployment grou=
p  for advice and guidance.  I met Joyce through a info-luncheon hosted for=
  EBS assistants and the DoubleTree to give information about redeployment =
and how  the process works and it's successes.  Because of a lack of  Commu=
nication, to the redeployment department, after a  week I did not have any =
information about me going into redeployment,  so at the end of the week, I=
 had no location for a redeployment desk and I  was leaving my department a=
t the end of the week of June 18-22.  =20
=20
    Due to this lack of  communication, I had to take off Monday & Tuesday =
June 25th, 26th, to have  my desk churned and locate a space for me for 45 =
days.  Joyce Barrett  contacted me with a location and more information reg=
arding my redeployment  process.  Located in 3 Allen Center, I set-up my se=
arch for  a "new" job at Enron, and my goal was to do my best to find a job=
  within Enron because that was a opportunity that I felt I owed myself and=
  Enron as a whole, by becoming Enron proud and believing in the visions  a=
nd values.  I met with Marie Jensen of Spearion to review my resume  and sh=
arpen my interview tactics.  Joyce  Barrett, Michele Hargrave and Brinella =
Knight were in contact with me to find  out how my job search was going and=
 lending support in any way.   I  had many interviews with companies outsid=
e and within Enron.  An  experience to meet new and interesting people and =
a opportunity that I feel  I would have not been able to have without redep=
loyment, so I  have no regrets about being redeployment.   I must tell you =
 that I was afraid, because a lot about this process, I was unsure of and m=
y  HR rep did nothing to assure me or inform me that this transition  is on=
e that can be rewarding, as well as a strong  challenge.
=20
    With Enron's values  system, Respect, Integrity, Communication and Exce=
llence in place and  strongly promoted by you  and Jeff Skilling (before hi=
s  departure), I want to stress to you that my experience with the HR side =
of  redeployment, has NOT carried out the value system that Enron promotes =
 and I'm sure whoever sent the comment about redeployment in that meeting  =
had every meaning of HR person representing Enron in such a  way that "a jo=
ke" is a kind way of putting it. No one should be  treated this way.   On J=
uly 31, 2001, I took a   temporary position in the Associate & Analyst Prog=
ram headed by Billy  Lemmons and Traci Warner working with Jeff Davis, John=
 Walt and Cathy Lira as  well as supporting the group as a whole.  I worked=
 in this department  until  August 21, 2001.  I received a message from Shi=
rley Cox,  Sheila Walton's assistant inquiring whether or not I had a  posi=
tion within Enron.  I called Shirley back and gave  her information about t=
he temporary assignment I had taken in the Associate  & Analysts Program. O=
n  August 14th, a call was made by Sheila  Walton to a Sr. Admin in the Ass=
ociate & Analyst Program,  inquiring whether I was working this department.=
  The admin passed the  information to Jeff Davis and he contacted Sheila W=
alton as to where I was  working and how long I had been working in the dep=
artment.  With a  remorseful sounding voice, Sheila proceeded to inquiry to=
 Jeff more details, to  which Jeff provided her.  I had overtime hours that=
 I tried to put into the  system, but I was unable to get into the time sys=
tem.  After the  conversation with Jeff Davis and Sheila Walton, I  find  o=
ut Sheila  had started the process to delete me from the system,  before my=
 original end date of August  15th.   I accepted a permanent position with =
Enron Networks as a Admin  Assistant II on August 14, 2001 reporting to Sam=
 Leuschen.  I started  that position on August 22, 2001. On August 24, 2001=
, after 2 days  of employment was terminated from the position and Enron du=
e to  Business Reorganization in Enron Networks. =20
=20
    I am very concerned about the  way this matter was handled and the seri=
es of events that surrounded this  action.  As a result,  I would like to d=
iscuss with you and or  someone in the responsible capacity and go into fur=
ther detail.   I have received a form letter stating that Enron can termina=
te my employment at  will, at any time and for any reason.  I feel this act=
ion has been provoked  for other reasons.=20
=20
     In ending this message to  you, Mr. Lay, you must know that redeployme=
nt at Enron is  a effective tool that should remain in place.  You should a=
lso know and  commend those persons who work in and closely with the redepl=
oyment group.   Enough good things cannot not be said about those people wh=
o go  out of their way to get you the help, the encouragement, the tools yo=
u need  while facing this process.  I realize that a business  decision was=
 made, and EBS downfall was a business decision, but this matter is  not a =
business one.  When redeployment takes place, the human side of you  feel s=
omewhat lost, hurt and you take it personally,although I realize it  was a =
business decision.  This occurrence was targeted and directed at  me person=
ally by Sheila Walton. Human resources should work with the human  being to=
 make you a better person through visions and values, not to be treated  in=
humanely.  Whether they are Enron's values or values in  general, HR repres=
entatives should portray what human  beings should have most of all...VALUE=
S, and  when there is no communication, no respect, no integrity, "the  jok=
e" begins and excellence is lost..
=20
    I look forward to hearing from  you or someone in your office soon.   I=
 can be contacted at the  numbers listed below at any time.   Thank you in =
advance for the  opportunity to discuss this matter.
=20
=20
=20
Sincerely,
=20
=20
Cathy Bates
(713) 524-2530 home
(832) 372-6602 cellcbates@houston.rr.com << File: mailto:cbates@houston.rr.=
com >>  << File: mailto:0@hotmail.com >> =20
=20
=20
=20
=20
=20

John, how do you want to handle this?  Michelle

Michelle

Following pushback from Britaldo Soares on the employment agreement we gave him, I had in country HR (Bottone is the VP of HR at Elektro) review our format and run it by his outside council. The attached is the result. Given we still have the same non compete and other principal terms I assume we can utilize it in place of the previous. 

Let me know if you have any problems with this.

Thanks
 
Alfredo Bottone@ENRON
08/23/2001 11:48 AM
I'm sending for you the model of AMENDMENT TO THE EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENT.

It was adapted according Brazil labor law requirements and it was revised by Veirano & Associados Advogados (Legal Counselor).

I believe that Corporate can analyse this model. If they agree with me, we will be implementing in future cases.

Nowadays we continue to use the Enron purpose form, although it contains clauses against our Brazilian
labor law.

If you have any doubts, call me.

Regards.

Alfredo Bottone  

 

<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>

please print these and file -- AMPS.  Thanks. MHC

Attorney-Client Privilege
Attorney Work Product
Personal & Confidential

Michelle-

Attached please find the four individual consulting agreements that we provided to Patrick Johnson.

Regards,
Kathryn Nance

Kathryn L. Nance
Bracewell & Patterson, L.L.P.
South Tower Pennzoil Place
711 Louisiana, Suite 2900
Houston, Texas 77002
(713) 221-1544
(713) 222-1212 fax
Attorney-Client Privilege
Attorney Work-Product
Confidential
knance@bracepatt.com

 - CONSULTI.doc 
 - CONSULTI.doc 
 - CONSULTI.doc 
 - CONSULTI.doc 

FYI.  Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the attorney-client and/or work product privileges.
Michelle:

As indicated in my voice mail to you, the email I sent to David Lund for
your information.

Kerry E Notestine
Littler Mendelson, PC
1900 Chevron Tower
1301 McKinney Street
Houston, Texas 77010
713.652.4748
713.951.9212 (fax)
knotestine@littler.com
www.littler.com

----
This email may contain confidential and privileged material for the sole use of the intended recipient(s). Any review, use, distribution or disclosure by others is strictly prohibited. If you are not the intended recipient (or authorized to receive for the recipient), please contact the sender by reply email and delete all copies of this message.

To reply to our email administrator directly, send an email to
postmaster@littler.com

Littler Mendelson, P.C.
http://www.littler.com

 - 2KQ901!.doc 

	WHILE YOU WERE OUT

Caller:		
Bob Nelson
Company:	

Phone:		
626-683-7644
FAX:		

Telephoned, Please Call

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the attorney-client and/or work product privileges.
See attached file; after you open the document below, click on the certification form.  I will send you a copy of the FMLA certification form that Paul Gonzales developed for use at Enron (its basically the same form with the Enron logo).

Valeria

Hi Valeria,
Here's the link.  You'll have to open the  Certification page as a PDF file and you can print from the PDF file.   
 
Sandra
 

 http://www.dol.gov/dol/esa/public/regs/statutes/whd/fmla.htm 
 - FMLA.url 

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the attorney-client and/or work product privileges.
Attached is the Enron FMLA Certification form; it was revised from the DOL document to include the Enron logo.

 

Hi, Felicia.

As I told Cindy, there is no easy way for me to determine which contracts I have done in the past are for corporate versus other business units.  I simply don't organize my documents that way.  Instead, I do a numeric list of documents, and the documents are identified by employee name, as opposed to business unit.  As of now, I have over 4500 documents on that list.  So, I can't easily pull out corporate agreements.

I can say that most of the corporate agreements I have done have been for RAC or Finance, so Sheila Walton probably has kept track of them somehow.  The others most likely were at VP or above level, so I think they have been captured by corporate comp.

I hope that gives you information, even if it doesn't provide exactly what you are looking for.

Let me know if you have questions.

Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

In my new roll in Compensation, I am trying to get comfortable that we have all the Employment Agreements up-to-date in the Corporate Compensation Database so that we can ensure that payments are made in a timely matter and contracts are looked at for renewal in the same timely manner.  What would help us tremendously is if we could get copies of all the contracts you produce for Corporate employees both VP and above and below VP so we can make sure they are entered into the Compensation Database.  Mary Joyce's group enters the VPs and above but Cindy Ward and I are responsible for making their payments under the contracts.  Because of this, I want to make sure we have copies and do not miss anyone.   As always, your help is very much appreciated!

Thanks!

Felecia
ext. 39815

Gina/David, I think we need to have some guidelines for these types of questions.  My view is that we should encourage people to be contacted while out on leave to identify reviewers and submit a self-evaluation.  Presumably, if they have a Click at Home PC, they can do it from there.  If not, we should be able to facilitate it manually.  Your thoughts?

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the attorney-client and/or work product privileges.
Michelle,
I received the below message, but still have questions:

If someone has been on leave for less than 12 weeks, but is currently out, what should we do in terms of selecting reviewers for them?  Should the supervisor select?  What should we do in terms of the self evaluation of listing 5 accomplishments that will be flashed on the screen during PRC meetings?  Should we just leave theirs blank?  If it is blank will it be viewed as a negative?  Can the supervisor contact the individual at home to ask them who they want for reviewers and what do they want to put for 5 accomplishments?  If the employee knows that we are going through this process and wants to select reviewers and do their accomplishments from home, should we allow that since they are on leave? 

Sorry to throw all of these questions at you, but the EES HR group has thrown them at me and I agreed to send you one e-mail to keep from all of us contacting you.  
Also, I need to get information from you on what to do in submitting my list of PRC attendees to you for review in terms of diversity.  It would be helpful if I understood what exactly you want and what you are looking for.

Any gudance you can provide on these matters would be appreciated.

NOTE - see below

Thanks
Teri

We have decided that someone who is out for more than 12 weeks during the review period should not be reviewed.  That guideline should be communicated to all of HR soon.  Michelle

Michelle Cash

Are you working on this?  MHC

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the attorney-client and/or work product privileges.
I'm concerned that Hezenrider and Wolfe should be do'able contracts in Portland but I'm doing a poor job of driving them thru. Can you reassure me you are making up for my ineptitude?

Rick,

Nice kudos from Robert.

Would you mind keeping Diane Goode in the loop on this.  As you may recall, she had done a summary of the legal requirements and sent it on to the generalists.  They now are calling her for help, so her knowing what you are doing is essential.

Thanks.

Michelle

Rick,

Great job of summarizing issues and developing recommendations!  I am in full support.

Thanks,

Robert

Attachment provides a compilation of Enron's policy treatment and considerations in granting employees a leave of absence for military or emergency duty.  After leadership's validation, HR Risk Management would propose distributing this policy guidance to all US domestic HR Generalists.   Thank you for your review and comments.  Regards, Rj.

 << File: HR Policy Guidance-military leaves.doc >>   
 

Vicente,

What is the status of our litigation in Puerto Rico?  Has there been a motion to remand?  Is anything scheduled in the next few weeks?  Have we received a scheduling order or a notice of Rule 26 hearing?

Thanks for the update.

Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

Thanks, Kerry.  That's what I thought.  Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

Ben:

As we discussed, the regulations from the department of labor specifically
allow the employment of 14 to 16 year olds in non-hazardous employment.  The
regulations, however, restrict employment to 40 hours in a week, 8 hours in
a day, and between the hours of 7:00 am to 9:00 pm.  29 C.F.R. 570.35.
Thus, don't take the interns to a power plant and don't work them past 9:00
or the hours indicated and you should be ok.  Let me know if you have any
follow up questions.

Kerry E Notestine
Littler Mendelson, PC
1900 Chevron Tower
1301 McKinney Street
Houston, Texas 77010
713.652.4748
713.951.9212 (fax)
knotestine@littler.com
www.littler.com

----
This email may contain confidential and privileged material for the sole use of the intended recipient(s). Any review, use, distribution or disclosure by others is strictly prohibited. If you are not the intended recipient (or authorized to receive for the recipient), please contact the sender by reply email and delete all copies of this message.

To reply to our email administrator directly, send an email to
postmaster@littler.com

Littler Mendelson, P.C.
http://www.littler.com

That was my response also.  I have no idea. . . .

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

HUH?

This year the Office of Labor & Employee Relations (OLER) is pleased to provide your business unit's 2001 Affirmative Action Program online.  The online site contains the documentation required to meet our regulatory obligations including the AAP narrative, goals and utilization analysis.  We have also included links to critical EEO/AA policies and related information.   We are excited about this opportunity to simplify your access to this critical and important information.   Please reference this web-site when you have an open position that needs to be filled or when considering transferring and promoting employees.   The URL link is listed at the bottom of this message.

Through our Affirmative Action Programs we take positive steps to ensure that we deliver on our commitment to EEO.  Affirmative Action is not about quotas for women or minorities nor is it about preferential treatment to less qualified candidates because of their race, gender, disability or veteran status.  Through affirmative action, we seek to establish a "level playing field" for all employees and applicants, regardless of race, gender, disability or veteran status.  We use statistical analyses of employment patterns as indicators of whether the playing field is truly level.

The AAP contains proprietary information, therefore it should not be shared with anyone outside of Enron.  If your operating company is participating in a bidding process where EEO/AAP information is requested, please forward those requests to the corporate Office of Labor & Employee Relations at EB1561 or call (713) 853-3086.  Please refer to Enron's Code of Ethics book for guidance concerning your obligations of confidence with proprietary company information.

Although the AAP contains proprietary information and belongs to Enron Corp., the narrative section is to be made available for review during regular work hours to all job applicants and employees who ask to see it.  We ask that these requests be forwarded through Human Resources and that the web site you are accessing not be shared.

We would also like to take this opportunity to reaffirm the strong commitment of Enron Corp. to the principle of Equal Employment Opportunity in its personnel policies and practices.  It is our Company policy to recruit, hire, train, and promote into all job levels, the most qualified employees and applicants for employment, without regard to race, color, religion, age, sex, national origin, disability, or veteran status.  All employee selections are based on (1) inclusive recruitment and outreach efforts, and the merit, qualifications and competence of individuals for the particular positions, and (2) consistently providing equal employment opportunity.  We believe that a diverse workforce is a strength, and that as we implement personnel policies and practices which foster fair treatment on the basis of race, sex and disability, we promote equitable employment opportunities for all employees and applicants.

Enron administers all personnel programs and employment opportunities without regard to race, color, religion, age, sex, pregnancy, national origin, physical or mental disability, veteran status, or status as an alien authorized to work in the United States.  Such employment programs and opportunities include, but are not limited to, compensation, benefits, transfers, layoff, leaves of absence, return from layoff, training, education, tuition assistance, and Company-sponsored social and recreational programs.

We have developed and implemented the 2001 Affirmative Action Program (AAP) to support our commitment to the principle of equal employment opportunity and meet federal and state requirements.  The AAP describes, in detail, the policies and procedures used in the Company's operations to carry out its commitment.

Your company's EEO Officer, as stipulated in your plan narrative, is responsible for administering the Company's Affirmative Action Program and will report to senior management on a continuing basis with regard to the progress being made under the AAP.  If you have questions, comments or concerns about Enron's Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action policies, please speak with your supervisor or your Human Resource Representative.

As with any rollout of a new web-site, errors, while not expected, may occur.  Please contact AA Program@enron.com if you are unable to log-in or experience any difficulties.  We would recommend that once you access the site you add it to your "favorites" list for future reference.

http://aap.enron.com/default.asp?u=2142&p=VEQIPSML

Attached for your review and comment are a letter and a memo in reference to the post-employment limitations of John Ashman.  If the letter is to your satisfaction, please prepare for finalization on your letterhead and send to Mr. Loeb.  If the memo is acceptable, please initial and give it to Mr. Ashman.

Please provide me with a hard copy of both documents.

Thanks.

  

	
Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

Hi, Jeanie,

AAP is in review.

McMichael -- we should revise in the next day or so.

Bridgeline -- will be out to you tomorrow.

Thanks.  Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

Hey guys,

Just checking on when the following might be available:

-sign off on Affirmative Action plan so that I may have Lavo sign
-new agreement for Ed McMichael
-Bridgline Assignment Letters for two new employees.

With PRC, I'm afraid I will forget these.  Thanks for your assistance.

Twanda, we should email the revisions to the Rome assignment letter to that lawyer.  Would you please do a draft?  Thanks.  Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the attorney-client and/or work product privileges.
please save these as mhc documents.  I'll revise.  Thanks.  MHC

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the attorney-client and/or work product privileges.
Michelle and Jim --

Attached please find termination letter that you requested.  Please note
that it is set up to be signed by Enron, as required by the original
assignment letter, and acknowledged by Hanover Measurement Services and Mr.
Rome.  In addition, I have attached resolutions of the Hanover Measurement
which authorize the termination of Mr. Rome's assignment to the Company.

Please call me with any comments or questions you may have.

-Meredith

Termination Letter:

 <<708301!.DOC>>

Resolutions:

 <<70P%01!.DOC>>

___________________
Meredith Aland Berlin
Latham & Watkins
Sears Tower, Suite  5800
Chicago, Illinois  60606
Phone:	(312) 876-7606
Fax:	(312) 993-9767
E-mail:	meredith.berlin@lw.com

This email may contain material that is confidential, privileged and/or
attorney work product for the sole use of the intended recipient.  Any
review, reliance or distribution by others or forwarding without express
permission is strictly prohibited.  If you are not the intended recipient,
please contact the sender and delete all copies.

 - 708301!.DOC 
 - 70P%01!.DOC 

would you please email to Julia and Deb the consulting services agreement?  Thanks.  Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the attorney-client and/or work product privileges.
We are looking at documenting various relationships with both brokers and agents in the Industrial business.   Could you please direct either Deb Korkmas or myself to appropriate forms that have been used and approved in the past.  Many thanks.   Julia

Julia Heintz Murray
Enron Wholesale Services
Enron Industrial Markets LLC
1400 Smith Street, EB3838
Houston, TX  77002
(713) 853-4794
Fax:  (713) 646-3393
julia.murray@enron.com

Hi, Kerry and Rick,

Hope you are enjoying the employer.  Here, it is flooding again -- my son's school is closed today because of flooding.  What fun!

Here is a request from our business guys to get information on a potential labor dispute.  Any information you can get without being obvious would be helpful.

Thanks.

Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the attorney-client and/or work product privileges.
Michelle:

Pursuant to our telephone conversation, I am forwarding you this e-mail.  As I advised we would like to obtain whatever information we can on a labor situation between Midwest Generation and the IBEW in the Chicago area.  

Thanks,

Jeff

It's greek to me.

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

Thanks Norma!

Michelle, 
What are your thoughts? 
  

FYI -- additional information on Midwest Power.  Your detective abilities would be appreciated.  Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the attorney-client and/or work product privileges.
Jeff Hodges has told me that you are helping us out with trying to locate information re: the Midwest Generation Labor Dispute.  The following article appeared in the Chicago Tribune today:

Under a settlement agreement signed with the National Labor Relations Board, Midwest Generation LLC, a wholesale power supplier to Commonwealth Edison Co., will begin negotiating as early as next week with the union representing 1,150 of its electrical workers, officials said. The move comes less than two weeks after the International Brotherhood of Electrical Workers local authorized a strike. The sides have disagreed over when the current contract expires; under a separate agreement, Midwest Generation was released from its obligation to maintain the existing contract through June 2002, company officials said.

Would there be any way to obtain details about this, or is it probably a confidential settlement?
Thanks for the advice.

Phil

I agree with your take.  Plus, how will those employees be hired?  Is it part of the deal?  If so, then we will need to figure out how to document it.  Michelle

Cheryl:
 
In light of your comments below, it now seems wise for us to schedule a meeting with you to find out which employees will move to Enron and agree on additional information we will need.  Also, if Enron staff will be doing all the back office/logistics, I'm assuming some sort of services agreement will be put in place.  At a minimum, I suggest Noel, Michelle Cash and I meet with you.  Shanna may or may not attend, but we would need to coordinate compensation with Shanna to maintain equity within the Coal marketing group.
 
I'll have my assistant, Elisa Tamez, contact you to set up a meeting for next Monday or Tuesday.
 
Thanks.

Cindy: Thank you for your response.  Our current plan is that the three marketers that Triton currently employs will become employees of Enron.  This will facilitate the coordination with our existing marketers and logistics people.  Enron will also handle all of the scheduling, sampling, and "back office" support.  As such, we may or may not need additional people for these tasks.  We will keep you posted once we know more about the needs of our group from an HR perspective.
 
Regards, Cheryl

Cheryl:
 
Due to the new structure of the deal, no further HR information will be required.  Would appreciate further description on how Enron will market the Triton coal, i.e., do we need to help find additional coal marketers/originators, or will we use existing Coal Group and Triton marketers to handle this.  You may not have answers to this yet, but if we can help coordinate through Shanna and/or our recruiting group, please let us know.
 
Cindy

All: 

As some of you know, and many may not, we are still working on Project Fireball. Over the past month we have been negotiating with the Vulcan investors to create a structure that benefits both Vulcan and Enron.  We have gone from a structure where Enron would own 100% of the company to one that includes some equity, debt, and marketing. We feel fairly confident that we are close to agreeing on a deal that will involve the following basic components:

Enron will pay Vulcan $ 100 million cash for the following: 
        $  40 million will be to purchase somewhere around 18% to 19% of the equity in Triton Coal Company 
        $  60 million will be to refinance subordinated debt that Vulcan currently has with UBS (Enron will then provide financing of this $60 MM)

        Enron will become the exclusive marketer for Triton coal and will receive a fee on each ton of coal sold (based on % of sales price)

We have indicated to Vulcan that we can close this deal within 30 days of their notification of acceptance of our bid. Some final due diligence issues need to be addressed by Enron before closing. The attached file includes a list of due diligence items that we have requested that are still outstanding.  Many of these may not apply, now that we will not purchase the entire company. Once Vulcan has accepted our bid we will need to move quickly and will need to let Triton know what outstanding issues we have to resolve. Please review this list and let me know by Monday afternoon of any items that we do not require in light of the new structure of the deal.

We will set meetings with many of you for Monday and Tuesday of next week to ensure a smooth closing process if we are selected.  Please let me know if you have any questions. 

Thanks to everyone for your continued support on this deal. 

Regards, 
Cheryl 
3-9574 

<<Fireball Final Due Diligence List 9.21.01.doc>> 

FYI

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the attorney-client and/or work product privileges.
 		

Michelle, Doug was in the real time group.  Please contact me for specific details.

We absolutely need to hold him to his evergreen.   It is his responsibility to understand the contract he signed.   If we have to, we should sue him to prevent him from working.

My understanding from Doug Miller is that he was taking a position at Calpine.  I indicated to him that he was still under an Evergreen Clause on his employment agreement.  I believe that there is some confusion with employees under a standard agreement where they think that there time to sit out 3 months post their agreement not 3 months following there termination with Enron.  I explained this to Doug and he stated that he needed to work and would continue with his plans to go to Calpine since he had to look after his family.  That being said, I spoke with Michelle Cash and she thought we needed to hold him to the non compete. She suggested that I speak with the business unit to assess their interest.  What are your thoughts?

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the attorney-client and/or work product privileges.
Michelle,

	I spoke with Rick Brown, he told me that when he signed the
handwritten agreement on behalf of Elliott and Dickinson, it was his
understanding that CRDC would make the required payments under the
settlement agreement.  But, if CRDC defaulted then Chris Cline, Tim Elliott,
John Dickinson, and Enron could be responsible for the remaining payments.
He believes that if CRDC defaults and the other defendants do not agree
among themselves as to the amount and manner in which Clonch will be paid,
then Clonch will be required to institute one arbitration action against
each of the remaining defendants.  Additionally, he believes that under the
agreement the parties did not agree to joint and several liability.  I asked
him as to why he allowed his clients to be potentially personally liable on
the payments owing to Clonch by CRDC.  He explained that it was a "no
brainer."  He reasoned that Elliott, Cline, and Dickinson are the chief
officers of CRDC and they will do everything in their power to prevent CRDC
from defaulting, because they do not want to be subject to personal
liability.  Rick also told me that Kevin also agrees with this
interpretation.

	After speaking with Rick Brown, I spoke to Rich Walters, who
informed me that Clonch refused to accept Enron's offer to guarantee
payments under the settlement agreement beginning 2002 until 2007 at a
maximum of $1000 a month and $12,000 a year.
Rich Walters told me Karen Miller's interpretation of the handwritten
settlement agreement.  Her interpretation is in accord with Rick Brown's
interpretation.  For these reasons, only intends to sue Enron and not Cline,
Elliott, and Dickinson for violation of the settlement agreement.

	Please call me so that we may discuss. Thanks.

Tim C. Carrico
Spilman Thomas & Battle, PLLC
email: tcarrico@spilmanlaw.com
phone:             (304)-340-3856
cell phone:       (304)-549-2681
fax:                  (304)-340-3801
address:           300 Kanawha Blvd., East
                       Charleston, W.Va. 25301

===============================================
CONFIDENTIALITY NOTE: This email message is for the sole use of the intended
recipient(s) and may contain confidential and privileged information. Any
unauthorized review, use, disclosure or distribution is prohibited. If you
are not the intended recipient, please contact the sender by reply email and
destroy all copies of the original message.

Hi, Janel,

I thought that I initialed those already.  If I didn't, I'll do it when I get back after my vacation next week.

In the meantime, go ahead and forward them to the counterparty for signatures on both originals and then have someone at VP level sign for Corp.  If I didn't initial, you should get them initialed before giving them to the corporate officer, because company policy requires attorney initials on all legal documents before signature.

Once signed, the original goes to the vault; we can take care of that for you.

I'll be out next week, but if you have questions, please call Diane Goode, who works in my group.  She can either assist you or find someone else who can.

Thanks.

Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

Hi Michelle,

I received the two executable copies of the CSA between Enron and KDS Communications.  I'm not sure what the next step is.  Should I overnight these to Ken to sign and then receive them back and sign on this end and he gets one and we get one?  And I'm assuming that no one else in legal has to sign off at this point?  I thought Linda Glynn mentioned something about Richard or someone else providing initials???  

Just let me know.  thanks!

Also does legal keep a copy or do we keep the contract with us?

Diane, would you please track this down and let Cathy know that we'll respond asap when I return.  Or, you could have Kriste respond.  I do not remember seeing a letter from counsel, but it is possible that it fell through the cracks.  Thanks.  Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the attorney-client and/or work product privileges.
Michelle,

Tom's been calling me for the Company's response to his attorney's letter.  Please advise and I can formally close the issue with him, i.e making his final day June 30th.

Thanks

Catherine Huynh
Enron Metals & Commodity Corp.
520 Madison Ave., 28th Floor
New York, NY 10022
Tel: 212-715-5276
Fax: 212-715-5231
E-Mail: Catherine.Huynh@Enron.com

Michelle,

I'm faxing you a letter I received this morning from attorney's representing Thomas Gramlich.

To refresh your memory, Tom was the chap that resigned in May but had a 6 months notice period in his MG employment letter.  He was the head sales person in our Lead Trading Group and given that he is going to work for a competitor, we wanted to use all of his notice period to keep him out of the market for as long as possible until we could find a suitable replacement.  September 26 would be the end of his notice period and his attorneys are proposing a June 30th release date.

As notice periods are not enforceable in the US, our hands may be tied, but I wanted to keep you advised.  Please let me know if you think there is anything we can do.

Thanks
Catherine Huynh
Enron Metals & Commodity Corp.
520 Madison Ave., 28th Floor
New York, NY 10022
Tel: 212-715-5276
Fax: 212-715-5231
E-Mail: Catherine.Huynh@Enron.com

Please note and put in a file for me regarding Enron AAPs.  That obviously will be of significance to me in my new role.  Thanks.  MHC

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the attorney-client and/or work product privileges.
Andrea, in response to Michelle's concerns about legal review of our Affirmative Action Plans, Please consider the following:

Background:   
?	Affirmative Action Plan development is supported by specific software that was implemented in January 2000.  
?	The Plans consist of two primary elements, the narrative portion and the statistical portion. 
?	Narrative was reviewed for legal merit in January 2000 by George Chaffee, Attorney at Law, Littler Mendelson, Walnut Creek, CA and by a local consultant, George Pharis, President, Strategic Direction Resources Inc. 
o	Recommended changes were incorporated into the FY 2000 AAPs.  The narrative section of an AAP is generally the same each year with few changes necessary.
?	The statistical portion requires an intense amount of labor each year.  The database of the plan has to be confirmed for accuracy
?	Plans are reviewed against the previous year's AAP for continuity
?	Once we have drafts of the AAP (narrative and statistical portion) for a business unit:
o	Draft plan and a memo are sent to the business unit HR head for review
o	HR head requests any changes and confirms their buy-in before the plan is finalized and distributed to their organization
o	Execution signatures are obtained
o	Plans are distributed to management level employees to guide their hiring/promotion and termination decisions throughout the course of the plan year.
o	Quarterly utilization reports are completed and sent to the business units to allow them to track their progress achieving AAP goals
o	If a "new goal" is warranted from quarterly reports, it is highlighted for the business unit to consider as they move forward through the rest of the year

Recommendations:

?	02 Plan narratives drafted and reviewed by appropriate legal counsel.  (Complete no later than Y/E 2001)
	o	OFCCP changes to regulations became effective December 13, 2000.  New Regs have reduced some narrative   
            requirements however underlying responsibilities are still implied  
?	AAP Plan drafts provided to HR Head and respective legal counsel for review, change, and approvals before being submitted for execution signatures
?	OLER to revise and communicate new execution milepost to get AAPs completed. Earliest data access date is Jan 15 - (reflecting Y/E promotions, terms etc)  

OLER is committed to supporting an effective AAP process for client units.  Please assist us by sharing you interests and perspectives on the recommendations offered.   

Regards, Rj.    

file: oler-core060101
***

As described in my prior email, here is a list of Ludwin's transactions.  Let me know if you have any interest.  Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the attorney-client and/or work product privileges.
 Michelle, please find attached the list of Representative Transactions
proved by Mitch.  Bruce Menke

 - transaction list.Ludwin.rtf 

Kerry,

We drove by your house, which looked like it took on some water.  I hope all is ok, and that you didn't have too  much damage.  Bellaire was hit pretty hard.

On another note, if you are able to gather any more info on this Midwest Generation issue, would you please call Jeff Hodge in our legal department?  Twanda can connect you.

I'll be on vacation this week and will return the 18th.  

Thanks.

Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the attorney-client and/or work product privileges.
Jeff Hodges has told me that you are helping us out with trying to locate information re: the Midwest Generation Labor Dispute.  The following article appeared in the Chicago Tribune today:

Under a settlement agreement signed with the National Labor Relations Board, Midwest Generation LLC, a wholesale power supplier to Commonwealth Edison Co., will begin negotiating as early as next week with the union representing 1,150 of its electrical workers, officials said. The move comes less than two weeks after the International Brotherhood of Electrical Workers local authorized a strike. The sides have disagreed over when the current contract expires; under a separate agreement, Midwest Generation was released from its obligation to maintain the existing contract through June 2002, company officials said.

Would there be any way to obtain details about this, or is it probably a confidential settlement?
Thanks for the advice.

Phil

Diane, not a high priority, but would you please get with Kim Melodick and find out what the client group wants to do with the Alonzo Williams lawsuit?  He never answered, and currently is in default.  Thanks.  Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the attorney-client and/or work product privileges.
Michelle:
	By my calculation Alonzo Williams' answer date will be Dec. 26. He was
served on November 29. I haven't heard anything.
	It occurred to me that we often are successful in resolving these things
quickly and cheaply by having someone at Enron call a contact at the new
company, TXU, and bring the issue to a head. So far as I know no one has
made such a call in this case.  I recall from the Union litigation a few
years ago there was an Enron exec who went to TUFCO by the name of Mark
McNally. We deposed Mark in that case and he was very professional and
cooperative. McNally had been at Enron and (I believe) Houston Pipeline for
15-17 years. He's now been with TXU 4 or 5 years and is CFO. A call to him
might get this off dead center. I'm copying Mark on this email because I
know Mark knows McNally well.
	What do you think?
	Best regards,
	Bill

Bummer about the flood insurance.  Of course, we had it and didn't need it.  We also pulled up our rugs, moved furniture, etc.  Had we not, the house surely would have flooded.  

Talk to you next week.

Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

Thanks for the message.  We had about 2 inches of water in the house and we
lost most of our flooring on the first floor. Most everything else is ok.
No flood insurance because we are not in the 100 year flood plain as you
know.

Regarding Midwest Generation.  I asked around with our Chicago lawyers and
did not find out anything.  I have made some other contacts and will let you
and Jeff Hodge (whom I have met) know if I hear about anything.

Kerry E Notestine
Littler Mendelson, PC
1900 Chevron Tower
1301 McKinney Street
Houston, Texas 77010
713.652.4748
713.951.9212 (fax)
knotestine@littler.com
www.littler.com

Kerry,

We drove by your house, which looked like it took on some water.  I hope
all is ok, and that you didn't have too  much damage.  Bellaire was hit
pretty hard.

On another note, if you are able to gather any more info on this Midwest
Generation issue, would you please call Jeff Hodge in our legal department?
Twanda can connect you.

I'll be on vacation this week and will return the 18th.

Thanks.

Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.
                    Philip

                    nronXgate            cc:

                                         Subject:     Midwest Generation

                    06/07/01

                    08:55 AM

Jeff Hodges has told me that you are helping us out with trying to locate
information re: the Midwest Generation Labor Dispute.  The following
article appeared in the Chicago Tribune today:

Under a settlement agreement signed with the National Labor Relations
Board, Midwest Generation LLC, a wholesale power supplier to Commonwealth
Edison Co., will begin negotiating as early as next week with the union
representing 1,150 of its electrical workers, officials said. The move
comes less than two weeks after the International Brotherhood of Electrical
Workers local authorized a strike. The sides have disagreed over when the
current contract expires; under a separate agreement, Midwest Generation
was released from its obligation to maintain the existing contract through
June 2002, company officials said.

Would there be any way to obtain details about this, or is it probably a
confidential settlement?

Thanks for the advice.

Phil

----
This email may contain confidential and privileged material for the sole use of the intended recipient(s). Any review, use, distribution or disclosure by others is strictly prohibited. If you are not the intended recipient (or authorized to receive for the recipient), please contact the sender by reply email and delete all copies of this message.

To reply to our email administrator directly, send an email to
postmaster@littler.com

Littler Mendelson, P.C.
http://www.littler.com

Yes, I should be involved.  Have you sent Noel prior information?

Michelle:

We have a conference all with Noel on this at 3:00 today.  Let me know if
you want to be a part of the conference call.

Kerry E Notestine
Littler Mendelson, PC
1900 Chevron Tower
1301 McKinney Street
Houston, Texas 77010
713.652.4748
713.951.9212 (fax)
knotestine@littler.com
www.littler.com

That is fine, just be sure to copy Noel Ryan on the email materials.  I
will ask Diane to follow up as well next week while I'm on vacation.
Thanks!!!

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by the
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

                    "Notestine,

                    ttler.com>            Subject:     RE: Sabbaticals

                    06/08/01 01:57

                    PM

 I have seen some emails about this recently. I will see what I can find
out.  It probably will be next week before I can get back to you.

Kerry,

Has your firm done any legwork on sabbaticals?  We are thinking about
doing
a pilot program in EWS for people who have worked here for more than 5-7
years (to be decided).  Any information, policies, research, pitfalls,
or
other experience you or others at the firm may have would be
appreciated.

If you send stuff by email, please reply to all so that Noel Ryan can
see
what you send (since I'll be out of the office on vacation all next
week).

Thanks a lot!!

Michelle

Michelle Cash
This message may contain confidential information that is protected by
the
attorney-client and/or work product privileges.

----
This email may contain confidential and privileged material for the sole
use of the intended recipient(s). Any review, use, distribution or
disclosure by others is strictly prohibited. If you are not the intended
recipient (or authorized to receive for the recipient), please contact the
sender by reply email and delete all copies of this message.

To reply to our email administrator directly, send an email to
postmaster@littler.com

Littler Mendelson, P.C.
http://www.littler.com

----
This email may contain confidential and privileged material for the sole use of the intended recipient(s). Any review, use, distribution or disclosure by others is strictly prohibited. If you are not the intended recipient (or authorized to receive for the recipient), please contact the sender by reply email and delete all copies of this message.

To reply to our email administrator directly, send an email to
postmaster@littler.com

Littler Mendelson, P.C.
http://www.littler.com

FYI, I forgot to forward this to you earlier.  MHC

Michelle,

Here is the first cut of a human resources agreement.  Look forward to
working with you on it next week.

Carol
                                         ++++++CONFIDENTIALITY NOTICE+++++
The information in this email may be confidential and/or privileged.  This
email is intended to be reviewed by only the individual or organization
named above.  If you are not the intended recipient or an authorized
representative of the intended recipient, you are hereby notified that any
review, dissemination or copying of this email and its attachments, if any,
or the information contained herein is prohibited.  If you have received
this email in error, please immediately notify the sender by return email
and delete this email from your system.  Thank You
 <<Human Resources Agreement.DOC>>

 - Human Resources Agreement.DOC 

That is a close call.  Has he already called on the acquiring company?  If so, then I would think it would be ok.  If not, I don't think that he could contact his friends who used to be at Novarco simply because they were acquired.  That, to me, would violate the spirit of the affidavit language, particularly if Richardson still will do business with the acquiring company through Novarco.

We could revisit this once the dust has settled after the acquisition to see if that approach still is warranted.

Michelle

Novarco (one of the companies identified on John Ashman's affidavit as a hands off account) is being aquired by a company that is not on the list.  There is some language in the affidavit (3c1) which appears to extend the list to the companies identified and their "subsidiaries, affilitates, heirs, and assigns"; would a buyer be considered one of these?

Chris Kravas
Enron Freight Markets
1400 Smith Street
Houston, TX 77002
t- 713 853 5180
f- 713 853 6061
mobile- 713 301 0986

Would you please send Rob Cole here at Enron a copy of our letter to EEOC for April?  He doesn't need any of the attachments.

Thanks.

Michelle

Twanda, would you please print?  Thanks.  MHC

Michelle,
Please look over these slides. This is the Performance Documentation training that Hector and Frank put together. We have modified a little and wanted to make sure you were still okay with this. Please let us know if there is anything we need to change. Thanks!
Mandy

Marty Chrisman

   

	for my forms files.  thanks. mhc

 <<SD201!.doc>>

Michelle:

Here is the standard form I use for an employee manual.  I call these
essential policies but others certainly are appropriate based on the
company's needs.  I also will check around for other manuals you could
review.

Kerry E Notestine
Littler Mendelson, PC
1900 Chevron Tower
1301 McKinney Street
Houston, Texas 77010
713.652.4748
713.951.9212 (fax)
knotestine@littler.com
www.littler.com

----
This email may contain confidential and privileged material for the sole use of the intended recipient(s). Any review, use, distribution or disclosure by others is strictly prohibited. If you are not the intended recipient (or authorized to receive for the recipient), please contact the sender by reply email and delete all copies of this message.

To reply to our email administrator directly, send an email to
postmaster@littler.com

Littler Mendelson, P.C.
http://www.littler.com

 - SD201!.doc 

Why does this person need Expertfinder?  I didn't get a specific reason from prior emails.  If he needs to locate people, shouldn't Peoplefinder do it for him?  More information would be helpful in making the determination of whether to allow him access.  Thanks.  Michelle

Yes, this mail never works right from home.  
 
Michelle Cash needs to sign off on anyone asking for access that doesn't meet the requirements.  Since Mike is a temporary employee, he doesn't meet the criteria.  Via this email, I'll ask Michelle to approve or decline.
 
Thanks,
Kathy

Kathy -- you sent this back, but did you mean to make a comment?

Kathy -- we have a summer intern who needs to connect wtih specific groups.  In order to do this, he needs access to org charts.  Therefore, would you please set him up with a # to access ExpertFinder?  Thanks.

Name:   Mike Finger 
Ext:    5-4760 

He is listed in email list.  

Bruce Stram is the VP in this group and he approves this for Mike. 

Please let me know when this happens. 

Thanks!!! 

Kaye 
X3-1561 

Would you please send Janice Priddy the blank short form?  Thanks.  Michelle

Michelle, this note is in response to the 28% tax rate that is attributed to paying out employment agreements. In order to move forward on exploring solutions, Janice needs a blank employment agreement.  Can you help?

Kim,
Can you get me a copy of a blank agreement so I can send it to legal for review?  The sooner the better.  I have also contacted EBS and asked them to send me a copy of one of their agreements (with no names) for John's review.
Thanks,
Janice

Janice,

Can you give me more information avout the agreement given in lieu of severance pay.  What are the terms of the agreement?  What is paid to the former employee under the agreement?  What is the timing of these payments?  Are they paid in the same year the employee terminates?  I will need more information as to the nature of the proposed agreement and its terms before I can reach an answer on this.  Do you have a copy of this agreement?

Thanks,

John

John,
I have been approached by HR with the following request which I would like your input.
When an employee is being terminated HR is giving them an agreement instead of severance pay.  The question is can it be taxed by the W-4 or does it have to be taxed as supplemental pay. 
My understanding is if an employee receives payments from an employer that are not part of their ordinary wages, it is considered supplemental wages and if the payment has been clearly indicated as other than ordinary wages it is taxed at the flat 28% (which will soon be 27.5%).
I would appreciate your input as to whether we could set up an agreement element in the system and tax it at the W-4 rate and not have any tax issues down the road that Enron could be held accountable, and what regulation could we use for support.
Thanks
Janice

Enron Corp.
janice.priddy@enron.com

Twanda, will you please handle this?  Add the inserts for the various items.  Michelle

Good Afternoon Michelle,

Could you forward an Exhibit A template to me?  I'm wanting to verify we are capturing all the fields required in our employment agreement automation effort.

Thank you.

Regards,

Charles Philpott

I think we should call it a project bonus, not an incentive bonus, because our annual bonus plan is called the Annual Incentive Plan.  Also, we usually use some other language.  I'll ask Twanda to send you our standard retention letter.

Michelle

Michelle,
Please review attached Incentive Bonus Contract.   It shouldn't take long, as it is only one page. These payments will be made on July 15th, so we'll need to obtain employees' signatures on these contracts prior to payment.

 << File: Incentive Bonus contract.doc >> 

Thanks,
Marlow
ext. 36643

No, it should remain the top 25 percent, because it is the top percentage of the criteria, not the peer group.  Thanks.  Michelle

Twanda, thanks for sending me this language.  
Michelle, since the top two categories are 35% should this be changed to top 35%?
Performance Bonus:	Employee may be eligible to participate in the Enron Corp. Annual Incentive Plan ("Plan") or any appropriate replacement bonus plan of ENA.  All Performance Bonuses are discretionary and shall be paid in accordance with the terms and provisions of the Plan and other criteria established by ENA, a portion of which may be paid in cash and a portion of which may be paid in stock options and/or restricted stock. 

			Provided that Enron meets its earnings targets and provided that Employee meets other performance-related criteria, including being rated within the top 25% of the performance criteria under Enron's annual performance rating system or its equivalent for calendar year ?TargetBonusYear?, Employee's annual bonus amount under the Plan for calendar year ?TargetBonusYear?, payable in ?TargetBonusPayableYear?, shall be based on an annual bonus target of $_________________.

Do you know this person?

	If you or someone in your EWS is hiring attorney's pass on this info.

	Thanks.
Dear Kriste:

I hope that you are well.
I wrote to you several months ago to introduce you to Glocap Legal Search, one of the fastest growing in house legal recruiting firms in the nation.    Since that time, we have worked very hard to continue building a truly unique and powerful legal recruiting company and we were gratified recently when  Forbes.com selected us the best recruiting website in the country!
 Our growing reputation and our hard work has resulted in an ever-expanding network of pre-screened, truly extraordinary attorneys seeking new and challenging career opportunities.

I am writing to  ask for your help. Do you know anyone who might be interested in hearing more about how we can help their company address their legal staffing needs?
 I have briefly summarized a very small sample of some of the attorneys available through Glocap.  We have many more available, in all practice areas and experience levels.  Call me if you would like to discuss how we can be of service to your company, or feel free to forward this email to a colleague.

Attorneys available now include:
1. Dynamic trademark attorney with over five years of experience at one of the premier law firms in the US.  Experience includes trademark, trade dress, trade secret and patent litigations in numerous disciplines including software, chemical engineering, electrical engineering, biotech, medical devices and more. Extensive drafting experience in copyright license, franchise agreements and related documents. Would relocate within US.

2. Top JD and MBA (Columbia) has over 6 years experience representing foreign and domestic commercial banks, investment banks, funds, corporations and other financial institutions in wide variety of financial transactions including acquisitions, refinancings, project finance, public and private debt and equity offerings, LBO's, private equity investments and workouts. Seeks dynamic in house position at financial institution or technology company in US or abroad.

3. Columbia Law and Dartmouth undergraduate has over 5 years legal experience in corporate, securities and technology related work. Practice includes representation of both development stage and mature companies.  Will relocate throughout US for the right opportunity.

4. Associate at top Philadelphia firm has over three years expertise in structuring mergers, acquisitions, and debt and equity financing, as well as intellectual property licenses and general corporate matters. He is seeking a position with a suitable corporation in the Philadelphia or New York area.

5. Top law school graduate (law review) has over 7 years of sophisticated litigation experience at two highly prominent law firms. This candidate has represented broker-dealers, pharmaceutical companies, internet and high tech companies, among many other clients, on their most important and complex matters. They have ranged from accounting arbitrations  and bankruptcy cases to employment, general commercial and securities litigation. Has also worked at I-banks in non-legal roles.

6. This 1995 graduate of a top 5 law school and college has experience at both a premier law firm in M & A, corporate and finance as well as experience as an investment banker for a top bank. She/he seeks a legal position at a financial institution or similar entity that can utilize his/her combined legal and banking expertise.

7.  Harvard Law School (cum laude) and Stanford University (Phi Beta Kappa) graduate has done very sophisticated capital markets work in US and Asia. She/he has worked on private placements, mergers and acquisitions, private equity investments and joint ventures for American and Asian companies. Wants Northern California only.

8. Multilingual attorney with over 7 years experience representing issuers and financial institutions in registered and unregistered international securities offerings throughout Latin America. Also expert in representing creditors and borrowers in the implementation of credit facilities.

9. Michigan Law School and Yale undergraduate has over 5 years experience assisting private and public companies with venture financings, private placements, public offerings and mergers and acquisitions transactions. Has also counseled clients regarding general corporate matters, including formation and governance, employment agreements, and securities.

10. Harvard Law School and Yale undergraduate has 3 years experience at top law firm doing corporate acquisitons and divestitures, real estate, finance, joint ventures and project finance. This candidate has unusually strong communication skills and a terrific demeanor. Currently in house counsel to new media company

11. JD/MBA from top schools with extraordinary restructuring and global finance experience at top investment bank. Experience in acquisition finance, special loans/workout and financial advisory work.  She/he seeks position that will enhance and build upon their experience.

We are actively working with far more attorneys than we could possibly summarize here. Please contact me with any specific credentials and experience you seek, and I will let you know promptly if we can be of service to you. Thanks.
--
Steven J. Greenberg
Managing Partner
Glocap Legal Search LLC
Carnegie Hall Tower
152 West 57th Street, 27th Floor
New York, New York 10019-3310
212-333-6431

www.glocaplaw.com
greenberg@glocap.net

*** Glocap provides legal, financial and technical recruiting to public and private companies including Fortune 500 companies, financial institutions, investment banks and consulting firms, and law firms.  http://www.glocap.com ***

*** Forbes selected Glocap as its "Favorite Headhunter" in its Best
of the Web issue published in Spring 2001.
http://www.forbes.com/bow/b2c/review.jhtml?id=2812

v

please print this plus attachment and file under Corporate American Express Cards.  thanks

FYI!!!!!

Irma Alvarez
HR Svc Connection
Ext. 3-1543

Irma, 
Thank you, for taking to time to meet with Cheryl and I.   We hope this simple plan will make it easier and faster to get the information we all need. 

I prepared the attached as minutes to our meeting, if you will.  It is intended to help us remember how we are to handle the American Express issues with your group going forward. 

Please let me know if you have any corrections or additions. 
Thanks again, 
Johnny and Cheryl

	 

	

please send her our standard confidentiality agreement that we attach to the consulting services agreement -- ok to send it by email. thanks

Michelle,
Do you have a soft copy of a NDA that you could forward to me or could you tell me who I should contact?
Thanks,
Melissa Prihoda
Organizational Development and Learning
713.345.2501

Mark,

Attached is a signed version of the Consulting Services Agreement between Enron and Andersen Consulting (now Accenture).  Yevgeny Frolov in HR is working on a project whereby Accenture is developing software for Enron.  Enron will own the content of the programs, and ultimately, licenses will be sold for the software, with Enron and Accenture sharing the royalty interest.

I think that your expertise is needed on this agreement.  I will send you a copy of the latest term letter, along with my handwritten comments on the draft.  

Would it be possible to get your comments/thoughts on these?  Yevgeny will contact you directly.

Thanks.

Michelle

==================================
Mike Baer
Accenture - Legal Group
100 South Wacker Drive, Ste. 515, Chicago, IL 60606-4006
Voice: 312-693-1512, Octel: 69/31512, Fax: 312-652-1512
eMail: michael.e.baer@accenture.com
==================================

This message is for the designated recipient only and may contain
privileged or confidential information.  If you have received it in error,
please notify the sender immediately and delete the original.  Any other
use of the email by you is prohibited.
 - B0033CF1.TIF 

Pursuant to my prior email, here is the draft term letter.  I will forward my handwritten comments.  Thanks.  Michelle

Michelle,

In our effort to develop a better program for Enron and transform HR in to commercial viable operation, we would like to enter in the relationship with Accenture that will help us to achieve such goals.  Attached below is a document that summarizes our intent.  Please review it and lets get together to discuss the language.  Some of the key points were we the originating arm are struggling is Warranty section.  I assume that between you and Accenture's counterpart you will be able to work out the version that is acceptable to Enron and the provider.

Accenture will provide the name of the attorney involved in this initiative.

Sincerely,

Yevgeny
 

 

Ava, would you please forward this to the IP lawyer who is handling Mark's stuff while he's out?  Thanks.  MHC

Michelle,

In our effort to develop a better program for Enron and transform HR in to commercial viable operation, we would like to enter in the relationship with Accenture that will help us to achieve such goals.  Attached below is a document that summarizes our intent.  Please review it and lets get together to discuss the language.  Some of the key points were we the originating arm are struggling is Warranty section.  I assume that between you and Accenture's counterpart you will be able to work out the version that is acceptable to Enron and the provider.

Accenture will provide the name of the attorney involved in this initiative.

Sincerely,

Yevgeny
 

 

Ava, would you please forward this to the IP lawyer who is handling Mark's work?  We are looking for a quick turnaround, so if you could ask him to call me asap, I'd appreciate it.  Thanks.  Michelle

Mark,

Attached is a signed version of the Consulting Services Agreement between Enron and Andersen Consulting (now Accenture).  Yevgeny Frolov in HR is working on a project whereby Accenture is developing software for Enron.  Enron will own the content of the programs, and ultimately, licenses will be sold for the software, with Enron and Accenture sharing the royalty interest.

I think that your expertise is needed on this agreement.  I will send you a copy of the latest term letter, along with my handwritten comments on the draft.  

Would it be possible to get your comments/thoughts on these?  Yevgeny will contact you directly.

Thanks.

Michelle

==================================
Mike Baer
Accenture - Legal Group
100 South Wacker Drive, Ste. 515, Chicago, IL 60606-4006
Voice: 312-693-1512, Octel: 69/31512, Fax: 312-652-1512
eMail: michael.e.baer@accenture.com
==================================

This message is for the designated recipient only and may contain
privileged or confidential information.  If you have received it in error,
please notify the sender immediately and delete the original.  Any other
use of the email by you is prohibited.
 - B0033CF1.TIF 

Thanks for the info, Karen.  Go ahead and keep this in your file regarding Meliza, so that it can be there in the event we need it further.  Thanks.  Michelle

 << File: Meliza Evanson Meeting NOtes.doc >> 

Hi Michelle, 

Attached please find above, notes from our Meeting with Meliza Evanson for your file.

Kind regards,

Karen.
x54667

Twanda, please note.  MHC

All agreements may now be forwarded to Mary Joyce as well as Dana Bryant, our new compensation analyst.  Michelle, please add to your distribution list a copy for Dana (that will work for me as well.)

Hi Michelle,

As Jeff is a US employee working in Houston with only a dotted line to Europe, I presume that the compensation team in Houston will be loading the executive agreement onto the relevant compensation system, and ensuring that the contract is passed to the relevant person for requesting the options etc. ( I know that it used to be Mary McKendree, so I am copying Pam on this message).

Regards

Melissa

Tel: +44 207 783 6617
Fax: +44 207 783 8887
Cell Phone: +44 7768 255 058

Will do, once I receive the revised agreement from them.  Michelle

Micelle,
Can you please let me know what the status of the contract template for Japan is?  I understand you are working on this with Baker & McKenzie for Jane McBride.  I would be intersted in seeing the advice from B&M on this matter, because it would be helpful for me as the HR person in Tokyo.   As well, once the contract template is complete, if you could send it to me and Melissa Laing for our reference, that would be great.
Thank you for your help.
Caroline

Caroline Schaeffer
Sr. HR Representative
Enron Japan
caroline.schaeffer@enron.com

I spoke with her and got this information.  We are scheduling her to come in and meet with Mark Taylor, Cheryl Nelson, and others who have information about the position.  

Molly, when is that interview scheduled?

Michelle

New contact information for Kim Jacobson: home office is 713/666-1230; and email address is kajlaw@swbell.net  Any update on her taking a part-time position?  Thanks for all the help.  Lance.

W. Lance Schuler

why don't we wait and share our revised policies with them?  

Michelle, we have received McKinseys version of HR Policy that is communicated to employees, they have asked if we woyuld supply them with a copy of our HR Policy handbook.  Are we clear to share our current intranet posted HR policies?  Regards, Rj.  

Please print this plus attachment and file Corporate American Express Cards.  thanks

Michelle,

I met with Cheryl Slone & Johnny Ross yesterday regarding our current In-effective termination process when it comes to American Express balances for terminated employees.  

After sitting down with both, I made my recommendations and I got their feedback as well.  It seems that the following outlined recommendations is what we both agreed upon and would like to implement immediately.  However, I would like your blessing on this before I actually send out the communication to my team and the EWS HR Community.  

I have attached our current termination process flow.  

Recommendations from yesterday's mtg. 

1) Begin requesting an American Express balance at the same time we send the request for the stock option summary.

2) Provide balance sheet in termination folder for generalist to conduct the Exit interview.

3) Reiterate to employee their signed corporate card agreement, Number 9, which you can see in the attachment below. 
	I understand that UPON MY TERMINATION I will have to pay any outstanding balance owed on the Corporate Card
	PRIOR to receiving my final check.  I hereby authorize Enron to withhold from my check or checks, any and all amounts
	outstanding.

4) Since the employe will be processing a final expense report and will be receiving a check from the expense report group, an automatic deduction from their final check for their balance should not be a great impact for them.

5) This will reduce the time and energy that HR Reps spend tracking ex-employees after the fact and confirming that they have paid Amex, after they have received their final Expense Report.

6) My team has the access to include Amex balance withholding as part of our SAP Termination action before payroll finalizes.

7) MOST IMPORTANTLY!!!  This reduces the liability that Enron has had to incur with Amex and will save our Company a tremendous amount of money.   

8) For those balances that are more than the actual final check amount, the HR Svc Connection will work with the generalist on a case by case basis.

Again, if you could please give me your approval or feedback asap, that would be great.

Thank you ma'am.

Irma Alvarez
HR Svc Connection
Ext. 3-1543

 

 Irma, 
Attached is a copy of the Card Agreement we use for the AMEX apps. 

    
 Please call me if you have any questions. 

Thank you, 
Johnny Ross
713-646-8314

Alan, do you want to talk with this guy while he's in town?  Michelle

Michelle:  Steve's name isn't on my list of those resumes we discussed last week.   Are you and/or Alan interested in talking with him?

Molly

Molly,

You mentioned you would be out of town some this week -- any possibility
that we could get a reaction to Steve Cochell's resume (attorney at FedEx)
before you leave?  Steve will be in town this Friday (7/13) and Monday
(7/16) if Michelle/Alan have any interest in speaking with him.

Thank you.

Elaine

Would you please find a copy of this and send to Felicia?  Thanks.  Michelle

Michelle and Sharon,

We are trying to track down a contract on Barbara Paige.  Executive Compensation said they did not receive a copy.  Can either one of you help us locate a copy?

Felecia

Felecia - I have checked our files and we do not have an agreement on Barbara Paige.

Thanks,
Diana

Diana, can you look in our files to see if we have an agreement on Barbara?  Please also check with Teresa.  Thanks.

Pam,

I looked in the Compensation Database to check on this for Sheila but there is no contract info in the system for Barbara Paige.  Can Dana check into this for us and let us know if she can locate the contract?  

Thanks!

Felecia

Felecia, can you check on this as soon as possible and let me know what the status is.  Thanks.

Sheila Walton

Sheila,

My contract calls for a salary increase after one year (June 12, 2001).  That has not yet taken effect. What do I need to do?

Barbara

I think this is in your ballpark, not mine!

Kerry/Michelle:

	ETS HR has been reviewing the current above-referenced pay practice, the legal landscape surrounding this issue, and various approaches to address the matter.  We feel it is time to meet and hopefully reach consensus as to a recommended course of action.

	Please let me know what day(s) later this week and next would be available for you to meet for an hour or two.  I'll then coordinate scheduled on my end and confirm a date and time.  Thanks,

Brian

I am happy to assist, although I think that this is Kriste's world.  I've passed this email on to her, and will assume that she has it covered, unless I hear otherwise.  Michelle

Kerry/Michelle:

	ETS HR has been reviewing the current above-referenced pay practice, the legal landscape surrounding this issue, and various approaches to address the matter.  We feel it is time to meet and hopefully reach consensus as to a recommended course of action.

	Please let me know what day(s) later this week and next would be available for you to meet for an hour or two.  I'll then coordinate scheduled on my end and confirm a date and time.  Thanks,

Brian

Thanks, Pat.  It is only temporary (at least, that's what I keep insisting!).

I just learned about a new deal involving coal mines in Wyoming or Montana (I can't remember now).  Data room to be opened in Denver on Monday.  I'll send you details asap and let you know if we may need to invite you along.  Would you be available?

Thanks.

Michelle

Document attached
 - Emplyr Duty to Accommodate m1.doc << File: Emplyr Duty to Accommodate m1.doc >> 

Looks good to me.

Michelle,

Thanks for the quick response on this contract.  I made your suggested changes and deleted the paragraph about the confidentiality.   I spoke to the other Networks generalist who has night shift clients.  He stated that all night shift individuals receive the same premium and there's no reason to keep the matter confidential.  In fact, it is a selling point to attract night shift talent.  Thanks for commenting on the language.

Please let me know if I may proceed with signatures.  

 << File: Shift Work Contract- TEMPLATE.doc >> 

Thanks,
Marlow

Who will get them?  I am happy to sit down with him in a privileged conversation and discuss those statistics, which I think is the best way to protect the privilege.  Otherwise, if it goes to him at his request, then there is no protection if we find undesirable results. 

Hi Michelle;
 
Dovie told me that she has had a chat with you regarding the diversity stats we were preparing for the VP PRC on 23 July.  Delainey had asked specifically for these stats, and that's why wewere including them.  Is there any way that we can provide the data, perhaps marking it attny privilidge?  If not, can we discuss this with Delainey so that he is aware of the reasons PEP PRC cannot provide it?  I'd apprecuate your thoughts.  Thanks, Gina

Hello, all.

Attached is an invitation from Seyfarth Shaw to attend their labor and employment seminar.  It is scheduled for Tuesday, 7/17, and lasts only a half-day.  Generally, their seminars are high quality.  Plus, the cost is only $50. 

Let me know if you plan to attend.

Michelle

At the request of Ted Meyer, attached is an electronic invitation to Seyfarth Shaw's Half Day Labor & Employment Law Seminar to be held June 17 in Houston and June 19 in Dallas.

If you should have any questions please feel free to contact the Houston office at (713) 225-2300.

Christi Kennedy
Marketing Assistant
SEYFARTH SHAW
(312) 739-6981
ckennedy@seyfarth.com

THE INFORMATION CONTAINED IN THIS TRANSMISSION IS ATTORNEY PRIVILEGED AND/OR CONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION INTENDED FOR THE USE OF THE INDIVIDUAL OR ENTITY NAMED ABOVE.  IF THE READER OF THIS MESSAGE IS NOT THE INTENDED RECIPIENT, YOU ARE HEREBY NOTIFIED THAT ANY DISSEMINATION,  DISTRIBUTION  OR COPYING OF THIS COMMUNICATION IS STRICTLY PROHIBITED.
 - hou_dall.pdf 

I don't think that is a good idea.
We were intending to put these results (which would actually be preliminary and based on the prerating results for VP's) into the VP data books.    
Who will get them?  I am happy to sit down with him in a privileged conversation and discuss those statistics, which I think is the best way to protect the privilege.  Otherwise, if it goes to him at his request, then there is no protection if we find undesirable results. 
Dovie told me that she has had a chat with you regarding the diversity stats we were preparing for the VP PRC on 23 July.  Delainey had asked specifically for these stats, and that's why wewere including them.  Is there any way that we can provide the data, perhaps marking it attny privilidge?  If not, can we discuss this with Delainey so that he is aware of the reasons PEP PRC cannot provide it?  I'd apprecuate your thoughts.  Thanks, Gina

I like that better.  When is that meeting?  Or, do we want to do that separately outside of the PRC evaluation meeting?
How about you come in and brief them orally?  
 
I don't think that is a good idea.
Who will get them?  I am happy to sit down with him in a privileged conversation and discuss those statistics, which I think is the best way to protect the privilege.  Otherwise, if it goes to him at his request, then there is no protection if we find undesirable results. 
Dovie told me that she has had a chat with you regarding the diversity stats we were preparing for the VP PRC on 23 July.  Delainey had asked specifically for these stats, and that's why wewere including them.  Is there any way that we can provide the data, perhaps marking it attny privilidge?  If not, can we discuss this with Delainey so that he is aware of the reasons PEP PRC cannot provide it?  I'd apprecuate your thoughts.  Thanks, Gina

please print this and file Corporate American Express Cards. Thanks.

I don't think you need to have a separate payroll deduction document at termination, but it probably would be good to provide them with a copy of the one they previously signed.

My thought was that it may make sense to remind all Amex card holders of the policy so that there are no surprises at termination.

Michelle

Thank you ma'am for your quick response. 

I can work with Cheryl Slone, Johnny Ross & Ryan regarding the communication to all current Amex users. As for the communication to the HR Community, I can get that out today to make this new implementation to our Termination process effective 10/01/01.  

Now, my only additional question now is, the employee has already signed the Amex Agreement as I specified below, do you see a need for me to include an additional document in the Termination packet for the employee to acknowledge as well for that Payroll deduction. I was planning on it since they have already signed the Amex agreement, but, if you think we (The HR Svc Connection) should, please let me know and I will prepare something and run it by you.

Please advise.

Thxs,
Irma Alvarez
HR Svc connection
Ext. 3-1543

I like this approach.  Let's document it and let people know.  We probably want to send some sort of communication to persons holding an Amex card, and I believe that Ryan Seleznov is looking at our overall process of who actually gets a card. Thus, I am copying her on this email.  Michelle

Michelle,

I met with Cheryl Slone & Johnny Ross yesterday regarding our current In-effective termination process when it comes to American Express balances for terminated employees.  

After sitting down with both, I made my recommendations and I got their feedback as well.  It seems that the following outlined recommendations is what we both agreed upon and would like to implement immediately.  However, I would like your blessing on this before I actually send out the communication to my team and the EWS HR Community.  

I have attached our current termination process flow.  

Recommendations from yesterday's mtg. 

1) Begin requesting an American Express balance at the same time we send the request for the stock option summary.

2) Provide balance sheet in termination folder for generalist to conduct the Exit interview.

3) Reiterate to employee their signed corporate card agreement, Number 9, which you can see in the attachment below. 
	I understand that UPON MY TERMINATION I will have to pay any outstanding balance owed on the Corporate Card
	PRIOR to receiving my final check.  I hereby authorize Enron to withhold from my check or checks, any and all amounts
	outstanding.

4) Since the employe will be processing a final expense report and will be receiving a check from the expense report group, an automatic deduction from their final check for their balance should not be a great impact for them.

5) This will reduce the time and energy that HR Reps spend tracking ex-employees after the fact and confirming that they have paid Amex, after they have received their final Expense Report.

6) My team has the access to include Amex balance withholding as part of our SAP Termination action before payroll finalizes.

7) MOST IMPORTANTLY!!!  This reduces the liability that Enron has had to incur with Amex and will save our Company a tremendous amount of money.   

8) For those balances that are more than the actual final check amount, the HR Svc Connection will work with the generalist on a case by case basis.

Again, if you could please give me your approval or feedback asap, that would be great.

Thank you ma'am.

Irma Alvarez
HR Svc Connection
Ext. 3-1543

 << File: Termination Flowchart - SAP Action.ppt >> 

 Irma, 
Attached is a copy of the Card Agreement we use for the AMEX apps. 

    << File: AE Agreement Form.doc >> 
 Please call me if you have any questions. 

Thank you, 
Johnny Ross
713-646-8314

I'd check with Oxley first.  I kind of think they are separate issues, and I am not sure that the whole group needs to see the areas where we may have issues.  MHC
Meeting is on 23 July.  I would probably do it within the meeting, because that is probably the only time we'll get the committee together in one place.  Shall I pass this alterative through Delainey?
 
I like that better.  When is that meeting?  Or, do we want to do that separately outside of the PRC evaluation meeting?
I don't think that is a good idea.
Who will get them?  I am happy to sit down with him in a privileged conversation and discuss those statistics, which I think is the best way to protect the privilege.  Otherwise, if it goes to him at his request, then there is no protection if we find undesirable results. 
Dovie told me that she has had a chat with you regarding the diversity stats we were preparing for the VP PRC on 23 July.  Delainey had asked specifically for these stats, and that's why wewere including them.  Is there any way that we can provide the data, perhaps marking it attny privilidge?  If not, can we discuss this with Delainey so that he is aware of the reasons PEP PRC cannot provide it?  I'd apprecuate your thoughts.  Thanks, Gina

absolutely, unless Kerry plans to be nice to him

	I do not think this is a conflict issue as to Enron and your representation of Enron as you are not being engaged by Malme.  I do not see a problem. Michelle do you agree? 

However, we thank you for bring it to our attention.

Michelle and Kriste:

Of all bizarre twists.  Please see message below.  Malme has purchased an
employment practices liability insurance policy (EPLI) and we are scheduled
to do the audit required by the insurance company.  While Texas conflicts
law probably would not make this a conflict because it is not like or
related to other work we have done for Enron, California conflict laws
apparently are more strict.  Could you confirm that Enron does not have a
problem with us doing an employment law audit for Malme's current company.  

Kerry E Notestine
Littler Mendelson, PC
1900 Chevron Tower
1301 McKinney Street
Houston, Texas 77010
713.652.4748
713.951.9212 (fax)
knotestine@littler.com
www.littler.com

----
This email may contain confidential and privileged material for the sole use of the intended recipient(s). Any review, use, distribution or disclosure by others is strictly prohibited. If you are not the intended recipient (or authorized to receive for the recipient), please contact the sender by reply email and delete all copies of this message.

To reply to our email administrator directly, send an email to
postmaster@littler.com

Littler Mendelson, P.C.
http://www.littler.com

I can't attend, as I'll be out of the office in Austin at a mediation.  Michelle

Kerry/Michelle/Kriste:

	Please plan on attending a meeting to address the above-referenced matter on Wednesday, July 18 at 8:30 in EB 1136.  Feel free to call me beforehand if you'd like to preview the issues and the "mind-set" that we are currently operating under.  However, please be prepared to address the legal landscape of our variable pay practice under the FLSA and any and all of the methods of compliance.  Thanks,

Brian 

Twanda, please send them hard copies of the invitation for Seyfarth's seminar.  Thanks.  MHC

Jo Ann, I think it is a great idea to invite Todd, Brad and Melissa.  I know that Michelle would agree.  Please extend the invitation and I have asked Michelle to include everybody on the distribution list.  Thanks for the reminder. 

Sheila 

Michelle -- I would like to attend this seminar.  Please let me know if I need to do anything further in response.  
Also, would Todd, Brad and Melissa (as Corporate HR reps) be able to attend?  Would it be OK to send to them?
Thanks.
Jo Ann

Jo Ann, would you be available to attend?   I will to attend since I will be preparing for the VP ST cross calibration.  Please respond to Michelle Cash.  Thanks.

Sheila 

Hello, all.

Attached is an invitation from Seyfarth Shaw to attend their labor and employment seminar.  It is scheduled for Tuesday, 7/17, and lasts only a half-day.  Generally, their seminars are high quality.  Plus, the cost is only $50. 

Let me know if you plan to attend.

Michelle

At the request of Ted Meyer, attached is an electronic invitation to Seyfarth Shaw's Half Day Labor & Employment Law Seminar to be held June 17 in Houston and June 19 in Dallas.

If you should have any questions please feel free to contact the Houston office at (713) 225-2300.

Christi Kennedy
Marketing Assistant
SEYFARTH SHAW
(312) 739-6981
ckennedy@seyfarth.com

THE INFORMATION CONTAINED IN THIS TRANSMISSION IS ATTORNEY PRIVILEGED AND/OR CONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION INTENDED FOR THE USE OF THE INDIVIDUAL OR ENTITY NAMED ABOVE.  IF THE READER OF THIS MESSAGE IS NOT THE INTENDED RECIPIENT, YOU ARE HEREBY NOTIFIED THAT ANY DISSEMINATION,  DISTRIBUTION  OR COPYING OF THIS COMMUNICATION IS STRICTLY PROHIBITED.
 - hou_dall.pdf << File: hou_dall.pdf >> 

How are we answering this type of question?
I heard that we are to ask supervisors not to put a rating on the evaluation form.  If they want to, is there any legal reason not to do it?  I always thought the goal was to make the communication and documentation as accurate and explicit as possible.  Thanks!

Oops -- too efficient.

FYI...I've asked Cheryl Erickson (coordinator for Project Fireball) to put Pat's email address on the distribution list for all communications related to Fireball.  He told me this a.m. that you and I were sending him the same stuff.  Thanks.

please put in Curran's files.

One more....
This one is for Greg Curran.
We have also "okayed" it and are forwarding it to Mary Joyce.
Thanks 
Dana

I guess that I would look at this a bit differently.  We are not penalizing a person for the cost of obtaining a visa; rather, it is the fact that he did not come through on his accepted offer and start to work for us that is the issue.  Does that matter?

Margaret Daffin and I had a conference call with Alice Gruber regarding recovery of our expenses related to obtaining H-1B visas for new employees.  Margaret estimates there have been three/possibly four instances where an individual has walked away from a position after we had committed time and money to process the visa application.  According to Alice, the DOL regulations changed last year. 

The regulations do not allow an employer to penalize a foreign national for the employer's cost of obtaining the visa.  The regs do allow the employer to recover "bonafide liquidated damages" in the amounts "stipulated by the parties at the beginning of the contract."  The "liquidated damages" may vary from state to state.  Since our offer letter does not put these candidates on notice of our intent to recover such costs, there has been no stipulation by the parties.  If we put them on notice, then the most we could attempt to recover would be our attorneys fees, not the filing fees.  

However, Alice does not recommend that we attempt to recover our costs.  She thinks the legal fees for trying to recover these monies would outweigh the H-1B costs ($3,000.00 on average).

Also, Alice expressed concern that if we add some type of "notice" language to the offer letter, that we will force some candidates to accept jobs with other companies that don't threaten to recover these costs.  She believes this could have a "chilling" effect and cause us to lose quality candidates.  

I asked if we could put some kind of notice in the packet that Margaret Daffin sends out to the Candidates explaining what information she needs to process their visa applications.  We can do that, but that may drive some candidates away.

Alice thinks the unstable economy will reduce the number of candidates who walk away after the visa has been processed.  s. Apparently this was a fairly common practice in the last couple of years when the economy was stronger and the candidates were more cavalier about turning down positions.   

Let me know what you think.  Alice would like to be very involved if we decide to try to collect these monies.  

yes, it is redundant.

Michelle=20

These are the revisions Pam Butler made to the initial evergreen agreement.=
  Is this a redundent issue now that we are revising the document?

Noel

Noel, here are my suggested revisions:

In order to represent an incentive for the Beneficiary to remain in the Com=
pany, the Beneficiary will be vested in the right to exercise an option as =
follows: (a) up to 15% of the stock options granted on the granting date; (=
b) up to 30% of the stock options granted as of six (6) months following th=
e granting date; (c) up to 45% of the stock options granted as of twelve (1=
2) months following the granting date; (d) up to 60% of the stock options g=
ranted as of eighteen (18) months following the granting date; (e) up to 75=
% of the stock options granted as of twenty-four (24) months following the =
granting date; (f) up to 90% of the stock options granted as of thirty (30)=
 months following the granting date; and (g) up to 100% of the stock option=
s granted as of thirty-six (36) months following the granting date.  The ri=
ght of the Beneficiary to the stock option will only be available once vest=
ed.  The Beneficiary may exercise vested options within the validity period=
 of five (5) years from date of grant.  In no event may Beneficiary exercis=
e or have any rights to unvested options. In no event may Beneficiary exerc=
ise or have any rights in a stock option after the term of the validity per=
iod expires.

Pam

The ESA lawyers sent us a draft of the "evergreen agreement" that the emplo=
yees are going to sign before they receive options and base salary increase=
s.  Could you make sure the wording for the vesting schedule (highlighted i=
n yellow) is acceptable.

 << File: retention 2001 options2.doc >>=20

Noel Ryan
x 5-2527

No, but we have been meeting on this topic.  We met early this week and are having a follow-up meeting next week.  I will ask Diane Goode to include you by phone, if you want to attend.  Michelle

Hello Michelle.

Do we have any developments in this arae or should I go and do my own thing for Europe ?

We're meeting now, near my office -- can you come?

They are done and should be in your email today.  MHC

Hi, there.

Please can someone advise what the hold-up is on the above agreements? I get daily calls and they, understandably, are getting annoyed! 

Thanks!
Tara

Congratulations!!!!  I know you are happy to have that wrapped up.  Michelle

My sincere congratulations to  entire negotiation team, specially to Lourdes and Vicente, for  me particularly it has been a pleasure to work with you  and I must say that  being part of a  team  that  has the abilities and  knowledge as this one  does is  refreshing.
We have achieved and surpassed  the  goals  defined in  our strategy and most important we have left EcoElectrica with  in a good position to handle itself  in presence of a union, which is not  an easy thing to achieve, we have also established the  grounds  for a solid open relationship without compromising any managerial principle or economic objective. All in all a job well done!.
 Thanks to all it's been great working with you all.
Regards, Teo

great -- let me know your feedback.

I'm going. 

R.

Hello, all.

Attached is an invitation from Seyfarth Shaw to attend their labor and employment seminar.  It is scheduled for Tuesday, 7/17, and lasts only a half-day.  Generally, their seminars are high quality.  Plus, the cost is only $50. 

Let me know if you plan to attend.

Michelle

At the request of Ted Meyer, attached is an electronic invitation to Seyfarth Shaw's Half Day Labor & Employment Law Seminar to be held June 17 in Houston and June 19 in Dallas.

If you should have any questions please feel free to contact the Houston office at (713) 225-2300.

Christi Kennedy
Marketing Assistant
SEYFARTH SHAW
(312) 739-6981
ckennedy@seyfarth.com

THE INFORMATION CONTAINED IN THIS TRANSMISSION IS ATTORNEY PRIVILEGED AND/OR CONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION INTENDED FOR THE USE OF THE INDIVIDUAL OR ENTITY NAMED ABOVE.  IF THE READER OF THIS MESSAGE IS NOT THE INTENDED RECIPIENT, YOU ARE HEREBY NOTIFIED THAT ANY DISSEMINATION,  DISTRIBUTION  OR COPYING OF THIS COMMUNICATION IS STRICTLY PROHIBITED.
 - hou_dall.pdf << File: hou_dall.pdf >> 

Also, say hi to Ted Meyer, who is my (and your) Bellaire neighbor.  

I'm going. 

R.

Hello, all.

Attached is an invitation from Seyfarth Shaw to attend their labor and employment seminar.  It is scheduled for Tuesday, 7/17, and lasts only a half-day.  Generally, their seminars are high quality.  Plus, the cost is only $50. 

Let me know if you plan to attend.

Michelle

At the request of Ted Meyer, attached is an electronic invitation to Seyfarth Shaw's Half Day Labor & Employment Law Seminar to be held June 17 in Houston and June 19 in Dallas.

If you should have any questions please feel free to contact the Houston office at (713) 225-2300.

Christi Kennedy
Marketing Assistant
SEYFARTH SHAW
(312) 739-6981
ckennedy@seyfarth.com

THE INFORMATION CONTAINED IN THIS TRANSMISSION IS ATTORNEY PRIVILEGED AND/OR CONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION INTENDED FOR THE USE OF THE INDIVIDUAL OR ENTITY NAMED ABOVE.  IF THE READER OF THIS MESSAGE IS NOT THE INTENDED RECIPIENT, YOU ARE HEREBY NOTIFIED THAT ANY DISSEMINATION,  DISTRIBUTION  OR COPYING OF THIS COMMUNICATION IS STRICTLY PROHIBITED.
 - hou_dall.pdf << File: hou_dall.pdf >> 

I think this works.  What is the best way to incorporate this into the plan?

Michelle, here is a suggested revision to Section 3.4 B which I believe will accomplish the objective we discussed.  We need to draft procedures to be adopted by the Committee. 
B.  If a terminated employee who is entitled to receive a severance benefit under the Plan receives a notification of layoff from Enron in compliance with the Federal Worker Adjustment and Retraining Notification Act, is placed on a period of paid leave of absence or furlough before termination of employment by Enron, and continues on the payroll of Enron for such period, the severance benefit payable under the Plan shall be reduced and offset, in a manner prescribed in procedures established by the Committee, by the amount of pay received by such employee during such period.  
Pat

I'm holding off on these until I get the package from PR.  

Attached for your review are the scripts, the script talking points, and the agendas for training catagories:  Regards, Rj. 

 << File: Scripts A-D Rev4.doc >>  << File: scripts-Talking points.doc >>  << File: Status notification meeting agendas for BU notifiers.doc >> 

My info is correct.  Michelle

=20

Best Regards,=20
Julie Clyatt=20
(713) 853-3256=20

yes, indeed..

Thank you.
=20
Did you have a nice trip?
=20

Best Regards,=20
Julie Clyatt=20
(713) 853-3256=20

My info is correct.  Michelle

=20

Best Regards,=20
Julie Clyatt=20
(713) 853-3256=20

In a message dated 11/25/01 1:45:27 PM Pacific Standard Time, Michelle.Cash@enron.com writes: 
I think this works.  What is the best way to incorporate this into the 
plan? 
Michelle, I don't know if I have the final restated plan document.  I'm not sure what changes anyone made after my last draft.  I don't even know what the design decision  was regarding the formula.  I think that Kriste has it or Mary Joyce should have it. 
The best way to incorporate the revised paragraph into the plan would be to cut and paste the revised paragraph over the existing paragraph B. 
Pat 

What do you think?  We have a babysitter that night already, although I am sure we could cancel it.  

FYI

Hey Gang:

Dave's staff meeting was attended by women in a party mood and Kirk with some limited veto rights!  We have tentatively scheduled a casual family Christmas party for Dave's Gang for December 8 at Alicia's house in the Heights.  This is a kid-friendly event with a street party twist - we'll start with a casual dinner at 5pm at the Goodrows then, weather permitting, travel by foot, wagon, stroller, bicycles, scooters or similar modes to the Lights in the Heights Street Party a few blocks away.

We'll send out better invitations next week.  But please mark your calendars and inform your household event coordinators now.

Check out the attached link to Lights in the Heights for more info about carolling and carousing for Christmas!

Ho Ho Ho

Alicia

http://www.woodland-heights.org/Events/LIH/home.html

Please schedule me to attend this meeting.  Thanks.  MHC

The meeting will begin at 10:00 am.

Reminder:
Our next meeting will be held tomorrow,  Friday, August 31, in EB 42C1.  Items to be covered in the meeting include:  

1.  Action Items - Update
2.  Focus Group Meetings 
3.  ER page on HR Website
4.  Generalist Tracking forms for ER issues
5.  Developing Performance Standards

Please let me know if you will not be able to attend.

George,

I spoke with Fran about the Leaf River contracts.  She indicated that we are waiting for details (names, etc) from Eric Connor.  Once we get those, we can generate a draft for review and comment.  I understand that Fran has asked Eric for this data.  Let me know if you have any questions.

Michelle

Terrie, On the issue of communicating the restated severance plan, below is the recommendation of four different attorneys who have considered the issue.  Michelle

In a message dated 11/25/01 2:35:26 PM Pacific Standard Time, Michelle.Cash@ENRON.com writes: 
My recommendation would be to let 
everyone know it has been restated and attach an electronic copy of the 
new plan, thus letting the plan speak for itself. 
Michelle, this was the combined recommendation of Kriste, Kerry N. and myself.   
Pat 

No rush on this -- late this week is fine.  Michelle

Please schedule and set up a conference call between Jon Chapman, Sarah Gregory, Michelle and me regarding the data protection policy.

Thanks,
--Lizzette

	Would you please handle this?  Thanks.  Michelle

Michelle,

We have a reconciling item between SAP Account 0530-10220019 Outflow Clearing and the actual bank balance with Citibank New York 40781075 in the amount of $5,346.46.

On 10-26-01 your forwarded to Treasury Wire Transfer Requests as follows:

Payee                                   Amount     Curr    US Amount
Denton Wilde Sapte Tokyo   $492,120      JPY    $4,024.20
Rajah and Tann                   $2,425.65     SGD   $1,332.26

It appears that these two (2) Wire Transfer Requests have not been forwarded to A/P to record the expense.

Please arrange to forward the appropriate documentation to A/P during November 2001.

Stacey Lee Burnett

I'll get back with you asap.  Michelle

Do we need to have our meeting today? I could sure use the time for some other meetings.

Kevin

FYI re:  offer revocation.  Michelle

I would appreciate your help in communicating to the HR community that signed waivers related to the revocation of job offers are to be placed in two locations:  (1) original to the vault; and (2) a copy to the application file kept by HR regarding the individual.

Thanks,
--Lizzette

Money.

Michelle:  I would like to recommend that when the H.R. Representative has an exit interview with a foreign national employee who is being laid off from Enron, that Enron offer them a consultation with Tindall & Foster.  This would enable the individual to talk to the attorneys about their individual immigration status and concerns, after they leave Enron's employment.  I believe it would also show that we are concerned about them.

The approximate cost of this is $150 per hour.

Do you see any problems with this?
Please advise
Margaret

The good news is, we don't owe a mediation fee, right?  Lizzette, I'll give Jack a call.  Michelle

The Rome mediation scheduled for Thursday has been cancelled.

--Lizzette

I guess I would delay in responding to this one until we know what the plan will look like.  Hate to direct them to current plan if it will be changing.  Michelle

We should be able to direct employees to the web site <http://home.enron.com> for plan information.

Michelle & Rick, do we want to answer this question now?
The answers so far have stated current Enron Corp Severance Plans are in place for those employees laid off.

What are the Enron Corp Severance Plan details? Where can they be found?

Thanks

Brian Ripley
713-345-4709 (work)
281-541-2927 (cell)

I will provide more detailed comments later, but want to clarify that the severance plan has not been adopted by all Enron entities domestically.  Similarly, some Enron-owned companies have adopted their own vacation, sick pay, etc.  So, we should be careful about the audience for these communications.  I suggest getting with Rick Johnson on that issue.  Michelle

Attached is the latest draft of a memo outlining the changes to severance, vacation, et al.  While I know that we don't have a decision on severance, Michelle Cash and I have discussed most likely only being able to include a link to the restated plan.  If we do that, any language in the memo related to severance will be very generic.  I've also added information about the suspension of the Educational Assistance Program.  (Q: Rick, is the cut off date Nov. 2002, or should it be 2001?)  Let me know your thoughts when possible.  We'd like to send this as soon as we get word from David that a plan has been selected.

 << File: Policy change notice email.doc >> 
Michelle, when we know which plan is selected, we'd still like to have some summary language/talking points we can provide HR generalists and supervisors to help them briefly explain the plan as they are talking with employees.

Ann, I've looked over this list and realized I have no relevant information, so I've forwarded it to Sharon and Kriste, who should be able to help you.  Sorry I can't do it myself, but I just don't know anything about the pipes.  Michelle

Michelle,

Here's the list of information I need for Northern Natural Gas:

1.  EEOC charges, lawsuits and/or judgments entered or settlement agreements reached in the last 2 years (including discrimination, harassment, workers' comp and ERISA claims, or otherwise), including any compliance agreements, consent decrees, etc. with any governmental agency (i.e..  OFCCP, EEOC, DOL, etc.)

2.  List of any pending government compliance audits, administrative proceedings, employee grievances regarding compliance with wage, overtime, or safety and health issues.

I talked with Valeria and she is pulling the EEOC charge information.  Of course, I need this as soon as possible.  Thanks for your help.

Ann

Mike,

I have reviewed the NEPCO AGreement to separation pay and release of claims.  I believe that there are significant issues with this because it does not comply with the requirements of the Older Worker Benefit Protection Act.

I will send you a new waiver form to use.    The one you are using is not valid under the ADEA.

Michelle

I agree that it is best to leave alone.

Last I checked, the severance plan is not currently listed on the intranet.  I wonder whether we should provide information regarding the current plan as it may change in the very immediate future.  What are your thoughts?  Thanks, Cole.

We should be able to direct employees to the web site <http://home.enron.com> for plan information.

Michelle & Rick, do we want to answer this question now?
The answers so far have stated current Enron Corp Severance Plans are in place for those employees laid off.

What are the Enron Corp Severance Plan details? Where can they be found?

Thanks

Brian Ripley
713-345-4709 (work)
281-541-2927 (cell)

Yes. Send to me. Thanks. Michelle

It shiuld be cynthia barow instead. I think the benefits info already is in what we sent to katie caplan at weil. Let me know how I can help. Michelle

Go ahead and notify. 

What a jerk 

I don't think we should curtail cause terminations.  Others would probably be best to wait unless there is a disruptive situation.  Michelle

Michelle,

Are we are tabling all terminations for performance issues that we would normally be exploring outside of our current situation?  My assumption is that we are looking for those individuals to go in the first wave of lay-offs.  Please confirm.

Dave 

You should indicate that the severance plan is subject to the approval of the Enron Corp. Board of Directors.  We do have a plan in place, but we haven't terminated any employees under that plan  in the last few weeks.  So, we can't say that there is not plan in place righ now.  Michelle

Wes Colwell held a floor meeting yesterday where he announced what he thought the severance packages would look like, 1 1/2 weeks for each year of service and 1 1/2 weeks for every $10,000 of your annual salary maximum of 39 weeks no doubling.  Apparently that is not correct or has not been approved so I was going to send out the following announcement to those who attended his meeting for clarification.  Please give me your feedback as soon as possible.

Estalee

Yesterday in Wes Colwell's floor meeting a possible Severance Plan scenario was discussed.  The Severance Plan is under review and at this time we do not have a defined plan in place.  Once we know exactly what the plan will look like we will communicate to you as quickly as possible.  We are sorry for any misunderstanding there may be.  Please feel free to contact your HR Representative with any additional questions.

We need the following data asap:

1.  Number of total employees at all Enron entities broken down by domestic and US
2.  Breakdown of those domestic employees by whether they are hourly or salaried
3.  Amount of accrued, unpaid vacation balance.

Michelle

I agree. No offer. Let him pursue his claims with everyone else. Michelle

Yep

Sandra, we need the password!

  Hi Michelle & Twanda
This is a long memo.  Let me know if you cannot open the link to the memo and I will print it out for you.

Regards,
Sandra
x37921
 
 http://www.eeac.org/private/99-152.pdf

Sarsh

Sarah. Please feel free to call me on my cell at 713-302-5522 or at home at 713-218-7155 if you need to reach me urgently. Michelle

I think that we should enforce the agreement. Did he get a signing bonus?  If so he probably will have to pay back. He also will have to hnor noncompete. 

What happened with Brent Price?

Michelle

Sure 

Kathy,

Would you please get access to expertfinder reinstated for my group:  me, Lizzette Palmer, Twanda Sweet, and Diane Goode?

Thanks a bunch!!

Michelle

I left a voice mail for Terrie, indicating that I think we should close out this communication with something to the effect of:  "If you have further questions, please contact ________________."

Due to current business circumstances, on November 28, 2001, Enron's Board of Directors adopted an amendment to the Enron Corp. Savings Plan.  The amendment includes the following changes, which became effective on November 29:

?	Savings Plan contributions that are deducted from your November 30 paycheck will be matched by Enron in cash rather than Enron stock.  The cash match will be placed into the Fidelity Freedom 2000 fund, the default fund for the Plan.  

?	After November 30, Enron will no longer match your savings plan contributions.  As an exception, the company will continue the union matching contributions to the Plan.

?	Effective immediately, diversification within the Plan will now be allowed, regardless of your age, from ALL company contribution accounts.  This removes the restriction for all employees under the age of 50 to diversify the company contributions held in their account.  These accounts include all prior company contributions, QNEC, and company match accounts.  

To move funds:
On the Web, choose "Savings Plan--Restricted Employer Acct Transfer/Reallocation" from the drop down menu.
On Voice Response, choose "request for fund transfer/reallocation of your restricted employer accounts."
This will allow you to move money from the four formerly restricted accounts: Company Matching, Union Matching, Prior Matching, and QNEC.

To avoid phone delays, we recommend that you access your account through the web at http://hewitt.resources.com/enron  or through benefits.enron.com.

This looks fine with me. Michelle

I think that is right, but I do not have the data to confirm that. Michelle

Thanks. We're using Weil. Talk to you soon. Michelle

I would say that we should honor the terms of any sale or acquisition agreement with regards to service bridging. If we agreed to do so, then our records should reflect that service date. Michelle

Here are some referrals for HR consultants.  Michelle

Michelle:

Here are the referrals that I received.  Some of the referrals came from
more than one source within our firm.

Kerry--

I suggest that you speak to Barry Cosloy at PricewaterhouseCoopers' Global
HR Practice.  Barry heads up the PwC Employment Compliance Risk Management
Solutions.  I am attaching his contact information and suggest that you
contact him directly.  I am also attaching two presentations that describe
the exact type of practice group you need.

 <<Barry I. Cosloy>>
 <<Workforce reduction v3.ppt>>

Kerry,

I have been networking with William M. Mercer Company, a subsidiary of Marsh
McLennan Companies.  They are one of the largest, if not the largest, human
resources consulting firms in the world.  They have 15,000 employees and
offices all over the country.  They are clearly the top in their field.
Here is a contact person in Houston: Philip Tenenbaum in Mercer's Houston
office.  Philip can be reached at 713-653-5253. Here also is some
information about Phillip and Mercer.

 <<PTenenbaum - BIO.doc>>  <<Mercer overview.doc>>

Kerry:

I have a strong relationship with Hewitt.  I forwarded an edited version of
your e-mail to my primary contact at Hewitt and inquired as to who he
recommends in Houston.  Below is Dick's response.  Hopefully, this will be
useful to you.

Christy

Christy, we'd certainly appreciate it if you suggested Hewitt. We have a
rather
large center in the Woodlands, which is just outside Houston. Also, we have
a
number of consultants who work on the issues mentioned.

You could suggest Don Henderson as an initial contact. Don is a benefits
lawyer
in the Houston (i.e.., Woodlands) office who could help them locate the best
Hewitt resource for the client. Don's number is 281-363-0456  I'm copying
Don in
case he has a suggestion of someone else who the client might contact.

It was good seeing you at the reception. Thanks for thinking of us!

Dick Hinman
Legal Consultant
Hewitt Associates
1 Embarcadero Center, Suite 1400
San Francisco, CA 94111-3703
(415) 438-2482 (direct dial)
(415) 837-1810 (fax)
rchinman@hewitt.com

We also had reference to Jeanneret & associates, but I know you know them.
Here is another person in that line of business if you want to go that
route:

If you need an economist, try these folks.
 <<Brian P. Sullivan Ph. D.>>

Based on our conversations to date, I would think the PriceWaterhouse and
Mercer contacts would be your best bets.

Kerry E Notestine
Littler Mendelson, PC
1900 Chevron Tower
1301 McKinney Street
Houston, Texas 77010
713.652.4748
713.951.9212 (fax)
knotestine@littler.com
www.littler.com

----
This email may contain confidential and privileged material for the sole use of the intended recipient(s). Any review, use, distribution or disclosure by others is strictly prohibited. If you are not the intended recipient (or authorized to receive for the recipient), please contact the sender by reply email and delete all copies of this message.

To reply to our email administrator directly, send an email to
postmaster@littler.com

Littler Mendelson, P.C.
http://www.littler.com

Content-Transfer-Encoding: 7bit

 - Workforce reduction v3.ppt 
 - PTenenbaum - BIO.doc 
 - Mercer overview.doc 
Content-Transfer-Encoding: 7bit

Sure. I didn't read it all but assume it is ok. Michelle

Ill see what I can find out for you. Michelle

Get with David Lund. 

Nepco is not in br. Let's discuss the charges. M

Thanks. Both of us are still here. You of all people know how hard yesterday was for me. I hope never To have to go through that type of experience again. Talk to you soon. Michelle

I assume that you are working with Terrie James on this. The answer depends, so we need to be careful about how we answe it. Michelle

I'm still here. It has been very rough this week. Thanks for checking with me. Michelle

FYI. We have suspended our neutral reference practice in light of the layoffs yesterday. 

FYI, I have heard from some folks that business folks think that too many HR people are gone, so I think they may be ok with numbers. Michelle

The answer is no.  We can't provide personnel information to anyone outside the company.  Not appropriate at any time.  Michelle

fyi. - are we to channel messages like this way to a point of contact.
 
Pls advise.
 
Thanks, Karen.
Karen,
 
Can you tell me which associates and analysts were retained and which ones were laid off and the criteria for making the decision?
 
Simone
 
 

sounds good

Kathy Cook talked with Ben Herman about the problem employee who was abusing personal time, sick time, etc. 

They decided that since she has used more than her  allotted sick leave, any future time off will be charged as vacation or at no pay.

No need to call Kathy Cook back unless you have something additional to tell her.

Can you and +iane please join me Sharon and Kriste at 2 for a status meeting?  Go tob 16. 

Kari, this is helpful.  Is there any way we can delete the names of persons who no longer are here?  Thanks.  Michelle

Attached is the report you requested.  The report does include Louise Kitchen; however, she is technically assigned to ENW.

Please see attached.

 << File: EA Comm EEs - 12-05-01.xls >> 

Please pull the following info and put into Excel:

BU = EA
Peer Group = Commercial
EE Status = Active or LOA

List all EEs, sorted by:
	1)  Job Title (high level to low level)
	2)  EE's Name (alpha order)

Be sure to include the following info, if the EE is on an ACTIVE, EXECUTABLE EE Agrmt:
	EE Agrmt Begin Date
	EE Agrmt End Date

I am working with Mary Joyce on that right now. Michelle

I think we should consider this request. 

I think that the answer is that she will be eligible for the $4500 and will be allowed to continue whatever medical coverage she had elected already until 12/31.  Please refer her to the Q&As on the web site for details.  Michelle

Tim/Michelle:  To follow-up on our meeting yesterday...I received a call from one of my clients, Takiyah Gordon, regarding her maternity leave status.  She had her baby on November 14th and will be under a doctor's care until January.  She informed me that she also received the news that she will not qualify for unemployment while under a doctor's care.  Please advise.  Thanks.

I have received an urgent data request from the counterparty for Netco.

They want the following asap:

Signed copies of contracts for Greg Whalley and Vince Kaminsky (who may not have a contract)
Sample signed agreement for a regular trader (presumably give one at vp and above and one below vp) -- I can get this from my files easily
Signed sample agreement for an IT person, such as Jay Webb (I think I can get this one as well).

They also want the following data for the 838:

	Name
	Position/title
	2000 total compensation (broken down by base, bonus, etc)
	Comp for 2001, broken down by base, bonus, etc.  (I'd exclude stay bonus in this number)
	If the person has a contract, what is the future value of the contract
	Did the person get a stay bonus last week?  If so, amount.
	Date of hire
	If under contract, beginning and end date of the term of that agreement.

They are in a rush for this data, so give me a call and let me know how quickly we can assemble it.

Thanks a lot!

Michelle

please file "Pam Benson".  Thanks.  MHC

For your reference I am forwarding the following from Cindy Adams.  The bottom line is she deserves to have her record amended to expunge any negative comments resulting from her tenure in Mr. Sutton's office.  I will leave it to you professionals to do the right thing.  Please advise Ms. Adams on how best to proceed.

Tim, absolutely.  You have my permission to pass this information on to HR and any member of senior management as I need to fill in the gap she created in my resume, as I am going to require references.  Not only would I like to persuade Pam to put her apology in writing, I've contemplated contacting Joe Sutton to set the record straight as Pam blocked me all three times I requested through HR having a meeting with Joe in the presence of my HR representative and Pam as well.  I think he should also know the truth.

Thank you Tim for your feedback, as I continue to appreciate and value your advice. 

With your permission I would like to pass this on to HR.  Perhaps you could pursuade Pam to put this in writing.  It might be helpful in attempting to have your reviews amended.

Tim, I just wanted to share with you the matter of my having received a telephone call a week ago from Pam Benson (formerly of Joe Sutton's office).  She was the admin with Joe Sutton's office who'd approached me and then insisted I had to come work with her in supporting Joe's office even after I had told HR and her I wasn't interested.

She was also responsible for eliminating me from Joe's office in his absence upon her return from her surgery after I had supported his office  having been complimented by him verbally to Pam in my presence as having taken what he referred to  as "the best planned trip he'd been on in years with everything in place". (This was in reference to his trip around the world when he went to India to meet with President Clinton.)

Pam said she's "had me on her mind for a long time" then proceeded with:
"I was going to call you at home but was uncertain that the number I had was correct, so decided to call you at Enron since I knew you were there." 
"I had to call to tell you I've had you on my mind for a long time and that I need to tell you how very sorry I am for what I did to you, Cindy.  You didn't deserve to be treated like that."  "You are a fine person" and then she broke down crying on the telephone.  Pam said she hoped in her heart I would forgive her and that "she didn't deserve to talk to me".  

She said she had retired and was calling me from her home and that "God had been talking to her and told her to make this telephone call and that she needed to call to apologize to me for what she had done to me." She said twice, "if there is anything I can do for you emotionally or financially, please call me and I will do whatever I can to help you."  My only response to Pam was, "Pam,  I  do not understood why you did it."   

Tim, in all of my years employed within the corporate environment, I have never encountered anyone like Pam Benson before who would harbor jealousy to the point where they would want to destroy a person's reputation among their peers and professional associates and manipulate someone's career.  Of course she caught me off guard calling me here at the office around 11:00 am which left me speechless.  I found her call strange as so much time has passed.  Her disruptive behavior only reflected her thoughts. 

I just thought I'd share this with you.  Some people never cease to amaze me.  

Cindy

 

please file in Diomedes' file.  Thanks.  MHC

 
 
Michelle/Pam,
 
Please let me know whether you have now cleared the payments as I need to give a position to my counterparties by this week.
 
Regards,
 
Diomedes.

fine with me.  mhc

	Miles,

	The notice and objection look good to me, but I want to make sure that Bob, Michelle, Dorie and Lisa don't have any objection to it.  Let's talk Monday morning.

	Britt

	Per my conversation with Britt on Friday, attached is a draft notice
of bankruptcy in the Event case.  I left it very bare, i.e., did not say
whether the bankruptcy stays the adversary proceeding, because we may not
want it "stayed" in light of Rodney Tow's intent to dismiss the proceeding
in favor of an agreed liquidating plan.
	Also, the U.S. trustee filed  a motion to dismiss or convert the
case since it has been inactive and no plan has been confirmed.  I was not
served with the motion, but Rodney told me about it and I have received his
response.  I would like to join with a short response on Enron's behalf, a
draft of which is attached.  The response is due tomorrow (Monday), so let
me know if you have any concerns about filing it.  

	 <<NoticeBankr.doc>> 	 <<ObjDismiss.doc>> 

You need more than the 840 for this -- you also need the IT personnel.  I'll forward those to Kathy so she can get started.  Thanks.  Michelle

Chaps, did we get Kathy the list of 840 to check for compliance certificates?
I confirmed that I can get to my work from home (darn it!!).  I haven't got a list from anyone yet to run the data you need....

No risk to non-compete.  The payment obligation is one that is independent of non-compete.  MHC

Holly Krebbs left Enron (Portland). She had a 3-month evergreen and was supposed to be paid her salary through that 90-day period.  Due to a computer glitch, Holly got terminated from payroll and did not receive a regular paycheck from August 8 through September 26.  As soon as Holly made Amy aware of the situation (Sept. 26), Irma got the computer records corrected and requested a check to pay monies due. The employee was sent a check via Federal Express.

Amy is concerned that we may have somehow "breached" the settlement agreement which would allow Holly to ignore her obligations re non-compete.  Is the non-compete still in effect as long as she got the money, even if it wasn't paid on time? 

We know Holly is going to AEP at the end of the 90-day evergreen and Amy has already had to remind her of her non-compete obligations because Holly was seen lunching with an AEP executive.

Is there a risk here re non-compete?

Thanks....

   

Here is the second list.  Michelle
 
Hi Michelle,
 
The attached spreadsheet should represent a complete set of developers of EnronOnline since inception.  I haven't named the individual Valtech and Agency.com developers since the agreements we have with those companies presumably cover all of their developers.
 
The rest of the systems will probably not be done until tomorrow.
 
--jay
 
 

I got this request a second time.  Probably Fran would have the best knowledge of exactly how these people were paid.  
I don't think so because they roll up under EIM and I don't think they were included.  I'll check my query on who I included in the initial pull I did.  Diane may have included them in the second pass at that data.

Do either of you know the answer to this?  Thanks.  Michelle

Michelle. Do you know who would know the answer to this question. Please let us know. Thanks. Julia 
Julia: 
  
For purposes of determining the Garden State Paper (GSP) first day motions to be filed, the attorney at Weil I am working with (Chris Marcus) has asked whether GSP employees were included in the "count" of "Enron" employees to be covered under its motion for approval to pay payroll.  If you have any questions, please email or call me.  Thanks

Cheryl 

Alan,

I got a request from Carey Sloan that we confirm in writing that he was no longer an officer or board member of any Enron entity as of the last date of his employment.  Can we do that?  If so, who can assist?

Thanks.

Michelle

Twanda,

We missed Diane's birthday on Friday -- I can't believe I forgot it!!!

I'd like to get cake Monday afternoon.  

Michelle

We are working on it but in the grand scheme of things it is kind of a back burner issue. Michelle

I agree. But we should pay them the 4500. 

We have decided not to make any reps about these plans, since any buyer would not be taking them.  However, we have a data room list that specifies what was made available, and the other side is welcome to review most of what is in that room.  We remain cautious about releasing employment compensation data and contract information about individuals, but are happy to provide totals of current and future costs under those agreements in the aggregate.  Let me know if you have questions.

Which deal are you actively working on?  Fire or Wind?  Do I need to be working on the draft agreement?

Thanks.

Michelle

We need a list of all benefit plans of any "to be" Newco employee.  We also rep that we have made these available to the purchaser.  I believe you said that the actual documents were available somewhere, so I assume that the other side could see them?

Angela D. Davis

Here are my comments.  Thanks.  Michelle

Please advise of any revisions

The Company has established this request process so officers and employees of the Company who have a legitimate business need can access H:drive and email files of [Cash, Michelle]   former employees.  The user's account will be active for 2 business days to allow the requestor sufficient time to  [Cash, Michelle]  copy, review, or examine pertinent files.  

If you encounter files/emails that are clearly personal [Cash, Michelle]  , you should not review them beyond determining that they are personal in nature.  Activities should center only on your business requirements.  However, should you discover any information of a criminal nature [Cash, Michelle]  ,  [Cash, Michelle]   or violations of company policy,  you must report this information to IT Security and Controls.

Roberto

Go ahead and let them stay until vesting.  Please reverse their terminations and see if there is any work they can do until the termination day.  If they got the $4500, offset that amount from pay.  Michelle

Got to send the term packages out today for these folks so we need an answer.

My suggestion, extend sandra mcnichols to 55, don't do any of the 5 years.  

These guys need their packages to file for unemployement and I just can't hold them past today.

Ignore the file Joe sent.  He gave you too much information.  See the names below.

Formatted Name	Age	Tenure	Oversight	Employee Status Description	Termination Date	
MCNICHOLS, SANDRA R	54.96	12.34	Almost 55	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
DOBBS, KRISTINE E	54.76	5.18	Almost 55	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
						
LIM, LI-YIN 	32.44	4.91	Near Vesting	ACTIVE (But marked to go)		
HARRISON, LINDA J	39.39	4.91	Near Vesting	INACTIVE (But marked to go)		
KELLY, DOUGLAS S	41.35	4.92	Near Vesting	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
AVERY, LADONNA J	29.00	4.93	Near Vesting	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
GRANITE, COURTNEY A	31.68	4.93	Near Vesting	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
LETKE, ERIC S	32.48	4.93	Near Vesting	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
MARTE, TIMOTHY J	32.92	4.93	Near Vesting	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
PIERCE, JOHN M	34.39	4.93	Near Vesting	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
NORD, BONNIE S	37.18	4.93	Near Vesting	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
HOLLIS, ELISA H	42.15	4.93	Near Vesting	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
SAPALIO, MARY V	42.81	4.93	Near Vesting	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
ALBERTSON, DONALD G	50.83	4.93	Near Vesting	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
TWACHTMAN, CYNTHIA P	51.70	4.93	Near Vesting	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
MENTAN, RONALD G	66.83	4.93	Near Vesting	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
GARRETT, DAVID M	37.23	4.95	Near Vesting	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
GOODMAN, ELIZABETH A	40.42	4.95	Near Vesting	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
MOEN, STEVEN R	47.43	4.95	Near Vesting	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
BRANAN, GREG 	38.61	4.97	Near Vesting	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
WISEMILLER, CYNTHIA L	40.32	4.97	Near Vesting	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
HOPPER, KEVIN S	41.52	4.97	Near Vesting	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
LEWIS, JEFFREY M	36.47	4.99	Near Vesting	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
SHAFFER, CYNTHIA L	50.22	4.99	Near Vesting	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	

Kathy,

Would you mind re-running the list of people who are close to age 55 with 5 or are close to 5 years for vesting in cash balance plan?

We would like a 30-day cushion.

Would you please provide this data to me and Kalen?

Thanks.

Michelle

We will need to look at our vacation pay practice with Weil to determine whether we can pay out in the future for accrued, but unused vacation.
I think we can say that they'll get no less than $4500, but we want to confirm with Weil.
Don't know about parking/bus.  I think it is regular course, but we may have to change that regular course.

key questions that would be great to answer for current employees before Friday:

-Vacation policy, we should be able to answer this one ourselves. do we really need Weil's input?
-Severance, obviously part of the retention request to the courts, but can we say that they will get no less than $4500?
-Parking subsidy/bus subsidy-i'm tracking this with Steve Kean
-business expenses paid pre-petition, part of the clarification to courts. just so you know, George Wasaff is not processing any expenses pre-filing across the board.

I would love to be able to answer vacation, i think we should draft the following:

-Carry over is 1 week, with exceptions approved by manager (Michelle, David is concerned to put out a blanket 2 week carry over as there are only pockets of people working all hours to year end)
-We will pro-rate starting Jan 1 2002.  So when people are termed, they will receive prorated vacation, not full as in past, plus any carry over.

Why can't we get this one out?

Here it is for posting.  I'll craft an email to send to employees with a link to the intranet:

 << File: Retained Q&A - 12.11.01.doc >> 

I agree -- involve Valeria.  You also should invite my new lawyer, Lizzette Palmer.  Twanda is her assistant, also.  Thanks.  Michelle

Dear all, 

I had a meeting today with the PEP team as they were interested in our system expectations for Year-End PRC relative to diversity.   I gave them a few ideas but indicated that I wanted to get your thoughts and requirements.   I would like to meet with you next week to review  your thoughts and expectations.   We have a little more time to plan and get the review process completed earlier.  

 I will have Jo Ann schedule a meeting next week.  

Michelle, I think it would be a good idea to include Valeria Hope.  She was instrumental in helping me last year.

Andrea Yowman 
Enron Corp 
713-853-1477

Mary jean. Did you get ok from your partners to publish 401k info to public and employees?  PR seems to think that Glen signed off on doing it. Michelle

Happy to give them, but no reps are going to be made, as I understand.  Michelle

We are going to give it to them.  That is what I was told.

Angela D. Davis
We have decided not to make any reps about these plans, since any buyer would not be taking them.  However, we have a data room list that specifies what was made available, and the other side is welcome to review most of what is in that room.  We remain cautious about releasing employment compensation data and contract information about individuals, but are happy to provide totals of current and future costs under those agreements in the aggregate.  Let me know if you have questions.

Which deal are you actively working on?  Fire or Wind?  Do I need to be working on the draft agreement?

Thanks.

Michelle

We need a list of all benefit plans of any "to be" Newco employee.  We also rep that we have made these available to the purchaser.  I believe you said that the actual documents were available somewhere, so I assume that the other side could see them?

Angela D. Davis

yes, I approved, after talking wtih Weil.  Michelle

Yes. I believe Michelle approved? Mich, can you confirm?
David - Ok with you?   T

please note offset to pay

Go ahead and let them stay until vesting.  Please reverse their terminations and see if there is any work they can do until the termination day.  If they got the $4500, offset that amount from pay.  Michelle

Got to send the term packages out today for these folks so we need an answer.

My suggestion, extend sandra mcnichols to 55, don't do any of the 5 years.  

These guys need their packages to file for unemployement and I just can't hold them past today.

Ignore the file Joe sent.  He gave you too much information.  See the names below.

Formatted Name	Age	Tenure	Oversight	Employee Status Description	Termination Date	
MCNICHOLS, SANDRA R	54.96	12.34	Almost 55	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
DOBBS, KRISTINE E	54.76	5.18	Almost 55	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
						
LIM, LI-YIN 	32.44	4.91	Near Vesting	ACTIVE (But marked to go)		
HARRISON, LINDA J	39.39	4.91	Near Vesting	INACTIVE (But marked to go)		
KELLY, DOUGLAS S	41.35	4.92	Near Vesting	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
AVERY, LADONNA J	29.00	4.93	Near Vesting	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
GRANITE, COURTNEY A	31.68	4.93	Near Vesting	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
LETKE, ERIC S	32.48	4.93	Near Vesting	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
MARTE, TIMOTHY J	32.92	4.93	Near Vesting	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
PIERCE, JOHN M	34.39	4.93	Near Vesting	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
NORD, BONNIE S	37.18	4.93	Near Vesting	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
HOLLIS, ELISA H	42.15	4.93	Near Vesting	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
SAPALIO, MARY V	42.81	4.93	Near Vesting	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
ALBERTSON, DONALD G	50.83	4.93	Near Vesting	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
TWACHTMAN, CYNTHIA P	51.70	4.93	Near Vesting	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
MENTAN, RONALD G	66.83	4.93	Near Vesting	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
GARRETT, DAVID M	37.23	4.95	Near Vesting	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
GOODMAN, ELIZABETH A	40.42	4.95	Near Vesting	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
MOEN, STEVEN R	47.43	4.95	Near Vesting	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
BRANAN, GREG 	38.61	4.97	Near Vesting	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
WISEMILLER, CYNTHIA L	40.32	4.97	Near Vesting	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
HOPPER, KEVIN S	41.52	4.97	Near Vesting	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
LEWIS, JEFFREY M	36.47	4.99	Near Vesting	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
SHAFFER, CYNTHIA L	50.22	4.99	Near Vesting	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	

Kathy,

Would you mind re-running the list of people who are close to age 55 with 5 or are close to 5 years for vesting in cash balance plan?

We would like a 30-day cushion.

Would you please provide this data to me and Kalen?

Thanks.

Michelle

all of them

are you suggesting for all of them or just sandra?

Go ahead and let them stay until vesting.  Please reverse their terminations and see if there is any work they can do until the termination day.  If they got the $4500, offset that amount from pay.  Michelle

Got to send the term packages out today for these folks so we need an answer.

My suggestion, extend sandra mcnichols to 55, don't do any of the 5 years.  

These guys need their packages to file for unemployement and I just can't hold them past today.

Ignore the file Joe sent.  He gave you too much information.  See the names below.

Formatted Name	Age	Tenure	Oversight	Employee Status Description	Termination Date	
MCNICHOLS, SANDRA R	54.96	12.34	Almost 55	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
DOBBS, KRISTINE E	54.76	5.18	Almost 55	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
						
LIM, LI-YIN 	32.44	4.91	Near Vesting	ACTIVE (But marked to go)		
HARRISON, LINDA J	39.39	4.91	Near Vesting	INACTIVE (But marked to go)		
KELLY, DOUGLAS S	41.35	4.92	Near Vesting	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
AVERY, LADONNA J	29.00	4.93	Near Vesting	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
GRANITE, COURTNEY A	31.68	4.93	Near Vesting	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
LETKE, ERIC S	32.48	4.93	Near Vesting	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
MARTE, TIMOTHY J	32.92	4.93	Near Vesting	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
PIERCE, JOHN M	34.39	4.93	Near Vesting	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
NORD, BONNIE S	37.18	4.93	Near Vesting	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
HOLLIS, ELISA H	42.15	4.93	Near Vesting	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
SAPALIO, MARY V	42.81	4.93	Near Vesting	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
ALBERTSON, DONALD G	50.83	4.93	Near Vesting	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
TWACHTMAN, CYNTHIA P	51.70	4.93	Near Vesting	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
MENTAN, RONALD G	66.83	4.93	Near Vesting	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
GARRETT, DAVID M	37.23	4.95	Near Vesting	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
GOODMAN, ELIZABETH A	40.42	4.95	Near Vesting	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
MOEN, STEVEN R	47.43	4.95	Near Vesting	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
BRANAN, GREG 	38.61	4.97	Near Vesting	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
WISEMILLER, CYNTHIA L	40.32	4.97	Near Vesting	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
HOPPER, KEVIN S	41.52	4.97	Near Vesting	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
LEWIS, JEFFREY M	36.47	4.99	Near Vesting	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	
SHAFFER, CYNTHIA L	50.22	4.99	Near Vesting	WITHDRAWN	12/5/2001	

Kathy,

Would you mind re-running the list of people who are close to age 55 with 5 or are close to 5 years for vesting in cash balance plan?

We would like a 30-day cushion.

Would you please provide this data to me and Kalen?

Thanks.

Michelle

Hi, Randy.

I hope you are doing ok.

I thought you might be interested to learn that Victoria Sterling amended her lawsuit to add Enron as a party on Nov. 30.  Of course, the claim will be stayed due to bankruptcy, but it is interesting that she finally did it. 

Take care.

Michelle

How about 9 in my office on 3825?  Did you add the sections on what we want newco to do for the employees?  See you then. Michelle

Great!!

I will, subject to having the opportunity to review it.  Thanks.  Michelle

Michelle, can you please approve this request?

Kathy,

Cindy was contacted by the Greater Houston Partnership.  A New York-based financial company is considering relocating nearly 400 jobs to Houston due primarily to the influx of Enron talent to the market.  The Partnership has asked Cindy to present to this group tomorrow, Thursday, evening.  One piece of information they are asking for is a demographic breakdown of the people we terminated.  I was wondering if we could pull together numbers by job classification and level.  Here's what I invision:

Number of Employees Let Go 		Total: 4,500

	Trading				# 		(# Broken out by title/level)
	Financial			#		(# Broken out by title/level)
	Technical			#		(# Broken out by title/level)
	Professional			#		(# By professions included)
	Administrative			#		(# Broken out by level)
	Other				#

I'll put it into a PowerPoint slide for Cindy's presentation, but could I get the data (even if it is very rough) by about noon tomorrow?

Kathy, I know how many unreasonable requests you've had to put up with over the past few months.  I hope that this isn't another one.  Forgive me and set me straight if this can't be done.

Thank you,
Terrie

Good morning.

David has asked me to summarize a request for data relating to employment agreements, as the company needs to decide whether it will reject or accept those agreements in the bankrupt entities.  We also need to decide how to handle agreements in non-bankrupt entities.  We will need summaries of all employment agreements in the entire company, broken down by business unit, group, name of employee, term/duration of agreement, and future obligations under the agreement.

We will need those segregated as follows:

Employees involuntarily terminated in the last 2 weeks.
Employees involved in Newco/Trading operations.
EEL employees
Employees remaining in the Enron estate.

Could you arrange for this work to be done (preferably by tomorrow)?  I would suggest that someone develop a single format that works for this data and then share it with the others.

Thanks!!

Michelle

Maureen, as soon as I receive anything, I'll forward it on.  I am working on it and have been since yesterday.  Michelle

 << Message: daily conf call >> 

Here's the list of attendees to receive copies of the filings and summaries.

Thanks.

FYI
Michelle:

After I sent you my prior emails, Garry Mathiason responded with the
following emails on the two subjects that you raised.  Garry usually has
helpful insights so I thought I would pass them along:

Regarding the terrorism audit, this is an "external" threat assessment and
requires a qualified security company.  I think that Johnathan Tal could do
such an audit as well as some other more established security firms.

 <<Johnathan Tal>>

Regarding the HR consultant, the potential list is endless.  I have some top
level contacts with Delotte's Human Capital group.  Meanwhile, I think the
best non-attorney group on downsizing is probably  Right and Associates.
This is an area that we (Littler) have developed into a science.  At Cisco,
HP, AA, AOL, Solection, etc. we have advised on many of this issues.  Call
me if you would like specifics.  Garry

Michelle, here is the local contact for Right & Associates whom I have met:

 <<Joe A. Bowden>>

It does not look like we have an off-the-shelf memo on legal issues related
to Terrorism, but with our workplace violence work, we probably can put
something together less expensively and more thoroughly than other firms.
Let me know what we can do to help.

Kerry E Notestine
Littler Mendelson, PC
1900 Chevron Tower
1301 McKinney Street
Houston, Texas 77010
713.652.4748
713.951.9212 (fax)
knotestine@littler.com
www.littler.com

----
This email may contain confidential and privileged material for the sole use of the intended recipient(s). Any review, use, distribution or disclosure by others is strictly prohibited. If you are not the intended recipient (or authorized to receive for the recipient), please contact the sender by reply email and delete all copies of this message.

To reply to our email administrator directly, send an email to
postmaster@littler.com

Littler Mendelson, P.C.
http://www.littler.com

Content-Transfer-Encoding: 7bit

6/01

Content-Transfer-Encoding: 7bit

Asked to speak at HR Roundtable in April of 2001

No employment claims for gas or power. Michelle

Don't give SSNs.  I'd suggest giving names only.

Are you aware of this?  Is this okay to provide?  Should I just give names or SSN?  Thanks.

Kathy,

Chris has a subpoena for 401(k) information and is needing a list of all 401(k) deductions by employee and by deduction date since January, 1996.  It is my understanding that this info is needed by Monday.

Thanks,
Diane

Are we agreeing to this?

Michelle,

Would you know where these need to be sent?

Thanks
Cathy

Human Resources
Enron Metals & Commodity Corp.
520 Madison Ave., 28th Floor
New York, NY 10022
Tel: 212-715-5276
Fax: 212-715-5231
E-Mail: Catherine.Huynh@Enron.com

Hi Cathy, how are you?

I wonder if you can help me with this. I have a contract novation here for Drew Lynch which needs to be signed by an authorised signatories of Enron Corp, and Enron Expat Services Inc. Who should I fax this to for signature.

Many thanks

Brenda

Given that this has not been communciated to current employees, I believe that we should consider whether we want to continue this strategy at this time.  It strikes me as something that should be discussed at the management committee level, as that was the group that made this decision last summer.  Michelle

David, could you please confirm the system capabilities and preparation as it pertain to the changes in Enron's vacation accrual process.  Under the policy revision, vacation accruals will be 1/12th. of employees annual allotment, applied on the last day of each month, effective January 2002.  Jo Ann Hill had assumed the lead in getting this issue addressed.  She is not available to confirm preparations.
Before we communicate this change to those employees covered by Enron's US domestic HR / SAP payroll policies,  We should be certain the system is prepared.   
Please confirm that the system will not credit an annual allocation to employee vacation balance on January 1, 2002, and;
Please confirm that the system will credit vacation time balances with 1/12 of the annual allocation on the last date of each month, beginning January 31, 2002  

Thanks for your prompt attention to this matter,
Regards, Rj.  
3-9253 
Cell - 713-898-6874

I'd transfer to ENA effective 1/1.  If the people have employment agreements, we will need to assign.  Michelle

Amy

Can you find out from Louise/John whether they want to transfer in the ENW/Corp employees not on this list to ENA and consolidate all newco employee under the ENA umbrella prior to the deal going through ? Would suggest we leave them where they are. 

Michelle - does this make sense from an acquisition standpoint or should we transfer everyone to ENA ?

Amy can you pull in Anne, Sarah and Tana and check for all of newco/ENA employees as per the most current list. I'm completing the data room this am and info ready for a counterparty

There will be some ENA folks who are not on the newco list 

Thanks

Neil

Neil - 

Jeanie is out today so I will take responsibility of checking all of the gas and trading employees.

Thanks -
Amy

Karen an d I are ommitted as we are ENW employees

Neil

Please help with below.
Please review this headcount file, and verify that this is an accurate list of current ENA employees as of today 12/14/01.  Please send changes by 12:00 noon on Monday, 12/17/01 to Elaine Schield.

Thanks for your cooperation,
Sarah Brown

 << File: Total Headcount.xls >> 

How does he want to change it?  If it is more generous, then I think we should discuss.  Michelle

Gary/Michelle,
 
My understanding is that NEPCO didn't file chpt 11 so they should be able to proceed business as ususal, right?
Kalen/Tim
 
I know you were discussing the vacation policies earlier today.  Is this a question that you can address?
 
Thanks,
Diane
 
 
Ken Gray (425-415-3140) called stating their executive team wants to change their vacation policy for next year.  He is wanting to know who the proper authorities are in Houston to run this information through.
 
Ginger

likely story

Hey there,

I just sent an email outside the Enron firewall that contains the word "salary" in the attachment.  So I expect it to be picked up in the HR sweeper we have activated.  Just thought I'd let you know ahead of time that you may see it and let you know it was an approved mailing.  

Thanks.
Kathy

713-646-3490

Michelle

If you could give me you fax number I will fax this novation to you. 

Thanks

Brenda

Michelle,

This must have originated in London as it's the first I've heard of it.

Brenda,

Michelle is our employment attorney in Houston and needs to initiate/aprpove all US employment contract changes for execs. 

Thanks
Cathy

Human Resources
Enron Metals & Commodity Corp.
520 Madison Ave., 28th Floor
New York, NY 10022
Tel: 212-715-5276
Fax: 212-715-5231
E-Mail: Catherine.Huynh@Enron.com

Has there been a business decision to novate his agreement?  I am not aware of our decisions to novate any agreements.  Let me know who approved this from the business side.  Thanks.  Michelle

Michelle,

Would you know where these need to be sent?

Thanks
Cathy

Human Resources
Enron Metals & Commodity Corp.
520 Madison Ave., 28th Floor
New York, NY 10022
Tel: 212-715-5276
Fax: 212-715-5231
E-Mail: Catherine.Huynh@Enron.com

Hi Cathy, how are you?

I wonder if you can help me with this. I have a contract novation here for Drew Lynch which needs to be signed by an authorised signatories of Enron Corp, and Enron Expat Services Inc. Who should I fax this to for signature.

Many thanks

Brenda

lizzette has taken the lead on this immigration issue.  thanks.  michelle

I think we should have Charles Foster in on this call.  I will call to see his availability today and advise.

Timothy J. Callahan
Director, Global Employee Services
Enron Corp
333 Clay Street, Suite 1047
Houston, Texas 77002
Telephone:  713.646.9565
Fax:  713.646.9501

As we get closer to this transaction that we are working on I need to be sure what is the best approach for Lavo and Louise. Tim, who at Tindell and Foster is working their cases and Michelle and you and I call them today?

David

no, it looked suspicious, so I didn't open it.

Fax is 713-646-3490.

Hi Michelle

I have had trouble with my e-mails, I hope you didn't open the one with the virus that went to all of my sent addresses yesterday.

I have lost all of my e-mails, and along with them your fax number. Could you please tell me it again.

thanks

Brenda

Diane/Lizzette -- 

I would say that the background check issue is a business call.  They are the ones who require the background checks and the type of background checks.

Same with the guarantee language.  If there is a change, however, I would make it to the SSD instead of the main agreement.  That way, we won't have to live with it for every placement.

Michelle

Lizzette:

We got a call this morning from DBI (a contingency recruiting agency) regarding the Agreement. I've pulled this Agreement so you can see the specific language she is questioning.  She wants to modify the Agreement re the following:

	1.	Vendor wants to change Guarantee language so that she would provide:

			90-day unconditional guarantee (refund placement fee), or														120-day replacement of employee

	2.	With regard to background checks, her Agency checks employment references but does do the extensive background checks we generally require 			(verification of SS#, verification of address, state and district court check for criminal records, etc.)

		DBI has the Candidate sign an acknowledgement that all the information provided to her Agency is correct and that the candidate understands that falsification 		of data makes them subject to termination by the Employer.

		Bottom line -- she doesn't want to spend the money or hassle with the extensive background checks .

		What would you recommend?

		We're so glad you're here......

Yes, do a wire.  Her check to IRS will bounce if we don't handle it today.  Thanks.  Michelle

Michelle,

This check was dated 12/3 and was for $28,228.  It is my understanding that the bank will reject any check in excess of $15,000.   
 
If we replace this check, it will be rejected again since it is over $15,000.  Are we authorized to make these type of payments via a wire transfer, or would we still be in violation of the payroll order?  If we can not process it as a wire, can it be processed on the 12/31 semi-monthly paycheck?

Thanks,
Diane

Can we do something asap!

FYI, Enron didn't honor the check issued to Vicky!  Anything you can do to help sort this out would be appreciated.

Rgds,
	John
 << OLE Object: Picture (Device Independent Bitmap) >> 
Vicky Martinez
12/19/2001 10:33 AM
Robin Treadwell deposited a check from Enron relating to the tax settlement statement prepared by Price and sent to Enron demonstrating that Enron owes me US$28,228.00.  Robin deposited the check from Enron into my bank account last Thursday evening, December 13th.  On Friday, I mailed via FedEx my tax return with a check in the amount of $32,127.00.  The IRS received the check and my return on Monday, December 17.  

Today I checked my account electronically and there was only $7,000 in the account.  I called Wells Fargo Bank because the amount did not balance with my records.  The Bank informed me that the Enron check is not credited in my account because the Enron check was not honored.  They don't show that the IRS has yet forwarded my tax check, but if it has not already been received and returned to the IRS IT WILL CERTAINLY HIT MY BANK TODAY.  Enron's bank notified my bank last night that the Enron check is being returned due to non-payment and that the maker of the check needs to be notified.  Enron's bank will not give further information as to the exact reason.

Please contact me immediately as to how Enron is planning to solve this problem.

Regards,

Vicky 

We are working through that issue this week.  Michelle

Hey Michelle,
Did you guys address the non-compete issue for terminated employees?  I have 2 commercial employees who've been told that the non-compete is waived (confidentiality stands).  Has anyone at your end prepared anything in writing?  Please advise asap.  Thanks!

yes, we will.  michelle

Awesome - you'll have something written?  Let me know when it can be distributed.  Thanks....

We are working through that issue this week.  Michelle

Hey Michelle,
Did you guys address the non-compete issue for terminated employees?  I have 2 commercial employees who've been told that the non-compete is waived (confidentiality stands).  Has anyone at your end prepared anything in writing?  Please advise asap.  Thanks!

Kalen, do we still have the disclaimer on these?  I'd like to make sure that it appears on every set.  Thanks.  Michelle

Attached are the latest Q&A's posted on the internet yesterday.

We would like to pull a quick meeting together sometime today.  Tim will be getting back to all of you with time and location.
 << File: 1217updateexemployeesv2.doc >> 

Go ahead and give her a call -- let's get it right, even if it causes a few minutes' delay.  If anyone on this email knows how to contact her quickly, then have her give Mike Jones a call asap.  Thanks.  Michelle

Diane, 

We always use the info in SAP on checking accounts (per below).  Janie checks the info before wiring.  

I can call Vicky to get her to verify, but that will delay the submission of the wire.

Mike

 << OLE Object: Picture (Device Independent Bitmap) >> 

Tim/Mike - Can you get us the wiring instructions please.

Thanks,
Diane

Yes, do a wire.  Her check to IRS will bounce if we don't handle it today.  Thanks.  Michelle

Michelle,

This check was dated 12/3 and was for $28,228.  It is my understanding that the bank will reject any check in excess of $15,000.   
 
If we replace this check, it will be rejected again since it is over $15,000.  Are we authorized to make these type of payments via a wire transfer, or would we still be in violation of the payroll order?  If we can not process it as a wire, can it be processed on the 12/31 semi-monthly paycheck?

Thanks,
Diane

Can we do something asap!

FYI, Enron didn't honor the check issued to Vicky!  Anything you can do to help sort this out would be appreciated.

Rgds,
	John
 << OLE Object: Picture (Device Independent Bitmap) >> 
Vicky Martinez
12/19/2001 10:33 AM
Robin Treadwell deposited a check from Enron relating to the tax settlement statement prepared by Price and sent to Enron demonstrating that Enron owes me US$28,228.00.  Robin deposited the check from Enron into my bank account last Thursday evening, December 13th.  On Friday, I mailed via FedEx my tax return with a check in the amount of $32,127.00.  The IRS received the check and my return on Monday, December 17.  

Today I checked my account electronically and there was only $7,000 in the account.  I called Wells Fargo Bank because the amount did not balance with my records.  The Bank informed me that the Enron check is not credited in my account because the Enron check was not honored.  They don't show that the IRS has yet forwarded my tax check, but if it has not already been received and returned to the IRS IT WILL CERTAINLY HIT MY BANK TODAY.  Enron's bank notified my bank last night that the Enron check is being returned due to non-payment and that the maker of the check needs to be notified.  Enron's bank will not give further information as to the exact reason.

Please contact me immediately as to how Enron is planning to solve this problem.

Regards,

Vicky 

Bob,

I am happy for you to handle the Richter matter.  Lizzette Palmer on my team has been taking the lead on NEPCO matters, so get with her on details.

I'll confirm with David Lund that he has no objection.

Michelle

	Please see attached memorandum.

	 << File: mm-sanders17.doc >> 

I'm working on it.

The wire was requested this morning.  We are not allowed to process same day wires as all wires must be approved by the Cash Management Committee which meets at 8 AM every morning.  I requested an exception due to your circumstances.  I was told this afternoon that Treasury will not process this wire since it does not have the Cash Management Committee approval.

I feel that my hands are tied at this point.  If any one has any other ways to get this through, let me know.

DT

Diane,

I just spoke with Marcus Pullicino.  He did not find a wire transfer in the system for me, much less a wire transfer confirmation number.  Can you please let me know what's going on?

Thanks,

Vicky

Marcus - Can you please assist Vicki with this request?

Thanks,
Diane

Could you please forward to me the wire transfer confirmation number?   I don't show that the money has entered my account. 

Thank you,

Vicky Martinez

Diane, 

The bank confirmed the ABA number is 111900659.

Her Acct Number is 0367253523.

The name on her account is Vicky L. Martinez.

Let me know if you need anything else.

Mike

I have Robin calling the bank to verify.  I'll let you know.

If it is not verified in advance and there is a problem (often the wiring and the ACH instructions are different), we risk the wire not going through.  Just let us know if you want us to send it to her ACH account.

Diane

Diane, 

We always use the info in SAP on checking accounts (per below).  Janie checks the info before wiring.  

I can call Vicky to get her to verify, but that will delay the submission of the wire.

Mike

 << OLE Object: Picture (Device Independent Bitmap) >> 

Tim/Mike - Can you get us the wiring instructions please.

Thanks,
Diane

Yes, do a wire.  Her check to IRS will bounce if we don't handle it today.  Thanks.  Michelle

Michelle,

This check was dated 12/3 and was for $28,228.  It is my understanding that the bank will reject any check in excess of $15,000.   
 
If we replace this check, it will be rejected again since it is over $15,000.  Are we authorized to make these type of payments via a wire transfer, or would we still be in violation of the payroll order?  If we can not process it as a wire, can it be processed on the 12/31 semi-monthly paycheck?

Thanks,
Diane

Can we do something asap!

FYI, Enron didn't honor the check issued to Vicky!  Anything you can do to help sort this out would be appreciated.

Rgds,
	John
 << OLE Object: Picture (Device Independent Bitmap) >> 
Vicky Martinez
12/19/2001 10:33 AM
Robin Treadwell deposited a check from Enron relating to the tax settlement statement prepared by Price and sent to Enron demonstrating that Enron owes me US$28,228.00.  Robin deposited the check from Enron into my bank account last Thursday evening, December 13th.  On Friday, I mailed via FedEx my tax return with a check in the amount of $32,127.00.  The IRS received the check and my return on Monday, December 17.  

Today I checked my account electronically and there was only $7,000 in the account.  I called Wells Fargo Bank because the amount did not balance with my records.  The Bank informed me that the Enron check is not credited in my account because the Enron check was not honored.  They don't show that the IRS has yet forwarded my tax check, but if it has not already been received and returned to the IRS IT WILL CERTAINLY HIT MY BANK TODAY.  Enron's bank notified my bank last night that the Enron check is being returned due to non-payment and that the maker of the check needs to be notified.  Enron's bank will not give further information as to the exact reason.

Please contact me immediately as to how Enron is planning to solve this problem.

Regards,

Vicky 

I'd send this to sarah and ryan for their database. Ill check around I have a good friend who works there. 

I assume the severance question is only going to former employees, wbut the doctor question goes to both current and former employees. Let me know if the plan is different. Michelle

Have we assigned employees to netco?  I didn't think we had. In fact I think we were going to move everyone into ena and have them hired by netco after closing. I am on blackberry and missed the end of the talking points. Could you resend?  Thanks. Michelle

What about the change in control agreement for the other person you discussed?  I don't think we have seen that.  Thanks.  Michelle

By the way, Fran Mayes and I both will be at the office tomorrow.  Please contact us at my office - 713-853-6401.  Thanks.  

Disregard my prior e-mail.  This is Simon's actual agreement.  Lara

 <<233021_1.doc>>

 - 233021_1.doc << File: 233021_1.doc >> 

in general if a person turns down an offer to go to a divested company, it is considered a voluntary termination/resignation. We haven't made that decision here though. 

As to solicitation of employees back and forth, it will be a negotiated deal term. I can't recall if we put any provision on that issue in the bid template or not. Let me know if you want me to check the latest version 

Michelle

No. We think it may be payable as a past expense. Michelle

Can you supplement the answer to the visa question?  Thanks. Michelle
Q:  I am on a H1-B Visa.  What assistance is the company providing me?
A:  Enron is required to pay for a one-way, coach ticket for the employee only.  Please contact ______ for necessary arrangements.
(Michelle, what else can we say about timing, when we submitted names to the INS, etc?

Q:  Will I be able to receive severance in the future if I file for unemployment?
A:  There is no company offset for State unemployment benefits against the $4,500.  You are able to file for unemployment immediately after your termination date.  If you receive additional severance in the future, it will be offset by any unemployment wages you have received.

Q:  Will I be paid for any unused vacation? (we've already answered this broadly, but are getting a ton of specific questions around vacation now b/c they are thinking that it is being treated as an expense)
A:  The $4,500 payment included payment for all pre-petition compensation including unused vacation time, WARN notification, and incentive and overtime pay.  Employees are entitled to pursue any claims for amounts in excess of $4,500 in the bankruptcy proceeding.  The link for the claim form is included below.

who is handling reinstatement for ENA?

Lizzette, 
If we have to reinstate or hire new employees in the near future, will we have a sample re-instatement or sample offer letter available?   I don't need one now but I anticipate possibly needing one in the future. 
H
Hector, this may be coming - We need to get approval from Net Works OTC and then Oxley, but just fyi.  I will forward emails to you as I receive them.

Please see the below message from Kevin Sweeney.

Sally 
Per our conversation yesterday, below is a list of EGM employees that we would like to reinstate.  Please use this for changes to the budget and I will provide a justification memo by lunch time today.
1.) Bill Kasemervisz - Manager 
2.) Marilyn Schoppe - Staff 
3.) Tara Bryce - Staff or Specialist
4.) Paula Lacour - Staff or Specialist 
5.) Elizabeth Hernandez - Sr. Specialist  
6.) Linda Ewing - Specialist 

Thanks
Kevin

David,

I think we should remove anything relating to the components of a retention -- i.e., whether it is RS or cash -- and any thing relating to vesting.  No way to predict at this time.  As I have more comments, I'll send them on.

Mich

 << File: Netco retention general 122101.doc >> 

One other thing -- Texas law will apply to those employees in Texas, as state courts will not allow other laws to govern in employee matters.  Oregon is the same.

As I re-read, I found more references to vesting or payout dates.  Again, these should be more generic or blank.

Michelle

 << File: Netco retention general 122101.doc >> 

Unfortunately, no.  We have to get those approved by creditors here first.  Bummer.  Michelle 

 Merry Christmas!

Michelle, today's my last day before the Christmas break - any chance of getting those non-compete waivers today?

 
Mike,
 
I have attached a letter which was sent to Ming's home last evening.  The letter summarizes a meeting which was held between Ming, Cindy Olson and Valeria Hope on 10/16/01.  The letter outlines the options offered to Ming for separation which were crafted to be very sensitive to her immigration issues.  In the meeting, Cindy and Valeria shared with Ming that after an extensive investigation where Fundamentals employees were interviewed, there is no evidence of unfair treatment or discrimination.
 
I appreciate your willingness to respond to Ming, but would prefer that all future communication come from Michelle Cash.  We feel there may be pending legal activity and would like to ensure that our communications are privileged and consistent.
 
Also, Michelle Cash will be drafting a communication to all who were copied on Ming's message to you.  We would like to ensure everyone that Ming's situation is being treated with urgency.
 
 
Thanks,
Shanna
 
 
 
 
 
 
Shanna,
 
How should I respond to this.  I should give her a response, even a bland recognition, via return email. Please respond ASAP, remember I'm out after lunch today.
 
What is the latest on this?  Let's discuss at some point.
m

                                                                                                                                                                    

                                                                               Ms. MingchengLian 

                                                                               Manager,EGM/Fundamentals 

                                                                               713-529-0864                      

Dear Mr. Lay, 

My employment with Enron is to be terminated, the reason given by HR, for not meeting performance standards.  However, I firmly believe that this is not the real reason, the real one being for defying the wishes of my manager (Mr. Lowell Bezanis,Manager, EGM) who, I believe was acting in a discriminatory way towards me.  I have since filed a written complaint to Enron's EEO Committee. 

This committee, having investigated the case, has acknowledged that there were working environment issues but has refused to provide me with a written report of their findings.  As a consequence, my reasonable request for a re-deployment package has been rejected.   

If my employment is to be prematurely terminated I not only lose my job, but also my residence status in the US where I have lived in the past 8 years.  The HR department is fully aware of my situation and I feel that they were taking advantage of this fact when they asked me to sign a waiver not to sue Enron in exchange for protecting my status for 30 days.  I now feel that I am being pushed into a corner, unnecessarily, since all I have set out to achieve is to bring an awareness of the working conditions and the discrimination which is rife (not only towards myself but also to other employees, some of whom have left as a result) in the department and to move forward with practicable solutions. 

I have enjoyed a number of years as an employee of Enron where I have performed to the best of my ability, often receiving compliments from clients.  This cannot be the only way to solve this issue! 

 

The Trigger and Retaliation.    

Since Mr. Bezanis has been my line manager, internal training opportunities have repeatedly been denied to me.  On August 28, I attended a class of 'natural gas structuring'. Mr. Bezanis called the Learning Center refusing to pay the associated costs, however, I was welcomed to remain in the class at no charge. 

I felt that this situation could not continue and so I made an appointment with Ms. Shanna Funkhouser (my HR representative).  The day previous to the aforementioned meeting I was summoned to appear before Ms.Funkhouser.  Mr. Bezanis and Mr. Jeff Andrews were present in the conference room as I entered.  Feeling intimidated, I requested that I meet with Ms. Funkhouser privately the next day in order to submit a formal complaint regarding the EEO, as agreed previously.  She refused and continued with what I can only describe as adisciplinary by accusing me of excessive use of Enron property and equipment.  I was suspended and sent home with pay with possible termination. Ms. Funkhouser explained that her actions were based on the following:  

-        the assumption that I was making long distance personal calls from work 

-        that I was making jobapplications by company email 

Unequal Employment Opportunities and Unfair Treatment. 

As a manager, Mr. Bezanis has: 

-        Intentionally and consistently limited my employment opportunities in terms of training and performance appraisals.  He has repeatedly disapproved of my training courses without good cause since he refuses to explain his disapproval. 

-        Shown unfavorable bias towards my job performance (PRC process) which according to the PRC rules should be judged also by my peers' and clients' by review.  Until now, Iam still have not been informed of my PRC results. 

-        Made efforts to suppress my innovative ideas such as that of creating an 'energy index' as a potential useful trading instrument.  My idea was warmly welcomed by the team in the Department Offsite, but the reaction of Mr. Bezanis was of anger for not going through him first.  I was banned by him from developing the idea further. 

Discrimination.  

It is our belief that Mr. Bezanis has difficulty dealing with women employees, especially competent women, as equals.  His rough, stifling, and unfair management style has led to the resignation of Ms. Courtney Campbell, the other only woman reporting to him.   

Hostile Working Environment. 

 

The working environment under Mr. Bezanis has been an intimidating and abusive one. Derogatory language offensive to women is frequent and common. Very little respect is paid to our integrity and intelligence.  We are managed by "threats" rather than constructive comments.   

Wrongful Termination. 

Knowing I was unfairly treated, Enron HR has not helped address my concerns.  I was told that my employment is to be terminated due to my lowest ranking in the mid-year PRC process.  Ms. Cindy Olson admitted that the PRC practices might be unfair, but she said she had no power to re-open the past PRC cases.  I feel I have been subjected to a victimization campaign while the whole Enron organization attempts to protect the managers, no matter how wrong they are.  I request your attention and help during my most difficult time.  

I thank you for your understanding and commitment to a happy and positive resolution in this case. 

Yours sincerely, 

Mingcheng Lian 

try this

Michelle,

I've been working with Pat on a separate Waiver of Benefits agreement for our employees on a dual payroll system with the UK/US (Oxley, Kitchen and Pickering).  Somehow the waiver was never put in place for David and Louise when they came over.  I discovered this when working on the package for Pickering.  

David has agreed to take the agreement to Louise and Mark, once he is comfortable.  We've gone back and forth with David a couple of times.  He now says he'll sign if we take out item 1 and the last sentence of 4. 

I think we need item 1, but I've adjusted it on the attached to try to meet our needs.  David's concern is that the current wording puts "salt in the wounds" regarding the benefits they are giving up, or may give up in the future.  He wants to keep it simple.  

Please review and let Pat and I know your thoughts.

Regards, 

Timothy J. Callahan
Director, Global Employee Services
Enron Corp
333 Clay Street, Suite 2025
Houston, Texas 77002
Telephone:  713.646.9565
Fax:  713.646.9501

this is ok with me

Hi Michelle,

The below is a result of the question I raised to you at the meeting you held for HR on legal questions.

Kindal have authorised.. let me know if you have any questions.

many thanks

Karen.

Karen:  I like the questions and understand the need for them. We will have to be sure to loop Michelle Cash in on this for her input.

Molly

Molly/Meg,

Spoke with Tindall & Foster this morning with regard visa questions we can ask on our app form.   They have given us an additonal question as below (2) which would be helpful in terms of planning/budgeting etc for new hires.

Can we add to electronic form and see if we can add to hardcopy (subject to volumes already printed).

1)	Are you legally authorized to work in the United States? 
2)	Will you now or in the future require sponsorship for employment visa status (e.g., H-1B visa status)? 

Margaret - can we look to arrange for the lawyers to come in again and present to HR and give us updates on immigration policy.

Thanks, karen.

You sent this to me, Dan.  I have since clarified this with the GP attorneys.  Michelle

Roger...Do you have any idea what Khoury's email was all about?
I think we are planning to hire all the mill workers listed on the schedule attached to the agreement.  We will be agreeing to some of the requests in their agreement, but not most of the substantive ones, such as their request that we trade out value for unvested GP stock options for Enron stock options, their demand that we maintain bonus programs that are similar, etc.  George's view is that we will control how we handle the employees, not GP.

Are we not planning to hire substantially all the employees or isThis just the old "what we are actually going to do vs. What they want to try to bind us to do" thing and if it's the latter, how much " warm and fuzzy can we give 'em?
Don't worry about the "substantially similar" benefits issue--- I will deal with it.  Offering a job to all or substantially all employees is bigger issue.  Recognizing your need for flexiblity, we need to find a solution to that issue.

Gary/Scott--

I believe that this was not meant for public distribution, but it is a sentiment that I thought you should hear.

Michelle

Michelle,
We may reap the most benefit by having all the site HR Managers, Site Safety
Supervisors/Nurse Practitioners, Mike Indivero, Tony Bolar Softich(Safety),
Steve Olenik(Safety), Sean Mayer(Construction), Frank Petty(Director of
Construction), Mike Ranz(VP Construction), Bob Black(Manager Of Projects),
maybe a few other home office construction managers selected by Mike Ranz or
Frank Petty in attendance. I think you and Rick need to chair the meeting
because you will lend credibility and importance to the issue. You may even
want to invite whoever is John Gillis's boss(or his designee) to sit in to
emphasize the importance of this issue. Too often I hear "Enron has plenty
of money" and "Thats why we have lawyers" -the truth being we are the
guardians of our stockholders assets and we have a fudiciary responsibility
to protect those assets for the health and well being of the company, the
stockholders and the employees of Enron Corp. My experience has been that we
do a good deal of back stabbing and finger pointing when HR, Safety and
Construction get together and meet on anything. Liability/Settlement checks
regardless of the amount needs to be an issue along with the improvement of
the employment offer process and who is authorized to make decisions
effecting employment offers. In the end if supervisors or managers fail to
act prudently and in the best interest of the company then there is a
penalty. The penalty being they won't get the opportunity to lose more of
the companies money by making reckless decisions. Thats the approach I would
take with these people. The Weigle case does not need to be looked at like
it only cost us $490.00. This continued reckless disregard we have in our
decision making process is going to hit us big one of these days and we will
replace Foster Wheeler's Blue Island Racial Graffitti charge & settlement as
something the EPC Industry talks about. I may be overreacting here but I've
been in the middle of Nepco's harassment, discrimination other issues for
the last 18 months. Call me if you have any questions. Thanks for asking.
Mie

Dear Maaico,

Congratulations on the birth of daughter Laura!  She looks great -- very healthy and all.  It also is great to see how little Bart is growing up.  He is a beautiful boy!  You must be so happy and proud to have two healthy children.  

I will send you some fun pictures of my son, Cameron, who has learned to stand on his head -- he is very proud.

Congratulations again, and take care.

Love,

Michelle

Hello  All,
 
Els  gave birth to our healthy daughter Laura last Tuesday. It went almost  perfect. Labour started at 15.00 and at 19.05 Laura was there.  Unfortunately we had to go to the hospital at 21.30 because Els was still losing  some blood. It was not much of a problem and she could return home the next  morning.
 
Attached some photo's of the new  one.
laurageb      the  info..
laurageb1    a happy Els 10 minutes  after Laura was born
laurageb2    a happy Laura  bathing 
laurageb3    brother Bart reading a book  to Laura
laurageb4    a picture full of  Laura
laurageb5    some more  Laura
 
regards
 
Maaico, Els en Bart
 
 
 - laurageb.jpg << File: laurageb.jpg >> 
 - laurageb1.jpg << File: laurageb1.jpg >> 
 - laurageb2.jpg << File: laurageb2.jpg >> 
 - laurageb3.jpg << File: laurageb3.jpg >> 
 - laurageb4.jpg << File: laurageb4.jpg >> 
 - laurageb5.jpg << File: laurageb5.jpg >> 

those were fine -- no changes.  I just didn't want to fax them from the hotel due to cost.  mhc
Michelle;  
 
We haven't received the A/A and Exempt employee Feedback forms yet.  We have all of the others.   Gina 
 
Gina,
 
I sent these to Diane by fax Friday -- let me know if you didn't get them.  
 
Michelle
PAPER COPIES ON THE WAY. 
call me if you have any questions. 
thanks 
Elspeth Inglis 
Global Performance Management Team 
work:    (713) 853 7636 
mobile:  (713) 301 3781 
 

great result!

Please read the attached  for the latest developments in the above said case.
Frank Garrard 
Manager, EH&S  
NEPCO 
(425) 415-3033  (Direct) 
(425) 415-3000 (Main)  
 
 - Dismissal of Case 10-8-01.doc << File: Dismissal of Case 10-8-01.doc >> 

Kelly,  Do you have members of GSS on this list (I can't tell based on names)?  

I'll have my assistant get with you on calendaring.

Michelle

As you may know, I recently moved into Cindy Olson's organization and am responsible for our corporate responsibility initiatives, including diversity.  Andrea Yowman now reports to me and will coordinate the diversity function.  

All of you are involved in diversity, whether it is because you have participated in the Corporate Culture Committee, are responsible for supplier diversity, recruiting, compliance, etc.  We think that an ongoing coordination effort among the people invited will be critical to the success of our efforts.

I propose that we arrange a standing, one-hour meeting, initially every two weeks, to discuss overall strategy as well as individual activities that we have been involved in.  I would like for the first meeting to be held in mid-November.

I hope we can count on your participation.  Please let me know if you will be able to participate, and if so, which day and time works best from the list below:

Tuesdays:		10:00 to 11:00 a.m. OR 1:00 to 2:00 p.m.
Wednesdays:	9:00 to 10:00 a.m. OR 3:00 to 4:00 p.m.
Thursdays:		9:00 to 10:00 a.m. OR 1:00 to 2:00 p.m.

Unbelievable!!  I guess he has sour grapes.  We only paid him not to apply for a job -- unfortunately, insults were not contemplated in our agreement.  Ignore him.  Michelle

Didn't we pay this guy to go away.  How can we make him stay there?

dan

WOW Enron stock at $11.10 per share are you buying??  
It has been a year since I was escorted out of the 
Enron building by security because I did not fit the 
Enron culture.  WHAT BULLSHIT.

You actually did me a favor and I am doing great, 
however I still think you are a prick.

Charlie

ps I never did hear anything about a rail 
transportation trading platform, did it happen?

FYI  Michelle

Milly:  I have been asked to contact you to determine the status of the Permanent Residency application for Mr. Krishnarao.

On checking an old file for Mr. Krishnarao, I see that you started his Green Card application, based on Outstanding Researcher, in November, 1995.  There are also copies of the I-765 in the file, which I assume means that Mr. Krishnarao is already in the Adjustment of Status stage of the process?

I would appreciate you letting myself and Michelle Cash know where we are with the application at this time?  Hopefully, we are very close to completion! 

Many thanks
Margaret
713-345-1529

	Here is a list of EWS labor agreements, from Rick Johnson.  Let me know if you require more information.  Michelle

Michelle, per your request, below are the current and/or active labor union agreements specific to Enron and / or its direct affiliate entities:

Direct Hire -  Collective Bargaining Agreements (CBA)
PGE/IBEW 
PGE's coyote springs project - recently re-nogitiatied to 5 year term.
PGE's generation, distribution, and transmission  workforce. - 3 year term through Mar. 2004

Eko-Electrica - JV with Mission Energy - / USWA 
Eco-Electrica project - Puerto Rico -  3 year term - through June 2004

San Juan Gas
Teamsters  - O&M employees - Do not know the term of this agreement. 
Progasco
UTI (local independent union) - Do not know the term of this agreement.

EIM - entities not listed - 
EES/EFS - entities not listed -

Pre-Hire - Project Labor Agreements (PLA)
EWS
Roseville Energy Development, L.L.C.  - California State Building & Construction Trade Council - Negotiations underway.  Contract(s) to include Project Labor Agreement; expires on commercial operation,  Major maintance Agrement,  term to be determined (15 - 30 years); Line and Distribution construction - project specific; Access & referral neutrality agreement - Term 1 year from commercial operation date.
LODI L.L.C. - California State Building & Construuction Trades Council - Negotiations pending - peaker facility development with commitment to negotiate PLA.  
Enron Power & Industrial Construction Co. (EPICc)
Coyote Springs II Project - Active agreement(s) governing the construction of the facility - Third party ownership is established. Agreements expire at commercial operation. 
Longview Energy Development L.L.C. - Kelso Longview/Washington State Building & Construction Trades Council - negotiations dates pending Dec. 2001 anticipate a mirror of the Coyote Springs Agreement(s).  

Please call if additional information is needed
Regards, Rj.  	

Thanks.  mhc

Michelle, per your request, below are the current and/or active labor union agreements specific to Enron and / or its direct affiliate entities:

Direct Hire -  Collective Bargaining Agreements (CBA)
PGE/IBEW 
PGE's coyote springs project - recently re-nogitiatied to 5 year term.
PGE's generation, distribution, and transmission  workforce. - 3 year term through Mar. 2004

Eko-Electrica - JV with Mission Energy - / USWA 
Eco-Electrica project - Puerto Rico -  3 year term - through June 2004

San Juan Gas
Teamsters  - O&M employees - Do not know the term of this agreement. 
Progasco
UTI (local independent union) - Do not know the term of this agreement.

EIM - entities not listed - 
EES/EFS - entities not listed -

Pre-Hire - Project Labor Agreements (PLA)
EWS
Roseville Energy Development, L.L.C.  - California State Building & Construction Trade Council - Negotiations underway.  Contract(s) to include Project Labor Agreement; expires on commercial operation,  Major maintance Agrement,  term to be determined (15 - 30 years); Line and Distribution construction - project specific; Access & referral neutrality agreement - Term 1 year from commercial operation date.
LODI L.L.C. - California State Building & Construuction Trades Council - Negotiations pending - peaker facility development with commitment to negotiate PLA.  
Enron Power & Industrial Construction Co. (EPICc)
Coyote Springs II Project - Active agreement(s) governing the construction of the facility - Third party ownership is established. Agreements expire at commercial operation. 
Longview Energy Development L.L.C. - Kelso Longview/Washington State Building & Construction Trades Council - negotiations dates pending Dec. 2001 anticipate a mirror of the Coyote Springs Agreement(s).  

Please call if additional information is needed
Regards, Rj.  	

Here is what we are hearing.  It sounds like it is out of Millie's hands and is up the INS.  We'll keep you posted.  Michelle

Michelle:  would you like to get back to Vince Kaminski on this response from Milly Soto?
Margaret

Margaret:

Yes, we are at the I-485 stage and it should be approved by the end of
this month.

Regards,

Milly Soto

On Wed, 31 Oct 2001 11:34:50 -0600 "Daffin, Margaret"
<Margaret.Daffin@ENRON.com> writes:
>Milly:  I have been asked to contact you to determine the status of
>the
>Permanent Residency application for Mr. Krishnarao.
>
>On checking an old file for Mr. Krishnarao, I see that you started his
>Green Card application, based on Outstanding Researcher, in November,
>1995.  There are also copies of the I-765 in the file, which I assume
>means that Mr. Krishnarao is already in the Adjustment of Status stage
>of the process?
>
>I would appreciate you letting myself and Michelle Cash know where we
>are with the application at this time?  Hopefully, we are very close
>to
>completion!
>
>Many thanks
>Margaret
>713-345-1529
>
>
>**********************************************************************
>This e-mail is the property of Enron Corp. and/or its relevant
>affiliate and may contain confidential and privileged material for the
>sole use of the intended recipient (s). Any review, use, distribution
>or disclosure by others is strictly prohibited. If you are not the
>intended recipient (or authorized to receive for the recipient),
>please contact the sender or reply to Enron Corp. at
>enron.messaging.administration@enron.com and delete all copies of the
>message. This e-mail (and any attachments hereto) are not intendedto
>be an offer (or an acceptance) and do not create or evidence a binding
>and enforceable contract between Enron Corp. (or any of its
>affiliates) andthe intended recipient or any other party, and may not
>be relied on by anyone as the basis of a contract by estoppel or
>otherwise. Thank you.
>**********************************************************************

yea!  Great work, Valeria!  Michelle

FYI; Jubran has signed the agreements; I think this matter is just about over.

FYI

Amy,

I have signed both agreements.  You will receive them shortly.
A few questions, will I receive all checks by the 15th?
Is the $7500 a lump-sum payment also? I am assuming it is it.
Will you be sending me all the information regarding my retained benefits,
vacation hours, copies of the agreement signed, etc?
Just general questions, do you want me to come in for an exit interview, or
just do it over the phone?

Thank you,

Jubran

Jubran -

The revised information will be couriered to you this afternoon.

Kind regards -
Amy

Valeria and Amy,

If  you do not mind could you please courier over the package today as
soon
as possible. This way my Lawyer can review the information this
afternoon
and hopefully have a decision for you by tomorrow.

Jubran

what will the success fee look like?  Michelle

Michelle,

Below is the information you requested...thanks for the help.

Capstone Global Energy LLC
1330 Lake Robbins Drive
Suite 350
The Woodlands, TX 77380

Term: six (6) Months

Effective Date: November 5, 2001

No monthly fee or retainer...will need to negotiate a success based arrangement.

Services: Joint development of weather related risk management products for application to the electric power markets.

To begin with, we have identified four (4) specific targets: DTE, Connectiv, First Energy/GPU and Cinergy.

The open question is who retains the rights to any jointly developed products...open to sugestions.

Thanks for the help and please do not hesitate to contact me with questions.

Bill

I have looked at the policy and have no major issue with it, except to the extent that it may be either duplicative or different from policies that Corp. is looking to implement.

I agree with Paul's approach on the practice aspect as well as the statement that management will take reasonable steps to look for their unaccounted-for personnel.

Paul, it might make sense for you to talk with Robert Jones and David Oxley, who are looking at overall security issues in the wake of the terrorist attacks.

Michelle

Can't this be communicated as a simple Field Ops "practice" going forward instead of Policy? I'd rather see it be sold as  "this makes sense for all of us to do" vs. "do this because it is Policy" Additionally, what will be the consequences for not adhering to policy? Shouldn't we also state management will proactively track down their employees and together we will account for everyone's safety.

I would appreciate your review of the policy set out below.  As you can see, the policy has already been circulated, without legal review.  While we may all have had comments or suggestions, is there anything you think would require recirculation?  Thank you.  Lance. 

W. Lance Schuler
Lance,

Below is the policy note that we talked about earlier today.  Any comment or input will be appreciated.

Regards,

Allan Grimm
Sr. Director, Field Operations
Enron Broadband Services
allan.grimm@enron.com
713 293-8121

Was this reviewed by legal? If not I would like the wording checked and if necessary clarified relative to the obligations; expressed or implied regarding employee safety. certainly, knowing of the status of employees is important in an emergency.

Rick

Team,

Please consider the policy outlined below to be effective immediately.

EMERGENCY CHECK IN POLICY
FOR
EBS FIELD OPERATIONS EMPLOYEES

In light of the recent tragedies that occurred in New York City and Washington, D.C., Enron Broadband Services Field Operations is adopting a new policy that requires field operations personnel to check-in during unusual situations and emergencies, whether natural or man-made.  Through this check in, management will be able to ensure that any and all necessary measures are taken to provide for the safety of employees. 

Therefore, in the event of a disaster or emergency, all EBS employees and contractors shall call the Network Operations Center in Houston at 800 267-7028, as soon as they can do so safely, to advise EBS management of their status.  Since some personnel may be traveling or on a temporary assignment known only to their immediate supervision, all personnel are requested to check-in, not only those physically assigned to a location near the event.  Personnel on vacation or other leave should also make an effort to check-in so their safety can be assured as well. Phone contact is preferable, however, email or other communication services are acceptable. When you make the call, please provide the following information:

Name
Phone number where you can be reached
Immediate Supervisor
Current location
Assigned location
Any assistance required

It is the goal and focus of the company to provide a safe and secure work atmosphere for all employees.  Should you have any other further suggestions in this regard, please forward them to Herb Caballero, our safety manager, who is charged with developing policies to ensure your safety.

Regards,

Allan Grimm
Senior Director, Field Operations

I think it would be best to get those terms in this agreement.  

It will most likely be a percentage of the premium we receive....

what will the success fee look like?  Michelle

Michelle,

Below is the information you requested...thanks for the help.

Capstone Global Energy LLC
1330 Lake Robbins Drive
Suite 350
The Woodlands, TX 77380

Term: six (6) Months

Effective Date: November 5, 2001

No monthly fee or retainer...will need to negotiate a success based arrangement.

Services: Joint development of weather related risk management products for application to the electric power markets.

To begin with, we have identified four (4) specific targets: DTE, Connectiv, First Energy/GPU and Cinergy.

The open question is who retains the rights to any jointly developed products...open to sugestions.

Thanks for the help and please do not hesitate to contact me with questions.

Bill

FYI, in case you don't already have this.  Michelle

Michelle, per your request, below are the current and/or active labor union agreements specific to Enron and / or its direct affiliate entities:

Direct Hire -  Collective Bargaining Agreements (CBA)
PGE/IBEW 
PGE's coyote springs project - recently re-nogitiatied to 5 year term.
PGE's generation, distribution, and transmission  workforce. - 3 year term through Mar. 2004

Eko-Electrica - JV with Mission Energy - / USWA 
Eco-Electrica project - Puerto Rico -  3 year term - through June 2004

San Juan Gas
Teamsters  - O&M employees - Do not know the term of this agreement. 
Progasco
UTI (local independent union) - Do not know the term of this agreement.

EIM - entities not listed - 
EES/EFS - entities not listed -

Pre-Hire - Project Labor Agreements (PLA)
EWS
Roseville Energy Development, L.L.C.  - California State Building & Construction Trade Council - Negotiations underway.  Contract(s) to include Project Labor Agreement; expires on commercial operation,  Major maintance Agrement,  term to be determined (15 - 30 years); Line and Distribution construction - project specific; Access & referral neutrality agreement - Term 1 year from commercial operation date.
LODI L.L.C. - California State Building & Construuction Trades Council - Negotiations pending - peaker facility development with commitment to negotiate PLA.  
Enron Power & Industrial Construction Co. (EPICc)
Coyote Springs II Project - Active agreement(s) governing the construction of the facility - Third party ownership is established. Agreements expire at commercial operation. 
Longview Energy Development L.L.C. - Kelso Longview/Washington State Building & Construction Trades Council - negotiations dates pending Dec. 2001 anticipate a mirror of the Coyote Springs Agreement(s).  

Please call if additional information is needed
Regards, Rj.  	

Hello, John.  I am forwarding this to you at the request of Rob Walls.  Let me know if you also would like to have the litigation summary for employment matters.  Michelle

Michelle, per your request, below are the current and/or active labor union agreements specific to Enron and / or its direct affiliate entities:

Direct Hire -  Collective Bargaining Agreements (CBA)
PGE/IBEW 
PGE's coyote springs project - recently re-nogitiatied to 5 year term.
PGE's generation, distribution, and transmission  workforce. - 3 year term through Mar. 2004

Eko-Electrica - JV with Mission Energy - / USWA 
Eco-Electrica project - Puerto Rico -  3 year term - through June 2004

San Juan Gas
Teamsters  - O&M employees - Do not know the term of this agreement. 
Progasco
UTI (local independent union) - Do not know the term of this agreement.

EIM - entities not listed - 
EES/EFS - entities not listed -

Pre-Hire - Project Labor Agreements (PLA)
EWS
Roseville Energy Development, L.L.C.  - California State Building & Construction Trade Council - Negotiations underway.  Contract(s) to include Project Labor Agreement; expires on commercial operation,  Major maintance Agrement,  term to be determined (15 - 30 years); Line and Distribution construction - project specific; Access & referral neutrality agreement - Term 1 year from commercial operation date.
LODI L.L.C. - California State Building & Construuction Trades Council - Negotiations pending - peaker facility development with commitment to negotiate PLA.  
Enron Power & Industrial Construction Co. (EPICc)
Coyote Springs II Project - Active agreement(s) governing the construction of the facility - Third party ownership is established. Agreements expire at commercial operation. 
Longview Energy Development L.L.C. - Kelso Longview/Washington State Building & Construction Trades Council - negotiations dates pending Dec. 2001 anticipate a mirror of the Coyote Springs Agreement(s).  

Please call if additional information is needed
Regards, Rj.  	

done -- do you also want me to send him the list of litigation?

PLEASE FORWARD THIS MESSAGE AND ATTACHMENTS TO JOHN ALE.  THANKS
Robert Walls 

I think we have had our release reviewed by NY counsel already, but it might be a belts and suspenders idea to have Drew look at it quickly.

I agree with Lizzette's view of the persons who don't sign the release; I believe that they probably have quit.  If, however, they rescind their application before termination, it is not a voluntary term.  If the situation arises, however, I think we should reevaluate at that time.

Michelle

Whoops! didn't get the copy to you on the first try.

--Lizzette

I'll be glad to review and edit, and to prepare a separation agreement.  Michelle, do you think we need to have NY counsel review the separation agreement?

On the question of rescinding the agreements, I think that an employee who rescinds a separation agreement may not be entitled to anything because the person still has voluntarily quit and isn't entitled to any severance under any plan.  But for employees who try to rescind the application for voluntary severance (ie say they don't want to quit at all), I think we've led them to believe that they can do so without repercussion.  So, I would say that they remain employees who (1) ultimately still can choose to voluntarily quit, or (2) may be selected for termination, in which case we may owe severance.  Michelle, do you agree?  

--Lizzette

Michelle, Lizzette,

We have extended our application deadline to 9AM Monday since many employees have been asking for more consideration time.

I expect by Tues, Weds next week we will have determined which employees applications will be accepted.  With this in mind, can I ask you to take a look at the following acceptance and rejection letters?  These were used in London's program, and will need to be edited for use in the US.

Additionally, can you send me a copy of the Separation and Release Agreement to be used for the Voluntary Program?  I would like to familiarize the business leads on what it will contain.  Can you please ensure that the Agreement contains verbiage reference payment subject to adequate performance (per the Plan document).

We anticipate that the termination dates for the first wave of employees leaving under the is Program would leave by 12/31/2001. This means that the latest I can get the Agreement to them is Nov 15 so they will have the full 45 day consideration period.  With such a narrow timeline, I will try my best to get you all the information for effected employees soon as possible so that you will have time to prepare the Agreements.

Also, what happens in the event that the employee rescinds the Separation & Release Agreement?  Do they then, by default, receive involuntary severance?

Thanks
Cathy

 << File: Acceptance Letter-Draft.doc >>  << File: Rejection Letter-Draft.doc >> 

Human Resources
Enron Metals & Commodity Corp.
520 Madison Ave., 28th Floor
New York, NY 10022
Tel: 212-715-5276
Fax: 212-715-5231
E-Mail: Catherine.Huynh@Enron.com

perfect!  I hope that we can make it!!  Michelle

I booked the Santa lunch and have you guys down for 3.  Sat. Dec. 1 at 11:30 am.  No cancellations after Nov. 23, so just let me know before then if the other event presents a conflict.  Dress Cameron in his Christmas finery for his photo with Santa!

Did you have a chance to respond?

Please respond for yourself/your supervisor!  Unfortunately, my responses so far have been all across the board, so I have not narrowed the options down any.
Thanks, Stacy

As you may know, I recently moved into Cindy Olson's organization and am responsible for our corporate responsibility initiatives, including diversity.  Andrea Yowman now reports to me and will coordinate the diversity function.  

All of you are involved in diversity, whether it is because you have participated in the Corporate Culture Committee, are responsible for supplier diversity, recruiting, compliance, etc.  We think that an ongoing coordination effort among the people invited will be critical to the success of our efforts.

I propose that we arrange a standing, one-hour meeting, initially every two weeks, to discuss overall strategy as well as individual activities that we have been involved in.  I would like for the first meeting to be held in mid-November.

I hope we can count on your participation.  Please let me know if you will be able to participate, and if so, which day and time works best from the list below:

Tuesdays:		10:00 to 11:00 a.m. OR 1:00 to 2:00 p.m.
Wednesdays:	9:00 to 10:00 a.m. OR 3:00 to 4:00 p.m.
Thursdays:		9:00 to 10:00 a.m. OR 1:00 to 2:00 p.m.

	please do an assignment.  Michelle

John Suarez  (Dir. Trading) has recently transferred from EBS to East Power Trading  effective Nov 1, 2001 and we need to have his employment agreement amended to reflect his new op co.  What details do you need from me?

Thanks for the thoughts.  We are getting through it.

Cameron actually wore his yellow rain slicker, his yellow rain shoes, and his red fireman's hat.  So, instead of rain boy, he was a fireman.  I must admit that he looked absolutely adorable!!

Your bash sounds like it was a lot of fun.  I wish I could get Trey to dress up, but he really isn't into that type of thing.  We went to the opera Sat. night -- Tanenhouser.  Wagner really is uptight, isn't he?  Still, I enjoyed it quite a bit -- escaped into the music.  I went to a gala last week for MD Anderson Cancer Center.  It was amazing.  Joan Lunden MC'd.  The Houston Symphony provided music.  Video from George W. Bush.  Speech by GHW Bush.  Entertainment by one of the Irish Tenors, Lyle Lovett, Dhianne Carroll (who had a costume change even though she sang only for 20 minutes!), a 300-person chior, all accompanied by the Houston Symphony.  It was quite the event.  Persons there included the former President Bush and Barbara, James Baker, Alan Simpson, lots of local celebs, and me and my brother  (one of these things is not like the other!).  Still, we had a great time.  So, not all gloom and doom around here.

Well, I'd better get back to it.

Michelle

Hope everything is going well, we've been watching the Enron stories in the
NY Times and thinking about you both. I have to admit that it makes me feel
better about  not understanding my 401K statements, the fact that analysts
could even get confused about financial reporting.

All is well here, we had a kick-ass Halloween party, Rich looked fantastic
as the Bride of Frankenstein (costume and make-up courtesy of me!), my
friend Kim took some great pics, I don't have copies yet but when I do I'll
send you one. Rich wore one of my bras and he put it and we put balloons in
it and I said, how's that?  Well, he said, it's tight and kinda itchs.
You're good then, that's how it feels - I told him. HA!

We joined SF carshare ( www.sfcarshare.org ) and used a car for the first
time this past weekend.  We used a little green new beetle to go hiking on
sunday morning. It was great. You pay per hour (2.50) and per mile .45.  I
don't think we will use it very often, the way our lives are we really don't
need a car very often, but it will come in handy once in while, and esp for
hiking during the winter - and we're hoping someone will need to picked up
at the airport or something.  And we really wanted to support SF CarShare to
make sure they survive.  They are non-profit.

Did Cameron wear his slicker for Halloween or did he get tired of it before
that?  Rich's step sister Liz wanted her son Bennet to be a cowboy and he
wanted to be a power ranger or something.  She got him the power ranger
costume and let him start wearing it a month before Halloween in the hope
that he would be sick of it by Halloween and consent to be a cowboy.  Not
sure what happened but it sounded like a good plan.....

Say hi to Trey and Cameron for me.

Love,
 cheryl

Cheryl Brinkman
McKesson
Sr.  Product Manager
Generic Rx
cheryl.brinkman@mckesson.com
415-983-7501
415-732-2699 - Fax
Please note that the McKesson domain
has changed from @mckhboc.com to
@mckesson.com.  Please update your address files
for all McKesson employees.

Confidentiality Notice: This e-mail message, including any attachments, is for the sole use of the intended recipient(s) and may contain confidential and privileged information. Any unauthorized review, use, disclosure or distribution is prohibited. If you are not the intended recipient, please contact the sender by reply e-mail and destroy all copies of the original message.

I have seen this, but I don't think it should go out.  

David/Mary/Cindy, please correct me if I'm wrong.

Michelle

Michelle,
Have you had a chance to look at this?  Is it okay for us to send to the HR VPs and Generalists for them to forward to their client groups?
Thanks,
Melissa Prihoda
Organizational Development & Learning
713.345.2501
Tim -- Sorry for the delay.  We've been putting out fires all day.  Here's the revised Q&A.  Please make sure legal reviews before it is used and/or distributed.

Thanks!
Karen
x39757

 << File: HRQ&A.doc >> 

The OSHA complaint was dismissed. Michelle

I got this without an attachment.  Do you have?

great result!

Please read the attached  for the latest developments in the above said case.
Frank Garrard 
Manager, EH&S  
NEPCO 
(425) 415-3033  (Direct) 
(425) 415-3000 (Main)  
 
 - Dismissal of Case 10-8-01.doc << File: Dismissal of Case 10-8-01.doc >> 

would you please handle?  Thanks.  Michelle

Hello!  Would Wednesday from 3:00 to 4:00 p.m. work out for you for the below-mentioned meeting?   That seems to be the general consensus from all of the replies that I have received so far.  
You had mentioned in your last e-mail that your assistant would contact us regarding your calendar, but I don't believe that he/she has, and I looked on Peoplefinder to find out who it was, but there was not one listed that I could tell.
Thanks, Stacy

As you may know, I recently moved into Cindy Olson's organization and am responsible for our corporate responsibility initiatives, including diversity.  Andrea Yowman now reports to me and will coordinate the diversity function.  

All of you are involved in diversity, whether it is because you have participated in the Corporate Culture Committee, are responsible for supplier diversity, recruiting, compliance, etc.  We think that an ongoing coordination effort among the people invited will be critical to the success of our efforts.

I propose that we arrange a standing, one-hour meeting, initially every two weeks, to discuss overall strategy as well as individual activities that we have been involved in.  I would like for the first meeting to be held in mid-November.

I hope we can count on your participation.  Please let me know if you will be able to participate, and if so, which day and time works best from the list below:

Tuesdays:		10:00 to 11:00 a.m. OR 1:00 to 2:00 p.m.
Wednesdays:	9:00 to 10:00 a.m. OR 3:00 to 4:00 p.m.
Thursdays:		9:00 to 10:00 a.m. OR 1:00 to 2:00 p.m.

Neil, why not put them under an agreement? That would cover all of these aspects, as well as info re:  fees, etc.  Michelle
Michelle
 
I want to have some discussions with Wyndham Mills about a project that I want to ensure is treated as stictly confidential - do you have some non disclosure agreements that I could use - this is what they sent me but I want something stronger ?
 
Thanks
 
Neil
Dear Neil,
 
Sorry I was traveling on Friday when you called. I appreciate the call and spoke to Mark and he mentioned that you had also chatted as well.
 
Mark said that you would like to put a confidentiality agreement in place prior to our discussions.
 
I have attached the one we have used for a starting point. I do not really care which one we use, I thought this might help you out. Please feel free to modify and return to me and I will execute.
 
I look forward to our meeting.
 
Thanks,
 
Cabell 
 
 

sounds good -- I'll send you a standard confidentiality agreement, which also contains a non-solicitation of employees.  Michelle
 
Twanda, would you please do a standard confidentiality agreement for this company for my review? Thanks.  Michelle
Not sure I can get them under agreement yet - this will be one of the items of discussion - this is kind of a pre stage where I just want confidentiality before I even talk to them in detail
 
Neil
Neil, why not put them under an agreement? That would cover all of these aspects, as well as info re:  fees, etc.  Michelle
Michelle
 
I want to have some discussions with Wyndham Mills about a project that I want to ensure is treated as stictly confidential - do you have some non disclosure agreements that I could use - this is what they sent me but I want something stronger ?
 
Thanks
 
Neil
Dear Neil,
 
Sorry I was traveling on Friday when you called. I appreciate the call and spoke to Mark and he mentioned that you had also chatted as well.
 
Mark said that you would like to put a confidentiality agreement in place prior to our discussions.
 
I have attached the one we have used for a starting point. I do not really care which one we use, I thought this might help you out. Please feel free to modify and return to me and I will execute.
 
I look forward to our meeting.
 
Thanks,
 
Cabell 
 
 

wouldn't you want them not to solicit the employees they meet when they talk with you and your team?
They won't sign anything with a nonsolicitation yet - this will need to be when we have agreed the deal - when we'll put them in the full blown 12 month hands off and full MSA
 
Thanks
 
 
Neil
sounds good -- I'll send you a standard confidentiality agreement, which also contains a non-solicitation of employees.  Michelle
 
Twanda, would you please do a standard confidentiality agreement for this company for my review? Thanks.  Michelle
Not sure I can get them under agreement yet - this will be one of the items of discussion - this is kind of a pre stage where I just want confidentiality before I even talk to them in detail
 
Neil
Neil, why not put them under an agreement? That would cover all of these aspects, as well as info re:  fees, etc.  Michelle
Michelle
 
I want to have some discussions with Wyndham Mills about a project that I want to ensure is treated as stictly confidential - do you have some non disclosure agreements that I could use - this is what they sent me but I want something stronger ?
 
Thanks
 
Neil
Dear Neil,
 
Sorry I was traveling on Friday when you called. I appreciate the call and spoke to Mark and he mentioned that you had also chatted as well.
 
Mark said that you would like to put a confidentiality agreement in place prior to our discussions.
 
I have attached the one we have used for a starting point. I do not really care which one we use, I thought this might help you out. Please feel free to modify and return to me and I will execute.
 
I look forward to our meeting.
 
Thanks,
 
Cabell 
 
 

do you want  me to allow them to solicit you?  Just say the word.  
they will only meet me and oxley ! But yes that would be great 
 
;)
 
Neil
wouldn't you want them not to solicit the employees they meet when they talk with you and your team?
They won't sign anything with a nonsolicitation yet - this will need to be when we have agreed the deal - when we'll put them in the full blown 12 month hands off and full MSA
 
Thanks
 
 
Neil
sounds good -- I'll send you a standard confidentiality agreement, which also contains a non-solicitation of employees.  Michelle
 
Twanda, would you please do a standard confidentiality agreement for this company for my review? Thanks.  Michelle
Not sure I can get them under agreement yet - this will be one of the items of discussion - this is kind of a pre stage where I just want confidentiality before I even talk to them in detail
 
Neil
Neil, why not put them under an agreement? That would cover all of these aspects, as well as info re:  fees, etc.  Michelle
Michelle
 
I want to have some discussions with Wyndham Mills about a project that I want to ensure is treated as stictly confidential - do you have some non disclosure agreements that I could use - this is what they sent me but I want something stronger ?
 
Thanks
 
Neil
Dear Neil,
 
Sorry I was traveling on Friday when you called. I appreciate the call and spoke to Mark and he mentioned that you had also chatted as well.
 
Mark said that you would like to put a confidentiality agreement in place prior to our discussions.
 
I have attached the one we have used for a starting point. I do not really care which one we use, I thought this might help you out. Please feel free to modify and return to me and I will execute.
 
I look forward to our meeting.
 
Thanks,
 
Cabell 
 
 

FYI.  Michelle

The ClickAtHome Database shows that you have placed an order with Dell Computer with an order number of 688296201. Please read below for instructions:

1.  If this is correct, enjoy your computer!
    You can check your order status by clicking here:
      http://wwwapp.us.dell.com/us/en/ordstat/index.asp

      ** For questions about your order/changes/problems,
         call 1-866-220-3355 **

2.  If you did NOT place an order with Dell for the ClickAtHome program,
    please email enron@avenueb2e.com or call 713-895-9001 to report
    the incorrect order on your behalf.

3.  DELL OFFERS A 30 DAY NO QUESTIONS ASKED RETURN POLICY.
    THE 30 DAYS BEGINS FROM THE DAY YOUR PC IS SHIPPED FROM DELL.
    YOU WILL NOT BE ABLE TO RETURN YOUR PC AFTER THE 30 DAY PERIOD HAS PASSED.
    IF FOR ANY REASON, YOU BELIEVE YOU MAY NEED TO RETURN YOUR PC
    (INCLUDE FOR REPAIR OR SERVICE ISSUES), YOU MUST CALL DELL AT
    1-866-220-3355 BEFORE THE END OF THE 30 DAY PERIOD AND RECEIVE
    A RETURN AUTHORIZATION NUMBER. YOU MUST HAVE THIS NUMBER
    BEFORE THE END OF THE 30 DAYS.

Thank you!

ClickAtHome Team!

Let's get with Tommy to expedite it, if you want.  L, M

The Dell website estimates a 12/3/01 shipping date (when it leaves their office) -- I am shocked it would take a month to produce!

FYI.  Michelle

The ClickAtHome Database shows that you have placed an order with Dell Computer with an order number of 688296201. Please read below for instructions:

1.  If this is correct, enjoy your computer!
    You can check your order status by clicking here:
      http://wwwapp.us.dell.com/us/en/ordstat/index.asp

      ** For questions about your order/changes/problems,
         call 1-866-220-3355 **

2.  If you did NOT place an order with Dell for the ClickAtHome program,
    please email enron@avenueb2e.com or call 713-895-9001 to report
    the incorrect order on your behalf.

3.  DELL OFFERS A 30 DAY NO QUESTIONS ASKED RETURN POLICY.
    THE 30 DAYS BEGINS FROM THE DAY YOUR PC IS SHIPPED FROM DELL.
    YOU WILL NOT BE ABLE TO RETURN YOUR PC AFTER THE 30 DAY PERIOD HAS PASSED.
    IF FOR ANY REASON, YOU BELIEVE YOU MAY NEED TO RETURN YOUR PC
    (INCLUDE FOR REPAIR OR SERVICE ISSUES), YOU MUST CALL DELL AT
    1-866-220-3355 BEFORE THE END OF THE 30 DAY PERIOD AND RECEIVE
    A RETURN AUTHORIZATION NUMBER. YOU MUST HAVE THIS NUMBER
    BEFORE THE END OF THE 30 DAYS.

Thank you!

ClickAtHome Team!

who says they would want him?
no just David !
do you want  me to allow them to solicit you?  Just say the word.  
they will only meet me and oxley ! But yes that would be great 
 
;)
 
Neil
wouldn't you want them not to solicit the employees they meet when they talk with you and your team?
They won't sign anything with a nonsolicitation yet - this will need to be when we have agreed the deal - when we'll put them in the full blown 12 month hands off and full MSA
 
Thanks
 
 
Neil
sounds good -- I'll send you a standard confidentiality agreement, which also contains a non-solicitation of employees.  Michelle
 
Twanda, would you please do a standard confidentiality agreement for this company for my review? Thanks.  Michelle
Not sure I can get them under agreement yet - this will be one of the items of discussion - this is kind of a pre stage where I just want confidentiality before I even talk to them in detail
 
Neil
Neil, why not put them under an agreement? That would cover all of these aspects, as well as info re:  fees, etc.  Michelle
Michelle
 
I want to have some discussions with Wyndham Mills about a project that I want to ensure is treated as stictly confidential - do you have some non disclosure agreements that I could use - this is what they sent me but I want something stronger ?
 
Thanks
 
Neil
Dear Neil,
 
Sorry I was traveling on Friday when you called. I appreciate the call and spoke to Mark and he mentioned that you had also chatted as well.
 
Mark said that you would like to put a confidentiality agreement in place prior to our discussions.
 
I have attached the one we have used for a starting point. I do not really care which one we use, I thought this might help you out. Please feel free to modify and return to me and I will execute.
 
I look forward to our meeting.
 
Thanks,
 
Cabell 
 
 

Any officer can sign for Enron -- generally speaking, we like to have the BU head sign.  Michelle

Michelle, here is a faxed version of Nick O'Day's contract.  Who should sign it for Enron.

Thanks

Sender: 		03 5219 4610
Received: 	06 November 2001 09:36 
Pages: 		10 
Serviced By:  	FACSys server EULON-APFX1P (Device 2) 
Routing Info: 	38895

I don't think that this is a good idea for her process or any other general process.  

You mean for her process in particular, right? 

Michelle,

As an FYI, previously Tim and I had discussed perhaps that Louise should be the one that chooses between T&F and J&G, if it comes to that point.

"Everything comes to those who hustle while he waits."
                                                        -Thomas Edison
Best Regards,
Bobbi
International Human Resources
tel:    713 345 2809
fax:   713 646 5969
work space: EB 3658-b
email: bobbi.tessandori@enron.com

Please read the attached  for the latest developments in the above said case.
Frank Garrard 
Manager, EH&S  
NEPCO 
(425) 415-3033  (Direct) 
(425) 415-3000 (Main)  
 
 - Dismissal of Case 10-8-01.doc 

Jon is the perfect choice if he is an officer of that entity.  Michelle

I will get John to sign it then.  Thanks

Any officer can sign for Enron -- generally speaking, we like to have the BU head sign.  Michelle

Michelle, here is a faxed version of Nick O'Day's contract.  Who should sign it for Enron.

Thanks

Sender: 		03 5219 4610
Received: 	06 November 2001 09:36 
Pages: 		10 
Serviced By:  	FACSys server EULON-APFX1P (Device 2) 
Routing Info: 	38895

Sure, we could set up an LLC entity to employ those people.  They would have issues around payroll and benefits, but those can be handled.  Michelle

Michelle,

Have you had situations in the past where we've needed to set up a company/LLC to house employees separate from EGM/Enron Americas, etc.?

I'm working with limited information, but the Freight group has a potential deal where they will buy a trucking company and need a place to house the workers outside of EGM.  Another idea we are considering is using an outsourcing company, similar to Administaff, but this is expensive and it will be difficult to find somone to take on the liabilities associated with this type of workforce.

Thanks,
Shanna

We need to talk about that meeting with me, Mike, and John.  I do not think it went well at all, but I would like to discuss it with you.  Michelle

Michelle, Here's the training the NEPCO HR group has on their schedule.  I
think the outcome of your meeting with Indivero and Schwartzenburg is that
Mike would forward through me all requests involving the retention of
outside counsel including the expected training needs from outside counsel.
Let me know if you have any comments or suggestions.  Thanks.

David H. Lund, Jr.
Assistant General Counsel
National Energy Production Corporation
11831 North Creek Parkway N.
Bothell, WA 98011
425-415-3138
Fax: 425-415-3032
David.Lund@nepco.com or davidlu@nepco.com

David,  we have schedule Ogletree, Deakins and Nash to conduct Harassment
and Union Avoidance training at our El Dorado, AK job site on December 4th
and 5th.  We will be scheduling the training at our Lakeworth job site after
the first of the year. If you have any questions, please contact me at
x3136.

Glo

great -- thanks!

I talked to Rob Fries with Phillips and he said ok to sending you the plan.  I will fax it over to you today. 
Kerry E Notestine 
Littler Mendelson, PC 
1900 Chevron Tower 
1301 McKinney Street 
Houston, Texas 77010 
713.652.4748 
713.951.9212 (fax) 
knotestine@littler.com 
www.littler.com 

please calendar.  Thanks. Michelle

When: Friday, November 09, 2001 8:00 AM-9:00 AM (GMT-08:00) Pacific Time (US
& Canada); Tijuana.
Where: 800-711-8000 (4153099 passcod)

*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*

Please note that the time is from 8:00 - 9:00 PST
The call in number is 800-711-8000 (4153099 passcode)
cb

What a delightful and welcome change of pace in my email today!

Definitely count us in.  We'd love to join you.

By the way, do you have Mata Kroger's new phone number?  Or, is she still with Comsys?

Thanks!

Michelle

Hi stranger -- I am checking to see if you and Trey can join the Krummes  and us for champagne brunch on Sunday, Dec 16 at 10:30 at Cafe Noche.  Rob  is coming in for our Christmas party and is leaving for Austin right after  brunch.  We are both excited to have a whole night and next morning without  kids.  Let us know if you guys can join us.
 
DEB
 
Deborah Rank
Martin, Disiere, Jefferson & Wisdom,  L.L.P.
808 Travis, Suite 1800
Houston, Texas 77002
(713) 632-1710
Fax: (713) 222-0101www.mdjwlaw.com << File: http://www.mdjwlaw.com >> 
 

 - MDJW.jpg << File: MDJW.jpg >> 

please draft.  thanks.  Michelle

Hi Michelle,

Many thanks, Karen

Fred Baloutch
Jeffrey Zaun
Eric Moncada
Gabriel Weinart
Jason Jennaro
Steve Pan
Rahul Seksaria
Gary Linhart
Peter Bennett
Carrie Larkworthy
Jozef Lieskovsky
Gustavo Giron
Mason Hamlin
George Huan
Brent Dornier
Jason Huang
Leonidas Saavas

Go ahead and ask her to have the attorney call me.  Michelle

Shankman just called to tell me that Jennifer has engaged an atty.  If I receive any information from this atty, I will send your way.

Shanna

Sheila,

Could you please provide me with PH files and also complete the charts on the following people?  Some of them may have left the company, and others may never have been employed.  Will you have access to all current/former employees' information?  If not, who would?

Thanks tons!!

Michelle

It might help if I gave you the names!

Amy Flores
Michael Hinds
Chris Loehr
Michelle Stroud
Joyce Tang
Ben Thomason
Rudy de la Paz
Frank Felicia

Thanks!

Sheila,

Could you please provide me with PH files and also complete the charts on the following people?  Some of them may have left the company, and others may never have been employed.  Will you have access to all current/former employees' information?  If not, who would?

Thanks tons!!

Michelle

please get with him.  Michelle

Michelle,

I have recently taken over the management of the Hanover Measurement Services investment.  I would like to meet to get your perspective on the Bill Rome situation.  Are you available for 30 minutes on Wednesday morning?

Thanks,

Kevin Garland
Managing Director
Enron Principal Investments

Jo Ann,

Can you provide the answers for me?  Then I can decide how to proceed with Arthur. 

Thanks.

Michelle

Hi Michelle -- here's the information requested by Andersen.
Please advise.
Thanks.
Jo Ann

As discussed:

(See attached file: Individuals.xls)
*******************Internet Email Confidentiality Footer*******************

Privileged/Confidential Information may be contained in this message.  If
you are not the addressee indicated in this message (or responsible for
delivery of the message to such person), you may not copy or deliver this
message to anyone. In such case, you should destroy this message and kindly
notify the sender by reply email. Please advise immediately if you or your
employer do not consent to Internet email for messages of this kind.
Opinions, conclusions and other information in this message that do not
relate to the official business of my firm shall be understood as neither
given nor endorsed by it.
 - Individuals.xls << File: Individuals.xls >> 

John and Louise						,

I hope that the sample agreements sent to John earlier were what you had in mind.

I have completed all of the amendment and assignment agreements for those persons with the guaranteed bonus.  I will hold on to them until you are ready to fill in the blanks.  A few of those employees work for Enron Canada Corp.  I am not sure if I can transfer them to the other company in light of tax issues.  Nonetheless, those are ready, and we can change the new company name if we set up a Canadian entity in the next few days.

Let me know if you would like any more information.  You can reach me at 3-6401 or on my cell at 713-302-5522.

Michelle

For your information -- Here is some severance language I received from Lit=
tler.  Michelle

Michelle:=20
In response to my firm-wide email regarding set off for WARN notice: I rece=
ived a plan that included the following language:
The severance benefits provided under this Plan (including any additional b=
enefits provided pursuant to authority reserved in [company] under the prov=
isions of this Plan) are the maximum benefits that [company] will pay.  To =
the extent that any federal, state or local law, including, without limitat=
ion, the Worker Adjustment and Retraining Notification Act (WARN) and any o=
ther so-called "plant closing" laws, requires [company] to give advance not=
ice or make a payment of any kind to an Eligible Employee because of that E=
mployee's involuntary termination due to a layoff, reduction in force, plan=
t or facility closing, sale of business, change of control, or any other si=
milar event or reason, the benefits provided under this Plan shall be reduc=
ed by the amount of such payment. Notwithstanding any other provision of th=
e Plan to the contrary, an Employee's Severance Benefits shall not be less =
than the amount required by WARN, and in the case of an Enhanced Severance =
Benefit, shall not be less than the amount required by WARN plus an additio=
nal amount to be determined by the Employer.=20
Hope this is helpful.  Let me know if there is any big news at Enron.  Thin=
gs appear to be moving fast.=20
Kerry E Notestine=20
Littler Mendelson, PC=20
1900 Chevron Tower=20
1301 McKinney Street=20
Houston, Texas 77010=20
713.652.4748=20
713.951.9212 (fax)=20
knotestine@littler.com=20
www.littler.com

Not needed -- we have Ogletree on it.  Michelle

Do we need to complete the Questionnaire on Commerce Information form, Notice of Appearance, or Notice of Designation of Representative, or is someone else handling that?

Re: Electrical workers - 

Thanks.

	We need to do assignments for these folks.  Thanks.  Michelle

Michelle -

Just got off the phone with Jeanie and wanted to see what we needed to do regarding folks who had original contracts under co code 0413 and have now transferred to co code 1596 (this company code is called Wholesale EES).

The following people transferred to 1596 effective 10/16.

Rogers Herndon
Narsimha Misra
Berney Aucoin
Edith Cross
Oliver Jones

Timothy Coffing has been in 1596 since 8/6/01 - previous was in 0985 (EES).

Gordon Savage has been in 1596 since 8/1/01 - previous was in 0985 (EES).

Dale Furrow was hired into 1596 on 9/24/01.

Let me know if you thing that we need to do something for these folks - I think the concern is whether or not they can argue that their non-compete time started at the point they left ENA.

Thanks!
Amy

Good day, Diomedes,

First, let me say that I am sorry about the delay in responding to your earlier email.  

I am writing to let you know that the processing of your ECI payments has begun!  Because of the significant amount of activity here at Enron over the past few days, it may take a few days to finalize the processing.  However, if you have questions about timing, please feel free to call me at  713-853-6401 or Pam Butler at 713-853-6161.

Feel free to give me a call if you would like to discuss this matter further.

Michelle

I do not have any of this information -- Cathy, is the Metals plan the same as Enron domestic?  If so, then I would suggest that Chris Rahaim participate in this process.  Feel free to work with me on it, but I just don't have any data.  Thanks.  Michelle

Michelle:

Further to Cynthia's message below--I am principally looking for two items:

1.  pension and benefit information for Enron Metals US; and
2.  pension and benefits case law, Pension and Benefits Guaranty Corporation
opinions and    Department of Labor Opinions (in reference to the Henry Bath
US entities).

Any assistance you could provide would be much appreciated.

Best regards.

Deborah Greenwood
Attorney (New York)
Linklaters, London

Tel: (44-20) 7456-4995
Fax: (44-20) 7456-2222
deborah.greenwood@linklaters.com

http://www.linklaters.com
http://www.linklaters-alliance.com

Michelle, Deborah Greenwood needs to speak with someone for labor issues
for diligence purposes related to the US Metals transaction.  From what
I can tell, she needs info for Reps and Warr.

Mikie, please send a pdf file to Deborah of the Benefits at a Glance or
the SPD which ever is quickest.

Thanks
Cb
>  -----Original Message-----
____________________________________________________________

This message is confidential. It may also be privileged or
otherwise protected by work product immunity or other legal
rules. If you have received it by mistake please let us know
by reply and then delete it from your system; you should not
copy the message or disclose its contents to anyone.
____________________________________________________________

I am not aware of any. 

I am happy for us to paper the deal.  I am not sure that we will be able to guarantee anything special for Scarth in the event of a purchase of the assets -- it will be a deal team decision as to whether they want to impose that requirement on the sale of the asset.  Michelle

Lizette, attached is the consultive service draft that Mike Vlaming @ scarth lyons prepared and submitted. This agreement will be for the REF L.L.C.  This draft represents the compensation and recovery concerns that Scarth Lyons have as a result of the early termination of 2 prior agreements with Enron development spvs. They loose out when Enron flips a deal and the successor terminates.  Please review and let me know your views on the best way to proceed.  Michelle has agreed that this is "just papering up a deal that is already underway".  Once ready, I'll ask Michelle's support for the execution approval and I will let the commercial team know.  Thanks, Rj.  
 
Rick: 

Attached is the proposed Consulting Services Agreement incorporating changes as we discussed.  In particular, I have modified the following paragraphs:    (1), (3), (3.b), (3.d), (3.e), (13) and (14.c). 

Once you and Michelle have had an opportunity to review this revised Consulting Services Agreement, please contact me to discuss the changes. 

Michael J. Vlaming 

We have confirmed the amounts of the contracts.  When I speak of processing, it relates to the processing of the checks/wire transfers.

Michelle,

Thanks for your response. I tried to call you but got to your voice mail
so I am sending you this email to clarify some questions I have.

Please confirm that when you mention the "processing of the ECI
payments" you refer to the actual wire transfers and not to the process
of confirming the amounts based on the ECI-Enron contracts - which I
hope is complete by now.

Also, when you refer to the ECI payments does that mean that the
Employment Agreement payment amounts are still under review? If that is
the case and in the interest of gaining time please proceed with the
payments of the ECI amounts which I take it are simpler to calculate
(they depend on a formula and not on net income calculations like the
Employment Agreement payments) and we can deal with the Employment
Agreement payments later. Obviously if you have performed all the
calculations for both payments I would prefer to receive the entire
amount.

I realize this is a hectic time at Enron but unfortunately these
payments are VERY late and as I described in my previous emails I have
been postponing closing an important transaction which has considerable
value to me for months now. Unless I receive at least the ECI related
payments immediately I will be obliged to unwind other investments which
may be done at a considerable cost to me.

Please let me know if you have all the necessary information for the
wire transfers available to you.

I look forward to hearing from you.

Best regards,

Diomedes

Good day, Diomedes,

First, let me say that I am sorry about the delay in responding to your
earlier email.

I am writing to let you know that the processing of your ECI payments
has begun!  Because of the significant amount of activity here at Enron
over the past few days, it may take a few days to finalize the
processing.  However, if you have questions about timing, please feel
free to call me at  713-853-6401 or Pam Butler at 713-853-6161.

Feel free to give me a call if you would like to discuss this matter
further.

Michelle

Michelle:
Is this on your form?

Carol St. Clair
EB 4539
713-853-3989 (phone)
713-646-8537 (fax)
281-382-1943 (cell phone)
8774545506 (pager)
281-890-8862 (home fax)
carol.st.clair@enron.com

Carol,

I have a straight up deal with a consultant to work for me full time at $7500/month plus approved expenses.  His scope of work is identical to Eric Raab's plus add "focus on developing the OTC market and wholesale carrier relationships that result in increasing the number of transactions and volume of traffic, particularly with buyers".  He will also focus on building direct routes, our VOIP strategy and other trading oriented transactions.

He will report to me.  It is month to month, 15 days notice to terminate contract.

I'd like someone to prepare a draft of this so I can review and then forward it to Mr. Omar Valdez for his review.   

Thank you.

Thanks, Lynn, for the update.  If they have no interest in putting a settlement offer out there, then I suggest that we schedule the plaintiff's deposition.  Let's turn up the heat.  Michelle

 <<cash letter3.doc>>  <<discovery requests.doc>>  <<med.rel.doc>> 
Christine Neely, 
Secretary to Lynn Paul Mattson and Kristen L. Brightmire 
Doerner, Saunders, Daniel & Anderson, L.L.P. 
  
Information in this message may be privileged or confidential.  Information is intended for the sole use of the addressee.  No consent is given for unauthorized viewing or distribution.

 - cash letter3.doc << File: cash letter3.doc >> 
 - discovery requests.doc << File: discovery requests.doc >> 
 - med.rel.doc << File: med.rel.doc >> 

Vicki,

As mentioned in my voice mail on Friday, we have received a lawsuit filed by Michael Lindert against Enron Corp., EESO, and EES, Inc., in which he basically claims that he is due unpaid commissions.  He seeks damages of $1 million.

Jim Derrick passed this lawsuit to me, but let me know if you want me to manage it on behalf of EES.  

I have contacted Chicago counsel (for information, not retention, purposes) to determine the answer date, which is 30 days.  I do not believe that we have been properly served, however, so we appear to have additional time.  The suit was filed 11/1, and we received it sometime last week, via cover letter to Ken Lay from Lindert (rather bizzarre, if you ask me). 

The law firm representing the plaintiff is not some hack plaintiff's firm; it actually is a blue chip family law firm with a good reputation in Cook County.

The case probably should be removed to federal court due to diversity of citizenship.  According to the Seyfarth, Shaw lawyers I contacted on Friday, the Circuit Court of Cook County, Law Division is not a place where we would want to be, and federal court is preferable.  We have 30 days to remove to federal court.

Let me know how you want me to proceed.

Michelle

Twanda, could you please detach this attachment and send it to the following email address from my email?  I just don't want all the other communications enclosed.  We need to cc:  Julia Murray.

kevin.r.kosub@us.andersen.com.

Thanks!

Michelle

Michelle -- attached is the spreadsheet with the information I can review in SAP.  I have not released any information to anyone.
Please let me know if you need anything further.
Thanks.
Jo Ann

 

Jo Ann,

Can you provide the answers for me?  Then I can decide how to proceed with Arthur. 

Thanks.

Michelle

Hi Michelle -- here's the information requested by Andersen.
Please advise.
Thanks.
Jo Ann

As discussed:

(See attached file: Individuals.xls)
*******************Internet Email Confidentiality Footer*******************

Privileged/Confidential Information may be contained in this message.  If
you are not the addressee indicated in this message (or responsible for
delivery of the message to such person), you may not copy or deliver this
message to anyone. In such case, you should destroy this message and kindly
notify the sender by reply email. Please advise immediately if you or your
employer do not consent to Internet email for messages of this kind.
Opinions, conclusions and other information in this message that do not
relate to the official business of my firm shall be understood as neither
given nor endorsed by it.
 - Individuals.xls << File: Individuals.xls >> 

David,

I guess I think that it is not worth the fight these days.  I suppose would approve this training, but I think we need to have an understanding w/ Ogletree about travel time, travel expenses, billing rates, etc.  They need to understand who holds the purse strings, and I do not think it would be appropriate for them to bill their full hourly rate for time spent on travel given that we could find someone local to do the same training -- or could send me or Lizzette to do it for the cost of travel only.    For your information, David, there is nothing magic about the training they are doing.  It is standard training that I used to deliver frequently when I was in private practice.  Ogletree does not have a monopoly on it.

I'll try to call you early this week, now that the other work I have been focusing on may slow down a bit.

Michelle

Michelle, Here's the training the NEPCO HR group has on their schedule.  I
think the outcome of your meeting with Indivero and Schwartzenburg is that
Mike would forward through me all requests involving the retention of
outside counsel including the expected training needs from outside counsel.
Let me know if you have any comments or suggestions.  Thanks.

David H. Lund, Jr.
Assistant General Counsel
National Energy Production Corporation
11831 North Creek Parkway N.
Bothell, WA 98011
425-415-3138
Fax: 425-415-3032
David.Lund@nepco.com or davidlu@nepco.com

David,  we have schedule Ogletree, Deakins and Nash to conduct Harassment
and Union Avoidance training at our El Dorado, AK job site on December 4th
and 5th.  We will be scheduling the training at our Lakeworth job site after
the first of the year. If you have any questions, please contact me at
x3136.

Glo

This looks fine -- have we released us from any and all obligations that may have arisen before the date the agreement is signed?  I don't want there to be any other surprises, so I'd like to include "known and unknown" type language here.  Also, does the definition of ECT include all parents, shareholders, affiliates, employees, attorneys, etc?  Let's be very clear.  I'd also like a covenant not to sue signed by both Clonch and his attorneys.  

Ms. Cash, the attached is a draft release prepared by Mr. Woody.  Please
review and let me (or Chuck) know  your comments.  Thanks, Pam Haynes
(304-340-3789)

 <<3xpn01!.DOC>>

 - 3xpn01!.DOC << File: 3xpn01!.DOC >> 

Leslie, 

I have just learned that the Holland Club event will overlap with this event by about 30 minutes -- St. Nicholas arrives at 10:30, so Cameron probably wouldn't get his gift until 11:00 at the earliest.  Also, since it is out in the boonies, it would take a while to get back inside the loop.  

Would it be possible for us to arrive late?  I'd hate to create a disturbance, but I think Cameron would like to attend both things.

Thanks!

Michelle

I booked the Santa lunch and have you guys down for 3.  Sat. Dec. 1 at 11:30 am.  No cancellations after Nov. 23, so just let me know before then if the other event presents a conflict.  Dress Cameron in his Christmas finery for his photo with Santa!

please print and put in diomedes christodolou file. thanks

Mary Joyce/Michelle,
 
I hope all is well with you. Rob Walls has asked me to contact you relating to the payments that Enron needs to make based on the ECI and my own Employment agreement.
 
As I mentioned in my previous emails and messages these payments are late for a number of months now and it has become extremely URGENT from my standpoint that they are made immediately. I realise a lot is going on at Enron and that you must be very busy but this matter is really long overdue as well as fairly simple so please let me know what I need to do or who at Enron I need to contact in order to receive the payments.
 
Beginning Monday I can be contacted by email at diomedes@cumulouscapital.com  or by phone at my office in London (011-44-20-70728410). Today and tomorrow I can be contacted in Rioat the following numbers: 011-55-21-24957893/24913777.
 
I look forward to hearing from you,
 
Regards,
 
Diomedes.
 
 

please print and file in diomedes christodolou's file. thanks. mhc
Michelle -
 
Your thoughts?
 
 
Hi Rob,
 
I hope all is well with you and also that Enron is making full use of your experience and talent during this very difficult time.
 
I've been trying to get in touch with you by phone and as I realize you must be in all day meetings I thought I'd switch to email. In your message last time you asked me to get in touch with you this last Wednesday when you would have the outcome of Joe Dilg's review of the ECI contract and my employment contract (at least that's what I thought I understood but the message was breaking down).
 
As I have been postponing a deal I need to close for as long as I possibly can I really would appreciate it if you could provide me with the name of someone at Enron, in case you are swamped with other issues, with the authority to make the payments. As I mentioned before, the payments were due a few months ago and I'm now in real danger of not being able to close the deal at all if the payment is delayed further.
 
ESA is telling me I need to talk to Houston but I did not want to call Ken Lay's office at a time like this.
 
Please send me an email and also if you get some time please drop me a line to catch up on the personal side. I've been busy setting up my business in London and I think I should be ready to go with a couple of new ventures by the end of November. 
 
Best regards,
 
Diomedes.

Pam,
 
I guess a separate line of inquiry is whether we owe him payments under his employment contract.  We probably should get with Castleman this week.
 
Michelle
Michelle -
 
Your thoughts?
 
 
Hi Rob,
 
I hope all is well with you and also that Enron is making full use of your experience and talent during this very difficult time.
 
I've been trying to get in touch with you by phone and as I realize you must be in all day meetings I thought I'd switch to email. In your message last time you asked me to get in touch with you this last Wednesday when you would have the outcome of Joe Dilg's review of the ECI contract and my employment contract (at least that's what I thought I understood but the message was breaking down).
 
As I have been postponing a deal I need to close for as long as I possibly can I really would appreciate it if you could provide me with the name of someone at Enron, in case you are swamped with other issues, with the authority to make the payments. As I mentioned before, the payments were due a few months ago and I'm now in real danger of not being able to close the deal at all if the payment is delayed further.
 
ESA is telling me I need to talk to Houston but I did not want to call Ken Lay's office at a time like this.
 
Please send me an email and also if you get some time please drop me a line to catch up on the personal side. I've been busy setting up my business in London and I think I should be ready to go with a couple of new ventures by the end of November. 
 
Best regards,
 
Diomedes.

please print and file in diomedes christodolou file.  thanks.  mhc

Michelle,

Thanks for your response. I tried to call you but got to your voice mail
so I am sending you this email to clarify some questions I have.

Please confirm that when you mention the "processing of the ECI
payments" you refer to the actual wire transfers and not to the process
of confirming the amounts based on the ECI-Enron contracts - which I
hope is complete by now.

Also, when you refer to the ECI payments does that mean that the
Employment Agreement payment amounts are still under review? If that is
the case and in the interest of gaining time please proceed with the
payments of the ECI amounts which I take it are simpler to calculate
(they depend on a formula and not on net income calculations like the
Employment Agreement payments) and we can deal with the Employment
Agreement payments later. Obviously if you have performed all the
calculations for both payments I would prefer to receive the entire
amount.

I realize this is a hectic time at Enron but unfortunately these
payments are VERY late and as I described in my previous emails I have
been postponing closing an important transaction which has considerable
value to me for months now. Unless I receive at least the ECI related
payments immediately I will be obliged to unwind other investments which
may be done at a considerable cost to me.

Please let me know if you have all the necessary information for the
wire transfers available to you.

I look forward to hearing from you.

Best regards,

Diomedes

Good day, Diomedes,

First, let me say that I am sorry about the delay in responding to your
earlier email.

I am writing to let you know that the processing of your ECI payments
has begun!  Because of the significant amount of activity here at Enron
over the past few days, it may take a few days to finalize the
processing.  However, if you have questions about timing, please feel
free to call me at  713-853-6401 or Pam Butler at 713-853-6161.

Feel free to give me a call if you would like to discuss this matter
further.

Michelle

Aaron, does this apply to companies in which we have a large ownership interest, but that may not be a "subsidiary"?  Thanks.  Michelle

Michelle,

This email confirms our discussion that one of the mandates of the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors of Enron is that they approve all formations of and grants related to any subsidiary equity or phantom equity plans.

Mary and I can and will work closely and quickly with any group needing to get this done.  Mary is responsible for presenting the plan for approval to the Compensation Committee after Tax, Legal, Accounting, Commercial and HR interests are scrubbed.

These types of plans have accounting, legal and tax complexities that need to be worked out and change regularly.  Also, it is very important that no written or verbal promise related to equity grants before Compensation Committee approval is obtained.

Regards,
Aaron
x39280

Jo Ann, what is the answer?  Michelle

Thanks for the information, however I have a question for the 14
individuals in which we have "No record in SAP".   Do we know for certain
that these individuals where not employed with Enron , or is it that there
is no record of them in SAP HR.  Would a query out of the HR datawarehouse
tell us more information?

Thanks,
Kevin

*******************Internet Email Confidentiality Footer*******************

Privileged/Confidential Information may be contained in this message.  If
you are not the addressee indicated in this message (or responsible for
delivery of the message to such person), you may not copy or deliver this
message to anyone. In such case, you should destroy this message and kindly
notify the sender by reply email. Please advise immediately if you or your
employer do not consent to Internet email for messages of this kind.
Opinions, conclusions and other information in this message that do not
relate to the official business of my firm shall be understood as neither
given nor endorsed by it.
 - M Cash_Individuals.xls 

FYI, I talked this morning with a guy who took the Mexico cruise the week of Thanksgiving last year.  He gave me some scoop on the trip.  The weather is nice, but wind causes things to be chilly.  Lots of good food.

One thing -- the cruise ship apparently can be quite rocky and rolly, which can cause some folks to have horrible nausea.  You may want to call your pediatrician to get some meds for the kids (and probably call your doc for some meds for you--as I recall, you got awfully seasick on the deep sea fishing boat, although it was when you were having all that trouble with your thyroid).

Later, Michelle

Who would see or use this?  

Michelle,

 Please review and modify the attached draft emergency response procedures as you deem necessary, especially the last section regarding mobility impaired personnel.  If you would prefer to forward them to someone else for formal review, please do so.  Thank you for your assistance.  Mike Terraso 
 << File: All Enron Emergency Response Procedures.doc >> 

Add to your question list.  Michelle

Bobbi:  can you assist Jackie on this question?
Thanks
Margaret

Margaret - a couple of people have asked whether Enron would do more than the legal minimum of providing fare home for H1B visa holder i.e would they pay for other family members and possessions to be shipped home!  Is this one of the questions we are seeking a reply to?  - obviously this is one for Enron not the attorneys.

Jackie

Tel   281 596 0738
Cell  713 515 8592

I'll be out also -- on the cruise, baby!!!!

Sharon Butcher will not be in office today.

Your thoughts?
Hello, Michelle!
 
You came and spoke to my new hire class last Monday. I have a pending book deal with Zondervan publishing and wanted to make sure that there was no problem re the confidentiality agreement. 
 
I am certain there will be no problem. I have been a minister for 22 years and have a proposal being pitched by the senior editor at Zondervan to their editorial review board. The book will draw on my leadership/team-building experiences in the church and will be written from the perspective of a minister / mba. It will have nothing to do with Enron.
 
Please let me know when would be a good time to come by.
 
All The Best,
Bill

We are planning to attend, although I am going to a networking happy hour at my old firm. I have got to get out there, as you can appreciate!!  But I hope to see you at Kari's house. I know Trey and Cam will be there. Michelle

Not yet. Michelle

If he wants it. But I would like a waiver, so I think we should consider some sort of payment. Michelle

T. Would you please send runner to get this?  Thanks mhc

OK - The books have arrived and I have ordered a limited amount.
=20
Please come by my desk - 1669A to pick these up.
I would drop them off, but it is a long story!!
=20
See you all soon and happy reading!!
=20
(You may send someone else to pick up your book)
=20
Tania Patel
HR Analyst
Enron Executive Compensation=20
713-345-4990
=20

Please revise accordingly. Thanks. Michelle 
Michelle,

Joe has caved in on the home leave issue.  We only need to add the following to Exhibit A at the end of the Repatriation and Related items section:

"The items described above must be used within the six-month non-competition period; after that time, they will be forfeited.  If household goods are to be shipped to Argentina, Employee will have until May 15, 2002 to provide for duty free importation of goods into Argentina.  Additional time will be allowed where Enron must provide documents for duty free import of goods into Argentina."

Change Furniture Storage from reimbursed to Provided.

Once we resolve 7.9 and 7.10 below, he'll sign.

Tim
Michelle,

Discussed the latest draft separation agreement with Joe today.  He has just a couple more questions.

1.	Article 7.9 was adjusted to add the first sentence, which references articles of the employment agreement.  He wants to know the intent of this addition.  Also, article 4.4 is referenced and there is no 4.4 in the employment agreement.

2.	Article 7.10 - He is still concerned about the situation where Enron is acquired by a company where he was employed.  I explained to him that such a situation would not fall under "rehire" by Enron.  However, he would like the last sentence to read, "This provision would not apply if Employee is employed by an entity that may be acquired by or acquires a Company after the effective date of this agreement."

These are all the items for you.  I'm still haggling with him over home leave and timing on shipment of goods.  Let me know your thoughts on the above and I think I can get him to agree to some terms that we can finalize.

Regards,

Timothy J. Callahan
Director, Global Employee Services
Enron Corp
333 Clay Street, Suite 2025
Houston, Texas 77002
Telephone:  713.646.9565
Fax:  713.646.9501

That is fine, but I do have to get Cameron today, so let Shanna know. Thanks. Mich

How are we handling others in that group?  We must be consistent. Let's discuss. Michelle

How much?

they're fine.  michelle

Michelle: 
Lynn would like to get the discovery responses back before taking the Plaintiff's deposition.  Have you had a chance to review the latest draft of the discovery requests?  If they meet with your approval, we will send the requests out today.  We will start attempting to find a workable date for the deposition.  Will you be attending?  If so, please let me know what dates will work for you and then we will attempt to find an agreeable date with Plaintiff and his attorney.
Christine Neely, 
Secretary to Lynn Paul Mattson and Kristen L. Brightmire 
Doerner, Saunders, Daniel & Anderson, L.L.P. 
  
Information in this message may be privileged or confidential.  Information is intended for the sole use of the addressee.  No consent is given for unauthorized viewing or distribution.

I would suggest that we require a waiver before we pay the money.  

Attached is the letter that I am planning to send to individuals who have accepted offers from the A&A program, but have not yet begun employment with us.  I assume that no waiver of liability is needed, since an offer letter does not incur liability.  Please review and let me know if this is adequate, or if some sort of waiver is needed as well.  Thanks.

 << File: Rescind Offer Letter Nov 2001.doc >> 

Terry Bosien
Human Resource Manager
Associate & Analyst Program
713/853-5230

Please review and let me know what the traders want to do on this -- by Thursday would be good.  Michelle

Dear  Michelle:
 
    I  just finished my conference call with Liz Miller (counsel for Calpine),  Christina Solomon, and Steve Schuler (Steve is co-counsel for Miller with  Christina).  Christina had passed along to Liz the various points I made at  the meeting last week, so Liz was prepared to address our primary  concerns.  She made the following points:
         
         (1)    She has talked with several different people at various  levels of authority in Calpine's trading area, and insists that Calpine treats  the power grids as "completely different" regions, strategies for which are not  shared internally among those regions.    
 
         (2)    She asserts that "how we do it at Calpine is totally  different from Enron," since Calpine is "trading around a portfolio of assets  that we own."  She asserted that Enron, not owning power generation assets,  trades differently.  When I replied that Enron does have power generation  assets, she acknowledged the fact but insisted that Enron's trading style is  vastly different due to the difference in emphasis vis a vis the power  generation assets.
 
         (3)    Liz claims that Miller works almost exclusively in  "Urcot" (sp??) in Texas, with some participation in Entergy in Louisiana.   According to Liz, Calpine's strategies concerning these specific regions is  divorced from and not related in any way with any trading Calpine does in the  East or West.  
 
         (4)    Liz is of the opinion that Miller "is not senior enough  that we would be looking for what he knows."  He has no role whatsoever in  discussing or formulating strategy for trading.  Miller, she insists, is on  the receiving end only.  He takes orders, dispatching and scheduling  solely in response to orders he receives from others.
 
         (5)    Liz acknowledges that, were Miller in a more senior,  responsible position, she would have the same concerns we are expressing were  the tables turned.  Miller is "so slotted," however, that she believes that  he is not in a position to use any Enron trade secret that he might possess  (though she and Miller's attorneys expressed doubt that he could retain any  critical information, that the most critical information changes on a day-to-day  basis).
 
       We  ended the conversation with the following  understandings:
 
        (1)    Liz  will explore whether Calpine could put Miller in a non-trading function for a  period of two months or so.  
 
                 --She hastened to add, however, that trading is the only area for which  they really have any use for Miller.  She then suggested that she could  explore putting him instead in the West ("I know Enron doesn't even have a  western desk here.").  I believe that any proposal she comes back  with will entail his continuing in some trading  function.
 
        (2)    Liz  will try to determine how Calpine might provide assurances (acceptable to  ENA) that Miller is "on the receiving end only," as she asserts, such that we  would be confident that he is indeed not in a position to use any trade  secrets he may remember.
   
                 --On this point, I was clear that I did not know either what level of assurance  ENA would require or whether this would even be a feasible  alternative.
     
         (3)    I am to explore with ENA whether this additional  information about Calpine's difference in trading strategy and the limitations  on Miller's duties alleviates ENA's concerns about protection of its trade  secrets.
 
                 --Liz seems to believe that if the business people really knew the information  she is giving to me, they would not be concerned about the activities of this  low level person.
 
     Liz has asked that we reconnect later this week to exchange answers to  these inquiries.  I look forward to discussing with you our  response.
 
     Thanks for your assistance.
 
Best  regards,
Linda  Broocks

yes, if you send me the names and the amounts we will be paying, we'll put them together.  mhc

Can you provide an appropriate waiver document?

Thanks.

Terry

I would suggest that we require a waiver before we pay the money.  

Attached is the letter that I am planning to send to individuals who have accepted offers from the A&A program, but have not yet begun employment with us.  I assume that no waiver of liability is needed, since an offer letter does not incur liability.  Please review and let me know if this is adequate, or if some sort of waiver is needed as well.  Thanks.

 << File: Rescind Offer Letter Nov 2001.doc >> 

Terry Bosien
Human Resource Manager
Associate & Analyst Program
713/853-5230

please calendar.  thanks.  mhc

When: Friday, November 16, 2001 10:00 AM-11:00 AM (GMT-08:00) Pacific Time
(US & Canada); Tijuana.
Where: 800-711-8000 (4153099 passcode)

*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*

Michelle,
I am going to talk with Mary Clark this morning and suggest that we send the following reply to each individual that sent a question in. Does this cover your bases?

Dear........

Thank you for your question. We have had a number of questions on this, and other topics. We are collating the answers to these questions, and intend to post an updated Q&A on the intranet site. 
[Cash, Michelle]  
Your question about the calculations of shares and strike price was one of the most frequently-asked questions we received.  Yes, the details and calculations currently  [Cash, Michelle]  described on the Q&A a [Cash, Michelle]  re  [Cash, Michelle]   accurate.
 

	please begin to prepare this.  I've asked her how much.  MHC

Michelle, please draft a separation agreement for Diomedes.  It has been confirmed by Terrie Wheeler that Diomedes owes Enron $230,505 which would be withheld from his separation payment?  What else do you need from me to paper this?  Thanks!

Carol. I spoke with lara robinson this morning. She indicated that the indemnities in the contribution agmt covered the matters addressed in this draft and that she was told no more indemnities were to be made. She also wants us to hire everyone who is out on leave immediately instead of having them show up when released. Even if the person never returns due to a conversion to LTD she wants us to pick up responsibility for those employees. Seems unusual to me. Would you please give me a call at your earliest convenience. My number is 713-218-7155. Thanks. Michelle

doesn't this sound divine. . . 

Dear Tulane Traveler,

http://www.ahitravel.com/tulane/results/yaa/

Here's the deal:  you fly to Amsterdam, in the Netherlands, then
are transported from the airport to a first-class hotel for
6 days/5 nights, for the bargain basement price of $895.*
You want more?  The evening of your arrival, there will be a
cocktail party at your hotel so you can meet the other young
Tulane travelers on the trip.  Upon your awakening, enjoy the use
of a knowledgeable local at the travel desk who can guide you to
either the insider's Amsterdam or the tourist bit.

In order to provide you with maximum flexibility, four different
departure dates will be offered for this trip: January 26 to
February 1, February 2 to 8, February 9 to 15, February 16 to 22,
February 23 to March 1, and March 2 to 8.

Amsterdam is a modern international city, at the crossroads of
Europe and at the heart of the Dutch experiment in social
freedom. It is also the historic city of Rembrandt, van Gogh,
and the Anne Frank House.  It is not only the center of Dutch
culture but also a melting pot of diversity.  The distinctive
architecture and numerous canals make Amsterdam one of the world's
most unique cities.  Easily covered on foot, Amsterdam abounds
with historic museums, great live music and clubs, international
cuisine, and superb shopping.   There simply is no other city in
the world like Amsterdam.

Check out http://www.ahitravel.com/tulane/results/yaa/ to learn
more about this affordable (long live the American dollar!) and
fun journey to Europe sponsored by the Tulane Alumni Association.
The more the merrier, so take advantage of this blue (and green)
light special--forward this message to your friends and start
planning today!

*****************************************************************

YES! I'd like to receive more e-mail travel offers.
http://www.ahitravel.com/tulane/registration/

If you are not interested in receiving notices of this nature,
please email alumni@tulane.edu with your full name and type
"Remove" in the subject line.

Sincerely,
Bill Vandivort TC '00

*This price is for departures from Chicago or Atlanta.
Departures from Newark are $795.  Still doesn't make you wish you
were from Newark, does it?

Attached is a proposed letter to use when rescinding an offer of employment.  I have consolidated drafts done by Fran Mayes and Terry Bosien.  If you have other forms that you think work better, please send them our way. I think it will be useful to work from the same document across Enron.

Please note that each situation should be handled consistently with others in similar circumstances, and that special care should be taken for those who have quit prior jobs, relocated, or are in precarious visa situations.  

Michelle 

The minimum number of days should be 21, and they should have 7 days to revoke it.  Although the ADEA probably would not apply to A&A candidates, it could be an issue for the rest of the organization.  Michelle

Michelle - After getting your message regarding the waiver, and discussing it with Hector McLoughlin, I've added some language to the original letter.  

 << File: Rescind Offer Letter Nov 2001.doc >> 

Attached is a proposed letter to use when rescinding an offer of employment.  I have consolidated drafts done by Fran Mayes and Terry Bosien.  If you have other forms that you think work better, please send them our way. I think it will be useful to work from the same document across Enron.

Please note that each situation should be handled consistently with others in similar circumstances, and that special care should be taken for those who have quit prior jobs, relocated, or are in precarious visa situations.  

Michelle << File: 5929mhc.doc >> 

The attachments didn't make it.

Tim:  I asked Tindall & Foster to answer various visa related questions that I have received over the past few days, and they have sent me the attached which covers both the non-immigrant (visas) and the immigrant (permanent residency) areas of concern.

Please have these posted as soon as possible.
Thanks
Margaret

Here are two memos for review by you.  Please review and let us know if you
have any questions.

 <<Enron WHAT HAPPENS IF DYNEGY ACQUIRES ENRON.doc>>  <<Enron WHAT HAPPENS
IF I'M LAID OFF.doc>>

> _________________
> Tindall & Foster, P.C.
> Email Message from Alice Margaret Gruber
>
>
>
>
>
> Alice Margaret Gruber
> Tindall & Foster, P.C.
> 600 Travis, Suite 2800
> Houston, Texas 77002-3094
> Telephone:  (713) 229-0636 ext. 1124
> Fax:             (713) 228-1303
> Email:  agruber@tindallfoster.com
>
>
> _____________________________
>
>
> CONFIDENTIALITY STATEMENT:  This electronic message contains information
> from the law firm of Tindall & Foster, P.C. and may be confidential or
> privileged.  The information is intended to be for the use of the
> individual or entity named above.  If you are not the intended recipient,
> be aware that any disclosure, copying, distribution, or use of the
> contents of this message is prohibited.  If you have received this message
> in error, please notify us immediately by reply email or by telephone at
> (713) 229-8733 and delete the material from any computer.
> _____________________________
>
>
>
>

 - Enron WHAT HAPPENS IF DYNEGY ACQUIRES ENRON.doc << File: Enron WHAT HAPPENS IF DYNEGY ACQUIRES ENRON.doc >> 
 - Enron WHAT HAPPENS IF I'M LAID OFF.doc << File: Enron WHAT HAPPENS IF I'M LAID OFF.doc >> 

No. Sounds right. 

Yes. I have been working those. After I get all info I wil probably consolidate and give to sharon for keping but I think it make sense forme to consolidate all info on these employees. Thanks. M

Unfortunately, I do not think we'll have time for this today, given other critical priorities.  I would suggest that the deadline may be slipping in light of other activities.  

Michelle

Hello Michelle and Lizzette,
I wanted to touch base with both of you before the approval deadline (tomorrow, November 15th) for the EEO and Harassment Prevention policies.  If you have additional revisions/suggestions that you would like to submit, please let me know.  

Thanks in advance for your assistance!

Wendy Fincher

Can you provide some insight?  Thanks.  Michelle

In a message dated 11/13/01 11:10:20 PM Pacific Standard Time, Michelle.Cash@ENRON.com writes: 
           Can we use credited service date for sev calc?  I have a 
person who was hired in 1997, left in 1999 and was rehired 
           in April 2001.  The system is using a 1998 service date 
for severance.  I calculated in on the 2001 re hire date. 
Michelle, since the Plan is not administered centrally, it can be a challenge to learn what past practices were, especially if they differed from different work groups.  I've have always recommended centralized administration because an ERISA plan is required to be administered uniformly and consistently in similar circumstances.   
One place to check about past practices is Cynthia Barrow's group.  You may not know what all past practices were until the conclusion of discovery related to litigation.   
I don't know what past practices were, but I would start with Cynthia's group which I view as the source and reference point as to what the recommended practices should be. 
Pat 

Hi, Janette and Diane,

Based on my conversations with Mark, we are going to revise this letter a bit.  So, hold off on giving them to him until the next round! 

Thanks.

Michelle
Janette:

At Michelle Cash's request, I have prepared the attached letters for the CEO and two managing directors of RWE Trading.  We have set the letters up to go to both the Germany and United Kingdom addresses.  We are still working on an address and name for the General Counsel.  Since their London office is closed for the day, it will probably be Thursday morning before I get those details.

Please call me if you need additional information. Thanks.

Diane Goode
Senior Specialist
 << File: 5930-A mhc.doc >>  << File: 5930-B mhc.doc >>  << File: 5930-C mhc.doc >>  << File: 5930-D mhc.doc >>  << File: 5930-E mhc.doc >>  << File: 5930-F mhc.doc >> 

The intent is not to include 16b officers.  Payments will not be made if termination occurs prior to payment date.  I'll get back with you on the other issues.  Michelle

Just got off conference call with Wachovia to review trust arrangement particularly to ensure that this is effective in not triggering tax until time of payment rather than triggering tax at funding of trust.  We think this arrangement does that as long as the following is true:
Funds put in trust should not be paid out until 2002 to provide for "service period/vesting" requirement
Must be irrevocable i.e. funds can never come back to employer so need to be careful not to overfund

Also, to keep from being subject to ERISA, need to assume that payments are not delayed until termination.  (IF subject to ERISA, creates ugly reporting/compliance issues and discrimination testing.....)

 The issue of whether to set up a new employer i.d. to hold the trust is a question - might provide more security and protection in the event of bankruptcy but might create tax deductibility issues.  Might be better if we could set up subparts for different employers to ensure tax deductibility.  I will run by external tax counsel with utmost discretion.  

If this is to be used for non-U.S. employees, need to ensure arrangement doesn't trigger taxable event at funding due to local tax law.  May not be an issue.

Are we contemplating including any insiders?

 

 

Dan. I spoke with GP benefits counsel this morning. There are several business issues outstanding. Fran is trying to get with McMahon to get his take on tham. He is at EB where she is doing a Super Saturday. 

Janette:

At Michelle Cash's request, I have prepared the attached letters for the CEO and two managing directors of RWE Trading.  We have set the letters up to go to both the Germany and United Kingdom addresses.  We are still working on an address and name for the General Counsel.  Since their London office is closed for the day, it will probably be Thursday morning before I get those details.

Please call me if you need additional information. Thanks.

Diane Goode
Senior Specialist
      

Diane,  attached is the new nastygram.  Would you mind moving the names/addresses from the first draft into these (or move this text into the other -- whichever is easiest!!) and then sending to Janette for Mark's review?  Thanks!  Michelle 

Never mind on this -- Twanda took care of it.  Thanks!!  Michelle

Diane,  attached is the new nastygram.  Would you mind moving the names/addresses from the first draft into these (or move this text into the other -- whichever is easiest!!) and then sending to Janette for Mark's review?  Thanks!  Michelle 

As we discussed, here is the second set of Q&As.   Your comments would be appreciated.  Michelle

Please review the questions and answers in the attached spreadsheet.  Michelle Cash has reviewed the attached answers and will forward to other relevant/appropriate legal counsel for final review.  Please forward any revisions to me.  Thanks, Cole.

   

FYI -- I guess we'll all be busy.  Michelle

Michelle and Kriste: 
You probably know about this case already, but this was filed this week in Federal Court: 
Pamela Tittle et al. v. Enron Corp. et al. 
11/13/2001-3913 
The description of the facts are: 
Possible class action ERISA violation case in which the defendants failed to fulfill their fiduciary duties to an Enron employee retirement plan by misrepresenting the financial status of hedging agreements made with third party partnerships.
The plaintiff's attorney is Robin Harrison.  I know Robin quite well.  He does not do that much employment work, and is more of a commercial litigator.  As you know, I have done a substantial amount of ERISA work and would be interested in helping Enron out on this case.  Please let me know what we can do to help.
Kerry E Notestine 
Littler Mendelson, PC 
1900 Chevron Tower 
1301 McKinney Street 
Houston, Texas 77010 
713.652.4748 
713.951.9212 (fax) 
knotestine@littler.com 
www.littler.com 

Thanks!  I needed a little levity.  Michelle

 << File: 698[1].gif >> 

Mark Taylor
Vice President and General Counsel
Enron Wholesale Services
1400 Smith Street - EB3892
Houston, Texas 77008
(713)853-7459
(713)646-3490 (fax)

FYI
I have been asked to coordinate messaging and communication between the HR generalists and the Enron Human Resource Transition Coordination Team.  To that end, we will have an update meeting TODAY for HR Generalists to discuss activities that have occurred over the last few days and to ensure all of you have the same level of knowledge.  Your attendance is important to ensure the seamless flow of information across business lines. 

Meeting Details
Date:		TODAY, November 15th
Time:		3:30 p.m.
Location:	EB50M1 Dining

Conference Call Details:
Domestic:		888.422.7132
International:		334.264.8326
Participant Code:	784086
	
 
We realize that this process is taking time and we appreciate your continued patience and cooperation.  Should you have any questions or concerns about the process, please do not hesitate to contact me directly.

Cindy Skinner
Office 713. 853.0693
Cellular	713.412.9101
Home 281.412.4069

In case you didn't get this.  Michelle

=20

  <http://www.gifworks.com/queue/pilgram_pumpkin_md_wht_16172.gif>

=20

Please join us for an EWS HR Floor meeting -=20

When : Friday, November 16th

Where : Around EB 3678

Time : 8:30 a.m. - 9:30 a.m.

Please forward this on to anyone I might have left off of the distribution =
list. Thank you.

=20

Although this is EWS floor meeting, you may want to come to hear the messag=
es being delivered.  MHC

=20

  <http://www.gifworks.com/queue/pilgram_pumpkin_md_wht_16172.gif>

=20

Please join us for an EWS HR Floor meeting -=20

When : Friday, November 16th

Where : Around EB 3678

Time : 8:30 a.m. - 9:30 a.m.

Please forward this on to anyone I might have left off of the distribution =
list. Thank you.

=20

	Here are the details.  Michelle

OK. Should be payable to Enron Corp.,

I'll get letter drafted. Michelle, please help.

David, a couple of things:

1. Cheque. Will need to write you a UK cheque, have assumed an FX rate of
1.45 and and the Dollar amount is 77,919.66 , so that makes 53,737.70
Sterling. Who do I need to make the cheque out to? Can you also wait until I
give you the nod next week to cash it? The money should be in the account by
monday, but would like to make certain.

2. Could we draw up something brief in writing to cover our agreement from a
few evenings ago?

Everything hectic at present, we managed to get a removals company at short
notice, a flight back to blighty this weekend, and somewhere to stay in
London. Looking forward to working with the Enron Europe guys again.

Thanks for your help in all of this,

Jonathan

_________________________________________________________
Do You Yahoo!?
Get your free @yahoo.com address at http://mail.yahoo.com

OK. Final word is as follows;

Can we change para on bonus on exhibit a by deleting sentence beginning "All Performance Bonuses are discretionary...." and in addition also deleting the words in the second para "...under the Plan.." from the first sentence.

This is final change. He will sign or die.

David

David,

Just a question as to whether Dynegy has been notified that we are amending the contracts of these guys to delete minimum or target bonus and replacing with performance bonus memo?  We may want to send a brief email confirming the discussions and their consent so that we have it for our files.

Thanks.

Michelle

I understand your point on this and agree that someone may try to argue that it is due to them upon signing the offer letter.  Our practice and intent has been to pay after they start, and I believe that the letter refers to payment after they start, so there is some wiggle room on the other side.

I agree that it is not a "slam dunk" on our part, but my view is that the risk is worth not doing anything unless and until we get some sort of demand or claim.  We then can cross the bridge as to how to proceed.  In the meantime, I am comfortable with this level of risk.

Of course, if these folks are ones to whom we are paying any money, then the waiver should address the signing bonus issue.

Ya'll let me know if you disagree.

The initial view on this was that we should not pay signing bonuses when we revoke offers of employment, but I have continued to give thought to the issue and my concerns.  It appears that our offer letters refer to the bonus as a "sign-on bonus" and "signing bonus" and state that it will be paid within 30 days of hire.  The letter does not address what to do if we revoke, or if the applicant revokes.   

I think that based on the "signing" language, applicants could argue that because they signed, we owe signing bonuses.  

On the other hand, signing alone really can't be enough to justify payment; I don't think anyone would buy off on the idea that an applicant could sign, refuse to show up, and still be owed the bonus.  

Balancing those considerations, I think a viable argument can be made that an applicant who signs and professes a willingness to still show up must be paid the promised signing bonus.  As such, I think we have some exposure here.  I can't assess how much, in part because I don't have an estimate of the dollars at issue.  I do, however, understand that we plan to revoke approximately 100 offers, not necessarily all of which will involve signing bonuses. 

Any thoughts?

--Lizzette

Has this been approved by David Oxley?  If not, we can't proceed.  Thanks.  Michelle

Michelle,

Please run Scott Earnest's executables from his last draft.

Thanks,
Dave 

The meeting with Mark Haedicke has been scheduled for 2:00 tomorrow. 

Kerry, I suggest that you arrive by 1:45, as our security has increased significantly.  By copy of this email, I am asking Twanda to call the security console to alert them of your arrival.  Please ask for me when you arrive -- extension 36401.

We'll meet with Mark and then meet with David Oxley, who runs HR for the company, to discuss your role while I am out and beyond.

Thanks.

Michelle

Hi Dawn,

I am working on a project that requires the review of employment contracts.  I do not have signed copies of several Enron Canada agreements.  Would you mind faxing them down to me via Twanda as soon as possible on Friday?  We are on a Lavo deadline.   Thanks.

The people are:  Chad Clark, Mike Cowan, Paul Devries, Eric LeDain, Chris Dorland, John McKay, and John Zufferli (only if he signed the one we did for Enron Canada for him-- I have the ENA one dated 12/24/99).

I appreciate your assistance.  Please call Twanda before the fax arrives, as it is a central legal department fax and not a private one.

Thanks a lot!!

Michelle

	Twanda, how can we get these?  Can we enlist Knudsen's help?  Thanks.  Michelle

I am away from the office on Nov 16th, returning Nov 19th - I'll respond to your email on Nov 19th. 

Thank you.

Based on my review of the files, we do not have signed agreements for the following:

Tom Alonso*
Mark Fischer*
Ben Jacoby
Laura Luce
Mike McDonald
Narsimha Misra
Dave Parquet
Gregg Penman
Frank Vickers
Andy Zipper

Would you mind asking the vault if they have these?  If not, could you get with Knudsen to get them?

Thanks.  (By the way, no one should know why).

Thanks a lot!!

Michelle

Eric,

As mentioned in my voice mail, Pat McCarthy is the attorney we use for GSP employment matters.  I believe that he may be better suited to answer your questions (and may have the time while I am out on vacation next week).   His number is 973-966-8117.   I have left him a voice mail telling him that you may give him a call, so he will be prepared.

I hope that is helpful.

Michelle

Absolutely, I agree with that.  Michelle

agreed that there is some wiggle room because of the 30 days to pay language.  and, the waiver does address the signing bonus-- specifically states they won't get it.  
 
but with some employees, the signing bonus may exceed the amount we're offering for the waiver, so the incentive may be to not sign.  i suggest we remain open to considering paying the signing bonus if we get strong push back from an applicant.

I understand your point on this and agree that someone may try to argue that it is due to them upon signing the offer letter.  Our practice and intent has been to pay after they start, and I believe that the letter refers to payment after they start, so there is some wiggle room on the other side.

I agree that it is not a "slam dunk" on our part, but my view is that the risk is worth not doing anything unless and until we get some sort of demand or claim.  We then can cross the bridge as to how to proceed.  In the meantime, I am comfortable with this level of risk.

Of course, if these folks are ones to whom we are paying any money, then the waiver should address the signing bonus issue.

Ya'll let me know if you disagree. 

The initial view on this was that we should not pay signing bonuses when we revoke offers of employment, but I have continued to give thought to the issue and my concerns.  It appears that our offer letters refer to the bonus as a "sign-on bonus" and "signing bonus" and state that it will be paid within 30 days of hire.  The letter does not address what to do if we revoke, or if the applicant revokes.   

I think that based on the "signing" language, applicants could argue that because they signed, we owe signing bonuses.  

On the other hand, signing alone really can't be enough to justify payment; I don't think anyone would buy off on the idea that an applicant could sign, refuse to show up, and still be owed the bonus.  

Balancing those considerations, I think a viable argument can be made that an applicant who signs and professes a willingness to still show up must be paid the promised signing bonus.  As such, I think we have some exposure here.  I can't assess how much, in part because I don't have an estimate of the dollars at issue.  I do, however, understand that we plan to revoke approximately 100 offers, not necessarily all of which will involve signing bonuses. 

Any thoughts? 

--Lizzette 

I like the message and agree that communication is critical at this time.  Should we go right out and say that no one will be affected next week (more artfully phrased of course)?  I believe that is the right way to go (no terminations Thanksgiving week), so I'd like to go ahead and say it.  Michelle

Eric & Michelle,

Fran & Shanna would like to send this out to all EIM and EGM employees today from their respective OTC.  David and I have reviewed and agree that we should send.  We would like your thoughts and/or suggestions.

Thanks,

Robert

	FYI, I drafted this for Bowen to send out to All EIM employees in an effort to allay their fears that terminations will be
	occurring either today or next next.

	Fran

	

	This week, each business unit has been asked to identify the optimal structure and resources for EIM on a going forward basis..  
	 While the review is not complete, we are close to finalizing decisions surrounding the business and the employees associated with them.  
	
	Until the final decisions have been made, I ask for your continued patience. You will be notified at the appropriate time regarding the future 
	of the team.  

	Please take the opportunity to enjoy the time with your family next week at Thanksgiving and know that we are 
	working hard on finalizing all details.

Fran Mayes
HR Manager
Phone (713) 853-7211
Fax (713) 646-8100
Cell/Pager  713 875-3820 or
7138753820@messaging.nextel.com

FYI.  Michelle

Michelle--
This is from Gloria (at my spouseperson's laptop).  Attached below is my mark-up of the HR agreement sent to you earlier in the day by Lara.  A few comments:
*	I am willing to confine employment offers under 2.01(a) to "then available" jobs, so long as you are willing to confine the exclusion to folks on LTD.
*	I changed sick "leave" in the "vacation and sick leave" section to sick "pay," since we don't have sick days and I didn't want to confuse FMLA-- which, as I know you know, is not transferable between employers.
*	The language at 2.15(c) is essentially yours (which had gotten deleted), plus an additional clause in light of 2.01(a).
*	I added section 2.01(d) in light of the decisions regarding Simon Davies and John Reed, whose names will be deleted from Schedule B.
I will be in a meeting out of the office tomorrow a.m., but Lara knows how to reach me and I can be interrupted if you want to discuss any of this further.  I understand we're trying to get this stuff signed up tomorrow afternoon, so we should probably discuss as early in the day as we can.
Gloria
 <<331540_1_.doc>>

 - 331540_1_.doc 

I have retained Kerry Notestine from Littler Mendelson to help me on this project, so we don't need to get Bob Vote involved.

Michelle, 
After our conversation on Wednesday, we put together a summary of RIF Issues and Strategies to review with the key HR personnel.  Attached is a copy of the summary for your review.  In addition, attached is a copy of recommendations from a compliance  perspective on areas that we would like to see considered as plans are made.  Robert Jones has recommended that we meet with you and Robert Vote from a litigation perspective on what we should be looking at from a compliance standpoint, specifically with adverse impact analysis.  Please let me know when we can quickly get together. Thanks. ay

 << File: RIF Summary.doc >>  << File: Compliance and Diversity Layoff Recommendation.doc >> 

Andrea Yowman 
Enron Corp 
713-853-1477

yes, that would be great. Michelle

Michelle/Diane -

Do you want the same info from EEL?  We have record of approx.140 employment agreements in our database from EEL - some are expats, most are locals.  Please advise ASAP as we will need to get the London HR team working on theirs. 

Sheila

Sheila:  I understand Tammy is on vacation.  We need  someone to review the database that Tammy Joyner maintains and determine if the Business Unit named in the Employment Agreement is actually the Business Unit the employee is currently working for. If the employee is now working for a different Business Unit, then we will need to make sure the Agreement gets assigned to the appropriate Business Unit. 

So, we need a list of the employees whose Agreements to be assigned.

Please let me know who can get started on this project. 

By copy of this e-mail, we are asking Fran Mayes, Jeanie Slone, Shanna Funkhouser and Kim Melodick to let us know of any Agreements that need to be assigned.  We need to do this clean-up as soon as possible.

Cole, here are the revisions to the benefit plan q&a doc.  I think these are ready to go if these comments are incorporated -- but check with Barrow on them.  On your question about being able to put some of them on the web, let's go through which ones can go and which ones need to be further reviewed.  Thanks.  Michelle

Document attached. 

 - Merger Q&As m1.doc 

I agree, unless some of them have moved from EEL to ENA or vice versa.  In that situation, we definitely want to know about it so that the docs can be assigned.  Michelle

Michelle/Diane -

Please see Michele's response below.  With her explanation of how their agreements are structured, is this a relevant exercise for them to go through?

Sheila

Sheila,

We have been advising Houston this week that the Comp Database is not a reliable source of information for our Executive Agreements - we use SAP as our source information system.

However, please note that we do not have separate legal employing entities in the UK, for example EBS or EGM employees will always be hired on an Enron Europe Ltd. contract.  Therefore, all of our contracts should and do say Enron Europe Ltd. or if someone is employed in a regional office the employee will be employed under the legal entity for that office.  Given this, I am not sure whether the below will still be relevant - perhaps if you could let me know the objective here we will know which direction to go.

As it is late in the day / week here, we will pull our own report on Monday and double check on this then.  

Thanks and Regards
Michele
We have been asked by  Legal to audit all employment agreements to determine if the Business Unit named in the Employment Agreement is actually the BU the employee currently works for.  If the employee is now working for a different BU, the agreement will then be assigned to the appropriate BU.  The attached is a list of EEL agreements we pulled from  the Comp Database.  Can you review these agreements and note any which should be assigned to another BU.  Please add any we do not have on this list.

London/Houston Legal will need to coordinate on any assignments for those that have non-US based agreements.

They have asked for this info early next week.  Sorry for the short notice - we just got the request today.

Please call me or Kari Oquinn if you have any questions.  Thanks for your help.

Sheila

  

According to the Comp DB, the EEs indicated on the attachment are EEL's employees with Executable EE Agrmts.

 << File: KO_Active EE Agrmts - EEL.xls >> 

Pat, please let me know if my email of last night did not go through.  I am in the office now 713-853-6401.  Thanks!!  Michelle

Hi Michelle, 
I received your voice message about drafting an amendment to the Severance Pay Plan, but I have not received your email describing the design of the amendment. 
I have already drafted two amendments, a restated plan document and a form of resolution terminating the plan.  I should be able to make something fit the design you are sending me. 
I have canceled plans for the morning so that I can help with this project, and look forward to working with you to finalize the amendment. 
Pat 

FYI, Sharon will handle maintaining the list of all persons who are critical witnesses in future litigation so that we can take that into consideration when managing personnel decisions.  Michelle

Dear Michelle:. I'll be happy to keep the list.  Sharon

FYI -- I've been reviewing most of the Q&As on the questions raised post merger announcement.  I don't think you need to do much, but I wanted you to be aware that this was going on.  Michelle

Cynthia, I have incorporated Patrick Mackin's revisions per Michelle Cash's instruction.  Please review and let me know whether the Q&As are ready for final publication.  Your assistance in this regard is greatly appreciated.  Thanks, Cole.

  
Cole, here are the revisions to the benefit plan q&a doc.  I think these are ready to go if these comments are incorporated -- but check with Barrow on them.  On your question about being able to put some of them on the web, let's go through which ones can go and which ones need to be further reviewed.  Thanks.  Michelle

Document attached. 

 - Merger Q&As m1.doc 

Lizzette and Ryan,

Kriste and I substantially revised the waiver agreement today, so sit tight=
.

Kriste, do you want to add the mediation provision?  I'll leave that to you=
.

Michelle

Ryan,

I'm sending back down the mark ups to the rif packet you sent to me.  On th=
e waiver, I've scratched out some paragraphs and told you I would send othe=
r language.  This is it.  Call with questions.

4.=09Employee Benefits.  Except as otherwise provided in Section ___((the p=
aragraph with the dollar amount)), Employee shall be entitled to receive ve=
sted or accrued benefits due and payable to Employee under all employee ben=
efit plans and compensation plans, subject to the terms of those plans.=20

5.3.=09Cooperation.  Employee agrees that, at Company's request, he or she =
will devote reasonable time necessary to assist in Company's litigation mat=
ters, including, but not limited to, meeting with counsel, providing testim=
ony at depositions or trial, and related activities.

To the release paragraph (right after the bolded paragraph saying employee =
releases everything.... add this section (you may need to organize the sect=
ions):

b.=09This release does not apply to or include the consideration or benefit=
s described in Section 2 above or to other promises and representations con=
tained in this Agreement.  This release also does not apply to claims which=
 may arise after the date this release is signed. Employee understands that=
 he or she may challenge the knowing and voluntary nature of this release u=
nder the Older Worker Benefit Protection Act (OWBPA) and the ADEA before a =
court, the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission (EEOC), or any state or =
local agency charged with the enforcement of any discrimination laws, despi=
te the release language stated above. Employee also understands that nothin=
g in this release prevents him or her from filing a charge or complaint wit=
h or from participating in an investigation or proceeding conducted by the =
EEOC or any state or local agency charged with the enforcement of any discr=
imination laws.  Employee understands, however, that if he or she pursues a=
 claim against Company under the OWBPA and/or the ADEA, Company may seek to=
 set off the amount paid to Employee for signing this release against any a=
ward he or she may obtain in such legal proceeding, and Company may be enti=
tled to recover costs and attorney's fees incurred by the Company as specif=
ically authorized under applicable federal or state law.

Also add this:

d.=09Employee acknowledges, agrees, and represents to Company that:

(i)=09Employee has carefully read and fully understands the effect of the p=
rovisions of this Agreement, which he or she is entering knowingly and volu=
ntarily;

(ii)=09Employee has had a reasonable time of not less than 45 days in which=
 to consider this Agreement;

(iii)=09Employee was advised and encouraged to consult an attorney prior to=
 executing this Agreement with respect to the effect of the provisions of t=
his paragraph and Employee's execution of this Agreement; and

(iv)=09Employee acknowledges that he or she has received information concer=
ning the age and job titles of other persons in his or her job classificati=
on or organizational unit, if any, who are remaining employed with the Comp=
any, as well as the job titles and ages of the persons being offered paymen=
ts upon voluntary separation.  The voluntary separation applies to the grou=
ps, for the time periods, and based on the eligibility factors set forth in=
 the attached Exhibit "A."

=09Employee may revoke this Agreement during the seven-day period following=
 the date Employee signs this Agreement by delivering signed, written notic=
e of such revocation to Human Resources and as required under Section __, w=
hereupon this Agreement shall be rescinded in its entirety and become null =
and void. =20

Add this as well:=20

7.10=09Mediation.  If a dispute arises out of or related to Employee's empl=
oyment with Company, or this Agreement, and if the dispute cannot be settle=
d through direct discussions, then Company and Employee agree to try to set=
tle the dispute in an amicable manner by confidential mediation before havi=
ng recourse to any other proceeding or forum.

Please send it to me again, and I will help organize as needed and check to=
 see if we need to add any other major provisions. =20
--Lizzette

	FYI.  Let us know if these folks are appropriate to include on our "critical for litigation" list.  Thanks!  Michelle

I'm wanting to use Martin Saachi and Steven Sheldon, both directors from EBS.  The quant work would be people from Vince's shop that are probably not as effected by the 'surplusing'.  I'll confirm Monday.  Thanks, Sherron.

I need to have the names as soon as possible, even if they may choose not to do it.  Thanks.  Michelle

Michele - I have not yet gotten a hold of the 2 individuals I'd like to work with on this.  Mark H. had asked me not speak to them until after I'd met with Richard Sanders.  At any rate, I should be able to speak to them next week and get their names to you - I want to ensure that they want to work on the project.  I'll be in touch as soon as possible next week.  Regards, Sherron

Sherron S. Watkins
Vice President, Enron Corp.
713-345-8799 office
713-416-0620 cell

Thanks a lot for managing this!

Mike Muskat called me back this morning.  I've passed along my comments and changes.  He will send a revised version today for your review next.
 
Lizzette
 

This will just be Rome and Enron.  Although we believe that most of his claims really are against HMS, his lawyer is claiming that Enron used HMS to defraud Rome.  His lawsuit will be against only Enron.  Therefore, it makes no sense to drag HMS into this at this point (although they probably will have to be involved in some fashion after suit is filed).  

Have we received a list of other people that will be involved in the mediation?  Hanover Compressor, Hanover Measurement, etc.

Kevin

I have spoken with Kevin on this.  Rome's attorney has asked for a mediation with Gary McGowan, who is an outstanding mediator.  We have agreed.  My paralegal, Diane Goode, will be calling you to schedule the mediation time as well as time for a preparation meeting.  I am in the process of preparing a chronology of events for you and Kevin, since he said that you should be the one involved in such a mediation.

If, prior to that, you would like to engage Rome in settlement discussions directly, feel free to do so.  I doubt that he will want to talk about it without his lawyer.

He still is an employee, but his deadline for redeployment is 10/31, at which time his employment will be terminated.  We will continue to honor his contract and pay him through the end of the Term, although he will not remain an employee of Enron.

Let me know if you have any questions.

Michelle

Michelle:

What is the status of Bill Rome?  Kevin Garland would like me to take another run at reaching some mutually agreeable solutioin with Bill.  Have we paid him the remainder of his contract?

Kevin

Valeria,
 
I agree that we need her to execute that note by a date certain.  This has gone on too long.

Michelle

This is really great news!  I think that we need to let her know that Dale is interested in having her transfer to his group but we still have the outstanding issue of the promissory note.  We need to let her know that she needs to take care of that matter or she will not be able to retain her employment with Enron.  Since she has had it for quite some time we need to give her a short window to comply.  What do you think?
 
Valeria

Valeria/Michelle -  Chevondra was offered a 30-day trail period working for Dale Neuner and if she was successful in her efforts, then she would have an option to officially transfer to Dale's department.  The trial period was complete as of November 15th and Dale has contacted EGM HR requesting the transfer of Chevondra into his group.

However, there was a contingency in Chevondra's transfer.  She was to sign a promissory note (for outstanding personal calls on a company cell phone), as well as return the company cell phone.  Shanna and I are unaware of  the cell phone or the signed promissory note being returned at this time. 

Could you please provide the recommended next steps?  

Regards, 
Kim Hickok 
Staff - EGM HR 
Office: 713-345-4019 
Pager: 877-547-6061 

Lance,

Thanks for passing this message on -- it is good to know what is on the rumor mill, and nobody who knows what I do ever passes those on to me directly!

I believe that we should carefully stay away from any statement that cuts are based on mid-year PRC, as that would not be the best legal defense to have.   

Instead, HR, with assistance from legal, has put forth a matrix for businesses to use in determining which employees, if any, will be affected.  Listed on that matrix include factors such as job criticality (which is weighted to be twice as significant as any of the other factors), ability to perform several different types of jobs, business knowledge, leadership, teamwork, and historical performance over the last 18 months.  PRC results would not be the sole factor.  Otherwise, someone who is the only person who knows how to do a mission-critical job might be affected simply because he rated out lower at mid-year review.  That result obviously would be disasterous.

Michelle

W. Lance Schuler
Lance,

  I have been told that all cuts will be based on PRC.  Kristina Mordaunt was my last reviewer and I have serious doubts about the fairness of her review.  If this becomes an issue, I would appreciate it if you would talk to Paul Racicot and Jim Fallon about the quality of my performance at EBS.  Thanks

I think this looks good.  For simplicity, I would use the ethnic codes we have in datamart/sap rather than creating new ones. That makes it easier to populate.  One other field to add would be visa status.  
 
As with the other documents, I believe that the population of these documents can be done now, with just the blank for "yes" or "no" for layoff waiting for the rest of the process.  You probably will have to run these by the generalist, Valeria or someone in ER team, and the attorneys for the special risk factors column.
 
Be sure and mark this document as privileged and confidential, prepared at the direction of counsel, so that we can protect the privilege of this document if necessary.
 
Thanks.
 
Michelle

I took a shot at combining the two spreadsheets.  Michelle, please provide correct ethic codes (I just guessed).  Tana, I'll need some help formatting the "Yrs. of Svc." and "Age" columns to calculate after we input date of hire and date of birth.  Comments?
 
Thanks,
 
Cindy

Pat, I really like that approach.  Looks great to me!  Michelle

Document attached. 

 - 2k01 sc design m2.doc << File: 2k01 sc design m2.doc >> 

Kriste, did you get this?  If not, I think it really works!!  Michelle

Document attached. 

 - 2k01 sc design m2.doc 

Pat, I am not sure if your email to Kriste went through -- I've forwarded it to her.  BUt, FYI, her address is kriste.sullivan@enron.com.  Thanks for all your help!

Document attached. 

 - 2k01 sc design m2.doc << File: 2k01 sc design m2.doc >> 

Kriste,

I believe that all but one of the amendments/bonus memo documents are complete.  The only one in question is for Brian Redmond, whose contract we did not have.  Jeanie is going to pull the contract in the morning and give it to Twanda.  Twanda will prepare the draft amendment and change to the memo and get it to Kriste for finalizing.  

Then (I hope) we'll be done!!!!

Thanks.

Michelle

PS, the number to the grammar hotline is 713-221-8670.

Stewart called me last week for some advice.  I had to leave a message for him when I called him back.  So, I gave him your names as backup in case he needs immediate assistance.  

Just wanted you to know that he might be calling one of you.

Michelle

David,

Late last week, I received a call from Kristen Kracraft, who does employment law at Dynegy.  She indicated that they would like for there to be a protocol for how to handle things if there is a desire to allow the hiring of employees from Dynegy to Enron or vice versa.  Of course, such hiring would have to be coordinated at the top of the company to avoid any type of free-for-all.  At a minimum, I would think that you and Andrea Lang would have to be the ones who make the decisions.  With that thought, I have asked Tim O'Rourke's team to work on such a protocol.

In the meantime, Kristen mentioned that one person in Rick Shapiro's group wants to go to Dynegy.  She understood that Shapiro had said it was ok.  Do you know about that?  If not, should you give Andrea a call about it?  I am concerned about the floodgate effect, so I believe we should proceed with extreme caution.

Let me know your thoughts on this.  

Michelle

Michelle,

I rec'vd the FAXed DRAFT document for Laird Dyer.  The contract is fine.  Please execute the agreement and send to Robert to sign.

NOTE:  There is not a signed copy of the Confidentiality and Intellectual Property Rights Agreement in Laird's file.  He is signing the Agreement w/ today's date (10/15/01).

Thanks!  Julie K

Julie Kearney
EWS Human Resources
503) 464-7404
julie_kearney@enron.com

Here is a proposed communication regarding severance plan changes.  This proposal makes me most nervous.  My recommendation would be to let everyone know it has been restated and attach an electronic copy of the new plan, thus letting the plan speak for itself.  We then could arm HR with a list of FAQs to address the changes without publishing anything other than the plan to the population as a whole.  What do you think?

Also, Kriste, we will have to determine the audience for severance plan communication, as not all Enron entities have this plan (e.g., NEPCO).  Same thing with vacation.  

Michelle

Here's a revised version of the severence/policy memo.  Michele, should we discuss how to address the severence plan in an email?  I included an alternative here to direct people to a website with the plan.

 

I am a bit unclear.  Are these ready for my final review yet?  If so, I will get right on them.  Michelle

Thanks for the info, Rick.  We also need to add one more question to the supervisor Q&A:  Will I still receive severance if the company files for bankruptcy? thx. kd

Mary, based on the most current information:  
1.	A&B employees will receive bonus consideration however the amount is not dependant or determined by their A / B designation.   Accordingly, any mention of bonus in the scripts will need to rely on what we have said in the past, I.E. Bonus will be dependant on financial performance and employee contributions over the past year.  
As result of this interpitation, Bonus, albeit a element of retention, should not be included as an inducement to retention at this time.  (source - Aaron Brown) 
2.	The employees on the D - list are being placed on paid furlough and being terminated at a known date in the future.  That period of earning calculated to be a severance plan offset.   Employees who work up to their specific term date ( C-list) will be receiving their normal pay; then their severance pay, without a severance plan offset.  Michelle Cash is working with Pat Mackin to define the severance plan features that will govern this timing and the corresponding explanations.     
I have a couple of questions about the scripts that Rick Johnson sent me

1.  For A and B employees, will there be bonuses.  It's crossed out on the A script and left in the B script.
2.  In the C script:
	Please explain what a 60-day notice w/o severance plan off-set means.
	When does severance go into effect for C employees?  It's not clear in the script.

Thanks.

Mary E. Clark
Director, Internal Communications
Phone:  713-853-7325
Fax:  713-853-6790
e-mail:  mary.clark@enron.com

Thanks, I agree.  Michelle

In a message dated 11/25/01 2:35:26 PM Pacific Standard Time, Michelle.Cash@ENRON.com writes: 
My recommendation would be to let 
everyone know it has been restated and attach an electronic copy of the 
new plan, thus letting the plan speak for itself. 
Michelle, this was the combined recommendation of Kriste, Kerry N. and myself.   
Pat 

Karen, is this now ready for my review?

Here are my edits and some additional questions...

 << File: business restructuring supervisor Q&A.doc >> 

Attached please find the Q&A for supervisors.  Please forward your review and comment version to Michelle Cash for legal compliance. -  Please note, the internal HR Q&A document, containing details on comp and benefits will not be circulated until noon Monday at the earliest.  
Regards, Rj.

 << File: QAsupervisor - Terminated.doc >>  

This is great!  Thanks for the info.  Michelle

Kevin / Michelle:

As I get ready for this mediation, I thought that these various presentations to ECT senior management (McConnell, Pres. of HPL, Rice and Hannon) would be helpful.  Special attention to the Hannon presentation which clearly shows that the real benefits of this new company were NOT primarily related to the monetization of the equipment (which Bill Rome contends), but instead were related to new business earnings and substantial cost savings.  This also has proved itself out as we go forward.

Kevin

for a little laugh, but walks through the original deal strategic concept (which has nothing to do with a financing)
 << File: Story.ppt >> 
what you used to sell the deal to mcconnell

 << File: McConnell.ppt >>  
and the versions given to rice and hannon respectively
 << File: Rice.ppt >>  << File: hannon.ppt >> 
and the presentation given to hms employees re: new business opportunity
 << File: HMS Final Presentation.ppt >> 

have saved other analysis, etc if you need it...

This is fine, but is it harsh enough?  

Michelle,
 
Below is a draft discipline letter for your approval.  It is intended to be used with employees who are determined to be posting to web-based bulleting boards during company hours.
 
You approved this a year or so ago, but I wanted to run it by you again in case anything has changed.
 
Ben
********
  

NAME,

An investigation has determined that you have participated in discussions on web-based bulletin boards during working hours.  Your comments, posted using company equipment and using a name intended to hide your identity, concerned Enron issues that could possibly be construed as insider information.  This activity is in direct violation of Enron's Code of Ethics. <?xml:namespace prefix = o ns = "urn:schemas-microsoft-com:office:office" />

You are to immediately cease this activity and come into compliance with Enron's Code of Ethics. Repeated violations will subject you to further discipline, up to and including termination.

 

Supervisor/HR Rep

DATE

I got a call from Rome's lawyer, who wants to call the whole thing off because he doesn't think he'll get the money he wants.  I told him we were ready and willing to proceed.  He was going to call the mediator to see if he could cancel without incurring the mediation fees.  So, I'll keep you posted.  Michelle

Michelle:
 I am currently leading the due diligence effort for Northern Natural Gas and Transwestern Pipeline as it relates to the Dynegy merger.  Dynegy has scheduled an all day due diligence session this Thursday beginning at 9 a.m. which obviously conflicts with the Bill Rome Mediation.  First thought: can we re-schedule? Second thought: the Dynegy meeting will be here at Enron - I can be in and out of the meeting but need to be here in the building.  In addition, how long will this take?  I would rather not re-schedule the mediation if at all possible but can't re-schedule the Dynegy meeting either.

Kevin

I am not sure I understand the question.  Give me a call when you have a chance.  Michelle

Michelle, any and all help on this one would be greatly appreciated.  Thanks, Cole.
Tim, a new kind of question.  Can you run this one by Michelle?

With all of the losses and their tax implications, is there a company resource we can use for information rather than struggling to find information ourselves?  Also, a number of employees (in this area) are considering bankruptcy, is Enron considering contracting with a Legal Firm to help employees in this area?

Craig Buehler  x3-6964

My recommendation would be that we don't comment at all, but let the terms of the Plan and the related waivers speak for themselves.  We cannot provide them with legal advice.  Michelle

Here is my suggested response:
Enron's policy is to not comment on current litigation.  With respect to severance, if an Enron employee is let go prior to the merger, and is eligible for benefits under the Enron Corp. Severance Plan, then the terms of that plan will govern.  No changes to the severance plan have been made at this time.  In general, however, any severance waiver signed will include a release of claims for any and all conduct that has occurred to date.  Post merger, employees will be eligible for benefits under whatever severance plan the merged company adopts, including with respect to waiver requirements.  

--Lizzette

Lizzette, can you help us draft an answer to these questions?  Thanks, Cole.
Rick or Cole,

PR received the following question.  We'd like to have an answer prepared, but don't plan to post it or include it in any of the Q&A that will accompany scripts.  (You may want to include it in an HR Q&A or post to LiveLink.)

Q.  If I am a party to a 401K class action suite against Enron, how will that affect my severance if I am involuntarily terminated?

Related Q.  If I am involuntarily terminated and required to sign a waiver as part of the severance package, can I participate in an employee or shareholder class action suite against Enron.

Fyi
 <<Meeting   Year-End Process & Global Compensation System Meeting (Lunch will be Provided) - tw.ics>> 

I don't think that is true.  Our waiver does contemplate such a release of claims.  I think we should not comment on legal questions and let the terms of our plan and the separation agreements speak for themselves.

Terrie, Cole; I'm forwarding these to Michelle.  Michelle, my view:  1.  Employees who qualify to the 401K class, may exercise their rights without risking their severance.   The severance waiver is not a universal surrender of rights to bring claims.   Regards, Rj.       

Rick or Cole,

PR received the following question.  We'd like to have an answer prepared, but don't plan to post it or include it in any of the Q&A that will accompany scripts.  (You may want to include it in an HR Q&A or post to LiveLink.)

Q.  If I am a party to a 401K class action suite against Enron, how will that affect my severance if I am involuntarily terminated?

Related Q.  If I am involuntarily terminated and required to sign a waiver as part of the severance package, can I participate in an employee or shareholder class action suite against Enron.

I agree.

I don't think the plan would call for an employee to withdraw from litigation to be eligible for benefits--just that the employee sign the waiver.  Then, I think that in the employee's lawsuit we'd argue that the waiver released the claims and that the claims should be dismissed.

--Lizzette

Michelle, Lizzette;  is it our view that an employee who has subscribed to a class seeking certification would need to withdraw prior to executing the waiver?  

I agree with Michelle.  I'm certain that the releases is designed to release such conduct.

--Lizzette

I don't think that is true.  Our waiver does contemplate such a release of claims.  I think we should not comment on legal questions and let the terms of our plan and the separation agreements speak for themselves.

Terrie, Cole; I'm forwarding these to Michelle.  Michelle, my view:  1.  Employees who qualify to the 401K class, may exercise their rights without risking their severance.   The severance waiver is not a universal surrender of rights to bring claims.   Regards, Rj.       

Rick or Cole,

PR received the following question.  We'd like to have an answer prepared, but don't plan to post it or include it in any of the Q&A that will accompany scripts.  (You may want to include it in an HR Q&A or post to LiveLink.)

Q.  If I am a party to a 401K class action suite against Enron, how will that affect my severance if I am involuntarily terminated?

Related Q.  If I am involuntarily terminated and required to sign a waiver as part of the severance package, can I participate in an employee or shareholder class action suite against Enron.

I'd like a copy of that, if possible.

I think it should state:  Confidential and Proprietary -- Not to be Disclosed to Persons Other Than Human Resources and Legal Department.  If possible, put it on all documents, as well as the cover of the notebook.  

Michelle

As soon as we receive notice to move ahead, generalists will receive a training binder outlining the process of the WARN notifications.  I assume we need to mark these documents as confidential and proprietary.  Is there any specific wording you would like on either a introduction page or as a footer on each page?  Please let me know ASAP so I can finalize the documents.

Thanks - Tana  

Go ahead and pose the question, but the answer should be that we don't comment at all on litigation, and that the terms of severance plan and related waivers will govern the situation.  We should reiterate that we can't provide with legal advice.  Michelle

so what's the final call?  can we post this Q&A on the Livelink tool for HR generalists?

My recommendation would be that we don't comment at all, but let the terms of the Plan and the related waivers speak for themselves.  We cannot provide them with legal advice.  Michelle

Here is my suggested response:
Enron's policy is to not comment on current litigation.  With respect to severance, if an Enron employee is let go prior to the merger, and is eligible for benefits under the Enron Corp. Severance Plan, then the terms of that plan will govern.  No changes to the severance plan have been made at this time.  In general, however, any severance waiver signed will include a release of claims for any and all conduct that has occurred to date.  Post merger, employees will be eligible for benefits under whatever severance plan the merged company adopts, including with respect to waiver requirements.  

--Lizzette

Lizzette, can you help us draft an answer to these questions?  Thanks, Cole.
Rick or Cole,

PR received the following question.  We'd like to have an answer prepared, but don't plan to post it or include it in any of the Q&A that will accompany scripts.  (You may want to include it in an HR Q&A or post to LiveLink.)

Q.  If I am a party to a 401K class action suite against Enron, how will that affect my severance if I am involuntarily terminated?

Related Q.  If I am involuntarily terminated and required to sign a waiver as part of the severance package, can I participate in an employee or shareholder class action suite against Enron.

What is he asking?  

Do you think we should answer this question?
I am not sure I understand the question.  Give me a call when you have a chance.  Michelle

Michelle, any and all help on this one would be greatly appreciated.  Thanks, Cole.
Tim, a new kind of question.  Can you run this one by Michelle?

With all of the losses and their tax implications, is there a company resource we can use for information rather than struggling to find information ourselves?  Also, a number of employees (in this area) are considering bankruptcy, is Enron considering contracting with a Legal Firm to help employees in this area?

Craig Buehler  x3-6964

It is in the Q&As already posted.  We cannot comment on HR policies/plans f=
or Dynegy or for the merged entity because we simply don't know.  Michelle

Michelle, are you comfortable answering this question?  Thanks, Cole.
Another one on the severance.

The following question was posed during a departmental conference call.  Pl=
ease respond with an answer to the whole group.  Thanks.

Do you know what the severance package might be for lay-offs associated wit=
h the merger?

Planning & Power Services:  If you have other questions, please direct them=
 to questions@enron.com.  This is the most reliable source for information.=
  Thanks.

Molly Carnes CPS
Administrative Coordinator
Office of John R. Keller
Enron Transportation Services
713-345-5338
molly.carnes@enron.com

Simone, how do I get to LiveLink again?

 << OLE Object: Picture (Metafile) >>=20

To date, we have loaded Q&A's on the following subjects:
Tuition Reimbursement (Benefits);
HR Activities;=20
Immigration and Visas;=20
Stocks and Options;
Clickathome (Worklife); and
Litigation (Worklife)

If you experience any technical difficulties, please don't hesitate to cont=
act Simone Lewis @ 3-1645.

\

I think that ya'll have handled the legal work for these entities in the past.  Can you provide Ann with this information asap?  Thanks!  Michelle

Michelle,

Here's the list of information I need for Northern Natural Gas:

1.  EEOC charges, lawsuits and/or judgments entered or settlement agreements reached in the last 2 years (including discrimination, harassment, workers' comp and ERISA claims, or otherwise), including any compliance agreements, consent decrees, etc. with any governmental agency (i.e..  OFCCP, EEOC, DOL, etc.)

2.  List of any pending government compliance audits, administrative proceedings, employee grievances regarding compliance with wage, overtime, or safety and health issues.

I talked with Valeria and she is pulling the EEOC charge information.  Of course, I need this as soon as possible.  Thanks for your help.

Ann

Claudia, would you please arrange to have these collected?  Thanks.  Michelle

Iris S. Waser 
X3-6059 
EB 4749b 

I have reviewed the contract for Brent.  He has a 3-month non-compete after the termination of his employment.  Is he planning to honor it?  If not, we have to make decisions about pursuing him in court.

Michelle

Great idea to put this out there.  FYI, I have arranged for Jack Wisdom to provide some training on wage and hour law issues in the next few weeks.  I'll keep you posted on the status of that.  Michelle

fyi...

Dear Felecia:

This is a great HR Reminder.  I recommend that you send it to Michelle Cash, Lizzette Palmer, and Kriste Sullivan.

Thanks.

Sharon

To Corporate HR Generalists,  Compensation and Payroll

Periodically, I plan to communicate refreshers on the FLSA and its requirements for both exempt and non-exempt employees.  For this communication, I would like to focus on compensatory time off.  While Enron does not have a formal written policy on compensatory time off, we must not forget the regulatory obligations for administering this provision of the FLSA.   I encourage each of you to share this information with your client groups.

I recently overheard a conversation in the elevator where an employee was talking about all the comp time they had accrued and how they planned to take it before yearend.  Several immediate and simultaneous thoughts went through my head -- 1) is this an exempt or nonexempt employee, 2) where is this being recorded, and 3) what if this employee gets redeployed/termed or transfers jobs--would they expect to take this time off or in the case of a nonexempt employee be paid for it?  Unfortunately, we have no way to validate comp time since we have no tracking mechanism for this.  In the case of a nonexempt employee this could become a very risky situation.

Compensatory Time Off for Non-Exempt Employees

Compensatory time off for non-exempt employees must be used in the same pay period in which it is accrued.  If an employee works overtime in a workweek which falls at the beginning of a pay period, then the employee can take time off with pay in a workweek later in the same pay period.  If an employee cannot use all of the accrued comp time by the end of the pay period, then the employee must be paid for the comp time in the paycheck for the pay period.  Any comp time which is used by nonexempt employees must be provided at the rate of one and one-half hours off with pay for every overtime hour which is worked.  There is no cost savings in the use of comp time.  

Compensatory Time Off for Exempt Employees

If an employer promises comp time to an overtime exempt employee, then the employee may be able to enforce the promise of additional compensation even though the employee was not entitled to overtime pay.  Enron's Overtime Pay and Reimbursement Policy states "Exempt employees are not eligible for overtime pay."   Responding to an exempt employee's claim that he or she is entitled to comp time is often difficult because records are not generally kept of exempt employee's hours of work--(I plan to devote my next communication to tracking an exempt employee's hours worked as this is often an area of confusion).  The provisions of comp time may also adversely affect the "salary" which must be paid for white-collar employees to be overtime exempt. 

I hope this communication will be helpful and I welcome any feedback or suggested topics you may want additional information about.  Please feel free to pass this on to anyone I overlooked in your respective groups.

Felecia Acevedo
Director, Corporate Compensation
(713) 853-9815 Phone
(713) 646-2113 Fax
(713) 557-5921 Cell
felecia.acevedo@enron.com

Under the Enron Corp. severance plan, can we provide employees with the opportunity to take voluntary termination in lieu of future involuntary term?  One of our offices wants to offer employees that opportunity, with some sort of enhanced benefit if they take it.  

Your quick thoughts on this would be appreciated.

Michelle

As a follow up to the discussion today, this may be of assistance.  Michell=
e

FYI and akin to our meeting this morning.

Sandra

[IMAGE]
The  EmploymentSource Newsletter=20
SPECIAL EDITION
Our Mission is To Help Employers Enhance Employee  Relations While Minimizi=
ng Employment  Claims.
Please forward this  newsletter to your friends and co-workers.  To subscri=
ber or  unsubscribe, see bottom of newsletter.

We at EPS share our grief and prayers with our  fellow Americans in the wak=
e of the terrorist attacks.  We offer our  condolences to those of you who =
have lost loved ones, friends, or colleagues.  This tragedy has touched eac=
h of our lives  While focusing on  business-as-usual is difficult right now=
, we are moving quickly to  adapt to the needs of our clients. We are addin=
g special segments to our HR  classes to address organizational response an=
d workers' reactions to the crisis,  and we will continue to work to meet y=
our special needs. We are committed  to providing a compassionate resource =
should you need  one.

What  NOW?
Kathleen K. Edmond, Esq., MBA,  LICSW
Employment  Practices Solutions, Senior Consultant, Minneapolis/St.  Paulke=
dmond@epexperts.com=20
 (800)  727-2766
=20
Soon, very soon, we will all need to  get ourselves and our companies back =
to business - whether we are ready or  not.  How can we do this in a way  t=
hat is respectful and helpful, but at the same time doesn't create issues t=
hat  do not exist?
First, understand that we  are all affected.  Not just those of  us who had=
 family, friends, co-workers, or neighbors in New York, Washington, or  who=
 were passengers on the airlines.   Our world has permanently changed.   Th=
is is not a dramatic overstatement.  It is simply the truth.  We cannot und=
o what happened yesterday  but we can influence how we deal with the change=
 and how we can be stronger as a  result of the horrible attack on our coun=
try, our safety, and our sense of  security yesterday.
Let me simply make a  list.  I apologize if this is not  Pulitzer Prize mat=
erial.  Timeliness  is the most important factor at the moment. =20
Speak to the  organization.  Pull management  together first to discuss the=
ir responsibilities as managers and give them  guidance.  Acknowledge their=
 dual  roles as managers in the organization and individuals with personal =
 feelings.  While it will take time  to absorb the full impact of what has =
happened, it will be necessary to get  back to the business at hand. =20
Depending on the size  and configuration of the organization, talk to every=
one as a group.  Either get them together in person, a  group e-mail, voice=
mail, teleconference - whatever means are available to  you.  At this point=
 it is most  important to let people know that we are all stunned but that =
we are pulling  together.  It is not important to  have all the answers rig=
ht now.   Communication will continue. =20
Acknowledge that our  world is now different.  The sense  of safety and sec=
urity we had before September 11th is gone.  We must each individually and =
 organizationally replace that with something different. =20
Acknowledge that  individuals will respond and recover at different paces. =
 Some will want to get back to work as  quickly as possible to regain their=
 sense of normalcy and control.  Others will have difficulty focusing  for =
a long time.  Most likely it  will be sporadic and not a constant inability=
 to focus.  This is a very normal response to a  crisis. =20
Depending on your  organization and the level of direct impact, you may cho=
ose to bring a  professional counselor or team of counselors on site for a =
day or longer.  They can conduct group processes and  individual counseling=
. =20
Another possibility is  a chat room where employees can share their experie=
nces, feelings, and have a  place to vent.  The question will  arise, how l=
ong should the chat room be operational.  For right now, don't set a time l=
imit,  but review it in a couple of weeks or a month.  If participation is =
decreasing (which  I except that it will in a month), determine a date to c=
lose it down and make  an organizational announcement to that effect.  When=
 closing it down, don't go dark  without notice.  Just let people  know tha=
t it is time to end that part of the recovery process. =20
Allow people to talk  periodically during the day.  The  need for the amoun=
t of discussion will change over the next weeks.  In the next day or so pro=
bably little  work will get done.  But by the  end of the week and certainl=
y next week, business will resume. =20
Consider allowing employees additional  personal time off for memorial serv=
ices, blood donations, or other  community-focused recovery events. =20
Remind people to use  your Employee Assistance Program, company counselors,=
 health benefits,  religious leaders, and other local counseling resources =
as available.  Have someone in the organization pull  together a resource l=
ist of local and organizational telephone numbers for  employees and their =
families. =20
Talk about the impact  on your specific business and what effect if any it =
has on your company.  Maybe it affects your communications,  transportation=
, distribution, or some other aspect of your operations. =20
If  members of your corporate family have been killed in these attacks, con=
sider a  memorial service later this week or next for all employees to atte=
nd, whether  they personally knew the individual(s) or not. =20
Assure them that  business will go on, subdued perhaps, different in some w=
ays, but there will  be continuity. =20
Recognize that people  will be angry, sad, scared and confused for some per=
iod of time.  The risk of discriminatory judgments  and remarks is increase=
d.  If you  hear such remarks, challenge, gently if necessary, but help peo=
ple understand  that it is a normal reaction to the attacks on our safety. =
=20
Remind them to take  care of themselves and their families and friends.  It=
 is important to keep talking to  each other and their children, even those=
 very young children.  Here is a good article they can  use:  www.womencent=
ral.msn.com/parenting/articles/tragedy.asp=20

We do not know what will be happening in the next weeks or  months.  There =
may be additional  armed conflict.  We have entered a  time of uncertainty =
that will continue to affect the national psyche and our  individual lives.=
  As organizations  we are well advised to be prepared to address the effec=
t it will have on our  employees.
You will need to address the corporate travel policy.  What will you do if =
an employee is  afraid to travel to New York for a business trip?  Consider=
 making other meeting  arrangements, at least for the near term.
Longer term you will have questions about what to do with  employees who ca=
nnot seem to focus after a reasonable length of time.  And you will have qu=
estions about what  is a reasonable length of time and proper disciplinary =
actions if needed.  We will address those questions as they  arise, but for=
 now they are beyond the scope of this communication.  Please feel free to =
email or call us if  you have specific questions.
Yesterday I was conducting  a Best  Practices seminar in Minneapolis as the=
 terrorist attacks were  unfolding on the East Coast.  As we  did not know =
the magnitude of what was about to happen we decided to continue  with the =
work in front of us but to be cognizant of the events that were  occurring.=
  The day and the response  of the participants were instructive to what to=
 expect at work.  Participants were engaged, but at some  level distracted.=
  We took a break  every hour or so for an update on events.   We talked ab=
out our personal feelings.  We changed our agenda to spend the last  half h=
our of the day planning about how we would lead our organizations through  =
this tragedy.  We discussed the role  of Human Resources and the Legal depa=
rtments.  We wondered at the inconsistency of the  beautiful day, the sunsh=
ine and the green grass in the suburbs of Minneapolis  and the horror we we=
re hearing on the news.  We encouraged people who had two hours  of drive t=
ime to leave a half hour early to be home with their families.  We all took=
 calls and made calls during  the day to check on family and friends.
In other words, we took  care of ourselves, and we took care of others.  We=
 also worked, and planned for the  future.  I urge you to do the  same.

 About the  author: =20
Kathleen Knutson Edmond is a  Senior consultant with Employment Practices S=
olutions, Inc. and is located in  the Minneapolis/St. Paul office.   Kathle=
en has worked in the Human Resources field as a management  consultant an i=
n-house attorney for a large national retailer.  In addition  to her law de=
gree, she has earned an MBA, is a certified mediator specializing  in emplo=
yment disputes, and is a licensed independent clinical social  worker.   Ov=
er the years Kathleen has counseled, coached, and trained  several thousand=
 employees and managers on a broad spectrum, of human resource  and busines=
s operations issues.   Kathleen can be reached at kedmond@epexperts.com . =
=20

Copyright 2001 Employment Practices Solutions, All  Rights Reserved=20
Feel free to  reprint any articles from this newsletter with appropriate at=
tribution to author  and publication.=20
We respect your privacy and will not release your email  address to any thi=
rd parties. If you are an employment attorney or HR professional and would =
like to  submit an article, please contact us: eps@epexperts.com  To unsubs=
cribe: EPS-request@list.epexperts.com   with 'unsubscribe' in message body.=
  Not a  subscriber?  EPS-request@list.epexperts.com   with 'subscribe' in =
message body.  Questions or  comments? eps@epexperts.com .
 - eps1in.jpg

We are working on this issue this week by meeting with Joe Dilg and putting forth a summary memo of the history of the situation, the pay requirements under the contract, and recommendations of how to move forward.  That will be done this week, and everyone on this email will be copied on it.  Michelle

Mary & Pam -- Diomedes has sent me a number of messages this week asking about the status of the payment(s) under the ECI Buyout Agreement.  I have been putting him off now for several weeks but he is justifiably asking for an explanation as to what the issue is.  He is planning to be in Houston tomorrow and Friday and wanted to know who he could talk to about this, short of calling Ken Lay.  It may be most appropriate for him to simply call Ken but I'd like to know from you how you would you like to handle this.  

Based on my reading of the contract, I believe it is clear that we owe him (i.e., ECI) payments under the ECI contract and that we do not have the right to set off payments he owes us against payments we owe ECI.  The ECI contract provides interest on late payments of the greater of Chase's prime rate plus 2% or 14%, which interest is currently accruing on the past due amounts.  I think it would be helpful if we could arrange a call with some or all of the group copied on this email to discuss further how to proceed.  Thanks.

Regards,
	John

I know, but that doesn't change the fact that we should articulate the standards that we are using -- I know that they use some criteria that are based on solid business reasons, so let's capture them!  That way, we at least can explain why we did things.  Michelle

Agreed. But this is what we did last year.
I like that there is some sort of formal process based on peer group.  
 
I also like that they have made a decision to have ranking in the commercial groups.  It looks like they are being ranked to measure performance, not for compensation.  If so, then it would be nice for there to be some rough correlation to compensation.  If not, then what are the criteria for determining the bonus amounts?  If it is P&L and some other components, then let's specify what they are.  My biggest concern with all of this flexibility is that decisions will appear arbitrary with no clear basis for distinguishing between persons at the top of the bonus range and persons in the bottom.
 
On non-commercial, will there be a further breakdown within the 80?  If so, will those correlate to bonus amounts?  If not, same question as above.
 
I understand that market forces may drive many of these bonus decisions.  If so, then I believe that we simply should articulate them and be prepared to explain the bases for bonus payment amounts.
 
Promotion process looks good.
 
Assistants and clerks looks good, although it looks like OOC will decide bonus amounts.  If this is a fixed amount based on the rating, then that is ok.  Otherwise, if they are not pretty standardized, the same issues arise as above.  I
 
I expect that the same kinds of questions will arise for all business unit plans.
 
Hope this helps.  Let me know if you want to discuss or would like to talk through pay criteria.
 
Michelle

What d'ya think? 
Same thing just prettier and with more details.  Suggest we send to HR for them to implement. 

<<PRCprocess.xls>> 

Here is our plan on PRC. 

Assistants: 

Ranked 1,2,3 by supervisors - pay determined by Me and Louise.  No meetings. 

Non Commercial but in North America: 

Traditional ranking with the correct people addending the meetings.  Pay grid determined by OOC. 

Analysts and Associates 

Ranked as per Billy Lemmons %'s and then pay grid determined by OOC 
I would like to see 25% - 65% - 10%.  Billy disagrees.  This would provide for a quick meeting rather than trying to split them into 4 groups with the top one excluding some awesome people.

Managers/Directors 

Ranked from 1 to 100 in as many clusters as the groups see fit.  We are going to combine managers and directors into one table.  The ranking is based on this years performance is directly related to pay.  We will have two meetingss - one for traders and one for other commercial staff (orig/finance/etc).  We will not have a pay prc but will take the results of the rankings and work with individual leaders after the meetings to ensure the appropriate compensation.

We will also determine promotions during this meeting using different criteria. 

VP's 

We will rank all our VP's from 1 to 100 with a group of selected people - some VP's and some MD's.  
This too will be directly related to pay. 

Cheers as you Brits say 

who are they?

ok. Can you articulate this to SK and PB.
I know, but that doesn't change the fact that we should articulate the standards that we are using -- I know that they use some criteria that are based on solid business reasons, so let's capture them!  That way, we at least can explain why we did things.  Michelle

Agreed. But this is what we did last year.
I like that there is some sort of formal process based on peer group.  
 
I also like that they have made a decision to have ranking in the commercial groups.  It looks like they are being ranked to measure performance, not for compensation.  If so, then it would be nice for there to be some rough correlation to compensation.  If not, then what are the criteria for determining the bonus amounts?  If it is P&L and some other components, then let's specify what they are.  My biggest concern with all of this flexibility is that decisions will appear arbitrary with no clear basis for distinguishing between persons at the top of the bonus range and persons in the bottom.
 
On non-commercial, will there be a further breakdown within the 80?  If so, will those correlate to bonus amounts?  If not, same question as above.
 
I understand that market forces may drive many of these bonus decisions.  If so, then I believe that we simply should articulate them and be prepared to explain the bases for bonus payment amounts.
 
Promotion process looks good.
 
Assistants and clerks looks good, although it looks like OOC will decide bonus amounts.  If this is a fixed amount based on the rating, then that is ok.  Otherwise, if they are not pretty standardized, the same issues arise as above.  I
 
I expect that the same kinds of questions will arise for all business unit plans.
 
Hope this helps.  Let me know if you want to discuss or would like to talk through pay criteria.
 
Michelle

What d'ya think? 
Same thing just prettier and with more details.  Suggest we send to HR for them to implement. 

<<PRCprocess.xls>> 

Here is our plan on PRC. 

Assistants: 

Ranked 1,2,3 by supervisors - pay determined by Me and Louise.  No meetings. 

Non Commercial but in North America: 

Traditional ranking with the correct people addending the meetings.  Pay grid determined by OOC. 

Analysts and Associates 

Ranked as per Billy Lemmons %'s and then pay grid determined by OOC 
I would like to see 25% - 65% - 10%.  Billy disagrees.  This would provide for a quick meeting rather than trying to split them into 4 groups with the top one excluding some awesome people.

Managers/Directors 

Ranked from 1 to 100 in as many clusters as the groups see fit.  We are going to combine managers and directors into one table.  The ranking is based on this years performance is directly related to pay.  We will have two meetingss - one for traders and one for other commercial staff (orig/finance/etc).  We will not have a pay prc but will take the results of the rankings and work with individual leaders after the meetings to ensure the appropriate compensation.

We will also determine promotions during this meeting using different criteria. 

VP's 

We will rank all our VP's from 1 to 100 with a group of selected people - some VP's and some MD's.  
This too will be directly related to pay. 

Cheers as you Brits say 

Fran, the latest on gp closing is Nov. 15 as a target, but the 30th is more likely. Michelle

great, would youplease get this to Janette?  Thanks.

 << File: Allocation Worksheets.xls >> 
I've revised spreadsheet for ENA Teams.

	please put this into the last FAQ for the Metals stuff.  Michelle

Michelle, Lizzette,

Attached is the piece on immigration for the FAQ.  Alice Gruber from Tindall & Foster has provided the language.

Thanks
Cathy

Human Resources
Enron Metals & Commodity Corp.
520 Madison Ave., 28th Floor
New York, NY 10022
Tel: 212-715-5276
Fax: 212-715-5231
E-Mail: Catherine.Huynh@Enron.com

Cathy:  please see the following response from Alice Gruber:

IMMIGRATION MATTERS

Q: I've been working for Enron under a US work permit.  How will my
immigration status be affected when my employment ceases?

A:  Your work permit is specific to Enron and is not transferable to
any other employer without additional processing by the INS.  A
non-immigrant (H-1B, L-1, TN, etc.) is out of status once s/he has been
terminated.  Once the non-immigrant is out of status, in theory, s/he should
depart the US as soon as possible.  If the non-immigrant can find a new
employer and file within approximately 30 to 60 days from the date of
termination, the INS has generally overlooked the violation of the
maintenance of status.  Keep in mind this is not a hard and fast rule, and
the INS has the ability to enforce shorter or longer periods on a
case-by-case basis.

If you are offered another job in the US your prospective employer
will have to apply for a new work permit on your behalf.
If you do not get another job in the US and you wish to remain here
then you must seek permission to stay on other grounds.

Upon termination, the foreign national should contact an attorney and
schedule a time for a full consultation (in-person whenever possible)
regarding all issues.  There are often many issues which need to be
addressed as each person's immigration issues are unique.

I hope this is what you are looking for.  Let me know if we need anything else?
Thanks
Margaret

FYI, please let me know if you have any comments.  Michelle

Lizzette and Michelle, 
Attached is a discussion draft of the plan document.  Please review and send to others who need or wish to review it.  I have designed flexibility into the Plan that should serve us well in the event of design changes. 
Please share your comments with me or let me know if you have any questions. 
Pat 

 - Enron Metals US Vol Term Plan Doc1.doc 

Here is a draft of the plan document we prepared for the Metals situation.  Michelle

Lizzette and Michelle, 
Attached is a discussion draft of the plan document.  Please review and send to others who need or wish to review it.  I have designed flexibility into the Plan that should serve us well in the event of design changes. 
Please share your comments with me or let me know if you have any questions. 
Pat 

 - Enron Metals US Vol Term Plan Doc1.doc 

Happy to talk with you about the ADA -- I've actually written two papers on the topic and edited an article in The Houston Lawyer on your very topic (albeit several years ago, which was before the Supremes spoke on the issue).  On the Senior Specialist position, I am happy to discuss that with you as well.  Please get with my assistant, Twanda Sweet, at 39402 to schedule a time next week to talk.  Michelle

My name is Jim Little.  I am a forth year Enron employee and a third year student at South Texas College of Law.

I am writing in response to a posting with your group for a Sr. Legal Specialist.  The posting itself contains no information about the job other than the fact that it is in the Labor and Employment Department.  I realize the expectation may be that I contact the recruiter directly; however, I felt efficiency would be served in contacting you directly.  I would appreciate any information you may provide including both duties and necessary qualifications.  

I would also appreciate you considering speaking with me in the near future concerning a paper I am writing about individuals with HIV and the protections they are afforded under the ADA.  I feel comfortable that Enron has addressed this issue and I am merely guessing that you would have been involved in such discussion or have familiarity through your various writings on the ADA.  I am still researching the topic, so it will be a few weeks before I would feel able to ask intelligent questions.  But I would appreciate knowing at this time if this is something you are able and willing to discuss.  

Thank you for your time,

Jim Little
x37703

this guy is going to call to schedule -- give him 30 minutes.  mhc

My name is Jim Little.  I am a forth year Enron employee and a third year student at South Texas College of Law.

I am writing in response to a posting with your group for a Sr. Legal Specialist.  The posting itself contains no information about the job other than the fact that it is in the Labor and Employment Department.  I realize the expectation may be that I contact the recruiter directly; however, I felt efficiency would be served in contacting you directly.  I would appreciate any information you may provide including both duties and necessary qualifications.  

I would also appreciate you considering speaking with me in the near future concerning a paper I am writing about individuals with HIV and the protections they are afforded under the ADA.  I feel comfortable that Enron has addressed this issue and I am merely guessing that you would have been involved in such discussion or have familiarity through your various writings on the ADA.  I am still researching the topic, so it will be a few weeks before I would feel able to ask intelligent questions.  But I would appreciate knowing at this time if this is something you are able and willing to discuss.  

Thank you for your time,

Jim Little
x37703

Yes, it has.  In fact, I gave the same message as you describe below.  Michelle

Michelle,

Has the ER Marketing Campaign Roll-out been discussed with the HR heads?  If not, I think this should be an agenda item at David Oxleys next HR heads' meeting.  I met yesterday with Gary Smith and he expressed some concerns about ER marketing its services; he's concerned that it may encourage employees who have in the past handled their concerns internally or by working with their HR Reps to come out of the woodwork and swamp our resources.  I explained to him that we are not trying to drum up more business but rather ensure that employees are aware of mechanisms in place to address workplace issues.

Valeria

FYI.  Michelle

In light of the recent scare regarding Anthrax, we have prepared a
memorandum for our clients to use in communicating with their employees
about this serious issue, a copy of which is attached.  This memorandum is
based in large part on information recently released by the Centers for
Disease Control and Prevention ("CDC").  More information can be obtained at
the CDC's website located at www.cdc.gov.  Please feel free to use the
memorandum as you see fit, and if you have any questions, please contact
Larry Stuart at (713) 427-5027 or reply to this e-mail.

Sent on behalf of
The Houston Labor and Employment Group
Baker & McKenzie
1301 McKinney, Suite 3300
Houston, Texas 77010
(713) 427-5000
 <<21#H01!.DOC>>

 - 21#H01!.DOC 

The 2 weeks is the amount of years of service,  or the amount of 10K increments in salary.  The 4 weeks is a premium on top of that amount.  

Cathy,

The voluntary separation calculator asks for a number for 2 weeks pay.  Should that be four weeks, or does the program take the 2 weeks and multiply it to arrive at the four weeks base pay number?  If the latter, I can see it creating some confusion.  If the calculation sheet needs to be set up that way, perhaps we should drop a note explaining.

--Lizzette

That's the plan, stan.

Lizzette, Michelle,

Are we still on target to get all the final documents for the Voluntary Separation back to me by close of business?  We've made a commitment to employees that they will be receiving he info packet by Monday morning.

Thanks
Cathy

Human Resources
Enron Metals & Commodity Corp.
520 Madison Ave., 28th Floor
New York, NY 10022
Tel: 212-715-5276
Fax: 212-715-5231
E-Mail: Catherine.Huynh@Enron.com

Michelle,

I'm quite happy with the lay out of the plan (great flexibility), but have just a few comments/questions.

Article 2.3, Can we make such a broad statement that is so biased toward the Company?

Article 3.1, I think the max payment is 56 weeks.

Article 5.2, Under failure to meet performance, can we reduce the 45 day period and reference oral notification as well as written notification?  One of my concerns is, if we notify someone that we accept their Voluntary application, but need them to work for the next 3-4 months, the employees' motivation level might be very low which will effect their performance level.  Or perhaps we can build a statement in to the Separation and Release Agreement stating that the completion of their transition of their role needs to be satisfactorily completed to receive the separation pay.

Also, somewhat related, do we expect to have the involuntary severance plan amended anytime this year?  As I'm working out the next stage of involuntary severance reductions, just need to know if the calculation is likely to change.

Thanks Michelle.

Cathy

Human Resources
Enron Metals & Commodity Corp.
520 Madison Ave., 28th Floor
New York, NY 10022
Tel: 212-715-5276
Fax: 212-715-5231
E-Mail: Catherine.Huynh@Enron.com

FYI, please let me know if you have any comments.  Michelle

Lizzette and Michelle, 
Attached is a discussion draft of the plan document.  Please review and send to others who need or wish to review it.  I have designed flexibility into the Plan that should serve us well in the event of design changes. 
Please share your comments with me or let me know if you have any questions. 
Pat 

 - Enron Metals US Vol Term Plan Doc1.doc << File: Enron Metals US Vol Term Plan Doc1.doc >> 

Thanks for getting me this info.  Michelle

According to SAP, you have 56 hours of vacation left, and you have not taken your Discretionary Holiday.  Let me know if you need anything further.

Margo

Linda,

I can't make 10 tomorrow, so go ahead and meet without me.

Lunch this week would be difficult, as I'm out Thursday and Friday attending the SW Legal Foundation Labor seminar in Dallas.  Would you like to try something next week with me and Lizzette Palmer, my new attorney?  If so, have your assistant get with Twanda at 853-9402 to schedule, as Twanda works for both me and Lizzette.

Thanks.

Michelle

Dear  Michelle:
     We have set a meeting with Cristina Solomon and Liz Miller that I am assured is  set in stone.  It will take place tomorrow at 10am at Cristina's  office.  Can you attend?  I have given Cristina the agenda items so  that she and Liz can be prepared to answer all of our questions.   
Best  regards,
Linda  Broocks
 
P.S.  Can you  have lunch this week with Laura Gibson and me?

when is this scheduled?

The location for the above meeting will be EB1671.

If anyone has any questions or changes, please call me at 713-853-5528 or Terrie Wheeler at 713-853-5201.

Thank you.

Bernadette C. Etienne
713-853-5528 bus#
713-646-2110 fax#
EB 1680b

	please calendar.  thanks

Tuesday, October 30th. 3:00 - 4:00.  Terrie Wheeler is the one setting it up.

Bernadette C. Etienne
713-853-5528 bus#
713-646-2110 fax#
EB 1680b

when is this scheduled?

The location for the above meeting will be EB1671.

If anyone has any questions or changes, please call me at 713-853-5528 or Terrie Wheeler at 713-853-5201.

Thank you.

Bernadette C. Etienne
713-853-5528 bus#
713-646-2110 fax#
EB 1680b

I haven't specifically referenced NuTech in my questions to them.  I also probably need to ask the comp committee about these "tolerable" conflicts of interest, particularly in light of recent press coverage of Enron.  We'll discuss that this afternoon, Nancy, but I am not feeling like we should agree to any of those types of provisions.  Yikes!  

The following is the email I sent Aaron last week.  I called him this morning to confirm if this was accurate.  He's meeting later today with Mary Joyce and said he'll get back to me.  I did not inquire specifically about NuTech--I assume Michelle is doing that.

Teresa

Aaron:

Based on our conversations, it is my understanding that the compensation committee has asked to review compensation plans for our affiliates if we own approximately 50% or more of the company.  The determination of exactly which plans must go to the committee will be made by Mary Joyce upon receipt of a bullet point presentation of the key terms of the plan.  The committee would likely review any compensation plan pursuant to which (i) employees receive equity interests without making capital contributions in cash or other property with reasonably equivalent value to the equity interests, (ii) employees receive equity interests prior to Enron recovering its investment, or (iii) employees are to be offered employment agreements with terms that are not within "Enron norms."  In addition, all significant terms of the compensation plan are to be disclosed in the DASH.

Do I understand this all corrrectly?  Is there anything I have omitted?

If the committee meets only quarterly, timing could certainly be an issue in some transactions.  If that is the case, can special meetings be called?

 
Teresa

Last week Teresa was waiting to hear back from Aaron (sp) regarding the threshold and process for approval. Michelle, Tom Kalb and I have a meeting this aft with Nutech and we all , including John Thompson per his meeting request last week, need to know the steps if any that we need to take on Nutech and similar matters.Michelle/Teresa, appreciate your advice on how best to track this down. Nancy 

Rescinding is what you meant to say. 

Please send the form consulting agreement to Randy.  Thanks.  MHC

Michelle, 

Karen Jones has aksed that I work the Consulting Agreement matter.  For some reason the  CA that she mentioned was not attached.  I've called Karen to see if she can resned.  In the inteirm if she out until toomorrow, I was wondering if you could resend me a copy of the CA that you sent ot her.

Thanks,

Randy
  

Hi Randy;  thanks for helping Kelly with these consulting agreements.  Hopefully, attached above are the 2 emails that I think you'll need.  One is a note from Kelly with basic information on the 2 consultants and how he wants to approach the scope of work (for now, they are to be on a real tight leash, where, at our request, they will set up and attend mtings with folks in the environmental community, as we direct), and to let them propose their hourly rates.  The other email is the form that Michelle Cash says we should use for these "political"/"quasi-political" consultants.

Thanks again for your help.  Kelly is in SF the rest of this week (he's not traveling after all, for all the obvious reasons).

All the best,
Karen

   

Do we want them to be under employment agreements? 

Michelle,

The Coal group has a question related to personnel they would acquire from Vulcan if they purchased the marketing rights to their coal.    In this scenario, there are 4 marketing employees which would come to Enron as a part of the deal.   A few things:

In this case, I'm assuming these employees would resign from Vulcan and Enron would extend the appropriate offer.
Secondly, Enron's purchase of the marketing rights will be for an 18mo to 3 year trial period. At the end of the trial period, if Enron returns the marketing rights to Vulcan (or current owner), they want the right to re-call these employees.  George McClellan is ok with the right to recall, but I am not sure how/where to put this in writing ie; in the deal agreement, offer letter, etc.

Thanks,
Shanna

David,

You asked me to provide my opinion about the employment agreement provisions relating to target bonus amounts that are based on performance.  

The bonus language contained in the majority of the agreements with a target bonus is as follows:

	"Provided that Enron meets its earnings targets and provided that Employee is rated within the top 25% of the performance criteria under Enron's annual performance rating system or its equivalent for the calendar year in question, Employee's annual bonus amounts under the Plan for calendar years 2001, 2002, and 2003 (payable in 2002, 2003, and 2004, respectively), shall be based on an annual bonus target of $_____________."

This language does not address a person's performance as compared to one's peers, but instead looks at the number of performance criteria and requires that a person be in the top 25% of those criteria.  Thus, if there are only 3 rating categories (i.e., 1, 2, 3, distributed as 10-80-10), then only the people in the top category would be within the top 25/33% of the rating criteria.  

Given the huge change in our process, however, there is an argument that the above language cannot be applied to the current scheme and that instead, we should look at the top 25% of the peer group, instead of performance criteria, even though that was not the intent of the provision when it was drafted.

As a result, I would suggest that the middle category be divided further into either 2 or 3 subcategories (i.e., 2A, 2B, or 2C).  That way, persons who fall out in categories 1 or 2A would be eligible for the target bonus.  If there is a decision not to break  down the middle 80 further, then it would be useful to look at those employees with a bonus target that we think is too high. For those employees, a more conservative approach may be to evaluate them on a scale that is more subdivided than the 10-80-10 breakdown and to document that they fell out in the bottom 75% of the categories under that process.  

Of course, it goes without saying that we should ensure consistent treatment based on race, sex, national origin, age, etc. in this process.

Please let me know if you have any questions.

Should we wait on this, given the possibilities we discussed earlier today.  Michelle

Draft?
David, please prepare a response to this question for Greg.  We will post the Q&A on eMeet.  Send the response to me for further handling.  Thanks.

 << OLE Object: Picture (Device Independent Bitmap) >> 
Anonymous

Does the new PRC Rankings Policy of only the top 10% and the bottom 10% will be reviewed by the Enron Office of the Chairman mean that only the top 10% of employees will be considered for promotions? Will the bottom 10% be asked to leave the company, if yes, then will we stick to it at all levels, especially Sr. Dir, VP & MD? 

I can't find it on my blackberry. I can't remember who sent it, and the ones I've reviewed don't have the info.  Why don't you ask Shanna Funkhouser for the details?  Sorry about that!  Michelle

I woke up and couldn't get back to sleep. Bummer. 

Was this adopted?

Document attached 

 - 1AMD93RS Oct2001b.DOC << File: 1AMD93RS Oct2001b.DOC >> 

Hi there!!

From whom?

Am I getting a good package?

I think you should be there, so it can wait until later in the week.  Other priorities obviously govern.  Thanks.  Michelle

Here is the revised review (password - oberon).  I have meetings scheduled for the afternoon and am not sure I will be able to get out of them at any particular time.  Does it make sense to give her the review without me being there and meet later or not?
 << File: NELSON CHERYL - revised2 - clean.doc >> 

	FYI

	Yes, I spoke with Mark on last Thursday and the revisions are complete.  He will let me know today when the 
	three of us can meet to discuss.

	Fran

Hey Fran, I am just following up from our meeting the week before last.  Were we able to make any progress since then getting any revisions?  

please send to him our consulting services agreement and also the agreement for contract and other services (Diane has the latest form).  cc to Carol St. Clare.  Thanks!

Here is the soft copies of the agreements.

(See attached file: Commission Agreement - Individual.doc)
(See attached file: CounterpartyCommissionAgreementSellerLicensorLogix.dot)

 - Commission Agreement - Individual.doc 
 - CounterpartyCommissionAgreementSellerLicensorLogix.dot 

I would not want any of our policies to address what is "unlawful,"  as I believe that is a matter for a court. Instead, our policies should state what we want to have in them, and leave the issue of legality to others.  Plus, I wouldn't want any admission of unlawful conduct in our policies.  Michelle

Hello Lizzette and Michelle,
Attached are the revised EEO and Harassment Prevention policies, and links for all policies.  Lizzette, I noted that you placed a question mark next to the "Unlawful (under FMLA)" link.  It is my understanding that the FMLA policy narrative and the related links are going to be revised/updated by Kriste Sullivan and Chris Rahaim.  In our last Project N-Form meeting, we agreed that Kriste and Chris would communicate their changes to Anne Labbe and Sarah Zarkowsky (members of the Content team).

Please let me know if you have additional changes.  Thanks again for your assistance!

Wendy

 << File: 10.16.01 Revisions to Green policies.doc >>  << File: 10.24.01 Revisions to Green Links.doc >> 

yes.  I have contacts there, if you want.  Michelle

Michelle, do you believe they would be a good company to contact regarding ER team?

Ryan

If it is same as mid-year, then I won't need to look at it.  Thanks.  Michelle

Hi Michelle-

Here's the Confidentiality Agreement we used at Mid Year for the HR staff who required access to employee records outside their own BU or access to restricted records (HR employees).

Would you like to revise this form, or shall we use the same version for this round?

Please let me know your thoughts as soon as possible. 

Thanks,
-Dovie

 << File: Confidential  Agreement.doc >> 

Dovie Keprta
Global Performance Management 
713.345.8864 desk 
713.516.5598 cell 

Sorry, I don't.  Michelle

Andrea Yowman 
Enron Corp 
713-853-1477

Jeff couldn't make it.  We'll reschedule at his availability.  MHC

Thanks. 
Do you know why the meeting with Jeanerette was cancelled and when it will be rescheduled?

Sorry, I don't.  Michelle

Andrea Yowman 
Enron Corp 
713-853-1477

Thanks, but no headhunters.   I can't afford a fee.  Michelle

Please review the following resume  for the position of SPEC SR LEGAL.

HUGHES,HOLLY  ->		00598689.DOC

 

FYI, if you didn't get this already.  Michelle

=09We will be conducting one-hour training sessions regarding U.S. Foreign =
Corrupt Trade Practices Act ("FCPA"), U.S. Trade Sanction Laws and U.S. Ant=
i-Boycott Laws at the following times in EB5C2:

=09Tuesday, July 24, 2001=0910:00 a.m. - 11:00 a.m.
=093:00 p.m. - 4:00 p.m.
4:00 p.m. - 5:00 p.m.

=09Tuesday, July 31, 2001=0910:00 a.m. - 11:00 a.m.
=093:00 p.m. - 4:00 p.m.
4:00 p.m. - 5:00 p.m.

=09This training is designed for traders, originators, accountants, lawyers=
, back and mid-office support and anyone who deals with foreign government =
officials or foreign consultants to give them the ability to spot FCPA issu=
es and know when to contact the Legal Department concerning these often sub=
tle events and issues.  Michelle Blaine, an attorney with the Enron Wholesa=
le Services Legal Department who conducts this training for Enron worldwide=
, will make these presentations.

=09We are conducting the training for both Enron Industrial Markets and Enr=
on Global Markets.

=09You will be able to go into the site: http://elm.enron.com beginning Mon=
day, July 16, 2001 and register for one of the sessions under "FCPA/Trade S=
anction Laws", which will be listed under the Corporate Compliance Category=
.

=09Should you have any questions, you can contact Carolyn George at Ext. 33=
439 or at carolyn.george@enron.com.

=09Also, please feel free to forward this invitation to others who could be=
nefit from this training.

Julia Heintz Murray
Managing Director and General Counsel
Enron Wholesale Services
Enron Industrial Markets LLC
1400 Smith Street, EB3838
Houston, Texas  77002
Phone: 713/853-3439   Fax:  713/646-3393
julia.murray@enron.com

Twanda/Diane,

I've given the Japanese template to Twanda to revise -- please use the non-VP form and not the form on which I have made the revisions.

Thanks.

Michelle

Robin,

Diomedes was not eligible for severance because of outstanding expense reports -- approximately $400K.  I know that Mary was involved in this to great detail.

Once the expense report issue is clarified, then he would be eligible for regular severance.  Mary and Tim Callahan have been coordinating those issues.

Michelle

Robin called because Christopoulos Diomedes (I didn't look up the spelling) has been calling John Novak, Pete Weidler, and Joe [Kischkill?] "asking where the review of payment" stands.  Diomedes believes "he met the milestones."   Robin was told that you and Mary Joyce were working on this.

Can you e-mail Robin Treadwell and give her an update?  Thanks.

Document attached 

 - Can Employers Satisfy ADA.doc 

Hey Doug,

Here is what would be great to have:

for Pulp
All the mills, their most updated capacity (can you also find out how often they update the capacity and whether they remove the maintenance related downtime when they come up with the capacity number)
and the type of pulp they produce.

for Printing & Writing paper
same thing for paper too.In addition, what kind of pulp they use to produce the paper.

Can we get the same info in a spreadsheet from too?

thanks,
Monika

Hello Maria Teresa,

THe September inventory number for Norscan is 1,549,000. 
The inventory figure for the world is not out yet.

Monika

Cecil,

can you please take a look at this presentation and see if numbers make sense?

thanks,
Monika 

Done!

Dan's email address is

	dan.temple@jacobs.com

Could you email the spreadsheet to him, with my comments about what we want? 

Thanks,

Dave

Hello Mr. Temple,

This is a follow-up email to what you talked with Dave Allan on the subject of Fiber morphology. Attached you will find the fiber characteristics spreadsheet - the most updated version. 

We also have an additional question which is - why each quality parameter (the column headings) is important to each major end-use (paper grade) application.

You can contact me for any further questions.

thanks,
Monika Causholli
Enron Industrial Markets
(713) 345- 1510

Attached is the pulp presentation on the pulp facts. I also sent it out to Andrew Conner for review. Please take a look and let me know.

thanks,
Monika 

She is the cutest little thing. 

The Monkey:

 << File: milan2.jpg >> 
 << File: milan3.jpg >> 

Andrew,

Can you take a look at the attached presentation and see if numbers make sense to you. 

thanks,
Monika

Jim,

I found a consultant who does extensive studies on world tissue. PLease read below. Just wanted to know if you knew the guy. His name is Esko Uutella and he is located in Germany.

Hi Ms. Causholli,

I have made recently a major multiclient study "Outlook for World Tissue 
Business" which includes all tissue mills with capacities worldwide plus 
capacity profiles by the largest producers worldwide and by region. I attach the 
study proposal with this e-mail. The report costs US$ 3,500 (300 pages with 
detailed Annexes).

If you would like to have only capacity data for the regions you mentioned plus 
the top 10-12 global producers, I could sell this part of information at US$ 
600. You should specify the form in which I should present it so that I 
could easier fulfil your data needs.

Best regards

Esko Uutela
EU Consulting

Causholli, Monika schrieb:
> Hello Mr. Uutella,
>
>
> I am an analyst working for Enron Industrial Markets in Houston, Texas
> and I am gathering some information on tissue. I spoke to Rod Young and
> David Pinault from RISI and they told me to contact you as you do some
> more extensive studies on tissue usage. 
>
> What I am looking for are: tissue capacity worldwide and by region
> (North America, Europe, Latin America, Asia)
> and the biggest companies that produce tissue.
>
> Can you also include how much this information would cost?
>
> Thanks in advance,
> Monika Causholli
> Enron Industrial Markets
> (713) 345 1510
>
>
>
>
> **********************************************************************
> This e-mail is the property of Enron Corp. and/or its relevant affiliate and
>  may contain confidential and privileged material for the sole use of the
>  intended recipient (s). Any review, use, distribution or disclosure by
>  others is strictly prohibited. If you are not the intended recipient (or
>  authorized to receive for the recipient), please contact the sender or reply
>  to Enron Corp. at enron.messaging.administration@enron.com and delete all
>  copies of the message. This e-mail (and any attachments hereto) are not
>  intended to be an offer (or an acceptance) and do not create or evidence a
>  binding and enforceable contract between Enron Corp. (or any of its
>  affiliates) and the intended recipient or any other party, and may not be
>  relied on by anyone as the basis of a contract by estoppel or otherwise.
>  Thank you. 
> **********************************************************************

Dick,

Just spoke with Peter Cardellichio at RISI who is the person in charge oh Asia and he told me that their forecast for Japan is based on the European prices. He said that prices in Europe and Japan have been pretty close historically thus he uses European prices as a base and adjusts thoem based on what is happening to Asia.

Hope this helps,
Monika

Andrea,

I found a private consultant on tissue (as RISI does not do anything on the subject) and he is located in Germany. Below is the kind of information that he can make available to us as well as the costs. Can you please advice me on how much information we want to get from him based on what he wrote below?

 

Hi Ms. Causholli,

I have made recently a major multiclient study "Outlook for World Tissue 
Business" which includes all tissue mills with capacities worldwide plus 
capacity profiles by the largest producers worldwide and by region. I attach the 
study proposal with this e-mail. The report costs US$ 3,500 (300 pages with 
detailed Annexes).

If you would like to have only capacity data for the regions you mentioned plus 
the top 10-12 global producers, I could sell this part of information at US$ 
600. You should specify the form in which I should present it so that I 
could easier fulfil your data needs.

Best regards

Esko Uutela
EU Consulting

Causholli, Monika schrieb:
> Hello Mr. Uutella,
>
>
> I am an analyst working for Enron Industrial Markets in Houston, Texas
> and I am gathering some information on tissue. I spoke to Rod Young and
> David Pinault from RISI and they told me to contact you as you do some
> more extensive studies on tissue usage. 
>
> What I am looking for are: tissue capacity worldwide and by region
> (North America, Europe, Latin America, Asia)
> and the biggest companies that produce tissue.
>
> Can you also include how much this information would cost?
>
> Thanks in advance,
> Monika Causholli
> Enron Industrial Markets
> (713) 345 1510
>
>
>
>
> **********************************************************************
> This e-mail is the property of Enron Corp. and/or its relevant affiliate and
>  may contain confidential and privileged material for the sole use of the
>  intended recipient (s). Any review, use, distribution or disclosure by
>  others is strictly prohibited. If you are not the intended recipient (or
>  authorized to receive for the recipient), please contact the sender or reply
>  to Enron Corp. at enron.messaging.administration@enron.com and delete all
>  copies of the message. This e-mail (and any attachments hereto) are not
>  intended to be an offer (or an acceptance) and do not create or evidence a
>  binding and enforceable contract between Enron Corp. (or any of its
>  affiliates) and the intended recipient or any other party, and may not be
>  relied on by anyone as the basis of a contract by estoppel or otherwise.
>  Thank you. 
> **********************************************************************

Hello Mr. Uutella,

I am an analyst working for Enron Industrial Markets in Houston, Texas and I am gathering some information on tissue. I spoke to Rod Young and David Pinault from RISI and they told me to contact you as you do some more extensive studies on tissue usage. 

What I am looking for are: tissue capacity worldwide and by region (North America, Europe, Latin America, Asia)
and the biggest companies that produce tissue.

Can you also include how much this information would cost?

Thanks in advance,
Monika Causholli
Enron Industrial Markets
(713) 345 1510

Vik,

How was Boston?

I think you aske me where BEK prices are? The location is O://Industrial Markets/Fundamentals/Paper/Pulp/RISI Prices. You will find the price for the BEK delivered to US and delivered to Europe. 

anything else I can do?
Monika

Hello Dequan,
Can you tell me how recent this forecast is?

Thanks,
Monika Causholli
Enson Industrial Markets
(713) 345 1510

Hi Monika,
    Please see the attached file for Northern Bleached Softwood 
Kraft Pulp delivered to Japan.  Let me know if you have any 
questions.
    Best regards,
    Dequan

Dequan He
Economist, Asian Service
Resource Information Systems, Inc.
4 Alfred Circle
Bedford  MA 01730
Tel: (781)271-0030 ext. 34
Fax: (781)271-0337
Email: he@resourceinfo.com     

 

Attached is the market wrap up for this week. If you have any questions you can contact me.

Monika Causholli
Enron Industrial Markets
(713)345-1510

Ami,

I will be here on Monday but I believe that most of my day is taken with meetings. Can we possibly meet on Tuesday? Just call me at my extension 5-1510. 

good luck at you new job,
Monika

Hey Monika,

I'm going to start working with Om Bhatia next Monday, and he thought it would be good if we met so I could talk to you about things I will be working on. Let me know when you have some free time!

Thanks,

Ami Thakkar
Analyst
x53835

This is great. Thanks for your help.

Monika Causholli
Enron Industrial markets
(713)345-1510

Hi Monika,
    Please see the attached file for Northern Bleached Softwood 
Kraft Pulp delivered to Japan.  Let me know if you have any 
questions.
    Best regards,
    Dequan

Dequan He
Economist, Asian Service
Resource Information Systems, Inc.
4 Alfred Circle
Bedford  MA 01730
Tel: (781)271-0030 ext. 34
Fax: (781)271-0337
Email: he@resourceinfo.com     

sounds great. Let's meet on Monday

Monika

Monika, I found the Jacobs-Sirrine proposal on the fiber study; you can get a copy from me.

They included a matrix on which they would display various fiber characteristics, which I'm attaching. << File: Fiber Morphology.xls >>  Cecil and I went over it and he suggested some changed, which are incorporated here. The only one he wants to add that isn't reflected here---but which we need to tell them---is that we want to know why each quality parameter (the column headings) is important to each major end-use (paper grade) application.

Let's go over this Monday morning.

Dave

 

Dick,

Attached is the 15-year NBSK forecast delivered to Japan.

Monika

thanks

The reason why your check went to Portland is because in 2000 the ISC created a US01 address for you so that you would receive your checks while you were in Portland.  I have gone into SAP and delimited your US01 address and you will receive your 10/15 check at your 2906 mail stop.

Gwen,

There have been problems with my paycheck going to the wrong address. It is still going in Portland, Oregon. Can you please change my mail stop to 2906?

My current address is
2440 North Boulevard # 5205
Houston, TX 77098 

and I changed this in the ehronline website. Can you reconfirm this? 

Thanks,
Monika Causholli

Gwen,

There have been problems with my paycheck going to the wrong address. It is still going in Portland, Oregon. Can you please change my mail stop to 2906?

My current address is
2440 North Boulevard # 5205
Houston, TX 77098 

and I changed this in the ehronline website. Can you reconfirm this? 

Thanks,
Monika Causholli

Karen,

Can you please review the market wrap?

thanks,
Monika 

SAN FRANCISCO, Sept. 27, 2001 (paperloop.com) - Worldwide chemical paper-grade market pulp producer inventories declined 66,000 tonnes in August from the prior month, according to preliminary data from the Pulp and Paper Products Council in Montreal. August marked the sixth month in a row that world inventories had fallen as producers dropped their stocks 1.9 percent from opening levels. 
World producer stocks closed August at 3.402 million tonnes, representing 37 days of supply, a day less than July results. Producer inventory levels are 33.3 percent higher than year-ago figures, when world producers held 28 days of supply. Although stocks are still high on a year-over-year basis, recent results still represented a strong improvement. Back in June, world producer stocks were 74.8 percent higher than the same period last year. 
August production of 2.683 million tonnes declined 2.3 percent from last month and tumbled 10.3 percent vs. year-ago results of 2.992 million tonnes. Global shipments totaled 2.750 million tonnes, dipping 1.9 percent from the 2.698 million tonnes recorded in August of last year. 
Producers operated at 88 percent of capacity in August, the same rate as both June and July of this year. That compared to world producers' year-ago operating rate of 103 percent. Meanwhile, the shipment-to-capacity ratio, considered an indicator of producer discipline, advanced 2 points from the prior month to 90 percent, PPPC reported. 
World inventory figures include totals from North America, Nordic countries, Argentina, Austria, Belgium, Brazil, Chile, France, Japan, Morocco, New Zealand, Norway, Portugal, South Africa, South Korea, Spain, and Swaziland. Countries that do not report inventories include Russia, Indonesia, Taiwan, and Thailand. 
World producers shifted 26,000 tonnes between the close of July and last month's opening inventories. 

Karen,

Attached is the market wrap for this week. Can you please edit it?

thank you,
Monika 

Eugenio,

Can you send me the correlations spreadsheet so I can start using it too?

Thanks,
Monika

Dirk,

Attached is the historical shipments to capacity ratio

Monika 

Karen,

RISI has a European consumption number for the hardwoods but does not break this down to BEK and other hardwoods.

Let me know if you need the hardwood consumption.

Monika 

Karen,

Per you request today attached is the hardwood shipments form Portugal, Chile and S. Africa to Europe. 
Note that A. Africa is combined with Morocco's data. 

Morela,
I don't know if you got this:

Brazil's Cenibra getting $100 million investment to expand pulp
09/25/2001 10:05:35, SABI 
Brazil, Sept. 24, 2001 (Gazeta Mercantil) -- After investments of US$650mil to take the control of woodpulp producer Cenibra, the consortium JBP (Japan Brazil Paper and Pulp Development Co) has decided to expand business. Cenibra will receive US$100mil investment to increase its capacity at Belo Oriente facility, Minas Gerais state, from the current 800,000 to 1 million tonnes per year. In 2000 the company registered R$838.6mil net earning, and R$229mil net profit. Its net worth reached R$609.6mil.	

Traders,

The pulp meeting will be held today between 2-3 pm in room 2942.

Thanks,
Monika

Foex published their index for the week:

NBSK remained at $450 for the third week in a row, whereas BHKP was $404.96 up $4.89 (1.22%). But expressed in Euros the price dropped to Euro 436.76 from the Euro 439.4 of last week.
 

PLease see attached,

Monika Causholli
Enron Industrial Markets
(713) 345 1015

Dirk,

Attached are the updated tables on Demand Indicators.

MOnika 

 

Hope this helps

Monika

Andrew,

As a follow-up to our conversation last week I have tried to get the list of mills from PPPC but they are not responding to my requests. There is another way to compile that by using Jacobs Sirrine database information.

Second, I changed the inventory sheet to reflect the latest NORSCAN inventory number that I got from PPPC and so the forecast for October changed a bit, more in line with the historical average now.

Let me know what you want to do on the pulp mills's list and also anything additional in the inventory forecast sheet.

Monika 

Today FOEX published its weekly index for pulp:

For the first time in weeks both the softwoods and the hardwoods show signs of weaknesses again.  

NBSK was down $US0.48 or 0.1% after four weeks of price increases.
BHKP was Euro 466 down Euro 3.34. Expressed in US dollars BHKP was $US416.09 down $US2.33 or 0.56%.
These decline happens despite the recent efforts from the biggest pulp producers, including Weyerhaeuser, to raise prices. This might be a sign of the fact that the market fundamentals  do not support the price increases in pulp. 

The average FOEX for October is:
NBSK: $US 460.68 up $10.26 from September
BHKP:$US 414.76 up $13.67 from the September level

 Please attached for a chart of FOEX prices

Thanks!

Hope this helps. 

Dora A. Trevi?o
Administrative Assistant II
Enron Industrial Markets
Ph: (713) 345-7753
Fax: (713) 646-3253

 << File: Market Pulp Planning Meeting.doc >> 

This meeting will be held at the Doubletree in Travis I.

Dora A. Trevi?o
Administrative Assistant II
Enron Industrial Markets
Ph: (713) 345-7753
Fax: (713) 646-3253

Done!

Hi Monika!
Could you please add me to your distribution list?  
Thank you. 
Natalie

Natalie,

For your information and use.

Eric
Hello,

Please find attached the market wrap for the week of October 26th. If you have any questions you can contact me.

thanks, << File: MW 10_26.doc >> 
Monika Causholli
Ext. 5-1510

Hey Laura,

Do you have the phone number of that hair salon you go to?

thanks,
Monika

Dave,

Here is the report on RISI conference.

thanks,
Monika 

Hello Jim,

It's been a long time since I last wrote you but here I am again. I am still working for Enron, but I moved away from Oregon. Now me and my husband are living in Houston, Texas. 
I worked in Portland until May of this year and then I though of moving away from Oregon just because opportunities are not as big there. In Portland I wroked as a power real time trader buying and selling power real time. I got tired of that job because of shift work. This summer I joined the forests products department and right now I do analysis for the traders. I ahve taken a couple of derivatives classes offered in the company and plan to take some more. My goal is to move to a trader's position, mostly financial trader to work with derivatives but we will see what happens. Right now I am learning about the market, and how it functions. 

I plan on taking some classes next term at Rice University in Houston. I need to have better mathematical skills and I will start taking math classes at night after work. We will see how this goes. i have to prepare myself well for the future. 

That's all on work side. 
Moving to Houston was quite a change. The  weather especially. Right now though the weather is great, it's sunny and in the mid-70s to 80s. I love it. Koli likes Portland better. Houston is a much bigger city and a little more dangerous. I like it though, what I miss is Corvallis and school. I miss business school at OSU and studying for finance classes. I want to go back to school eventually and get both MBA and PHD so I can teach. I would love to be a professor. 

So how are you? How is your wife? Your kids? Is anything new happening? What about your parents in NY? Are they OK from all that has happened?  
What about OSU? Anything new there? How is prof. Moulton? Say hi to him from me. What about the students? Are you still demanding of them? You know I remember that I put a lot of work in your classes.

We plan to go home this Christmas and meet our families. My parents ask me about you all the time. They had the greatest time when they visited me here. 

well that's all for now but I will keep in touch more often. Let me know how thigs are going with you,

say hi to your wife from me
best wishes,
Monika   

yes please include me in the class.

thanks
Monika Causholli

You are on the waitlist for the above class held Thursday and Friday (Nov. 1-2) from 8:00am-5:00pm both days.  I just received a cancellation.  Please respond ASAP to this email if you would like to be included in the class??

Thanks, 
Maggie

Hello everyone,

Attached is a summary of the 16th annual North American RISI conference on forest products. I have additional more detailed information on my desk in case anyone needs it.

thanks,
Monika Causholli
Ext. 5-1510  

Karen,

Attached is the Asian mill by capacity from three different sources. RISI, Jacobs-Sirrine, PPI.

Monika 

Gracie,
 
Can I still cancel the class. I am sorry but I can't make it.
 
thanks,
MOnika Causholli

REMINDER!!!
 
 
You are enrolled in the following.
 
Derivatives II
November 1 & 2, 2001
in EB552
8:00 am - 5:00 pm  (both days)
 
Please complete the following quizzes and bring to class
 
 
Please be on time

Yes I have but I just cancelled Der. II.

thanks,
Monika

Dave,

Attached are the revisions. It's all checked out by Cecil Stapley. Let me know who to send this to.

Thanks,
Monika 

G-P Leaf River pulp mill sale deal with Enron falls through
10/24/2001 17:43:03, Forestweb 
By Diane Keaton  San Francisco, Oct. 24, 2001 (Forestweb) -- The tentative deal for Georgia-Pacific Corp. (G-P) to sell its Leaf River market pulp mill to Enron Corp. has collapsed, according to a knowledgeable industry source.  Neither company is speaking publicly about the latest development, citing policies against commenting on rumors. However, the pending arrangement, subject to final approval, was no secret to some pulp and paper industry players (see Forestweb, Oct.19).  Top Enron officials were said to have nixed the agreement this week. Last week in its third quarter earnings statement, the company reported a net loss of $618 million, including a write-off of $1.01 billion.  The source said the deal might still be salvageable at a later date.  The Leaf River mill, in New Augusta, Miss., has the capacity to produce 600,000 tonnes per year. Since February it has produced exclusively softwood kraft pulp.	

Gracie,
 
When is the course offered again because I can't find it in the web?
 
Monika

I will cancel your registration.  Gracie

Gracie,
 
Can I still cancel the class. I am sorry but I can't make it.
 
thanks,
MOnika Causholli

REMINDER!!!
 
 
You are enrolled in the following.
 
Derivatives II
November 1 & 2, 2001
in EB552
8:00 am - 5:00 pm  (both days)
 
Please complete the following quizzes and bring to class
 
 
Please be on time

Shipments of market pulp to China totaled 462,157 tonnes in September, down 0.6% compared with August shipments, according to a report last week by China's Materials Information Center.Despite the month-to-month decline last month, market pulp imports into China year-to-date have climbed 33% vs. the same period last year. From January to September 2001, imports have totaled 3.54 million tonnes, reported China's general administration of customs. This might indicate that the Chinese buyers have plenty of stocks available and might slow down their purchasing patterns.

Weak market in the pulp industry continues to push producers into taking further downtime. As expected the bulk of downtime is taken by the Canadian producers who face the highest producing costs.  Today NorskeCanada announced it will take additional curtailment at all four of its BC pulp and paper divisions during the fourth quarter to reflect the continuing difficult market conditions.The company said it will curtail paper production by 60,000 tonnes (including 38,000 tonnes of newsprint) and pulp production by 23,600 tonnes in the fourth quarter. Fourth quarter curtailment brings accumulated total paper curtailment for 2001 to 166,000 tonnes (including 112,000 tonnes of newsprint) and pulp curtailment to 121,000 tonnes. 

Sorry Nyree. No exceptions.

Monika

I need to know if you have any exceptions (vacation, sick,...) for pay-period Oct 15-31.  If you do not, please reply with "no exceptions"  we need to keep records for both our benefits.  

Thank you for your assistance,
Nyree I. Chanaba
713-345-4035
EIM Fundamental Analysis

Amy,

You could probably add expected capacity projections to see how Asian capacity will change in the future both in pulp and paper and compare that to let's say other areas of the world. I remember that in the RISI conference the speakers were saying that Asian pulp capacity increase will lag behind that of Latin America but their paper capacity will probably explode so they will major pulp buyers.

Anyways, you can find the capacity expansion data in the PPPC website. Let me know because I have some printed copies too.

Monika

Hey Monika,

I'm working on finding all the Pulp producers and consumers in Asia.  This is a what I've started making.  Do you have any other suggestions or information I could use?

Thanks,

Ami Thakkar
Analyst
x53835

 << File: producers.xls >> 

When is the next derivatives  II class offered?

thanks,
Monika Causholli

Hello Karen,
Attached is the market wrap for this week. 

Thanks,
Monika 

In September North American paper demand continued to fall. This is not positive news for the paper and pulp industry.  The following is what PPPC released:
North American printing/writing paper inventories dropped by about 6% from August to the end of September, but shipments, production, and demand stayed depressed from year-ago levels.
Total North American printing/writing production was down 11.0% in September compared with a year ago, to 2.091 million tonnes, PPPC reported. Total shipments were off 9.9% to 2.224 million tonnes. Total inventories decreased 133,000 tonnes from August to September to 2.145 million tonnes and were 313,000 tonnes or 12.7% lower than in September last year. The industry overall operating rate (shipments to capacity) in September was 84%, down from 88% in August and down from 96% a year ago. 
Uncoated free-sheet accounted for most of the inventory drop, according to September statistics released yesterday by the Pulp and Paper Products Council in Montreal. North American demand was down 10.2% in September to 1.038 million tonnes
Coated free-sheet (woodfree) demand was down 11.2% in September while coated groundwood (mechanical) papers demand was off 7.5%, PPPC reported. 

Karen,

Can you please take a look at the revised version and let me know?

thanks,
Monika 

I want to register.

thanks,
Monika Causholli

FINAL DAY TO REGISTER - RICE MBA INFO SESSION

PLEASE RSVP BY 12:00 NOON
NOVEMBER 2, 2001

THANKS!

Come learn about the Jones Graduate School of Management at Rice University!  This is your opportunity to meet to meet with individuals from the Jones Office of Admissions, as well as with current students and alumni.

Date:  Monday, November 5, 2001

Time:  6:00 - 8:00 pm

Location:  ECN 5c2

Space is limited, so please email Constance Charles by November 1st to RSVP.  

Thanks, and hope to see you there!

Karen,

Attached is the pulp flow chart.  

Thanks Dave!
It's nice to have some feedback

Monika

WOW! This is a great industry overview. I haven't vetted the numbers, and I understand Karen wants to sit down and go over it in detail, but it appears to be exactly what we wanted and a great tool. Of course it will always be a work in progress, being improved and updated as we get better information. 

Good work.

Dave

Hello everyone,

Attached you will find the pulp and printing & writing presentation - facts and figures as of 2001.
Please if you have any questions you can contact me.

thanks,
Monika Causholli
Enron Industrial markets
(713) 345 -1510  << File: Pulp Presentation Template1.ppt >> 

 

Hello Team,

Tembec Inc. may back a controversial $450-million project to convert the mothballed Chandler newsprint mill in Quebec to make high-quality magazine paper.  The Chandler mill was shut in 1999 by the former owner, Abitibi, due to high costs.   The Quebec government and the union-backed Quebec Solidarity Fund now effectively own Chandler and are negotiating with Tembec to tie up the conversion project by year-end.       A comfort to newsprint producers as potential newsprint capacity is diverted else where at a time when the market is sitting in a supply glut.

Ayesha

Thanks Elliot!

Monika

 << File: KS-IX.ppt >> 

This is the pulp presentation from the RISI conference.

Elliot T. Bonner Jr.
Enron Industrial Markets
1400 Smith Street
Houston, TX  77002
Ph:  713-853-0551
Fx:  713-646-3253
email:  elliot.bonner@enron.com

Hello Karen,

Please find attached Chile's capacity and its expansion projects.

Note that: 
1- Arauco's Constitucion mill might have another alternative capacity of 360,000 tons a year. I was confused because in their annual report the capacity is mentioned many times, each time different numbers. Can I get your input on this. We can discuss it when you have time.

2- There is one modernization project that will increase the capacity of Pacifico mill (CMPC) that will come online on Q1 2003. I did not apply any percentage rate for the project implementation. PLease advise me if I need to do that plus the rates I should use.

3- The projects in red are not impelemented yet and PPPC does not look very optimistic for those. 

4-Sheet 1 of the spread sheet contains the mills' capacities from Jacobs Sirrine which are not far off from the capacities I found in the annual reports.

Let me know if I need to work and improve this further.
 
Finally, I had a lot of fun working on this project  :)

Monika

Hello,
 
The November FOEX that came out today showed a small up-tick versus last week. 

FOEX for NBSK was US$465.43 up US$0.95 (0.2%)

FOEX for BHKP was Euro 466.02 up only Euro 0.02. In terms of dollars BHKP was US$420.55 up US$4.46 (1.07%).

Even though the movement upwards is very minimal, it is still in line with the pulp producers' attempts to raise prices. The price increases so far have been partially successful as producers have only been able to push for a US$10-15 dollar increase  instead of US$20-30 as previously announced. Still price increases are expected to continue in November. 

Please see attached for a chart on FOEX indeces.   

Thanks,
Monika Causholli
ext. 5-1510

Maybe I should rephrase it: What I was trying to say there was that producers are going to continue to make efforts to increase the prices in November in line with what they have announced. Whether that happens or not remains to be seen.

thanks for the feedback though. It helps a lot.
Monika

Monika,

Good that you put some analysis with the price changes.  I'd be a bit careful about declaring that prices are expected to continue increasing through November --- many market observers (particularly Mr. Ross Hay-Roe) believe there's a good chance that the US$15/metric ton increase the producers already received will begin to erode in the next few weeks.  I think it's important that we give air time to all the possibilities, especially in light of the high degree of uncertainty surrounding the market.  Thanks.

Karen
Hello,
 << File: Foex Prices.xls >> 
The November FOEX that came out today showed a small up-tick versus last week. 

FOEX for NBSK was US$465.43 up US$0.95 (0.2%)

FOEX for BHKP was Euro 466.02 up only Euro 0.02. In terms of dollars BHKP was US$420.55 up US$4.46 (1.07%).

Even though the movement upwards is very minimal, it is still in line with the pulp producers' attempts to raise prices. The price increases so far have been partially successful as producers have only been able to push for a US$10-15 dollar increase  instead of US$20-30 as previously announced. Still price increases are expected to continue in November. 

Please see attached for a chart on FOEX indeces.   

Thanks,
Monika Causholli
ext. 5-1510

Hey Vik,

Do you know how often he publishes this?

Dear Warriors,

Mark Wilde has just published a great summary of industry downtimes.  Your teams might find it very helpful.  It may also be a good chance to see if our respective databases match Dr. Paper's records.

Thanks!
Vikram

 << File: INDUSTRY DOWNTIME 10.31.01.pdf >> 

I am!

Hello Warriors,

Would you be interested in learning MS Excel shortcuts & tricks from the Excel guru, Eugenio?  If so, please email me & let me know what things you would like to learn.   If there is enough interest, we will reserve a room and have Eugenio teach an Excel  session next week.

Ayesha

Nyree,

I received this message and i don't know what it means. Can you help?

thank you,
Monika
Employee Name: Monika Causholli
Report Name:   Monika Causholli
Report Date:   10/25/01
Report ID:     1CD662BAC8BB11D5B373
Submitted On:  10/25/01

You are only allowed 2 reports with receipts outstanding.  Your expense reports will not be paid until you meet this requirement.

Great. thank you. 
Monika

Monika,

All it is asking is for the receipts,  I already mailed the original receipts.  Let me know if you receive this message again.

Thank you,
Nyree I. Chanaba
713-345-4035
EIM Fundamental Analysis

Nyree,

I received this message and i don't know what it means. Can you help?

thank you,
Monika
Employee Name: Monika Causholli
Report Name:   Monika Causholli
Report Date:   10/25/01
Report ID:     1CD662BAC8BB11D5B373
Submitted On:  10/25/01

You are only allowed 2 reports with receipts outstanding.  Your expense reports will not be paid until you meet this requirement.

Karen,

Attached is the market wrap for this week. 

Monika 

Thanks!

Monika:

Try calling Ron Heller 202-205-2596

Milagros

It's such a cool card. Thank you very much. 

Monika

Hello! Vikram has just sent you a greeting card from Bluemountain.com.

You can pick up your personal message here:

http://www6.bluemountain.com/cards/boxf227366z5/e9ja3hh4wdfv93.html

Your card will be available for the next 90 days.

This service is 100% FREE! :) Have a good day and have fun!

Send FREE Blue Mountain cards to friends and family (and attach gifts too!)
http://www.bluemountain.com

Karen,

Here is the market wrap -revised.

Thank you, 
Monika

Hello everyone,

Attached is the market wrap for the week of 11/09. PLease if you have any questions you can contact me.

Thanks,
Monika Causholli
ext. 5-1510 

Hi Margaret,

Can I still travel on the visa that I have with Enron name on it?

Thanks,
Monika Causholli

Pivot tables
macros

Hello Warriors,

Many of you expressed interest in an MS Excel session with Eugenio.  Please email me at least one topic you would like Eugenio to cover.

Thanks,

Ayesha

Hello Tammy,

Here is my home email:

mcausholli@hotmail.com

Let me know if there is anything else you need.
thanks,
Monika

Hi Nyree,

I took vacation from Nov12-14.

thanks,
Monika

Good morning everyone,

Timesheets are due once more, please let me know if you have any exceptions (vacation, sick...) for Nov.1-15 pay-period.  I would really appreciate your input by 2 pm, today.  If your time is regular,  simply reply with "no exceptions".   

Thank you,
Nyree I. Chanaba
713-345-4035
EIM Fundamental Analysis

thank you!

Attached is Today's Comment for Wednesday, November 14, 2001.  "011114
Strong October for Pulp" is in PDF format and requires Adobe Acrobat Reader
5.0 to open.

Regards,

Ross Hay-Roe
hayroe@equityresearchassociates.com

Equity Research Associates
PO Box 189
110 - 5580 Wharf Road
Sechelt, BC
CANADA    V0N 3A0

Tel: (604) 740-9916
Fax: (604) 740-9817

Copyright ? EQUITY RESEARCH ASSOCIATES. All rights reserved. No part of the
attached publication may be reproduced or transmitted in any form
(electronic, mechanical, photocopy, facsimile, etc.) without the express
written consent of EQUITY RESEARCH ASSOCIATES.

Directors, shareholders or employees of Equity Research Associates may be
beneficial owners of securities referred to herein.  The information
contained herein was obtained from sources which we believe to be reliable,
however such information is provided on the understanding that Equity
Research Associates is not responsible for financial losses or damages of
any kind whatsoever resulting from action taken in reliance thereon, or from
inaccuracies therein.  Neither the information nor any opinion expressed
herein constitutes a solicitation by Equity Research Associates or any of
its employees for the purchase or sale of any securities.

Dave,

As PPPC explains in the attached file the reason for the low levels of inventory was because the consumer inventories had reached such a low level (below normal) throughout the whole year that now consumers are rebuilding the stocks.

Monika

Any clue why sales were strong in Europe and North America? 

It might be worthwhile to talk to Allen Whitman and Michel Valois and see if they know.

Cheers,

Dave

Hello,

Please the attached PRELIMINARY CHEMICAL MARKET PULP REPORT from PPPC.

Highlights:

Inventories decreased by 48,000 metric tonnes, from the 1.549 million level, to reach the 1.501 million level. This is a positive development for pulp producers especially when compared to the hitorically flat change in October.

BUT in October the the lowering of inventories did not come as a result of producer discipline. In fact Norscan producers operated at 90% in October compared to the 79% in September.

What brought the reduction in inventories is the increase in shipments this month. Shipments were 1.866 million compared to the 1.771 million level in September. Demand was at a record high for the month of October due to strong pick-up sales in North America and Western Europe. Also contributing to the high demand were the shipments to Asia/Africa.
See the table below for the summary of statistics:
 
	Norscan Market Pulp Statistics - October 2001			
	Sep-01	Oct-01	Change	
		in 000s		
Inventories	                 1,549 	                    1,501 	                       (48)	
Op. Rates	                   0.79 	                      0.90 	                    (0.11)	
Production	                 1,584 	                    1,850 	                       266 	
Shipments	                 1,771 	                    1,899 	                       128 	

 << File: prelim.pdf >> 

Yes great!

I'm free tomorrow, how does that sound?

Hello Maria Teresa,

How are you. I know that you were feeling sick the last time I saw you.

I want to talk to you about grad school. When are you going to be free for lunch?

Monika

thanks!

Monika,

Here is my contact with the International Trade Commission:
Lin Su
202-205-2607

Laura E. Bosek
Analyst
Enron Industrial Markets
(713) 345-1652
ext. 51652

Dirk,

Here it is!

Monika 

... to send me that list of companies!

thanks,
Monika

Thanks Dave. I got in.

Monika

fyi, Dave

GMAT REVIEW AT ENRON

The next GMAT review course at Enron will begin Monday, November 26th:
The schedule is:
     Course # 7019-00:  Monday nights, Nov 26 - Jan 28 (no class Dec 24 or
Dec 31)

This course is identical to the courses that started in October.  It is
being offered now for the benefit of employees who would like to take the
GMAT before January 31 for the purposes of applying to business school.

Course details:
     - Class is held at Enron in room ECN560 and is restricted to Enron
		employees
     - Each course is limited to eight students
     - Meets once a week for eight weeks
     - Hours are 6:00-9:00 PM (first session will run til 10:00 pm to
          include initial exam)
     - Expect 4-5 hours of homework per week
     - Course includes a total of four practice GMAT exams
     - Ends the second week of December, allowing employees to take the
          GMAT in December and meet a January application deadline.
     - Special discount of $200 off the regular Princeton Review tuition

Enron has allowed this program to be hosted in the Enron Building for
convenience of its employees.  Individuals are responsible for paying their
own fees.  Financial support from Enron is at manager's discretion and is
subject to the usual tuition reimbursement constraints around budget and
relevance to organizational performance.

HOW TO ENROLL:
     1.  Print out the attached registration form.
     2.  Complete the form, but please note the following
          SPECIFIC INSTRUCTIONS:
          A.  Fill out the student information completely, including
               your email address.
          B.  In the Enrollment section, where it says "Please enroll
               me in GMAT Class Size-8 Course # _________",
          C.  In the Payment section:  For the course at Enron, the
               tuition is discounted by $200, to $899.
               FULL PAYMENT of this amount by credit or debit card is
required on the registration form.  Be sure to indicate complete cardholder
information.
     3.  Fax the completed form to Princeton Review at (713) 688-4746.

Faxes are time-stamped by the receiving fax machine at Princeton Review.
The first eight valid registration forms received for each course will be
honored.  Registrations received after the first eight will be placed on a
waiting
list for the course or courses indicated.  Enrollments and waitlists will be
confirmed by email.

Employees who are not able to take the course at Enron can take a course at
the Princeton Review office at the same $200 discount.  
Call (800)2REVIEW to register or to receive a list of course schedules.

IMPORTANCE OF THE GMAT:
     The GMAT score is a critical part of your application to business
school.  Indeed, in many cases, it is the single most decisive statistic
that admissions offices use in evaluating applicants.  While work
experience, GPA, essays, and interviews are all important components of
your application, the GMAT is the one objective factor that you can
substantially improve in a short period of time.

THE TEXAS MBA TOUR:
     All interested Enron employees are invited to attend the Texas MBA
Tour, which will be in Houston on Wednesday, January 23. The Texas MBA
Tour, of which The Princeton Review is a partner, is a group of six business
schools that host a joint MBA panel discussion and admissions fair.  The
participating schools are Texas, Rice, SMU, Baylor, TCU, and Texas A&M.
The Princeton Review has agreed to handle registration for the event, so
call
(800) 2REVIEW to register.

http://home.enron.com:84/messaging/gmatregform.pdf

Good luck my friend. It has been great working with you. keep in touch
my email is: mcausholli@hotmail.com
Monika
Dearest Friends,

Please know that I have been afforded the opportunity to rotate into Enron's Principal Investments Group.  That being said, I wanted to thank all of you for the warmth and kindness you have extended to me over the past 6 months.  I sincerely hope that our paths in life will cross again very soon.

Best Wishes & Many Thanks,
Vikram Singh

Nyree I received this again.
See below
Monika
Employee Name: Monika Causholli
Report Name:   Monika Causholli
Report Date:   10/25/01
Report ID:     1CD662BAC8BB11D5B373
Submitted On:  10/25/01

Receipts for this expense report have not yet been received. If receipts have been mailed, please disregard this message.

Can I get an application and a brochure from the Bocconi university. I am interested in the MIEM/MCF.

My name:
Monika Causholli

Address:

2440 north boulevard # 5205
Houston, TX 77098
USA
Tel 713 807 1039
email: mcausholli@hotmail.com

thank you,
Monika Causholli

Hello Jim,

I was glad to hear back from you. So you are going to be a grandpa soon. That's great news!

Well, the main reason I am writing to you is that I need some advice. I would like to go back to school next year but I have no financial security. My job prospects don't look good either now that Enron was bought from another company.  I know that many private schools offer scholarships as well as assistantships. I am looking into all of those. 

It would be very helpful for me if you would help and direct me in the righ direction, let's say if you know a professor that would like to have his own researcher which would help me in the process to go through with school. I have a great deal of interest in finance, and that is what I want to do, I really don't want to do a MBA, rather a MS in Finance. I am very ambitious and work really hard to succeed. I have great work experience and I have worked for a company that is well recognized for its talent pool.

If you can't help me with this process, do you know anyone who can? I really would appreciate any advice that you can give me because I have no one else to get advice from right now. In addition, if you have any contact in the job market I would look into that too. 

Thanks Jim,
Monika

Karen,

Here is my resume.
 
Thanks,
Monika

Jim,

This is very helpful. I already forwarded my resume to the Tektronix contact you told me. I am forwarding you a copy of my resume as well just in case you something good crosses your way. I appreciate your help a lot. 
This whole thing with my company happened so fast and caught me off guard.- a lesson for next time-.

Anyways please continue to keep in touch. I will do the same and keep you posted. You know we really do not want to go back home right now. I have a list of things I haven't accomplished yet.

Thanks,
Monika

Hi Monika -

I have contacted the Head of the Finance Division at the University of
Colorado in Boulder to see if they offer assistantships. He is my major
professor from years ago. I will get back to you as soon as I hear from
him.

I am also forwarding to you in another email some info regarding
potential employment at Tektronix. Even though they will be coming to
OSU and you are in Texas, I would recommend that you forward your resume
to them and tell them you got the information from me. Tell them to call
me if they want to know more about you. 

Jim

Hello Jim,

I was glad to hear back from you. So you are going to be a grandpa soon.
That's great news!

Well, the main reason I am writing to you is that I need some advice. I
would like to go back to school next year but I have no financial
security. My job prospects don't look good either now that Enron was
bought from another company.  I know that many private schools offer
scholarships as well as assistantships. I am looking into all of those. 

It would be very helpful for me if you would help and direct me in the
right direction, let's say if you know a professor that would like to
have his own researcher which would help me in the process to go through
with school. I have a great deal of interest in finance, and that is
what I want to do, I really don't want to do a MBA, rather a MS in
Finance. I am very ambitious and work really hard to succeed. I have
great work experience and I have worked for a company that is well
recognized for its talent pool.

If you can't help me with this process, do you know anyone who can? I
really would appreciate any advice that you can give me because I have
no one else to get advice from right now. In addition, if you have any
contact in the job market I would look into that too. 

Thanks Jim,
Monika

Forgot to attach it. Here is my resume.

Hi Monika -

I have contacted the Head of the Finance Division at the University of
Colorado in Boulder to see if they offer assistantships. He is my major
professor from years ago. I will get back to you as soon as I hear from
him.

I am also forwarding to you in another email some info regarding
potential employment at Tektronix. Even though they will be coming to
OSU and you are in Texas, I would recommend that you forward your resume
to them and tell them you got the information from me. Tell them to call
me if they want to know more about you. 

Jim

Hello Jim,

I was glad to hear back from you. So you are going to be a grandpa soon.
That's great news!

Well, the main reason I am writing to you is that I need some advice. I
would like to go back to school next year but I have no financial
security. My job prospects don't look good either now that Enron was
bought from another company.  I know that many private schools offer
scholarships as well as assistantships. I am looking into all of those. 

It would be very helpful for me if you would help and direct me in the
right direction, let's say if you know a professor that would like to
have his own researcher which would help me in the process to go through
with school. I have a great deal of interest in finance, and that is
what I want to do, I really don't want to do a MBA, rather a MS in
Finance. I am very ambitious and work really hard to succeed. I have
great work experience and I have worked for a company that is well
recognized for its talent pool.

If you can't help me with this process, do you know anyone who can? I
really would appreciate any advice that you can give me because I have
no one else to get advice from right now. In addition, if you have any
contact in the job market I would look into that too. 

Thanks Jim,
Monika

Sorry Morela. I will remove you now from the list.
Monika

The good news for the pulp producers continue as worldwide chemical paper-grade market pulp producer inventories declined 345,000 tonnes in September from the prior month, according to preliminary data from the Pulp and Paper Products Council in Montreal. World inventories have fallen seven consecutive months as producers reduced their stocks 9.7 percent from opening levels.
World producer stocks closed September at 3.073 million tonnes, representing 33 days of supply and a four-day reduction from August levels. Producer inventory results are 19.4 percent higher than year-ago figures, when world producers held 28 days of supply. The inventory results were by far the largest single month reduction this year. The year's prior high was in June, when producers brought down inventories by 171,000 tonnes but faced a bloated 3.528 million tonnes of stock. 
September production of 2.525 million tonnes tumbled 10.2 percent vs. year-ago results of 2.812 million tonnes. Production levels were 5.9 percent lower than the prior month. 
Global shipments improved both month-over-month and compared to the same period last year. Shipments of 2.870 million tonnes rose 2.8 percent higher than year-ago results of 2.792 million tonnes, and surged by 4.4 percent vs. August despite a slower week of activity following the Sept. 11 terrorist attacks. 
Producers operated at 84 percent of capacity in September, down 11 percent from the same time last year when producers ran at 95 percent. Meanwhile, the shipment-to-capacity ratio, considered an indicator of producer discipline, advanced another 5 points to 95 percent, PPPC reported. 

Daniel,

Attached is the spreadsheet that contains US annual wood pulp exports to Brazil for the period 1997 -2001. For 2001 the number represents the accumulated exports between January- August.

Let me know if I can help with anything else,
Monika Causholli 

Hello Karen,

Please find attached the market wrap for this week.

Thanks,
Monika 

Can you send me a brochure and an application packet?

My contact info:
Monika Causholli	
2440 North Boulevard #5205
Houston, TX 77098

email: mcausholli@hotmail.com
Tel. (713) 807 1039

Thanks,
Monika Causholli

Hello Mr. Hughson,

Ronald Melicher adviced me to contact you about the PhD program. 
I am interested in the field of finance and I wanted to learn about the PhD finance program at the University of Colorado. 
Can you summarize the main points of the program, its requirements,and the deadlines? 

I have finished a finance degree from Oregon State University and have two years of work experience.

Sincerely,
Monika Causholli
Enron Corp.
(713) 345 1510

Jim,
 
I did write to Eric Hughson about the PhD program and I am waiting for his response.
In the meantime can you write me a recommendation letter. I know you don't like to do this but if you would it would be great. I am planning to apply to about 3-4 schools for now. I will mail the paperwork to you on Monday.
Also, should I contact the other finance professors at OSU trying to see what they can help me with?
Thanks for all your help. I will keep you posted.
 
Monika

Hi Again Monika -
 
Here is what I heard from my former professor. If I were you, I would contact Eric Hughson about CU's PhD program in Finance. It is worth a try.
 
I will contact you if I hear about other opportunities either for graduate study or employment opportunities. Keep me posted.
 
Jim
 
 
Hi Jim,
It has been a long time between communications.  We no longer offer an MS in Finance (however, I believe the Denver Campus does).  We admit only one or two new students in the Finance PhD Program each year--thus it is very competitive.  Our Finance PhD Program coordinator is Eric Hughson and he could be contacted at Eric.Hughson@Colorado.EDU <mailto:Eric.Hughson@Colorado.EDU>.  Unfortunately, I don't have any specific recommendations.
Ron
PS--I also still like the teaching part of the academic life and probably won't be retiring for another few years.

Hi Ron - 

It certainly has been a long time since we have communicated. I am glad to see that you have not yet retired and either have I. Moreover, I don't have any plans to do so in the immediate future as this job is so much fun.

The reason I am writing is that a former student of mine from Albania who works for Enron has been thinking for some time that she would like to go back to school and get a Master's Degree in Finance or PhD. Being a foreign student she needs to get some sort of scholarship or assistantship. She graduated from OSU a year or so ago and has been working at Enron since that time. Given what is happening at Enron, I am not surprised that she has decided to go back for a graduate degree.

Our College of Business does not have any graduate student assistantships and we also don't offer a master degree in finance or PhD.  Monika is without a doubt one of the sharpest students I have had in recent years. She is incredibly bright and works very hard. 

Does CU still offer the masters degree in finance and still offer student assistantships. If I recall, George Carvel was working on a MS in Finance and had an assistantship under Maurice Unger when I was going to CU. If so, can I give Monika your name and have her contact and perhaps forward her resume to you. Or can you put her in touch with the right person at CU?

If CU does not have anything available do you know of a few schools who might so that I can pass the information on to Monika?

Thanks for any help you can provide. 

Best regards, 

Jim 

Hey Ami,

Here is my resume.
 

Thanks,
Monika

Jim,
 
I was thinking that since I do not have enough time to prepare the appplication process, it would be a good idea for me to fax the recommendation letter forms to you first so you know what to expect and maybe start writing. In the meantime, I will mail those forms as well as envelopes because you have to retunrn those to me. The envelopes would have to be signed across the seal.
There will be a total of four schools that I am applying to.
   1- Yale
   2- Boston College
   3- University of Massachusetts
   4- Bocconi University (Italy)
 
Thanks,
Monika

Hi -
 
I would contact the other finance guys here. Who knows, they may have some great leads. As far as the letter is concerned, I would be happy to do it. Generally, however, each grad school has a specific recommendation form that they want references to fill out. So let me know after you get the required info from the schools. Typically, students just send it to me as I will probably have to submit it directly to the grad school people as they generally want confidential letters.
 
Jim
 
 

Jim,
 
I did write to Eric Hughson about the PhD program and I am waiting for his response.
In the meantime can you write me a recommendation letter. I know you don't like to do this but if you would it would be great. I am planning to apply to about 3-4 schools for now. I will mail the paperwork to you on Monday.
Also, should I contact the other finance professors at OSU trying to see what they can help me with?
Thanks for all your help. I will keep you posted.
 
Monika

Hi Again Monika -
 
Here is what I heard from my former professor. If I were you, I would contact Eric Hughson about CU's PhD program in Finance. It is worth a try.
 
I will contact you if I hear about other opportunities either for graduate study or employment opportunities. Keep me posted.
 
Jim
 
 
Hi Jim,
It has been a long time between communications.  We no longer offer an MS in Finance (however, I believe the Denver Campus does).  We admit only one or two new students in the Finance PhD Program each year--thus it is very competitive.  Our Finance PhD Program coordinator is Eric Hughson and he could be contacted at Eric.Hughson@Colorado.EDU <mailto:Eric.Hughson@Colorado.EDU>.  Unfortunately, I don't have any specific recommendations.
Ron
PS--I also still like the teaching part of the academic life and probably won't be retiring for another few years.

Hi Ron - 

It certainly has been a long time since we have communicated. I am glad to see that you have not yet retired and either have I. Moreover, I don't have any plans to do so in the immediate future as this job is so much fun.

The reason I am writing is that a former student of mine from Albania who works for Enron has been thinking for some time that she would like to go back to school and get a Master's Degree in Finance or PhD. Being a foreign student she needs to get some sort of scholarship or assistantship. She graduated from OSU a year or so ago and has been working at Enron since that time. Given what is happening at Enron, I am not surprised that she has decided to go back for a graduate degree.

Our College of Business does not have any graduate student assistantships and we also don't offer a master degree in finance or PhD.  Monika is without a doubt one of the sharpest students I have had in recent years. She is incredibly bright and works very hard. 

Does CU still offer the masters degree in finance and still offer student assistantships. If I recall, George Carvel was working on a MS in Finance and had an assistantship under Maurice Unger when I was going to CU. If so, can I give Monika your name and have her contact and perhaps forward her resume to you. Or can you put her in touch with the right person at CU?

If CU does not have anything available do you know of a few schools who might so that I can pass the information on to Monika?

Thanks for any help you can provide. 

Best regards, 

Jim 

Karen,

I will be in a class on Nov 27-28. The class in on "Understanding Options". Let me know if this is OK with you.

Thanks,
Monika 
Dear MONIKA,

Your enrollment status has been changed from 'Wait Listed' to 
'Enrolled' for the following course:

Course Title    : Understanding Options
Course Code     : UOPTNS-112701
Course Type     : Instructor Led Course

Starting Date   : Nov 27, 2001 8:00 AM
Ending Date     : Nov 28, 2001 5:00 PM

Thank you.

I think so. They don't register you until the person in charge approves it.

Monika,

Was this already approved by Andrea?  

Karen

Karen,

I will be in a class on Nov 27-28. The class in on "Understanding Options". Let me know if this is OK with you.

Thanks,
Monika 
Dear MONIKA,

Your enrollment status has been changed from 'Wait Listed' to 
'Enrolled' for the following course:

Course Title    : Understanding Options
Course Code     : UOPTNS-112701
Course Type     : Instructor Led Course

Starting Date   : Nov 27, 2001 8:00 AM
Ending Date     : Nov 28, 2001 5:00 PM

Thank you.

I can't attend this class.

thanks,
Monika Causholli

Dear MONIKA,

Your enrollment status has been changed from 'Wait Listed' to 
'Enrolled' for the following course:

Course Title    : Understanding Options
Course Code     : UOPTNS-112701
Course Type     : Instructor Led Course

Starting Date   : Nov 27, 2001 8:00 AM
Ending Date     : Nov 28, 2001 5:00 PM

Thank you.

Hi Karen,

Here is the Chilean capacity spreadsheet. I have placed this in the O:/Industrial Markets/Fundamentals/South American Pulp/Chile Data.
 

Monika

Monika,

Could you send me the Chilean capacity spreadsheet you'd put together?  Thanks.

Karen

thanks Dave!

good wrap! Thanks,
 
Dave

Hello everyone,
 
Attached is the market wrap for the week of Oct 19. If you have any questions you can contact me.
 
thanks,
Monika Causholli

Hello,

I am interested in the marketing analyst job posted in the monster.com

Please find my resume attached.

Sincerely, 
Monika Causholli

Monika Causholli
2240 North Boulevard #5205 
Houston, Texas 77098
                          (713) 807 1039                                                                                                                                                                                                                                   
                     mcausholli@hotmail.com
EDUCATION 
BS in Financial Services/Business Administration, Oregon State University, Corvallis, Oregon
Overall GPA 3.91/4.00. Minor: Political Science/International Affairs.

WORK EXPERIENCE

?	Analyzed the financial condition of pulp and paper companies by carefully reading through their financial statements and drawing the conclusion of their financial health. Based on the results of the analysis, prepared company reports for the origination team.    
?	Supporting the team of originators and traders by gathering data on the pulp market, preparing presentations, doing analysis on the prices and other market variables. Wrote a weekly newsletter with the most important information that included a market commentary. Built and completed the spreadsheets that contain all the market data for pulp. The spreadsheets helped the spot/financial traders to evaluate market conditions and make trading decisions. 

?	Researched the variables that affect the hourly electricity market including temperatures, planned and forced outages of generating units, loads and CISO expost prices resulting in an informed opinion about that day's trading options.
?	Looked for opportunities to create value based on the research. Raised up to $100,000 a day by following the market closely, taking advantage of the arbitrage opportunities between the different markets, and making use of transmission available to send power to various points. 
?	Ran the El Paso Electric Utility during the off peak hours and weekends by matching the load (demand) with the supply and making the necessary decisions to run the system reliably by following the WSCC requirements on spin and nonspin requirements.

?	Researched and graphed the historical temperatures for the Pacific Northwest, the Desert Southwest, and Rocky mountain and tried to find the correlation between the temperatures and energy load (demand).
?	Co-designed the load-forecasting model for the Pacific Northwest, Desert Southwest and Rocky Mountains in a course of three months.
?	Compiled the daily information for the term and cash traders including the historical temperatures graphs for California, daily forecasted load, and gas prices. 

             Financial Analyst 		         Edicom sh.p.k. 
             Assistant		                       Tirana, Albania 6/98-9/98
		 	
?	Calculated revenues, expenses, interest payments and cash flows for over ten investment projects including apartment buildings and a business center.
?	Translated business letters including memos and proposals from Italian/Albanian to English. 

COMPUTER SKILLS
 Software: Proficient in MS Word, PowerPoint, and Excel 

FOREIGN LANGUAGES
Albanian    Native Fluency
Italian    Near-Native Fluency	 

MAIN STRENGTHS:  Good analytical skills, detail oriented, a hard-worker, ambitious, a fast-learner, good writing skills, enthusiastic.  

					

Monika Causholli
2240 North Boulevard #5205 
Houston, Texas 77098
                      (713) 807-1039
mcausholli@hotmail.com
EDUCATION 
BS in Financial Services/Business Administration, Oregon State University, Corvallis, Oregon
Overall GPA 3.91/4.00. Minor: Political Science/International Affairs.

WORK EXPERIENCE

?	Analyzed the financial condition of pulp and paper companies by carefully reading through their financial statements and drawing the conclusion of their financial health. Based on the results of the analysis, prepared company reports for the origination team.    
?	Supporting the team of originators and traders by gathering data on the pulp market, preparing presentations, doing analysis on the prices and other market variables. Wrote a weekly newsletter with the most important information that included a market commentary. Built and completed the spreadsheets that contain all the market data for pulp. The spreadsheets helped the spot/financial traders to evaluate market conditions and make trading decisions. 

?	Researched the variables that affect the hourly electricity market including temperatures, planned and forced outages of generating units, loads and CISO expost prices resulting in an informed opinion about that day's trading options.
?	Looked for opportunities to create value based on the research. Raised up to $100,000 a day by following the market closely, taking advantage of the arbitrage opportunities between the different markets, and making use of transmission available to send power to various points. 
?	Ran the El Paso Electric Utility during the off peak hours and weekends by matching the load (demand) with the supply and making the necessary decisions to run the system reliably by following the WSCC requirements on spin and nonspin requirements.

?	Researched and graphed the historical temperatures for the Pacific Northwest, the Desert Southwest, and Rocky mountain and tried to find the correlation between the temperatures and energy load (demand).
?	Co-designed the load-forecasting model for the Pacific Northwest, Desert Southwest and Rocky Mountains in a course of three months.
?	Compiled the daily information for the term and cash traders including the historical temperatures graphs for California, daily forecasted load, and gas prices. 

             Financial Analyst 		         Edicom sh.p.k. 
             Assistant		                       Tirana, Albania 6/98-9/98
		 	
?	Calculated revenues, expenses, interest payments and cash flows for over ten investment projects including apartment buildings and a business center.
?	Translated business letters including memos and proposals from Italian/Albanian to English. 

COMPUTER SKILLS
 Software: Proficient in MS Word, PowerPoint, and Excel 

FOREIGN LANGUAGES
Albanian    Native Fluency
Italian    Near-Native Fluency	 

MAIN STRENGTHS:  Good analytical skills, detail oriented, a hard-worker, ambitious, a fast-learner, good writing skills, enthusiastic.  

					

Hello,

I am applying for the Power trader position offered in the monster.com. I have 1- year experience working as a real time power trader.
Please find my resume attached for additional information.

Thanks,
Monika Causholli 

Hello,

I am applying for the credit analyst position placed on the monster.com.

Please find my resume attached.

Sincerely,
Monika Causholli 

 

Hello,

I am looking for the Financial Analyst position posted on the monster.com

Please find my resume attached.

Sincerely,
Monika Causholli

FOEX for NBSK and BHKP continued to increase by a few cents this week and it looks like they are approaching the late July levels.  

NBSK is now US$468.64 up US$0.92 or 0.2%
BHKP is 417.21 up US$0.15 or 0.04%.

See attached

Monika

Jim,
 
What is you middle name if you don't mind me asking you. I need it to fill out the recommendation letter
 
Monika

The fax number here is 541-737-4890.

Jim,
 
I was thinking that since I do not have enough time to prepare the appplication process, it would be a good idea for me to fax the recommendation letter forms to you first so you know what to expect and maybe start writing. In the meantime, I will mail those forms as well as envelopes because you have to retunrn those to me. The envelopes would have to be signed across the seal.
There will be a total of four schools that I am applying to.
   1- Yale
   2- Boston College
   3- University of Massachusetts
   4- Bocconi University (Italy)
 
Thanks,
Monika

Hi -
 
I would contact the other finance guys here. Who knows, they may have some great leads. As far as the letter is concerned, I would be happy to do it. Generally, however, each grad school has a specific recommendation form that they want references to fill out. So let me know after you get the required info from the schools. Typically, students just send it to me as I will probably have to submit it directly to the grad school people as they generally want confidential letters.
 
Jim
 
 

Jim,
 
I did write to Eric Hughson about the PhD program and I am waiting for his response.
In the meantime can you write me a recommendation letter. I know you don't like to do this but if you would it would be great. I am planning to apply to about 3-4 schools for now. I will mail the paperwork to you on Monday.
Also, should I contact the other finance professors at OSU trying to see what they can help me with?
Thanks for all your help. I will keep you posted.
 
Monika

Hi Again Monika -
 
Here is what I heard from my former professor. If I were you, I would contact Eric Hughson about CU's PhD program in Finance. It is worth a try.
 
I will contact you if I hear about other opportunities either for graduate study or employment opportunities. Keep me posted.
 
Jim
 
 
Hi Jim,
It has been a long time between communications.  We no longer offer an MS in Finance (however, I believe the Denver Campus does).  We admit only one or two new students in the Finance PhD Program each year--thus it is very competitive.  Our Finance PhD Program coordinator is Eric Hughson and he could be contacted at Eric.Hughson@Colorado.EDU <mailto:Eric.Hughson@Colorado.EDU>.  Unfortunately, I don't have any specific recommendations.
Ron
PS--I also still like the teaching part of the academic life and probably won't be retiring for another few years.

Hi Ron - 

It certainly has been a long time since we have communicated. I am glad to see that you have not yet retired and either have I. Moreover, I don't have any plans to do so in the immediate future as this job is so much fun.

The reason I am writing is that a former student of mine from Albania who works for Enron has been thinking for some time that she would like to go back to school and get a Master's Degree in Finance or PhD. Being a foreign student she needs to get some sort of scholarship or assistantship. She graduated from OSU a year or so ago and has been working at Enron since that time. Given what is happening at Enron, I am not surprised that she has decided to go back for a graduate degree.

Our College of Business does not have any graduate student assistantships and we also don't offer a master degree in finance or PhD.  Monika is without a doubt one of the sharpest students I have had in recent years. She is incredibly bright and works very hard. 

Does CU still offer the masters degree in finance and still offer student assistantships. If I recall, George Carvel was working on a MS in Finance and had an assistantship under Maurice Unger when I was going to CU. If so, can I give Monika your name and have her contact and perhaps forward her resume to you. Or can you put her in touch with the right person at CU?

If CU does not have anything available do you know of a few schools who might so that I can pass the information on to Monika?

Thanks for any help you can provide. 

Best regards, 

Jim 

... I also need the exact title you have
 
Monika

The fax number here is 541-737-4890.

Jim,
 
I was thinking that since I do not have enough time to prepare the appplication process, it would be a good idea for me to fax the recommendation letter forms to you first so you know what to expect and maybe start writing. In the meantime, I will mail those forms as well as envelopes because you have to retunrn those to me. The envelopes would have to be signed across the seal.
There will be a total of four schools that I am applying to.
   1- Yale
   2- Boston College
   3- University of Massachusetts
   4- Bocconi University (Italy)
 
Thanks,
Monika

Hi -
 
I would contact the other finance guys here. Who knows, they may have some great leads. As far as the letter is concerned, I would be happy to do it. Generally, however, each grad school has a specific recommendation form that they want references to fill out. So let me know after you get the required info from the schools. Typically, students just send it to me as I will probably have to submit it directly to the grad school people as they generally want confidential letters.
 
Jim
 
 

Jim,
 
I did write to Eric Hughson about the PhD program and I am waiting for his response.
In the meantime can you write me a recommendation letter. I know you don't like to do this but if you would it would be great. I am planning to apply to about 3-4 schools for now. I will mail the paperwork to you on Monday.
Also, should I contact the other finance professors at OSU trying to see what they can help me with?
Thanks for all your help. I will keep you posted.
 
Monika

Hi Again Monika -
 
Here is what I heard from my former professor. If I were you, I would contact Eric Hughson about CU's PhD program in Finance. It is worth a try.
 
I will contact you if I hear about other opportunities either for graduate study or employment opportunities. Keep me posted.
 
Jim
 
 
Hi Jim,
It has been a long time between communications.  We no longer offer an MS in Finance (however, I believe the Denver Campus does).  We admit only one or two new students in the Finance PhD Program each year--thus it is very competitive.  Our Finance PhD Program coordinator is Eric Hughson and he could be contacted at Eric.Hughson@Colorado.EDU <mailto:Eric.Hughson@Colorado.EDU>.  Unfortunately, I don't have any specific recommendations.
Ron
PS--I also still like the teaching part of the academic life and probably won't be retiring for another few years.

Hi Ron - 

It certainly has been a long time since we have communicated. I am glad to see that you have not yet retired and either have I. Moreover, I don't have any plans to do so in the immediate future as this job is so much fun.

The reason I am writing is that a former student of mine from Albania who works for Enron has been thinking for some time that she would like to go back to school and get a Master's Degree in Finance or PhD. Being a foreign student she needs to get some sort of scholarship or assistantship. She graduated from OSU a year or so ago and has been working at Enron since that time. Given what is happening at Enron, I am not surprised that she has decided to go back for a graduate degree.

Our College of Business does not have any graduate student assistantships and we also don't offer a master degree in finance or PhD.  Monika is without a doubt one of the sharpest students I have had in recent years. She is incredibly bright and works very hard. 

Does CU still offer the masters degree in finance and still offer student assistantships. If I recall, George Carvel was working on a MS in Finance and had an assistantship under Maurice Unger when I was going to CU. If so, can I give Monika your name and have her contact and perhaps forward her resume to you. Or can you put her in touch with the right person at CU?

If CU does not have anything available do you know of a few schools who might so that I can pass the information on to Monika?

Thanks for any help you can provide. 

Best regards, 

Jim 

I will not be able to attend the class!

Dear MONIKA CAUSHOLLI, 
 
The following session's dates or location have been modified.
Please note the change.
 
Session
Meetings
Thank you!
 
Docent Learning Management System.
 

Hello everyone,
 
Attached is the market wrap for the week of Oct 19. If you have any questions you can contact me.
 
thanks,
Monika Causholli

Hello,

I am applying for the position of client support analyst posted on the Headhunter website.

Please see my resume below:

Monika Causholli
2240 North Boulevard #5205 
Houston, Texas 77098
                      (713) 807-1039
mcausholli@hotmail.com
EDUCATION 
BS in Financial Services/Business Administration, Oregon State University, Corvallis, Oregon
Overall GPA 3.91/4.00. Minor: Political Science/International Affairs.

WORK EXPERIENCE

?	Analyzed the financial condition of pulp and paper companies by carefully reading through their financial statements and drawing the conclusion of their financial health. Based on the results of the analysis, prepared company reports for the origination team.    
?	Supported the team of originators and traders by gathering data on the pulp market, preparing presentations, doing analysis on the prices and other market variables. Wrote a weekly newsletter with the most important information that included a market commentary. Built and completed the spreadsheets that contain all the market data for pulp. The spreadsheets helped the spot/financial traders to evaluate market conditions and make trading decisions. 

?	Researched the variables that affect the hourly electricity market including temperatures, planned and forced outages of generating units, loads and CISO expost prices resulting in an informed opinion about that day's trading options.
?	Looked for opportunities to create value based on the research. Raised up to $100,000 a day by following the market closely, taking advantage of the arbitrage opportunities between the different markets, and making use of transmission available to send power to various points. 
?	Ran the El Paso Electric Utility during the off peak hours and weekends by matching the load (demand) with the supply and making the necessary decisions to run the system reliably by following the WSCC requirements on spin and nonspin requirements.

?	Researched and graphed the historical temperatures for the Pacific Northwest, the Desert Southwest, and Rocky mountain and tried to find the correlation between the temperatures and energy load (demand).
?	Co-designed the load-forecasting model for the Pacific Northwest, Desert Southwest and Rocky Mountains in a course of three months.
?	Compiled the daily information for the term and cash traders including the historical temperatures graphs for California, daily forecasted load, and gas prices. 

             Financial Analyst 		         Edicom sh.p.k. 
             Assistant		                       Tirana, Albania 6/98-9/98
		 	
?	Calculated revenues, expenses, interest payments and cash flows for over ten investment projects including apartment buildings and a business center.
?	Translated business letters including memos and proposals from Italian/Albanian to English. 

COMPUTER SKILLS
 Software: Proficient in MS Word, PowerPoint, and Excel 

FOREIGN LANGUAGES
Albanian    Native Fluency
Italian    Near-Native Fluency	 

MAIN STRENGTHS:  Good analytical skills, detail oriented, a hard-worker, ambitious, a fast-learner, good writing skills, enthusiastic.  

					

Hello,

I am interested in the Financial Analyst position posted with Headhunter.
Please see my resume below:

Monika Causholli
2240 North Boulevard #5205 
Houston, Texas 77098
                      (713) 807-1039
mcausholli@hotmail.com
EDUCATION 
BS in Financial Services/Business Administration, Oregon State University, Corvallis, Oregon
Overall GPA 3.91/4.00. Minor: Political Science/International Affairs.

WORK EXPERIENCE

?	Analyzed the financial condition of pulp and paper companies by carefully reading through their financial statements and drawing the conclusion of their financial health. Based on the results of the analysis, prepared company reports for the origination team.    
?	Supported the team of originators and traders by gathering data on the pulp market, preparing presentations, doing analysis on the prices and other market variables. Wrote a weekly newsletter with the most important information that included a market commentary. Built and completed the spreadsheets that contain all the market data for pulp. The spreadsheets helped the spot/financial traders to evaluate market conditions and make trading decisions. 

?	Researched the variables that affect the hourly electricity market including temperatures, planned and forced outages of generating units, loads and CISO expost prices resulting in an informed opinion about that day's trading options.
?	Looked for opportunities to create value based on the research. Raised up to $100,000 a day by following the market closely, taking advantage of the arbitrage opportunities between the different markets, and making use of transmission available to send power to various points. 
?	Ran the El Paso Electric Utility during the off peak hours and weekends by matching the load (demand) with the supply and making the necessary decisions to run the system reliably by following the WSCC requirements on spin and nonspin requirements.

?	Researched and graphed the historical temperatures for the Pacific Northwest, the Desert Southwest, and Rocky mountain and tried to find the correlation between the temperatures and energy load (demand).
?	Co-designed the load-forecasting model for the Pacific Northwest, Desert Southwest and Rocky Mountains in a course of three months.
?	Compiled the daily information for the term and cash traders including the historical temperatures graphs for California, daily forecasted load, and gas prices. 

             Financial Analyst 		         Edicom sh.p.k. 
             Assistant		                       Tirana, Albania 6/98-9/98
		 	
?	Calculated revenues, expenses, interest payments and cash flows for over ten investment projects including apartment buildings and a business center.
?	Translated business letters including memos and proposals from Italian/Albanian to English. 

COMPUTER SKILLS
 Software: Proficient in MS Word, PowerPoint, and Excel 

FOREIGN LANGUAGES
Albanian    Native Fluency
Italian    Near-Native Fluency	 

MAIN STRENGTHS:  Good analytical skills, detail oriented, a hard-worker, ambitious, a fast-learner, good writing skills, enthusiastic.  

					

Hello,

I am interested in the position of Senior Financial Analyst posted on Headhunter. I am attaching my resume as a summary of my education and work experience. You can contact me by email, or phone. See details below:

Monika Causholli
2240 North Boulevard #5205 
Houston, Texas 77098
                      (713) 807-1039
mcausholli@hotmail.com
EDUCATION 
BS in Financial Services/Business Administration, Oregon State University, Corvallis, Oregon
Overall GPA 3.91/4.00. Minor: Political Science/International Affairs.

WORK EXPERIENCE

?	Analyzed the financial condition of pulp and paper companies by carefully reading through their financial statements and drawing the conclusion of their financial health. Based on the results of the analysis, prepared company reports for the origination team.    
?	Supported the team of originators and traders by gathering data on the pulp market, preparing presentations, doing analysis on the prices and other market variables. Wrote a weekly newsletter with the most important information that included a market commentary. Built and completed the spreadsheets that contain all the market data for pulp. The spreadsheets helped the spot/financial traders to evaluate market conditions and make trading decisions. 

?	Researched the variables that affect the hourly electricity market including temperatures, planned and forced outages of generating units, loads and CISO expost prices resulting in an informed opinion about that day's trading options.
?	Looked for opportunities to create value based on the research. Raised up to $100,000 a day by following the market closely, taking advantage of the arbitrage opportunities between the different markets, and making use of transmission available to send power to various points. 
?	Ran the El Paso Electric Utility during the off peak hours and weekends by matching the load (demand) with the supply and making the necessary decisions to run the system reliably by following the WSCC requirements on spin and nonspin requirements.

?	Researched and graphed the historical temperatures for the Pacific Northwest, the Desert Southwest, and Rocky mountain and tried to find the correlation between the temperatures and energy load (demand).
?	Co-designed the load-forecasting model for the Pacific Northwest, Desert Southwest and Rocky Mountains in a course of three months.
?	Compiled the daily information for the term and cash traders including the historical temperatures graphs for California, daily forecasted load, and gas prices. 

             Financial Analyst 		         Edicom sh.p.k. 
             Assistant		                       Tirana, Albania 6/98-9/98
		 	
?	Calculated revenues, expenses, interest payments and cash flows for over ten investment projects including apartment buildings and a business center.
?	Translated business letters including memos and proposals from Italian/Albanian to English. 

COMPUTER SKILLS
 Software: Proficient in MS Word, PowerPoint, and Excel 

FOREIGN LANGUAGES
Albanian    Native Fluency
Italian    Near-Native Fluency	 

MAIN STRENGTHS:  Good analytical skills, detail oriented, a hard-worker, ambitious, a fast-learner, good writing skills, enthusiastic.  

					

Hello,

I am pplying for the Financial Analyst position posted on Headhunter. Attached is my resume.
You can contact me by email or phone. See below:

Monika Causholli
2240 North Boulevard #5205 
Houston, Texas 77098
                      (713) 807-1039
mcausholli@hotmail.com
EDUCATION 
BS in Financial Services/Business Administration, Oregon State University, Corvallis, Oregon
Overall GPA 3.91/4.00. Minor: Political Science/International Affairs.

WORK EXPERIENCE

?	Analyzed the financial condition of pulp and paper companies by carefully reading through their financial statements and drawing the conclusion of their financial health. Based on the results of the analysis, prepared company reports for the origination team.    
?	Supported the team of originators and traders by gathering data on the pulp market, preparing presentations, doing analysis on the prices and other market variables. Wrote a weekly newsletter with the most important information that included a market commentary. Built and completed the spreadsheets that contain all the market data for pulp. The spreadsheets helped the spot/financial traders to evaluate market conditions and make trading decisions. 

?	Researched the variables that affect the hourly electricity market including temperatures, planned and forced outages of generating units, loads and CISO expost prices resulting in an informed opinion about that day's trading options.
?	Looked for opportunities to create value based on the research. Raised up to $100,000 a day by following the market closely, taking advantage of the arbitrage opportunities between the different markets, and making use of transmission available to send power to various points. 
?	Ran the El Paso Electric Utility during the off peak hours and weekends by matching the load (demand) with the supply and making the necessary decisions to run the system reliably by following the WSCC requirements on spin and nonspin requirements.

?	Researched and graphed the historical temperatures for the Pacific Northwest, the Desert Southwest, and Rocky mountain and tried to find the correlation between the temperatures and energy load (demand).
?	Co-designed the load-forecasting model for the Pacific Northwest, Desert Southwest and Rocky Mountains in a course of three months.
?	Compiled the daily information for the term and cash traders including the historical temperatures graphs for California, daily forecasted load, and gas prices. 

             Financial Analyst 		         Edicom sh.p.k. 
             Assistant		                       Tirana, Albania 6/98-9/98
		 	
?	Calculated revenues, expenses, interest payments and cash flows for over ten investment projects including apartment buildings and a business center.
?	Translated business letters including memos and proposals from Italian/Albanian to English. 

COMPUTER SKILLS
 Software: Proficient in MS Word, PowerPoint, and Excel 

FOREIGN LANGUAGES
Albanian    Native Fluency
Italian    Near-Native Fluency	 

MAIN STRENGTHS:  Good analytical skills, detail oriented, a hard-worker, ambitious, a fast-learner, good writing skills, enthusiastic.  

					

Hello,

I am interested in the Transmission Trader position posted in the Headhunter. I have also attached my resume as a summary of my qualifications. Please contact me by email or phone. See below:

Monika Causholli
2240 North Boulevard #5205 
Houston, Texas 77098
                      (713) 807-1039
mcausholli@hotmail.com
EDUCATION 
BS in Financial Services/Business Administration, Oregon State University, Corvallis, Oregon
Overall GPA 3.91/4.00. Minor: Political Science/International Affairs.

WORK EXPERIENCE

?	Analyzed the financial condition of pulp and paper companies by carefully reading through their financial statements and drawing the conclusion of their financial health. Based on the results of the analysis, prepared company reports for the origination team.    
?	Supported the team of originators and traders by gathering data on the pulp market, preparing presentations, doing analysis on the prices and other market variables. Wrote a weekly newsletter with the most important information that included a market commentary. Built and completed the spreadsheets that contain all the market data for pulp. The spreadsheets helped the spot/financial traders to evaluate market conditions and make trading decisions. 

?	Researched the variables that affect the hourly electricity market including temperatures, planned and forced outages of generating units, loads and CISO expost prices resulting in an informed opinion about that day's trading options.
?	Looked for opportunities to create value based on the research. Raised up to $100,000 a day by following the market closely, taking advantage of the arbitrage opportunities between the different markets, and making use of transmission available to send power to various points. 
?	Ran the El Paso Electric Utility during the off peak hours and weekends by matching the load (demand) with the supply and making the necessary decisions to run the system reliably by following the WSCC requirements on spin and nonspin requirements.

?	Researched and graphed the historical temperatures for the Pacific Northwest, the Desert Southwest, and Rocky mountain and tried to find the correlation between the temperatures and energy load (demand).
?	Co-designed the load-forecasting model for the Pacific Northwest, Desert Southwest and Rocky Mountains in a course of three months.
?	Compiled the daily information for the term and cash traders including the historical temperatures graphs for California, daily forecasted load, and gas prices. 

             Financial Analyst 		         Edicom sh.p.k. 
             Assistant		                       Tirana, Albania 6/98-9/98
		 	
?	Calculated revenues, expenses, interest payments and cash flows for over ten investment projects including apartment buildings and a business center.
?	Translated business letters including memos and proposals from Italian/Albanian to English. 

COMPUTER SKILLS
 Software: Proficient in MS Word, PowerPoint, and Excel 

FOREIGN LANGUAGES
Albanian    Native Fluency
Italian    Near-Native Fluency	 

MAIN STRENGTHS:  Good analytical skills, detail oriented, a hard-worker, ambitious, a fast-learner, good writing skills, enthusiastic.  

					

Hello,

I am interested in the Trading Analyst position with Sims Associates which was posted on Headhunter. I am attaching my resume as a summary of my qualifications. Please contact me through email or phone. See below:

Monika Causholli
2240 North Boulevard #5205 
Houston, Texas 77098
                      (713) 807-1039
mcausholli@hotmail.com
EDUCATION 
BS in Financial Services/Business Administration, Oregon State University, Corvallis, Oregon
Overall GPA 3.91/4.00. Minor: Political Science/International Affairs.

WORK EXPERIENCE

?	Analyzed the financial condition of pulp and paper companies by carefully reading through their financial statements and drawing the conclusion of their financial health. Based on the results of the analysis, prepared company reports for the origination team.    
?	Supported the team of originators and traders by gathering data on the pulp market, preparing presentations, doing analysis on the prices and other market variables. Wrote a weekly newsletter with the most important information that included a market commentary. Built and completed the spreadsheets that contain all the market data for pulp. The spreadsheets helped the spot/financial traders to evaluate market conditions and make trading decisions. 

?	Researched the variables that affect the hourly electricity market including temperatures, planned and forced outages of generating units, loads and CISO expost prices resulting in an informed opinion about that day's trading options.
?	Looked for opportunities to create value based on the research. Raised up to $100,000 a day by following the market closely, taking advantage of the arbitrage opportunities between the different markets, and making use of transmission available to send power to various points. 
?	Ran the El Paso Electric Utility during the off peak hours and weekends by matching the load (demand) with the supply and making the necessary decisions to run the system reliably by following the WSCC requirements on spin and nonspin requirements.

?	Researched and graphed the historical temperatures for the Pacific Northwest, the Desert Southwest, and Rocky mountain and tried to find the correlation between the temperatures and energy load (demand).
?	Co-designed the load-forecasting model for the Pacific Northwest, Desert Southwest and Rocky Mountains in a course of three months.
?	Compiled the daily information for the term and cash traders including the historical temperatures graphs for California, daily forecasted load, and gas prices. 

             Financial Analyst 		         Edicom sh.p.k. 
             Assistant		                       Tirana, Albania 6/98-9/98
		 	
?	Calculated revenues, expenses, interest payments and cash flows for over ten investment projects including apartment buildings and a business center.
?	Translated business letters including memos and proposals from Italian/Albanian to English. 

COMPUTER SKILLS
 Software: Proficient in MS Word, PowerPoint, and Excel 

FOREIGN LANGUAGES
Albanian    Native Fluency
Italian    Near-Native Fluency	 

MAIN STRENGTHS:  Good analytical skills, detail oriented, a hard-worker, ambitious, a fast-learner, good writing skills, enthusiastic.  

					

Please direct your concerns to my admin. assistant Nyree Chanaba 
at ext. 5-4035

Employee Name: Monika Causholli
Report Name:   Monika Causholli
Report Date:   10/25/01
Report ID:     1CD662BAC8BB11D5B373
Submitted On:  10/25/01

Receipts for this expense report have not yet been received. If receipts have been mailed, please disregard this message.

Jim,

Attached is the spreadsheet that contains regional consumption of market pulp by grade.

Monika 

Hello Ms. Schwenker,

I am interested in the financial analyst position posted in hotjobs.com
Please find my resume attached. You can contact me by email or phone.

Sincerely,

Monika Causholli

Monika Causholli
2240 North Boulevard #5205 
Houston, Texas 77098
                      (713) 807-1039
mcausholli@hotmail.com
EDUCATION 
BS in Financial Services/Business Administration, Oregon State University, Corvallis, Oregon
Overall GPA 3.91/4.00. Minor: Political Science/International Affairs.

WORK EXPERIENCE

?	Analyzed the financial condition of pulp and paper companies by carefully reading through their financial statements and drawing the conclusion of their financial health. Based on the results of the analysis, prepared company reports for the origination team.    
?	Supported the team of originators and traders by gathering data on the pulp market, preparing presentations, doing analysis on the prices and other market variables. Wrote a weekly newsletter with the most important information that included a market commentary. Built and completed the spreadsheets that contain all the market data for pulp. The spreadsheets helped the spot/financial traders to evaluate market conditions and make trading decisions. 

?	Researched the variables that affect the hourly electricity market including temperatures, planned and forced outages of generating units, loads and CISO expost prices resulting in an informed opinion about that day's trading options.
?	Looked for opportunities to create value based on the research. Raised up to $100,000 a day by following the market closely, taking advantage of the arbitrage opportunities between the different markets, and making use of transmission available to send power to various points. 
?	Ran the El Paso Electric Utility during the off peak hours and weekends by matching the load (demand) with the supply and making the necessary decisions to run the system reliably by following the WSCC requirements on spin and nonspin requirements.

?	Researched and graphed the historical temperatures for the Pacific Northwest, the Desert Southwest, and Rocky mountain and tried to find the correlation between the temperatures and energy load (demand).
?	Co-designed the load-forecasting model for the Pacific Northwest, Desert Southwest and Rocky Mountains in a course of three months.
?	Compiled the daily information for the term and cash traders including the historical temperatures graphs for California, daily forecasted load, and gas prices. 

             Financial Analyst 		         Edicom sh.p.k. 
             Assistant		                       Tirana, Albania 6/98-9/98
		 	
?	Calculated revenues, expenses, interest payments and cash flows for over ten investment projects including apartment buildings and a business center.
?	Translated business letters including memos and proposals from Italian/Albanian to English. 

COMPUTER SKILLS
 Software: Proficient in MS Word, PowerPoint, and Excel 

FOREIGN LANGUAGES
Albanian    Native Fluency
Italian    Near-Native Fluency	 

MAIN STRENGTHS:  Good analytical skills, detail oriented, a hard-worker, ambitious, a fast-learner, good writing skills, enthusiastic.  

					

Hey Vik,

What is going on over there? Are you guys busy? 

I got a favor to ask you. I know that one time you told me you could talk to your sister about a job opportunity at the World Bank. I am desperate to find another job and I feel I am a good candidate to work for the World Bank. Can you talk to her about me?  I can call her too and talk about openings there.

I would really appreciate your help,
Monika

do you know any phone number for BMG?

lname=Causholli
fname=Monika
Vac #=
nationality=ALBANIAN
address  =
permanent Address  =
Office phone=713 345 1510
fax=
email=mcausholli@hotmail.com
duration=
gender=FEMALE
dday=09
dmonth=11
dyear=1975
marital=Married
residence=no
country  of residence  =
change=no
country of nationality   =
relatives=no
names of relatives  =
language=Albanian
language  =English- High, High, High
PCskills  =Excel, Word, PowerPoint
Education=Oregon State University, Corvallis, Oregon USA
Degree: Bachelor of Science in Finance
Minor: International Relations
GPA 3.9

High School Graduation: June 1994 Tirana, Albania
publications=
Supervisor Karen Carter
Reasons for Leaving: Company is going bankrupt

?	Analyzed the financial condition of pulp and paper companies by carefully reading through their financial statements and drawing the conclusion of their financial health. Based on the results of the analysis, prepared company reports for the origination team.    
?	Supported the team of originators and traders by gathering data on the pulp market, preparing presentations, doing analysis on the prices and other market variables. Wrote a weekly newsletter with the most important information that included a market commentary. Built and completed the spreadsheets that contain all the market data for pulp. The spreadsheets helped the spot/financial traders to evaluate market conditions and make trading decisions. 

Supervisor: Bill Williams

?	Researched the variables that affect the hourly electricity market including temperatures, planned and forced outages of generating units, loads and CISO expost prices resulting in an informed opinion about that day?s trading options.
?	Looked for opportunities to create value based on the research. Raised up to $100,000 a day by following the market closely, taking advantage of the arbitrage opportunities between the different markets, and making use of transmission available to send power to various points. 
?	Ran the El Paso Electric Utility during the off peak hours and weekends by matching the load (demand) with the supply and making the necessary decisions to run the system reliably by following the WSCC requirements on spin and nonspin requirements.

?	Researched and graphed the historical temperatures for the Pacific Northwest, the Desert Southwest, and Rocky mountain and tried to find the correlation between the temperatures and energy load (demand).
?	Co-designed the load-forecasting model for the Pacific Northwest, Desert Southwest and Rocky Mountains in a course of three months.
?	Compiled the daily information for the term and cash traders including the historical temperatures graphs for California, daily forecasted load, and gas prices. 

present=no
reference1  =James Nielsen; Professor of Finance; Oregon State University; Oregon State University, College Of Business, 200 Bexell, Corvallis, OR 97331 Tel. 541 737 3226 
reference2  =David Allan; Director of the Fundamentals Group, Enron Industrial Markets 1400 Smith Street, Houston, TX 77002. Tel. 713 345 2644
reference3  =Richard Clinton, Professor of International Relations, Oregon State University, College of Liberal Arts, 207 Social Science Hall, Corvallis, OR 97331. Tel 541 737 6246 
criminal=no
criminal record  =
agency=no
applicationdate=Nov 21, 2001

 Dave,

Here is the draft of what I wrote.

Thanks,
Monika

Monika Causholli
2240 North Boulevard #5205 
Houston, Texas 77098
                      (713) 807-1039
mcausholli@hotmail.com
EDUCATION 
BS in Financial Services/Business Administration, Oregon State University, Corvallis, Oregon
Overall GPA 3.91/4.00. Minor: Political Science/International Affairs.

WORK EXPERIENCE

?	Analyzed the financial condition of pulp and paper companies by carefully reading through their financial statements and drawing the conclusion of their financial health. Based on the results of the analysis, prepared company reports for the origination team.    
?	Supported the team of originators and traders by gathering data on the pulp market, preparing presentations, doing analysis on the prices and other market variables. Wrote a weekly newsletter with the most important information that included a market commentary. Built and completed the spreadsheets that contain all the market data for pulp. The spreadsheets helped the spot/financial traders to evaluate market conditions and make trading decisions. 

?	Researched the variables that affect the hourly electricity market including temperatures, planned and forced outages of generating units, loads and CISO expost prices resulting in an informed opinion about that day's trading options.
?	Looked for opportunities to create value based on the research. Raised up to $100,000 a day by following the market closely, taking advantage of the arbitrage opportunities between the different markets, and making use of transmission available to send power to various points. 
?	Ran the El Paso Electric Utility during the off peak hours and weekends by matching the load (demand) with the supply and making the necessary decisions to run the system reliably by following the WSCC requirements on spin and nonspin requirements.

?	Researched and graphed the historical temperatures for the Pacific Northwest, the Desert Southwest, and Rocky mountain and tried to find the correlation between the temperatures and energy load (demand).
?	Co-designed the load-forecasting model for the Pacific Northwest, Desert Southwest and Rocky Mountains in a course of three months.
?	Compiled the daily information for the term and cash traders including the historical temperatures graphs for California, daily forecasted load, and gas prices. 

             Financial Analyst 		         Edicom sh.p.k. 
             Assistant		                       Tirana, Albania 6/98-9/98
		 	
?	Calculated revenues, expenses, interest payments and cash flows for over ten investment projects including apartment buildings and a business center.
?	Translated business letters including memos and proposals from Italian/Albanian to English. 

COMPUTER SKILLS
 Software: Proficient in MS Word, PowerPoint, and Excel 

FOREIGN LANGUAGES
Albanian    Native Fluency
Italian    Near-Native Fluency	 

MAIN STRENGTHS:  Good analytical skills, detail oriented, a hard-worker, ambitious, a fast-learner, good writing skills, enthusiastic.  

					

Hello,

I am applying for the credit analyst position. See my resume below

Sincerely,
Monika Causholli

Monika Causholli
2240 North Boulevard #5205 
Houston, Texas 77098
                      (713) 807-1039
mcausholli@hotmail.com
EDUCATION 
BS in Financial Services/Business Administration, Oregon State University, Corvallis, Oregon
Overall GPA 3.91/4.00. Minor: Political Science/International Affairs.

WORK EXPERIENCE

?	Analyzed the financial condition of pulp and paper companies by carefully reading through their financial statements and drawing the conclusion of their financial health. Based on the results of the analysis, prepared company reports for the origination team.    
?	Supported the team of originators and traders by gathering data on the pulp market, preparing presentations, doing analysis on the prices and other market variables. Wrote a weekly newsletter with the most important information that included a market commentary. Built and completed the spreadsheets that contain all the market data for pulp. The spreadsheets helped the spot/financial traders to evaluate market conditions and make trading decisions. 

?	Researched the variables that affect the hourly electricity market including temperatures, planned and forced outages of generating units, loads and CISO expost prices resulting in an informed opinion about that day's trading options.
?	Looked for opportunities to create value based on the research. Raised up to $100,000 a day by following the market closely, taking advantage of the arbitrage opportunities between the different markets, and making use of transmission available to send power to various points. 
?	Ran the El Paso Electric Utility during the off peak hours and weekends by matching the load (demand) with the supply and making the necessary decisions to run the system reliably by following the WSCC requirements on spin and nonspin requirements.

?	Researched and graphed the historical temperatures for the Pacific Northwest, the Desert Southwest, and Rocky mountain and tried to find the correlation between the temperatures and energy load (demand).
?	Co-designed the load-forecasting model for the Pacific Northwest, Desert Southwest and Rocky Mountains in a course of three months.
?	Compiled the daily information for the term and cash traders including the historical temperatures graphs for California, daily forecasted load, and gas prices. 

             Financial Analyst 		         Edicom sh.p.k. 
             Assistant		                       Tirana, Albania 6/98-9/98
		 	
?	Calculated revenues, expenses, interest payments and cash flows for over ten investment projects including apartment buildings and a business center.
?	Translated business letters including memos and proposals from Italian/Albanian to English. 

COMPUTER SKILLS
 Software: Proficient in MS Word, PowerPoint, and Excel 

FOREIGN LANGUAGES
Albanian    Native Fluency
Italian    Near-Native Fluency	 

MAIN STRENGTHS:  Good analytical skills, detail oriented, a hard-worker, ambitious, a fast-learner, good writing skills, enthusiastic.  

					

Hello Maria Teresa,

Eugenio is teaching a class on Black Scholes pricing at 2pm today. Can we meet at 3 pm today or if you can't do it today we can leave it for Monday.

thanks,
Monika

Monika Causholli
2240 North Boulevard #5205 
Houston, Texas 77098
                      (713) 807-1039
mcausholli@hotmail.com
EDUCATION 
BS in Financial Services/Business Administration, Oregon State University, Corvallis, Oregon
Overall GPA 3.91/4.00. Minor: Political Science/International Affairs.

WORK EXPERIENCE

?	Analyzed the financial condition of pulp and paper companies by carefully reading through their financial statements and drawing the conclusion of their financial health. Based on the results of the analysis, prepared company reports for the origination team.    
?	Supported the team of originators and traders by gathering data on the pulp market, preparing presentations, doing analysis on the prices and other market variables. Wrote a weekly newsletter with the most important information that included a market commentary. Built and completed the spreadsheets that contain all the market data for pulp. The spreadsheets helped the spot/financial traders to evaluate market conditions and make trading decisions. 

?	Researched the variables that affect the hourly electricity market including temperatures, planned and forced outages of generating units, loads and CISO expost prices resulting in an informed opinion about that day's trading options.
?	Looked for opportunities to create value based on the research. Raised up to $100,000 a day by following the market closely, taking advantage of the arbitrage opportunities between the different markets, and making use of transmission available to send power to various points. 
?	Ran the El Paso Electric Utility during the off peak hours and weekends by matching the load (demand) with the supply and making the necessary decisions to run the system reliably by following the WSCC requirements on spin and nonspin requirements.

             Financial Analyst 		         Edicom sh.p.k. 
             Assistant		                       Tirana, Albania 6/98-9/98
		 	
?	Calculated revenues, expenses, interest payments and cash flows for over ten investment projects including apartment buildings and a business center.
?	Translated business letters including memos and proposals from Italian/Albanian to English. 

COMPUTER SKILLS
 Software: Proficient in MS Word, PowerPoint, and Excel 

FOREIGN LANGUAGES
Albanian    Native Fluency
Italian    Near-Native Fluency	 

MAIN STRENGTHS:  Good analytical skills, detail oriented, a hard-worker, ambitious, a fast-learner, good writing skills, enthusiastic.  

					

Dave,

Just got off the phone with the school. Apparently I don't have enough time to submit application but I practically begged for it so they are allowing me to submit a late application.

The only thing is that I won't have an answer until the beginning of January. Classes start in the middle of January. So, is it possible to change the date of departure until Jan 11 in the letter that you wrote for me. It would be great.

Thanks,
Monika

It's all corrected.  

I didn't save the electronic version, so can you re-send it to me?

Dave,

Just got off the phone with the school. Apparently I don't have enough time to submit application but I practically begged for it so they are allowing me to submit a late application.

The only thing is that I won't have an answer until the beginning of January. Classes start in the middle of January. So, is it possible to change the date of departure until Jan 11 in the letter that you wrote for me. It would be great.

Thanks,
Monika

Dave,

I am leaving for Dallas tonight because I arranged a meeting with an international advisor at University of Texas tomorrow. She will do an exception for me.
Anyways, I won't be coming to work tomorrow but I will keep in touch.

See you on Wednesday
Thanks for everything,
Monika

I didn't save the electronic version, so can you re-send it to me?

Dave,

Just got off the phone with the school. Apparently I don't have enough time to submit application but I practically begged for it so they are allowing me to submit a late application.

The only thing is that I won't have an answer until the beginning of January. Classes start in the middle of January. So, is it possible to change the date of departure until Jan 11 in the letter that you wrote for me. It would be great.

Thanks,
Monika

Margaret,

Can I see you today in your office?
Let me know when is a good time for me to come

Thanks,
Monika Causholli

Yes I need to meet with you. Thusday morning is OK with me. What time?

Monika

Monika:  if you have questions regarding HIB visas, have you checked the Intranet web site on the Enron Home page as there are Merger Q&A's out there regarding visa issues.  If you have a question not answered, please send me an email, and I will get it answered for you.

If you need to see me for something else, I won't be able to see you until Thursday morning.
Let me know
Margaret

Margaret,

Can I see you today in your office?
Let me know when is a good time for me to come

Thanks,
Monika Causholli

Monika Causholli
2240 North Boulevard #5205 
Houston, Texas 77098
                      (713) 807-1039
        mcausholli@hotmail.com (preferred)
EDUCATION 
BS in Financial Services/Business Administration, Oregon State University, Corvallis, Oregon
Overall GPA 3.91/4.00. Minor: Political Science/International Affairs.

WORK EXPERIENCE

?	Analyzed the financial condition of pulp and paper companies by carefully reading through their financial statements and drawing the conclusion of their financial health. Based on the results of the analysis, prepared company reports for the origination team.    
?	Supported the team of originators and traders by gathering data on the pulp market, preparing presentations, doing analysis on the prices and other market variables. Wrote a weekly newsletter with the most important information that included a market commentary. Built and completed the spreadsheets that contain all the market data for pulp. The spreadsheets helped the spot/financial traders to evaluate market conditions and make trading decisions. 

?	Researched the variables that affect the hourly electricity market including temperatures, planned and forced outages of generating units, loads and CISO expost prices resulting in an informed opinion about that day's trading options.
?	Looked for opportunities to create value based on the research. Raised up to $100,000 a day by following the market closely, taking advantage of the arbitrage opportunities between the different markets, and making use of transmission available to send power to various points. 
?	Ran the El Paso Electric Utility during the off peak hours and weekends by matching the load (demand) with the supply and making the necessary decisions to run the system reliably by following the WSCC requirements on spin and nonspin requirements.

?	Researched and graphed the historical temperatures for the Pacific Northwest, the Desert Southwest, and Rocky mountain and tried to find the correlation between the temperatures and energy load (demand).
?	Co-designed the load-forecasting model for the Pacific Northwest, Desert Southwest and Rocky Mountains in a course of three months.
?	Compiled the daily information for the term and cash traders including the historical temperatures graphs for California, daily forecasted load, and gas prices. 

             Financial Analyst 		         Edicom sh.p.k. 
             Assistant		                       Tirana, Albania 6/98-9/98
		 	
?	Calculated revenues, expenses, interest payments and cash flows for over ten investment projects including apartment buildings and a business center.
?	Translated business letters including memos and proposals from Italian/Albanian to English. 

COMPUTER SKILLS
 Software: Proficient in MS Word, PowerPoint, and Excel 

FOREIGN LANGUAGES
Albanian    Native Fluency
Italian    Near-Native Fluency	 

MAIN STRENGTHS:  Good analytical skills, detail oriented, a hard-worker, ambitious, a fast-learner, good writing skills, enthusiastic.  

					

Monika Causholli
2240 North Boulevard #5205 
Houston, Texas 77098
                      (713) 807-1039
mcausholli@hotmail.com (preferred)
EDUCATION 
BS in Financial Services/Business Administration, Oregon State University, Corvallis, Oregon
Overall GPA 3.91/4.00. Minor: Political Science/International Affairs.

WORK EXPERIENCE

?	Analyzed the financial condition of pulp and paper companies by carefully reading through their financial statements and drawing the conclusion of their financial health. Based on the results of the analysis, prepared company reports for the origination team.    
?	Supported the team of originators and traders by gathering data on the pulp market, preparing presentations, doing analysis on the prices and other market variables. Wrote a weekly newsletter with the most important information that included a market commentary. Built and completed the spreadsheets that contain all the market data for pulp. The spreadsheets helped the spot/financial traders to evaluate market conditions and make trading decisions. 

?	Researched the variables that affect the hourly electricity market including temperatures, planned and forced outages of generating units, loads and CISO expost prices resulting in an informed opinion about that day's trading options.
?	Looked for opportunities to create value based on the research. Raised up to $100,000 a day by following the market closely, taking advantage of the arbitrage opportunities between the different markets, and making use of transmission available to send power to various points. 
?	Ran the El Paso Electric Utility during the off peak hours and weekends by matching the load (demand) with the supply and making the necessary decisions to run the system reliably by following the WSCC requirements on spin and nonspin requirements.

?	Researched and graphed the historical temperatures for the Pacific Northwest, the Desert Southwest, and Rocky mountain and tried to find the correlation between the temperatures and energy load (demand).
?	Co-designed the load-forecasting model for the Pacific Northwest, Desert Southwest and Rocky Mountains in a course of three months.
?	Compiled the daily information for the term and cash traders including the historical temperatures graphs for California, daily forecasted load, and gas prices. 

             Financial Analyst 		         Edicom sh.p.k. 
             Assistant		                       Tirana, Albania 6/98-9/98
		 	
?	Calculated revenues, expenses, interest payments and cash flows for over ten investment projects including apartment buildings and a business center.
?	Translated business letters including memos and proposals from Italian/Albanian to English. 

COMPUTER SKILLS
 Software: Proficient in MS Word, PowerPoint, and Excel 

FOREIGN LANGUAGES
Albanian    Native Fluency
Italian    Near-Native Fluency	 

MAIN STRENGTHS:  Good analytical skills, detail oriented, a hard-worker, ambitious, a fast-learner, good writing skills, enthusiastic.  

					

Monika Causholli
2240 North Boulevard #5205 
Houston, Texas 77098
                      (713) 807-1039
mcausholli@hotmail.com (preferred)
EDUCATION 
BS in Financial Services/Business Administration, Oregon State University, Corvallis, Oregon
Overall GPA 3.91/4.00. Minor: Political Science/International Affairs.

WORK EXPERIENCE

?	Analyzed the financial condition of pulp and paper companies by carefully reading through their financial statements and drawing the conclusion of their financial health. Based on the results of the analysis, prepared company reports for the origination team.    
?	Supported the team of originators and traders by gathering data on the pulp market, preparing presentations, doing analysis on the prices and other market variables. Wrote a weekly newsletter with the most important information that included a market commentary. Built and completed the spreadsheets that contain all the market data for pulp. The spreadsheets helped the spot/financial traders to evaluate market conditions and make trading decisions. 

?	Researched the variables that affect the hourly electricity market including temperatures, planned and forced outages of generating units, loads and CISO expost prices resulting in an informed opinion about that day's trading options.
?	Looked for opportunities to create value based on the research. Raised up to $100,000 a day by following the market closely, taking advantage of the arbitrage opportunities between the different markets, and making use of transmission available to send power to various points. 
?	Ran the El Paso Electric Utility during the off peak hours and weekends by matching the load (demand) with the supply and making the necessary decisions to run the system reliably by following the WSCC requirements on spin and nonspin requirements.

?	Researched and graphed the historical temperatures for the Pacific Northwest, the Desert Southwest, and Rocky mountain and tried to find the correlation between the temperatures and energy load (demand).
?	Co-designed the load-forecasting model for the Pacific Northwest, Desert Southwest and Rocky Mountains in a course of three months.
?	Compiled the daily information for the term and cash traders including the historical temperatures graphs for California, daily forecasted load, and gas prices. 

             Financial Analyst 		         Edicom sh.p.k. 
             Assistant		                       Tirana, Albania 6/98-9/98
		 	
?	Calculated revenues, expenses, interest payments and cash flows for over ten investment projects including apartment buildings and a business center.
?	Translated business letters including memos and proposals from Italian/Albanian to English. 

COMPUTER SKILLS
 Software: Proficient in MS Word, PowerPoint, and Excel 

FOREIGN LANGUAGES
Albanian    Native Fluency
Italian    Near-Native Fluency	 

MAIN STRENGTHS:  Good analytical skills, detail oriented, a hard-worker, ambitious, a fast-learner, good writing skills, enthusiastic.  

					

Thanks! this is better. 
Did you by any chance start working on the large map?
Monika

Here's an other one.

 << File: NorthAmerica.ppt >> 
Doug,

Why is the map cut off at the top? Can you fix this so that it shows all of it?

thanks,
Monika

Here is the map. If you do not like the way it's display, I can change it.  So let me know if you like the map.

 << File: map-usa.ppt >> 
Dougie

The good news in terms of pricing is that consumption rose this month by 16%, and higher consumption levels will deplete inventories and consumers will need to replace those inventories faster. Hopefully consumption will continue to grow over the next several months.

Monika

Monika, this is interesting. To summarize, are you saying that inventories are below a year ago (which is good for producers) but they rose when they normally fall (bad for producers)? What does this mean for pricing?

Utipulp Statistics for the month of September showed the following:

Stocks were up by 1.2% and reached 1.1 million level
Consumption went up 16% to 1.083 million
This represents 31 days of supply.
2001 September stocks are 15% lower than last year.

Historically over the last 4 years stocks have generally decreased in September by an average of 4%.
See graph below for historical Utipulp inventory levels:

 << OLE Object: Microsoft Excel Chart >> 

Count me too!

Hello Warriors,

I had expressed an interest in learning about the Black Scholes model, and Eugenio suggested that we get a group of warriors together who would be interested in learning about Black Scholes -- as it is fundamental to understanding derivatives.  If you are interested, please email me and schedules permitting, we can schedule a session this afternoon. 

Ayesha

 

Karen,

Attached is the Tissue Summary. Thanks,
Monika

Monika,

Thanks for handling the Market Wrap.  Also, could you please send me your Tissue analysis?  Thanks.

KC

Hi Karen,

I hope you get well soon!

I had Peggy edit the market wrap. I sent it out this morning.

Also, I have finished working on the Tissue Report. Do you want it send by email?

Let me know,
Monika

Doug,

Why is the map cut off at the top? Can you fix this so that it shows all of it?

thanks,
Monika

Here is the map. If you do not like the way it's display, I can change it.  So let me know if you like the map.

 << File: map-usa.ppt >> 
Dougie

San Francisco, Oct. 18, 2001 (Forestweb) - Weyerhaeuser Co. will increase t=
he U.S. price of its northern bleached softwood kraft (NBSK) price by $20/t=
onne to $500/tonne effective Nov. 1, according to a buyer source. Another b=
uyer source said Weyerhaeuser has increased his price by $20/tonne on the s=
awdust pulp that he buys, "and I assume on the others." Weyerhaeuser offici=
als were not available for comment. Weyerhaeuser has been the lone holdout =
at the U.S. price of $480/tonne for Oct. 1, when other North American produ=
cers went to $500/tonne. The competitors have complained that Weyerhaeuser'=
s price was a drag on their efforts. Producers and buyers alike have said t=
hat $500/tonne has been a hard sell in October, partly because of the marke=
t, but also because demand has been so slow. A number of sources say NBSK i=
s at $480/tonne for October, though a few are paying the $500/tonne price. =
"I don't think we will pay $500 (in November)," a buyer said today. "I thin=
k it will be $490." An agent today described the Weyerhaeuser news as "a pl=
us," but added, "Now all we need is for demand to pick up." Another agent a=
lso responded cautiously. "There is no indication anywhere in the world whe=
re demand has picked up, certainly not in the paper business. Without that,=
 (producers) can announce what they want to, but it is not a slam dunk," he=
 said. As for October transaction , aid that in most cases, they didn't mov=
e. "I know everyone needs (price increases) and I know the inventories have=
 gone down, but my feeling is they will go up again," he said, noting typic=
al late-fall patterns.  said that in contrast to the past, paper companies =
have not been able to make money off of low prices. "It's going to be a bat=
tle, for sure," he said. "There's a lot of fighting going on, a lot (of buy=
ers) are saying they're not going to pay it."

Hello everyone,

Attached is the market wrap for the week of November 2nd. If you have any questions or need additional information you can contact me at ext. 5-1510.

thanks and have a nice day,
Monika Causholli 

The good news for the pulp producers continue as worldwide chemical paper-grade market pulp producer inventories declined 345,000 tonnes in September from the prior month, according to preliminary data from the Pulp and Paper Products Council in Montreal. World inventories have fallen seven consecutive months as producers reduced their stocks 9.7 percent from opening levels.
World producer stocks closed September at 3.073 million tonnes, representing 33 days of supply and a four-day reduction from August levels. Producer inventory results are 19.4 percent higher than year-ago figures, when world producers held 28 days of supply. The inventory results were by far the largest single month reduction this year. The year's prior high was in June, when producers brought down inventories by 171,000 tonnes but faced a bloated 3.528 million tonnes of stock. 
September production of 2.525 million tonnes tumbled 10.2 percent vs. year-ago results of 2.812 million tonnes. Production levels were 5.9 percent lower than the prior month. 
Global shipments improved both month-over-month and compared to the same period last year. Shipments of 2.870 million tonnes rose 2.8 percent higher than year-ago results of 2.792 million tonnes, and surged by 4.4 percent vs. August despite a slower week of activity following the Sept. 11 terrorist attacks. 
Producers operated at 84 percent of capacity in September, down 11 percent from the same time last year when producers ran at 95 percent. Meanwhile, the shipment-to-capacity ratio, considered an indicator of producer discipline, advanced another 5 points to 95 percent, PPPC reported. 

Karen,

Attached is the market wrap for this week.

Monika 

thanks!
 << File: monika.xls >> 

Weyerhaeuser Company today announced that it has extended its $50 per share cash tender offer for all of the outstanding common stock of Willamette Industries, Inc. until midnight, New York City time, on December 5, 2001. 
As of midnight, New York City time, on October 17, 2001, Willamette shareholders had tendered and not withdrawn approximately 51.7 million shares pursuant to Weyerhaeuser's tender offer. 

Cartiere Burgo's Cellardennes pulp mill in Belgium, is back following a seven-day shut. During the closure, the company installed a new 700 air dried tonne/day ABB pulp dryer at the site that will boost Cellardennes' elemental chlorine-free pulp capacity from 260,000 tonnes/yr to 360,000 tonnes/yr.

 

 

Kent,

Attached you will find the pulp presentation that Andrea Reed asked me to send you.

Monika Causholli
Enron Industrial Markets
(713) 345 1510 

 

Peggy,

Slide # 5 has the pulp flow map.

Monika

I am with Industrial Markets here in Houston.

Monika

Hi Monica,

I'm doing well....thanks for asking.

I have removed you from the list.

What group are in you now?

Pete

Pete,

Hi how are you?
Can you remove me from the list?
thanks,
Monika Causholli

Start Date: 10/18/01; HourAhead hour: 9;  No ancillary schedules awarded.  Variances detected.
Variances detected in Energy Import/Export schedule. 

    LOG MESSAGES:

PARSING FILE -->> O:\Portland\WestDesk\California Scheduling\ISO Final Schedules\2001101809.txt

Error retrieving HourAhead price data - process continuing...
---- Energy Import/Export Schedule ----
$$$ Variance found in table tblINTCHG_IMPEXP.
     Details: (Hour: 9 / Preferred:   0.00 / Final:   0.00)
  TRANS_TYPE: FINAL
  SC_ID: ECTRT
  MKT_TYPE: 2
  TRANS_DATE: 10/18/01
  TIE_POINT: PVERDE_5_DEVERS
  INTERCHG_ID: EPMI_CISO_SRP
  ENGY_TYPE: FIRM

New spreadsheet that contains all the tissue mills, their capacity and number of machines is now located in: 

O://Industrial Markets/Fundamentals/Paper/Pulp/Tissuemills

Monika Causholli

Pete,

Hi how are you?
Can you remove me from the list?
thanks,
Monika Causholli

Start Date: 10/18/01; HourAhead hour: 9;  No ancillary schedules awarded.  Variances detected.
Variances detected in Energy Import/Export schedule. 

    LOG MESSAGES:

PARSING FILE -->> O:\Portland\WestDesk\California Scheduling\ISO Final Schedules\2001101809.txt

Error retrieving HourAhead price data - process continuing...
---- Energy Import/Export Schedule ----
$$$ Variance found in table tblINTCHG_IMPEXP.
     Details: (Hour: 9 / Preferred:   0.00 / Final:   0.00)
  TRANS_TYPE: FINAL
  SC_ID: ECTRT
  MKT_TYPE: 2
  TRANS_DATE: 10/18/01
  TIE_POINT: PVERDE_5_DEVERS
  INTERCHG_ID: EPMI_CISO_SRP
  ENGY_TYPE: FIRM

Thank you for letting me know. 
Also, do you have historical data for Utipulp: Consumption, inventory and days of supply?

Can you please help me find these?

thanks again,
Monika Causholli

Dear Monika,

We usually send every month Utipulp statistics figures by email, but our
association decided during the last meeting not to diffused them by email in
the future, only to put on our website : www.utipulp.org. That 's mean that
you will not receive email anymore but you can download directly the current
statistics on the website near the 15th of each month.

Best regards,

Mrs BAERTSOEN

I used to be on the subscription list but I do not receive the data by
email anymore. Can you please re-subscribe me?

My email is monika.causholli@enron.com

thanks,
Monika Causholli
Enron Industrial Markets
(713) 345 1039

Hi Karen,

I hope you get well soon!

I had Peggy edit the market wrap. I sent it out this morning.

Also, I have finished working on the Tissue Report. Do you want it send by email?

Let me know,
Monika

Karen,

As I told you there is quite a few discrepancies between RISI and PPI.

See attached.
If you have questions let me know,
Monika 

I used to be on the subscription list but I do not receive the data by email anymore. Can you please re-subscribe me?

My email is monika.causholli@enron.com

thanks,
Monika Causholli
Enron Industrial Markets
(713) 345 1039

Karen,

Can you see the questions for RISI and refine them a bit?

Thank you
Monika 

Thanks!

 << File: Mexico File.xls >> 

Hi Karen,

Attached is the spreadsheet containing the Chilean pulp and paper mills.

The info is all taken from RISI

Monika 

Morela,

Please take a look at slide # 15 for the corrected version.

Monika 

Karen,

Attached is the capacity growth compounded annually for the main regions and the world.

Let me know if this is what you wanted,
Monika 

Dave,

I am meeting with Maria Teresa this Wednesday to start working on price forecast.

I am currently working with Andrew on inventory forecast and the procedure is as follows:

Based on the formula (capacity * op. rate) - shipments = forecast inventory.

We used PPPC capacity forecast for the year and divided by 12 to get the monthly forecast. Then multiply this with our own estimate of the operating rate which can be an average of the last 2 months or the operating rate of last month carried forward, or the last month's operating rate difference with the average and apply that difference to calculate the next  month op. rate. 

We also estimate the level of shipments as the last 3 years average for the month we are trying to forecast.

So far we have only tested September and the forecast was pretty close to the actual.

let me know if this is what you requested,
Thanks,
Monika

Two things:

1) I think you are all aware that we need to develop a market overview presentation on each of your markets similar to what Monika is pulling together on pulp. Have you started outlining what would go in your presentation?

2) Please give me a short (2-3 bullet) summary of what you are doing on pricing and inventory forecasting. I want to develop a summary report for Bob Crane.

Thanks,

Dave

Ami,
I am sorry I forgot what you were looking. Attached are the prices for hardwoods delivered to Japan, China, S. Korea.
 
Monika
 

hey,
 
 just read the message below..the one you had written....its about MTH prices...
 
thanks 
ami

Hey Ami,
 
I am sorry what were you looking for?
 
Monika

hey monika,
 
i was just wondering if you had heard anything from RISI?
 
thanks,
ami
 

Hi Ami,
 
Sorry for not getting to you earlier. I am at home today. I don't think I have the MTH prices. I have requested those from RISI today so hopefully they will send them to me fast. The other prices are in the folder o:/Industrial Markets/Fundamentals/Paper/Pulp/RISI PRICES
 
Thanks,
Monika

quick question....which report in RISI do i look at for these numbers? thanks!! 

Conduct an correlation analysis between NBSK and Mixed Tropical Hardwood (MTH) price  and between BEK (Bleached Eucalyptus Kraft) and MTH

Ami,
 
RISI book has all th mills in Asia. Let me know if you cannot locate the book.
 
Monika

sorry, one more thing....i am starting to research on major pulp consumers and producers in asia....do you have any information on this i can use or a god place for me to start besides RISI or PPPC?
 
Thanks,
Ami
 
 

Hi Ami,
 
Sorry for not getting to you earlier. I am at home today. I don't think I have the MTH prices. I have requested those from RISI today so hopefully they will send them to me fast. The other prices are in the folder o:/Industrial Markets/Fundamentals/Paper/Pulp/RISI PRICES
 
Thanks,
Monika

quick question....which report in RISI do i look at for these numbers? thanks!! 

Conduct an correlation analysis between NBSK and Mixed Tropical Hardwood (MTH) price  and between BEK (Bleached Eucalyptus Kraft) and MTH

hey Stacey,

thanks for sending me the presentation template.

Monika

Hey Ami,
 
I am sorry what were you looking for?
 
Monika

hey monika,
 
i was just wondering if you had heard anything from RISI?
 
thanks,
ami
 

Hi Ami,
 
Sorry for not getting to you earlier. I am at home today. I don't think I have the MTH prices. I have requested those from RISI today so hopefully they will send them to me fast. The other prices are in the folder o:/Industrial Markets/Fundamentals/Paper/Pulp/RISI PRICES
 
Thanks,
Monika

quick question....which report in RISI do i look at for these numbers? thanks!! 

Conduct an correlation analysis between NBSK and Mixed Tropical Hardwood (MTH) price  and between BEK (Bleached Eucalyptus Kraft) and MTH

Foex is up again for the third week in a row even though the increase was at a slower rate than last week . The increase seems to continue to be the result of price increases announced by pulp producers earlier this month.

Today NBSK came in at $463.94/mton up $5.05 (1.10%) and BHKP was Euro 461.76 up Euro 8.78. Expressed in dollars BHKP was $416.72 up $1.24 (0.3%).

Please see attached
Monika Causholli
Enron Industrial Markets
(713) 345 1510

 

Stacey,

I forgot to send you this. It's the pulp presentation that I put together recently.

Monika 

Rhonda Flemming. I think she is one of Enron's lawyers.

Monika

Great!  Who was able to assist you?

Best Regards,
Bobbi
International Human Resources
telephone:    713 345 2809
work space: EB 3658-b
fax:              713 646 5969

Hello Bobbi. This is the exact procedure that we followed. 

Thank you
Monika Causholli

Hi Monika,

Your husband needs to complete the Form SS-5, attached.  Take it to the SSA office, you can also do this on his behalf.  However, you need all the documentation listed and your passport or drivers license.  He (or you) need to specifically request, from the SSA office, a "denial letter".  The denial letter will be sent to your home.  Upon its receipt, he needs to take the denial letter in lieu of a social security card with his Individual Tax Identification Number (ITIN) and apply for one then.

Margaret just advised that your husband received a Texas Drivers License.  Please advise if the above instructions are different than the process you utilized.

Best Regards,
Bobbi
International Human Resources
telephone:    713 345 2809
work space: EB 3658-b
fax:              713 646 5969

Bobbi:  can you help Monika on this one please?
Margaret

Hello Margaret,

I am trying to figure out how my husband can obtain a driver's licence in the state of Texas but the office of social security, IRS, and DPS all give me different answers and are not helpful at all. We are confused. My husband is on H4 visa and he does not have a social security but the state of Texas requires the social security to obtain a driver's licence. He has a tax-payer SSN but that did not work for the licence. 

Do you know what the law is in this case? Can we ask Enron lawyers about this problem? 
Common sense tells me that there can be a way for him to drive here but I don't know how.

Please help us,

Thanks a lot
Monika Cauhsolli

Hello Bobbi. This is the exact procedure that we followed. 

Thank you
Monika Causholli

Hi Monika,

Your husband needs to complete the Form SS-5, attached.  Take it to the SSA office, you can also do this on his behalf.  However, you need all the documentation listed and your passport or drivers license.  He (or you) need to specifically request, from the SSA office, a "denial letter".  The denial letter will be sent to your home.  Upon its receipt, he needs to take the denial letter in lieu of a social security card with his Individual Tax Identification Number (ITIN) and apply for one then.

Margaret just advised that your husband received a Texas Drivers License.  Please advise if the above instructions are different than the process you utilized.

Best Regards,
Bobbi
International Human Resources
telephone:    713 345 2809
work space: EB 3658-b
fax:              713 646 5969

Bobbi:  can you help Monika on this one please?
Margaret

Hello Margaret,

I am trying to figure out how my husband can obtain a driver's licence in the state of Texas but the office of social security, IRS, and DPS all give me different answers and are not helpful at all. We are confused. My husband is on H4 visa and he does not have a social security but the state of Texas requires the social security to obtain a driver's licence. He has a tax-payer SSN but that did not work for the licence. 

Do you know what the law is in this case? Can we ask Enron lawyers about this problem? 
Common sense tells me that there can be a way for him to drive here but I don't know how.

Please help us,

Thanks a lot
Monika Cauhsolli

Hello Margaret,

Actually you forwarded this messagge to Rhonda Fleming and she did help me a lot. We were able to obtain a driver's licence for my husband.  

Thanks Margaret.
Monika

Bobbi:  can you help Monika on this one please?
Margaret

Hello Margaret,

I am trying to figure out how my husband can obtain a driver's licence in the state of Texas but the office of social security, IRS, and DPS all give me different answers and are not helpful at all. We are confused. My husband is on H4 visa and he does not have a social security but the state of Texas requires the social security to obtain a driver's licence. He has a tax-payer SSN but that did not work for the licence. 

Do you know what the law is in this case? Can we ask Enron lawyers about this problem? 
Common sense tells me that there can be a way for him to drive here but I don't know how.

Please help us,

Thanks a lot
Monika Cauhsolli

This worked!

thanks a lot
Monika Causholli

Dear Ms. Causholli:

If your husband is not eligible to receive a Social Security number, he
needs to obtain a "letter of ineligibility" from the Social Security
Administration.  With this letter, the Department of Public Safety is able
to continue with the process of issuing him an original driver license.  He
will need to present proof of his identity in order to obtain an orginal
driver license and his foreign passport with a valid U.S. Visa included will
be sufficient.  Your husband will be required to take the written and
driving tests and pay the required fees.

If you have any other questions, please feel free to contact me at this
e-mail address or by phone at (512) 424-5062.

Sincerely,

Rhonda Fleming, Major
Driver License Division

Nyree,

I have a doctor's appointment (eye doctor) tomorrow at 9:30.

Thanks,
Monika

Hello,

Attached is the pulp presentation.

thanks, 
Monika

Hello everyone,

Attached you will find the pulp and printing & writing presentation - facts and figures as of 2001.
Please if you have any questions you can contact me.

thanks,
Monika Causholli
Enron Industrial markets
(713) 345 -1510  

Thanks Peggy!

 

SAO PAULO, Brazil, Oct 15, 2001 (Reuters) - Brazilian paper and pulp maker Industrias Klabin Papel e Celulose SA said on Monday it would restructure its units in a cost-cutting drive it hopes will save 60 million reais ($22 million) per year. 
Klabin, one of Brazil's top producers of paper, tissue and wood pulp, will incorporate its Klamasa, KIV, Industrias Klabin and Igaras units under its subsidiary Klabin Riocell SA , the company said in a statement. 
Riocell will remain the sole publicly held company in the group and will be renamed Klabin SA. Minority shareholders in Klabin will be given shares in Riocell at par, Klabin's Director General Josemar Verillo told Reuters. 
The restructuring, to be completed by December, should reduce administrative, operational, financial and tax costs. It will also improve operating synergies, allow for a better use of financial resources and improve the group's transparency for investors, Klabin said. 
"We have a lot of business between the group. That leads to operational and financial inefficiencies," Verillo said. 
The company said it expects to save about 60 million reais ($22 million) per year and could trim staff in the long term as a result of the restructuring. 
In a separate statement responding to an inquiry by the Sao Paulo Stock Exchange, Klabin said its consolidated net revenues would be 10 percent higher in 2001, driven by exports and a depreciation of Brazil's currency. The company posted net revenues of 1.9 billion reais ($684 million) in 2000. 

Karen,

I have a doctor's (eye doctor) appointment tomorrow at 9:30. I will come in the office first and then go to see the doctor. 

thanks,
Monika 

Thanks Andrea, I made an appointment there.
Monika
Dr. Pickering's number is:

713)522 2522

Please thank Andrea.

V

Yes it does help.

thanks,
Monika

I have no idea.  You know, if you call the insurance company they can recommend someone.  Are your eyes OK?

Andrea recommends Dr. Cheryl Pickering as an optician (eyeglasses and stuff...) 
Elizabeth recommends Dr. Milton Boniek as an ophthalmologist (for surgery and serious eye stuff...)

Hope this helps!
El V

Hey Vik,

Since you live close to me do you know any good eye doctor in that area? Can you please recommend?

Thanks,
Monika

thank you dear.

Here's the agent I've talked to. She's really nice :-)
Janette Redou
3642 University
Houston, TX 77005-3360 map </cgi-bin/db2www/agtmap.d2w/report?agt=8389&'reg'=25&st=53> 
Phone: (713) 666-3642
Fax: (713) 666-8029
Email: JANETTE.REDOU.LJ3W@STATEFARM.COM  </cgi-bin/agtmail.cgi?email_addr=JANETTE.REDOU.LJ3W@STATEFARM.COM&pref_name=JANETTE&last_name=REDOU>
Office Hours:
Mon-Fri 9:00am to 5:00pm
Sat 9:00am to 1:00pm
After Hours by Appointment
Find a Claim Office </claims/fndoffc.htm> 

http://www.statefarm.com/cgi-bin/db2www/agtqry1.d2w/report

Hello Ivonne,

I do not have an insurance card for the vision health plan. Can you tell me what I need to do to before I go to a doctor? Also should I find my own doctor or is there a list of names provided. Can you clarify this to me or tell me who do I need to contact for this?

thanks,
Monika Causholli

Karen,

Attached is the pulp presentation and the BEK slides are: # 6, 8, 9, 18, 21, 22.

Thanks, 
Monika

Ayesha,

Attached is the pulp presentation. I used RISI as the primary source of information and where RISI had no data I used other sources.

 

Monika

thank you  :)

Chip Dillon
Managing Director
Salomon Smith Barney
388 Greenwich Street -- 28th Floor
New York, NY 10013  USA
Phone: 1-212-816-2793
Fax (US): 1-800-380-6401
Fax (International) 1-212-816-1090
Email: c.a.dillon@ssmb.com

*	For the fifth consecutive month, preliminary data indicates that
market pulp inventories in the NORSCAN region saw a greater-than-historical
average decline of 195,000 tonnes in September (avg decline in Sept. is 108K
tonnes). 
*	As a result of this greater-than-normal decline, total inventories
now stand at 1.525 million tonnes -- nearing the 1.5 million tonne
historical inflection level, and down 24% from the Feb '01 level of 2.006
million tonnes (a 4-year high).
*	The reduction in inventories has certainly not been a result of
strong demand, but rather continued discipline on the part of major
producers -- NORSCAN mills operated at only 78% and shipments equalled 88%
of capacity in Sept.  
*	We are encouraged by this news, and believe that pulp prices could
see an increase in coming months. As we wrote yesterday, we see 2002 as the
cyclical trough yr with NBSK pxs averaging $510/tonne, followed by a 17%
rebound in '03 to $595/tonne, and '04 as the cylical peak yr with avg px of
$695/tonne.     

 <<Pulp 10-11-01.pdf>>  <<Pulp 10-11-01.doc>> 

ADDITIONAL INFORMATION AVAILABLE UPON REQUEST

 Salomon Smith Barney ("SSB"), including its parent, subsidiaries and/or
affiliates ("the Firm"), usually makes a market in the U.S.-traded over the
counter securities recommended in this report and may sell to or buy from
customers, as principal, securities recommended in this report.  The Firm or
employees preparing this report may have a position in securities or options
of
any company recommended in this report.  An employee of the Firm may be a
director of a company recommended in this report. The Firm may perform or
solicit investment banking or other services from any company recommended in
this report.

Securities recommended, offered, or sold by SSB: (i) are not insured by the
Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation; (ii) are not deposits or other
obligations of any insured depository institution (including Citibank); and
(iii) are subject to investment risks, including the possible loss of the
principal amount invested.  Although information has been obtained from and
is
based upon sources SSB believes to be reliable, we do not guarantee its
accuracy and it may be incomplete or condensed.  All opinions and estimates
constitute SSB's judgment as of the date of the report and are subject to
change without notice.  This report is for informational purposes only and
is
not intended as an offer or solicitation for the purchase or sale of a
security.  Investing in non-U.S. securities, including ADRs, by U.S. persons
may entail certain risks.  Investors who have received this report may be
prohibited in certain U.S. states from purchasing securities mentioned in
this
report from SSB.  Please ask your financial consultant for additional
details.
This report has been approved for distribution in the United Kingdom by
Salomon
Brothers International Limited, which is regulated by the Securities and
Futures Authority.  The investments and services contained herein are not
available to private customers in the UK and South Africa.  This report was
prepared by SSB and, if distributed in Japan by Nikko Salomon Smith Barney
Limited, is being so distributed under license.  This report is made
available
in Australia through Salomon Smith Barney Australia Securities Pty Ltd. (ABN
64
003 114 832), a Licensed Securities Dealer, and in New Zealand through
Salomon
Smith Barney New Zealand Limited, a member firm of the New Zealand Stock
Exchange.  This report does not take into account the investment objectives
or
financial situation of any particular person.  Investors should obtain
advice
based on their own individual circumstances before making an investment
decision.  Salomon Smith Barney Securities (Proprietary) Limited is
incorporated in the Republic of South Africa (company registration number
2000/025866/07) and its registered office is at Grosvenor Corner, 195 Jan
Smuts
Avenue, Rosebank, 2198, Republic of South Africa.  Salomon Smith Barney is a
service mark of Salomon Smith Barney Inc.

(c) Salomon Smith Barney Inc., 2001.  All rights reserved.  Any unauthorized
use, duplication or disclosure is prohibited by law and may result in
prosecution.

sure!

Monika,

Any chance you could add the following names to your Pulp Market Wrap distribution list?

Ray Carter
Jim (James) Monroe

Thks.

KC

Good afternoon,

Attached you will find the spreadsheet that contains information on Abitibi's mills pulp consumption classifying it by by purchased pulp and internal pulp as well as by by grades of pulp consumed: BSKP, TMP, DIP (ONP/OMG)

Thanks, 
Monika Causholli
 

Hello,

Please find attached the market wrap for the week of October 26th. If you have any questions you can contact me.

thanks, 
Monika Causholli
Ext. 5-1510

sounds good!

Thanks, I'll look it over. Let's meet after the Yak game.

Dave,

Attached is the spreadsheet with the Abitibi paper mills and their pulp usage. Let me know when we can meet.

Monika << File: Abitibi.xls >> 

Dirk,

Attached is a spreadsheet that contains hardwood prices delivered to Japan, China, and S. Korea and where th origin of the pulp is. 

Hope this is what you were looking for
Monika 

Thanks Danilo. This is very helpful.
Monika

Hi Monika,
I got the stuff I was looking for.  I will give you a file to keep as well.

Danilo

 << File: bhkpmonitor.xls >> 

Dave,

Attached is the spreadsheet with the Abitibi paper mills and their pulp usage. Let me know when we can meet.

Monika 

Hi Ami,
 
Sorry for not getting to you earlier. I am at home today. I don't think I have the MTH prices. I have requested those from RISI today so hopefully they will send them to me fast. The other prices are in the folder o:/Industrial Markets/Fundamentals/Paper/Pulp/RISI PRICES
 
Thanks,
Monika

quick question....which report in RISI do i look at for these numbers? thanks!! 

Conduct an correlation analysis between NBSK and Mixed Tropical Hardwood (MTH) price  and between BEK (Bleached Eucalyptus Kraft) and MTH

I did give the itinerary to you but if you still need it I can give it to you again. Also, Dave knows that my husband is coming with me but I don't know if Andrea knows. If there is a problem with this let me know.
 
Monika

Hello Monika, 

Hope your day is going great.  I am in the process of preparing your expense report.  Correct me if I am wrong, did you give me a copy of your flight itinerary for San Diego?  Also,  did Andrea know that you were traveling with your husband?  Please advise.

Thank you, 
Nyree 

Dave,
 
I am fine. I thought Karen told you about me working from home today. I am reading the tissue book that I just received from Esko Uutella Consulting in Germany.
 
I am also working on Abitibi's mills and send it to you by email. I asked Greg Bruch about the mills but he did not know the information as much in detail as we had it.
 
Thanks,
Monika

R U OK? 

I will be working from home for the rest of the day today. If you have any questions you can send them by email as I will be checking it from home.

Thank you, 
Monika Causholli 

I did contact RISI and they will send it to me by email.
 
Monika

Uh, were you able to get the price series for MTH? 

Thanks 
Dirk 

I will be working from home for the rest of the day today. If you have any questions you can send them by email as I will be checking it from home.

Thank you, 
Monika Causholli 

I will be working from home for the rest of the day today. If you have any questions you can send them by email as I will be checking it from home.

Thank you,
Monika Causholli 

Thank you very much. We will give it a try.

Dear Ms. Causholli:

If your husband is not eligible to receive a Social Security number, he
needs to obtain a "letter of ineligibility" from the Social Security
Administration.  With this letter, the Department of Public Safety is able
to continue with the process of issuing him an original driver license.  He
will need to present proof of his identity in order to obtain an orginal
driver license and his foreign passport with a valid U.S. Visa included will
be sufficient.  Your husband will be required to take the written and
driving tests and pay the required fees.

If you have any other questions, please feel free to contact me at this
e-mail address or by phone at (512) 424-5062.

Sincerely,

Rhonda Fleming, Major
Driver License Division

 

Peggy,

Attached is the market wrap of last week that I am going to send out today.

thanks,
Monika

Probably in three months.

When does a new RISI pulp forecast come out?  I have forgotten. Thanks.
Natalie

I will be attending.

Thanks
MOnika Causholli
Enron Industrial Markets

October 9, 2001

Dear Conference Attendee:

We thank you for registering for RISI's 16th Annual North American 
conference in Coronado Island, California.  This email is to confirm that 
you will be attending and to ask you to contact me by Friday, October 
12, 2001 if you are NOT.

We look forward to seeing you in California.

Regards,

Betty J. Thompson
Conference Coordinator

Hello Margaret,

I am trying to figure out how my husband can obtain a driver's licence in the state of Texas but the office of social security, IRS, and DPS all give me different answers and are not helpful at all. We are confused. My husband is on H4 visa and he does not have a social security but the state of Texas requires the social security to obtain a driver's licence. He has a tax-payer SSN but that did not work for the licence. 

Do you know what the law is in this case? Can we ask Enron lawyers about this problem? 
Common sense tells me that there can be a way for him to drive here but I don't know how.

Please help us,

Thanks a lot
Monika Cauhsolli

In Europe this week FOEX showed an strong increase in both softwoods and hardwoods. This is the second increase for NBSK this year and it is a sign of successful efforts on the producers side to raise prices.
NBSK was $458.89 up $7.76 (1.72%)
BHKP was Euro 452.98 up Euro 9.25 (or 2%). Expressed in dollars BHKP came in at $415.48 up from $407.11. 

Please see attached.

 

Monika Causholli

Nyree,

Just out of curiosity what is this for?

Attached is the form filled except for the CPU #. I don't know what this is.

thanks,
Monika

 

Laura,

The pulp inventory is located in the O:/Industrial Markets/Fundamentals/Paper/Pulp/Raw Data.

Check the first tab in the spread sheet. 

Call me if you have any questions.
Monika 5-1510

Hey there,

I am currently working on an inventory forecast for Linerboard and was hoping you could tell me where I can find pulp and OCC inventories.  I am hoping they will be leading indicators for containerboard.

Thanks,
Laura

Laura E. Bosek
Analyst
Enron Industrial Markets
(713) 345-1652
ext. 51652

Eugenio,

Sorry I am not going to be here. Can you reschedule for Wednesday?

Warriors:

The Yaks are calling

When Nyree secures a room for us, I will send an update.

Please find attached the pulp market wrap-up for the week of October 5.

If you have any questions you can contact me.

Thanks,
Monika Causholli
Enron Industrial Markets
(713) 345-1510 

Yes sure.  I won't be here on Monday and possibly Tuesday so how does Wednesday sound to you? If it's ok let's plan on it.

Monika

 Hey Monika,

 Do you want to have lunch sometime?

SAO PAULO, Oct. 4, 2001 (Press release) Votorantim Celulose e Papel (VCP) announces that it has entered into an agreement to acquire, through one of its affiliates, a 28% voting interest (12.3% total interest) in Aracruz Celulose, the Brazilian eucalyptus pulp company. The stake is being acquired from Mondi Brazil, a subsidiary of Anglo American for a cash consideration of $370 million.
Raul Calfat, CEO of VCP, said, "This transaction represents an important step for VCP in strengthening our position in the global pulp and paper markets. This also enhances our status as one of the lowest cost producers with outstanding services to our customers. We are very pleased with this opportunity which we believe will create substantial value for our shareholders."
Andrew Thompson, chairman of Mondi Brazil, said, "We evaluated the options for our investment in Aracruz and concluded that it was in the interests of our shareholders to sell our stake on these terms. We have valued being party to the development of Aracruz during our time as voting shareholders with board representation. We have been particularly impressed by the vision and leadership of Erling Lorentzen as founder and chairman. We are confident that VCP will be a supportive new voting shareholder and we wish both them and Aracruz success in the future."

Hello Mr. Uutella,

Thanks for sending me the report. I have read it and I am in the process of preparing a summary of it. I  have a couple of questions for you though.

First, can you explain a little bit about the TAD technology, like how it is done and so on. Also what does TAD stand for?

Second, what does AfH stand for?

Third, the consumption numbers for all the continents were given for year 1999. Do you have them for 2000 yet?

thanks for your help,
best regards
Monika Causholli
Enron Industrial Markets
(713) 345 1510

Hi Ms. Causholli,

I have made recently a major multiclient study "Outlook for World Tissue 
Business" which includes all tissue mills with capacities worldwide plus 
capacity profiles by the largest producers worldwide and by region. I attach the 
study proposal with this e-mail. The report costs US$ 3,500 (300 pages with 
detailed Annexes).

If you would like to have only capacity data for the regions you mentioned plus 
the top 10-12 global producers, I could sell this part of information at US$ 
600. You should specify the form in which I should present it so that I 
could easier fulfil your data needs.

Best regards

Esko Uutela
EU Consulting

Causholli, Monika schrieb:
> Hello Mr. Uutella,
>
>
> I am an analyst working for Enron Industrial Markets in Houston, Texas
> and I am gathering some information on tissue. I spoke to Rod Young and
> David Pinault from RISI and they told me to contact you as you do some
> more extensive studies on tissue usage. 
>
> What I am looking for are: tissue capacity worldwide and by region
> (North America, Europe, Latin America, Asia)
> and the biggest companies that produce tissue.
>
> Can you also include how much this information would cost?
>
> Thanks in advance,
> Monika Causholli
> Enron Industrial Markets
> (713) 345 1510
>
>
>
>
> **********************************************************************
> This e-mail is the property of Enron Corp. and/or its relevant affiliate and
>  may contain confidential and privileged material for the sole use of the
>  intended recipient (s). Any review, use, distribution or disclosure by
>  others is strictly prohibited. If you are not the intended recipient (or
>  authorized to receive for the recipient), please contact the sender or reply
>  to Enron Corp. at enron.messaging.administration@enron.com and delete all
>  copies of the message. This e-mail (and any attachments hereto) are not
>  intended to be an offer (or an acceptance) and do not create or evidence a
>  binding and enforceable contract between Enron Corp. (or any of its
>  affiliates) and the intended recipient or any other party, and may not be
>  relied on by anyone as the basis of a contract by estoppel or otherwise.
>  Thank you. 
> **********************************************************************

Thanks Nyree :)

revised.

                                          AGENT TR/TR BOOKING REF ZNUHAJ
 
                                          ENRON NORTH AMERICA
                                          CAUSHOLLI/MONIKA
                                          3WTC0306
  ENRON CORP                              INTEROFFICE ETKT RCPT
 
 
 
 
 
  DATE:  OCT 03 2001
 
 
 
HOTEL                 21OCT CORONADO BAY RESORT
                      23OCT 4000 CORONADO BAY ROAD
                            CORONADO, CA 92118
                            UNITED STATES OF AMERICA
                            TELEPHONE: 619 424 4000
                            FAX: 619 424 4400
                            CONFIRMATION: 95683347
                            REFERENCE: A0DAD2
                            SINGLE ROOM KING SIZE BED
                            RATE: *** USD 160.00 PER NIGHT
                            GUARANTEE GIVEN
                            ENRON CORP RQST NONSMKG KING
         TO AVOID BILLING CANCEL BY 6PM 2 DAYS PRIOR TO ARRIVAL
 
MISCELLANEOUS         20FEB HOUSTON TX
                      WED   ** THANK YOU FOR USING THE TAP **
 
CAUSHOLLI/MONIKA  S5C0413R1073
 
ASSISTANT:ANNA MEHRER 503 464-7698
*******************************************
INTL TVLRS: CARRY SOS WALLET CARD W/ENRON ASSISTANCE INFO
CALL SOS MEDICAL EMERGENCY:IN U.S 800 523-6586
CALL SOS MEDICAL EMERGENCY:INTL 215 245-4707 (COLLECT)
*********************************************
ALL FARES ARE SUBJECT TO CHANGE UNTIL TICKETED/PURCHASED

Teresa

Thank you Teresa,

Can we change the arrival to 10/21?  Please.

Thank you,
Nyree

                                          AGENT TR/TR BOOKING REF ZNUHAJ
 
                                          ENRON NORTH AMERICA
                                          CAUSHOLLI/MONIKA
                                          3WTC0306
  ENRON CORP                              INTEROFFICE ETKT RCPT
 
 
 
 
 
  DATE:  OCT 03 2001
 
 
 
HOTEL                 20OCT CORONADO BAY RESORT
                      23OCT 4000 CORONADO BAY ROAD
                            CORONADO, CA 92118
                            UNITED STATES OF AMERICA
                            TELEPHONE: 619 424 4000
                            FAX: 619 424 4400
                            CONFIRMATION: 95683347
                            REFERENCE: A0DAD2
                            SINGLE ROOM KING SIZE BED
                            RATE: *** USD 160.00 PER NIGHT
                            GUARANTEE GIVEN
                            ENRON CORP RQST NONSMKG KING
             TO AVOID BILLING CANCEL 48HRS PRIOR TO ARRIVAL
    LOWER HOTEL RATES MAY BECOME AVAILABLE. PLEASE INQUIRE AT CHK IN
 
MISCELLANEOUS         20FEB HOUSTON TX
                      WED   ** THANK YOU FOR USING THE TAP **
 
CAUSHOLLI/MONIKA  S5C0413R1073
 
ASSISTANT:ANNA MEHRER 503 464-7698
*******************************************
INTL TVLRS: CARRY SOS WALLET CARD W/ENRON ASSISTANCE INFO
CALL SOS MEDICAL EMERGENCY:IN U.S 800 523-6586
CALL SOS MEDICAL EMERGENCY:INTL 215 245-4707 (COLLECT)
*********************************************
ALL FARES ARE SUBJECT TO CHANGE UNTIL TICKETED/PURCHASED

Teresa

Thanks!

Hi Monika,
I have ordered the report and cd version, included in the subscription is a quarterly report.

Here is Sept's version of World Tissue Business Monitor from your German contact:

monika and dave,

as mentioned during our phone conversation, i am enclosing the original
spread sheet that was developed to capture both the morphological aspects of
various fibers as well the pulp qualities for different wood species.
 
also, the spreadsheet that dan T has provided with by enron, under fiber
morphology , and under hardwood broadleaf  species, southern mixed hardwood
(Hi Oak and Low Oak) and mixed tropical hardwoods are listed.
 
for this category only pulp characteristics can be provided but not fiber
morphology. so, please check that too.

if you have questions, please call me ((864) 676-5636) or dan T.

thanks.

Dr. Perry Parthasarathy

 <<Enron_Fiber_Pulp_Properties.xls>> 

============================================================================================
NOTICE - This communication may contain confidential and privileged information that is for the sole use of the intended recipient.  Any viewing, copying or distribution of, or reliance on this message by unintended recipients is strictly prohibited.  If you have received this message in error, please notify us immediately by replying to the message and deleting it from your computer.

==============================================================================

You need the following ingredients:

Trout Fish (medium size)
About 4 big yellow onions- chopped into little pieces
About 4 pieces of garlic- also chopped in little pieces
Tomato Sauce
Red Pepper
Black Pepper
Bay Leaf
Lemon Juice
Salt
White wine
Vegetable Oil

The process:

1- Clean and wash the fish. Cut the head off you don't need that. Place the fish in a pan and pour lemon juice in it. Leave it in lemon juice while preparing the sauce.

2- In another pan put some vegetable oil and fry the chopped onions. After about 4 min add a little black pepper, red pepper, garlic, salt and bay leaf and stir. 
3- Continue stirring until the onions are a little brownish in color. Then add the tomato sauce and continue stirring. You will have a reddish sauce ready.
4- In a baking pan put the sauce that you prepared above and open a free space in the middle for the fish. Place the fish in the middle. Then pour lemon juice and white wine on the whole pan and put the pan in the oven.

Keep an eye on it as fish is cooked really fast. When you serve it ad lemon juice again. 

Another way of cooking the trout fish (much easier and I think tastier)

Get a small trout this time., 
After cleaning it place it in a baking pan. Then add olive oil into it (lots of it), lemon juice,  chopped tomatoes (about 2 tomatoes) , and olives. 
Just bake it and there you have it. Again when you serve it you need to add some more lemon juice.
 It's delicious!

Try any of these and let me know how they taste. Have fun
Monika

 

Karen,

I have trouble printing so here is the cash costs for Indonesian mills. To easily identify I have bolded the row that contains the Riau Plant info. Cash costs are $164/mton.

Monika

Hello Avril,

We have found some good info on tissue paper from an independent consulting company.I talked to Andrea so we are going to go and purchase the study. The consulting company is located in Germany and the name of the person and his contact are:

Esko Uutella
phone 49815129193
emila euco.uutela@t-online.de

Please read below for the kind of information he can provide us with and the related costs. We decided to get the whole package.
thanks,
Monika

Monika, if Bryja and Karen are OK with this, go ahead and purchase.  I think we probably need to go with the complete study.  Please coordinate with Avril.
Thanks, avr

This report sounds very worthwhile, and the cost is extremely reasonable. Does Jim Bryja know these guys?

Andrea,

I found a private consultant on tissue (as RISI does not do anything on the subject) and he is located in Germany. Below is the kind of information that he can make available to us as well as the costs. Can you please advice me on how much information we want to get from him based on what he wrote below?

 

Hi Ms. Causholli,

I have made recently a major multiclient study "Outlook for World Tissue 
Business" which includes all tissue mills with capacities worldwide plus 
capacity profiles by the largest producers worldwide and by region. I attach the 
study proposal with this e-mail. The report costs US$ 3,500 (300 pages with 
detailed Annexes).

If you would like to have only capacity data for the regions you mentioned plus 
the top 10-12 global producers, I could sell this part of information at US$ 
600. You should specify the form in which I should present it so that I 
could easier fulfil your data needs.

Best regards

Esko Uutela
EU Consulting

Causholli, Monika schrieb:
> Hello Mr. Uutella,
>
>
> I am an analyst working for Enron Industrial Markets in Houston, Texas
> and I am gathering some information on tissue. I spoke to Rod Young and
> David Pinault from RISI and they told me to contact you as you do some
> more extensive studies on tissue usage. 
>
> What I am looking for are: tissue capacity worldwide and by region
> (North America, Europe, Latin America, Asia)
> and the biggest companies that produce tissue.
>
> Can you also include how much this information would cost?
>
> Thanks in advance,
> Monika Causholli
> Enron Industrial Markets
> (713) 345 1510
>
>
>
>
> **********************************************************************
> This e-mail is the property of Enron Corp. and/or its relevant affiliate and
>  may contain confidential and privileged material for the sole use of the
>  intended recipient (s). Any review, use, distribution or disclosure by
>  others is strictly prohibited. If you are not the intended recipient (or
>  authorized to receive for the recipient), please contact the sender or reply
>  to Enron Corp. at enron.messaging.administration@enron.com and delete all
>  copies of the message. This e-mail (and any attachments hereto) are not
>  intended to be an offer (or an acceptance) and do not create or evidence a
>  binding and enforceable contract between Enron Corp. (or any of its
>  affiliates) and the intended recipient or any other party, and may not be
>  relied on by anyone as the basis of a contract by estoppel or otherwise.
>  Thank you. 
> **********************************************************************

Karen,

You are right. I should have included some of my comments on the FOEX recent trends. I''ll keep that in mind for next time.

Thanks,
Monika

Monika,

I think an important point to make is not just that the FOEX was up for the period, but that this is the third week of increases for the hardwoods index after several mixed months (both increases and decreases).  However, it's also significant that this week's increase is less than that of last week indicating that the market has not yet found direction.

In terms of the NBSK index, I think it'd be important to point out that this is the first increase in the index since April of this year.  Again, I don't believe this indicates any firm direction in the market, but it's nonetheless a significant event.  

KC

Today FOEX published its index for NBSK and BHKP:

NBSK increased by $ (1.13) or 0.25%

BHKP increased by Euro 6.97 (1.6%) to Euro 443.73. Expressed in $US BHKP was up by $2.15 (0.53 %) to $407.11
See attached

Monika Causholli << File: Foex Prices.xls >> 

Andrea,

Attached is the pulp presentation. Please take a look and let me know of any changes or additions.
Also, tissue facts are taken from a bank of America report as RISI does not have any studies on it. I found one guy in Germany that seems to do quite an extensive work on tissue. I sent you an email yesterday stating what he can offer us and what the costs are.

Also note that fluff pulp data is very limited. I am waiting David Pinault from RISI to get back to me as he is researching and digging inside his organization to find anything on the fluff pulp. All these data can be added to the presentation upon availiability.

Thanks,
Monika 

Yes I did forget it. Here it is.

thanks,
MOnika Causholli

Monika, Did you forget to attach the spreadsheet?

Thanks,

Dan Temple

Hello Mr. Temple,

This is a follow-up email to what you talked with Dave Allan on the
subject of Fiber morphology. Attached you will find the fiber
characteristics spreadsheet - the most updated version. 

We also have an additional question which is - why each quality
parameter (the column headings) is important to each major end-use
(paper grade) application.

You can contact me for any further questions.

thanks,
Monika Causholli
Enron Industrial Markets
(713) 345- 1510

============================================================================================
NOTICE - This communication may contain confidential and privileged information that is for the sole use of the intended recipient.  Any viewing, copying or distribution of, or reliance on this message by unintended recipients is strictly prohibited.  If you have received this message in error, please notify us immediately by replying to the message and deleting it from your computer.

==============================================================================

Today FOEX published its index for NBSK and BHKP:

NBSK increased by $ (1.13) or 0.25%

BHKP increased by Euro 6.97 (1.6%) to Euro 443.73. Expressed in $US BHKP was up by $2.15 (0.53 %) to $407.11
See attached

Monika Causholli 

Thanks I will look at it tonight

Kevin

The dial in network is down so Elizabeth is headed into the office to get the PGE capacity release report.  It may be an hour.  Sorry for the delay.

I'm traveling to Florida on a business meeting on Thursday.  If Fred the chicken is available, I'd be pleased to have him accompany me.

Hi, Ms. Corman.

This is Mrs. Jung.  This is my email if you ever need it for future
reference.  :)

Flat Stanley was sent in the envelopes provided from home.  I had the kids
put labels with the school's address on it in the return address corner.  I
also included an envelope with the school's address on it so that Stanleys
could be returned.  I'm glad to hear Stanleys are being anticipated.  I know
the kids are really excited about them.

I'm also glad to hear Chad's enjoying school.  We are definitely doing
harder work than Kindergarten.  We're actually doing different work than the
rest of first grade - more challenging, mind-stretching work, I'd like to
believe.

I was very encouraged by your letter and just wanted to express my
appreciation for sharing your thoughts with us.  Thanks again!  Let me know
if you have any other questions.

Sincerely,
Mrs. Jung

fyi
Dot - 

I think Frazier did understand and was representing my view.  I'd rather that there were no tolerances in the OBA -- only the concept of reasonable balances.   With this point located in the makret area, it is quite possible that we'll be the ones with the swing (especially since we'll have flow control).  

If you prefer a tolerance in  both the termination and tolerance paragraphs I guess that's fine -- since the only remedy in either case is termination of the OBA.  The existing balance (even if over 100,000 cum) will be settled up under the OBA. 

	Shelley -- 
	
	Frazier did not seem to understand my changes in the tolerance sections (4c and 4d).  
	So, to clarify:

	On the tolerances, my concern was twofold -- that we only have the 100,000 dth limit in 
	the "termination" paragraph (and not in the tolerance paragraph), and that it was not clear 
	that, even if the cumulative daily imbalances totaled only 5% of the scheduled volumes for 
	the month, the parties would work to keep it below an actual volume of 100,000 dth (or have 
	a right to terminate the agreement if it were over that amount).

	--Dot
	Here are my comments.  (I have bolded them so you can see the changes.)  --Dot

	 << File: Gulfstream-OBA#9-10-01.doc >> 

Attached is our markup of the Gulfstream OBA with all of the changes we discussed today.
Sharon's goal is to send it out by COB today.
Please provide input to accommodate the schedule.
Thanks.

 << File: 01-111 Gulfstream OBA  (10-15-01) .doc >> 

I'm fine with these latest changes to our OBA mark-up.
Attached is our markup of the Gulfstream OBA with all of the changes we discussed today.
Sharon's goal is to send it out by COB today.
Please provide input to accommodate the schedule.
Thanks.

 << File: 01-111 Gulfstream OBA  (10-15-01) .doc >> 

Chris,

I also wanted to mention that I confirmed the Connie Davis of Travel Brokers received our passports and Kazakstan and Russian visa applications and is holding them pending instructions from you.

Shelley Corman
713-853-7083 (work)
713-857-2013 (cell)

Ginger/Chris,

The Orphans petitions coordinator at the Houston INS office called this morning to say that our paperwork appeared in order and that she has an appointment to review our case with her supervisor this afternoon.  She said that we should receive the approval notification form within a week.

Shelley Corman
713-853-7083 (work)
713-857-2103 (home)

Ginger/Chris,

The Orphans petitions coordinator at the Houston INS office called this morning to say that our paperwork appeared in order and that she has an appointment to review our case with her supervisor this afternoon.  She said that we should receive the approval notification form within a week.

Shelley Corman
713-853-7083 (work)
713-857-2103 (home)

Catherine,

Your mom gave me your email address and said that she mentioned that I would be emailing you.   

This summer, my husband, Kim Erb, and I hosted a 4-year old girl named Alina from an orphanage in Taraz.  She came to us as part of Kidsave International's summer miracle program.  She returned with her group back to the orphanage at the end of August.  We miss her terribly.  

We have been working anxiously to complete our dossier and our INS approvals to be able to bring Alina back to our family permanently.  Obviously world events have us very anxious about the adoption.  We are just as resolved to bring Alina home and I'd leave tomorrow if I had all the approvals.  My hope was lifted by hearing that you were able to travel home to Kazakstan last week.

We are working with an adoption agency called Across the World Adoptions.  Their Kazakstan agents are Sergei Pikalov and Larisa Reznikova.   Alina's orphanage in Taraz is called Ulan & this was the first time they ever participated in a summer program to send kids to the US.  There isn't any way for me to call or mail Alina now that she is back in the orphanage.  I am so fortunate that I am able to correspond via email with Sergei's wife (Larissa -- different Larissa) who was here this summer as a host with the kids.  Larissa and Sergei live in Almaty.  Larissa is a medical student.  She is rapidly improving her English through her visit and our continued correspondence.  Yesterday I was so touched that Larissa sent me a photograph of Alina.  Sergei was in Taraz last week and saw dear Alina & she is well.

Sorry for the long-winded background.  I hope you won't mind corresponding with me and offering me some travel advice.  

In His Name,

Shelley Corman
scorman@enron.com (work)
cormanerb@cs.com (home)

http://www.borg.com/~rjgtoons/bizco.html

Hi Ms. Traylor,

I gave my mom a heads up that "flat Stanley" would be arriving in the mail soon -- but it seems like
recent mail jitters are coming into play.  Before poor Stanley is needlessly tossed on fears of biological
terrorism could you confirm whether Master Stanley might be in a brown envelope?  I didn't have Ms. Jung's
email.

Hope all is well with you.  I am so pleased with how happy Chad is with school.  At first he expected to be 
coddled like Kindergarten and complained that 1st grade was too hard.  Boy how things have changed in a month.
Yesterday he told me that he was so happy that school was hard -- Kindergarten was soooooo boring.

I really appreciate the firm, yet compassionate manner you have with the kids.  It is just what Chad needs to develop.

While I'm writing, I will also mention one thing to you in case it comes up at school.  Over the summer we hosted
a 4-year old orphan girl (Alina) from Kazakhstan.  She had to return to her orphanage while we complete paperwork to adopt her.  The other day, Chad was watching TV and saw a picture of some Afghan children.  He commented how much they look
like Alina and then burst out in tears.  If the school works on a project for the Afghan kids, Chad may seem a little more emotional than usual -- just wanted you to know.

Regards,

Shelley Corman  (Chad's Mom)
scorman@enron.com

Hi Shel,

Did you say that "Flat Stanley" will arrive in a white envelope?  I received 
a yellow envelope in the mail today with no return address, my name & address 
were typed and it had a "non-profit" stamp on it.  I did not open it.  It's 
in the trash can but the garbage man doesn't go 'til Thursday... I can 
retrieve it if you think it might be the envelope from Chad.

Love,
Mom

Do you know?
Hi Shel,

Did you say that "Flat Stanley" will arrive in a white envelope?  I received 
a yellow envelope in the mail today with no return address, my name & address 
were typed and it had a "non-profit" stamp on it.  I did not open it.  It's 
in the trash can but the garbage man doesn't go 'til Thursday... I can 
retrieve it if you think it might be the envelope from Chad.

Love,
Mom

Elizabeth Brown will forward the capacity release data shortly

http://www.nolo.com/calculator/index.html

Here is my two cents...

From your message I understand that the tree trunk is entirely on our property and branches 
overhang the condominium fence.  If so, then the tree belongs to Ashford.  

The condominium probably has the legal right to trim branches up to the property line, but may not go on
our property or destroy the tree.  

A landowner is generally not required to trim its tree unless it knows the tree to be dangerous or the tree is
obstructing a public road.   A landowner can't be negligent unless they have legal duty to do something.  Since
the condominiums concern appears to be aestetics and not safety, there doesn't appear to be a "negligence" issue.
Further, a landowner isn't negligent for natural conditions such as a tree falling onto others property during a storm 
unless the landowner knew the tree was unstable prior to the storm.  

If the condominimum choose to sue the church for failure to maintain the tree, they would have to do so on a "nuisance" theory arguing that thetree interferes with the use and enjoyment of their property.  Still to prevail on a nuisance theory they would probably have to argue that the tree was dangerous.

Bottom Line:  We don't have a responsibility to trim the tree, but it seems sensible to let the condominium trim the tree so that issues don't ever arise later if a storm blew limbs down.  
    

Greetings:

I spoke with Connie of Hunter's Point condominiums who asked that if they
could cut the trees and bushes along the fence line we share.
She said its on our property and thought that we should cut it since it is
on our property and blocking the view of the residents of the complex.

Advised her that it is currentl y not a problem for us and if Hunter's
Point trim the trees and bushes they must clean up any cutting and not
leave them on our property. Connie advised she would check with their
landscape company and advise.

Shelley, can you advise if we are required by any law to trim the trees and
bushes which block the view of an adjoining resident, I guess for good
neighbor policy and as we are a church we could do our civic duty, this
also raises the question, if we are blocking their view now, what happens
when we build the new Sanctuary and they have a problem with our roof
blocking their view?

Thanks/Regards

Chris Sanguinetti
St Paul Global Marine
ph - 713 260 9791
fax- 713 260 9795

Please add to my personal contact list

Hello Shelley:  Just an informal advance notice that the College of 
Earth and Mineral Sciences will host a golf tournament on Thursday, 
November 8, at Tour 18 in Humble, Texas.  A 12:30 p.m. shotgun start, 
followed by a Burger & Chicken buffet, is on tap for the day.  Hope 
you can join us.  Information will be mailed within the next week or 
so.
-- 
*****************************
John L. Dietz Jr.
Director of Development
College of Earth and Mineral Sciences
The Pennsylvania State University
116 Deike Building
University Park, PA  16802
jld5@psu.edu
814-863-2289
http://www.development.psu.edu

Thanks for the invite.  Unfortunately, we have a customer meeting at South Shore Harbor that day.  

Hope you are doing well.  I haven't made it home to a football game yet this year -- although I guess that has been a blessing.

Shelley Corman
713-853-7083

Hello Shelley:  Just an informal advance notice that the College of 
Earth and Mineral Sciences will host a golf tournament on Thursday, 
November 8, at Tour 18 in Humble, Texas.  A 12:30 p.m. shotgun start, 
followed by a Burger & Chicken buffet, is on tap for the day.  Hope 
you can join us.  Information will be mailed within the next week or 
so.
-- 
*****************************
John L. Dietz Jr.
Director of Development
College of Earth and Mineral Sciences
The Pennsylvania State University
116 Deike Building
University Park, PA  16802
jld5@psu.edu
814-863-2289
http://www.development.psu.edu

FYI

Enbridge to Acquire Williams' South Texas Natural Gas Gathering, Treating a=
nd Transmission Assets
CALGARY, Alberta--(BUSINESS WIRE)--Oct. 11, 2001--Enbridge Inc. (NASDAQ:ENB=
R <http://finance.yahoo.com/q?s=3Denbr&d=3Dt> - news </n/e/enbr.html>; TSE:=
ENB. <http://finance.yahoo.com/q?s=3Denb.to&d=3Dt> - news </n/ca/e/enb.html=
>) today announced that it is purchasing natural gas gathering, treating an=
d transmission assets in south Texas from a unit of Williams (NYSE:WMB <htt=
p://finance.yahoo.com/q?s=3Dwmb&d=3Dt> - news </n/w/wmb.html>).=20
Enbridge will acquire 792 kilometres (492 miles) of gas mainlines regulated=
 by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission and 480 kilometres (298 miles)=
 of non-FERC regulated assets including gathering systems and pipeline late=
rals. Closing of the acquisition is subject to regulatory approvals includi=
ng approval by FERC to remove the mainlines from jurisdiction under the Nat=
ural Gas Act.=20
The acquisition, for US$50 million, is the first to be completed by Enbridg=
e's recently created Transportation Group South, which is based in Houston =
and has overall responsibility for Enbridge's U.S. business activities. The=
 assets will be owned and operated by Enbridge's wholly owned subsidiary, E=
nbridge Midcoast Energy Inc.=20
``Acquisition of these assets enables Enbridge to further expand its geogra=
phic footprint and scale of operations,'' said Dan C. Tutcher, Enbridge Gro=
up Vice President, Transportation Group South. ``It levers off the expertis=
e that Enbridge Midcoast Energy has developed in gas gathering, processing =
and transportation, and enhances our position in the active Gulf Coast regi=
on. In addition to its strategic value, we expect the acquisition to be imm=
ediately accretive to Enbridge earnings, and to have potential for future e=
xpansion.''=20
The mainline assets include two pipelines that run from close to the Texas-=
Mexico border near Laredo and McAllen to Transco Station 30 where they conn=
ect with the Williams Transco mainline, which has connections at the Katy h=
ub and continues on to the U.S. Southeast and Northeast.=20
The non-FERC regulated assets include a 210-kilometre (130-mile) gathering =
system with a 90 million cubic feet per day capacity sour gas treatment pla=
nt and 78 ton per day sulphur recovery facilitity; 210 kilometres (130 mile=
s) of other gathering laterals; a currently inactive processing plant in Be=
e County with capacity of 60 million cubic feet per day; and a 61-kilometre=
 (38-mile) lateral connecting the two FERC-regulated mainlines.=20
Enbridge Inc. is a leader in energy transportation, distribution and servic=
es in North America and internationally. As a transporter of energy, Enbrid=
ge operates, in Canada and the U.S., the world's longest crude oil and liqu=
ids pipeline system. The Company also is involved in international energy p=
rojects, and has a growing involvement in natural gas transmission and mids=
tream businesses. As a distributor of energy, Enbridge owns and operates Ca=
nada's largest natural gas distribution company, which provides gas and ret=
ail services in Ontario, Quebec and New York State. The Company is developi=
ng a gas distribution network for the province of New Brunswick; is involve=
d in the distribution of electricity; and provides retail energy products a=
nd services to a growing number of Canadian and U.S. markets. Enbridge empl=
oys approximately 6,000 people, primarily in Canada, the U.S. and South Ame=
rica. Enbridge common shares trade on The Toronto Stock Exchange in Canada =
under the symbol ``ENB'' and on the NASDAQ National Market in the U.S. unde=
r the symbol ``ENBR''. Information about Enbridge is available on the Compa=
ny's web site at www.enbridge.com <http://www.enbridge.com>.

Kent,

I can get together on Tues.  at 1:30.

I certainly want to make this report as useful as possible.  But, in some regards I feel like I failed my group in not memorializing the notes from our Omaha meeting on the specific changes that we agreed as a group to make to the report.  I have kept Dale in a state of fiddling with this report for two months now.   For example, my notes from our meeting reflect the fact that we decided against trend information.  I am certainly willing to change that decision if you guys collectively agree.

Have you considered whether we need different types of reports rather than try to accomplish all on this page.  The purpose of the current page is for gas logistics to report on what is happening on the system (i.e. how the physical world is tracking to the paper world).   We need to run through this exercise from a gas logistics side each day even if it isn't meaningful to marketing.  I'm not adverse to the concept of studying shifts in gas flows from day-day or year-year, but perhaps this is a distinct analytical tool.

Hopefully we can work out these details on Tues & then run with it.  

Shelley,

The changes are an improvement.  Both Jo and I were thinking that we were moving toward having a summary section where the system-wide balance was addressed.  This would include things such as a summary receipt/delivery balance, how gas is moving across the system at key pipeline points, how much capacity (such as at Clifton) that is used for transport vs. contract storage vs. operational storage (line pack changes).

Also, we were looking for some longer term trend information such as what were the zones in the Market Area and other key points were using last year so we can see the year-on-year trends.

We find ourselves talking about specific volumes at specific points and we feel that it would add a broader feel as to what is happening on the system if we can start with a broader look at the entire system and then move into more of a location by location/point information.  These were some of the things that we wanted to sit down and talk about to be sure that were all on the same page.  Could we plan on getting together after Lynn's brown-bag lunch presentation (about 1:30)?

Thanks,

Kent

Thanks.  I got your voice message. 

 I'm good with getting together on Tuesday, but I would also like any major formatting feedback in advance of the meeting if possible so that we can walk away from the meeting on Tuesday with the final product.  Otherwise, I'm concerned that we'll never get out of the cycle of perpetual feedback & differences in preferences of formatting style.

Thanks.  I got your voice message. 

 I'm good with getting together on Tuesday, but I would also like any major formatting feedback in advance of the meeting if possible so that we can walk away from the meeting on Tuesday with the final product.  Otherwise, I'm concerned that we'll never get out of the cycle of perpetual feedback & differences in preferences of formatting style.

It has been terrific to correspond with Liz & satisfying to help her get info on Oksana from my correspondence with Larisa.  My dossier is with Ginger, hopefully being translated.  I have not yet received my INS approval and I'm scared that I'll anger them if I start calling.

Hi Shelley,
 
I just wanted to check in and see how everything is going.  Did the home study come back from INS yet?  Were you able to get in touch with Liz Gras?  Let me know if there is anything I can do.   I am thinking of you and your family...all of them... here and in Kazakhstan. 
 
Suzanne  

Too much partying yesterday -- so I didn't finish my homework.  I'm still working on the slides and probably will be during the Commission meeting.  So I'll send them to you by 10:30 AM of so.  If you are available to edit them during a working lunch in my office let me know.

No revenue is better.  I've already been over our O&M with my directors.  

Shelley,
       I was thinking just revenue, but we can just as easily do O&M, too.  Which would you prefer? 
Dan  

I'll be at the meeting Friday.  Caroline tells me that it is strictly a revenue review - no O&M.   Do you want to go over just revenue with my team or both revenue/O&M?

Shelley,
       I haven't seen any invitation list for Friday's Plan Review with Stan yet, but we are up at 10:00 and will go until 1:00.  I'd like you to be in through the whole thing if possible.  After that, do you think that you and I should walk through the whole plan with the key people in your group (and maybe Steve's)?  Give me a call if you haven't received the Plan handouts by tomorrow.  Thanks.

Dan

Thanks for the info

Hi Shelley,

I came across this info that thought that I would email it to you just in
case....

Suzanne

> Just in case you are not on the list I got this from.
> Dianne Combs
> Crawfordsville, IN
> dossier at Kaz embassy in DC for two weeks now.
>
>
> -
>
> Dear adoption representatives,
>
> In light of the recent events in the US, we would like to inform you that
> the adoption intake and interviews have moved to a new location. The
> representative are requested to submit the documents to the East Gate of
the
> Embassy between 9.30 and 10.55
>
> Please be advised that from now on, if any of the required documents are
> missing or not filled out at the intake the adoption representative will
> have to come back the next working day. Only the cases that are
> documentarily complete will be accepted. For instance, if pictures of the
> child are missing at the intake they cannot be submitted at a later time
> prior to the interview. Please do not ask us to make exceptions for your
> case. Our space and time are limited and any exceptions will not allow us
to
> process those cases that are complete.
>
> Please note that due to our temporary relocation to another building we
> require that the representatives also submit copies of form I-171 H
(Notice
> of Favorable Determination of Approval from the INS) and the homestudy.
> Without these documents the case will be considered incomplete and the
> family will not get an interview the same day.
>
> Thank you for your understanging and cooperation,
>
> Julie Furuta-Toy,
> Chief, Immigrant visa unit
> US Embassy, Moscow
>
>
> _
>
>

I'll be at the meeting Friday.  Caroline tells me that it is strictly a revenue review - no O&M.   Do you want to go over just revenue with my team or both revenue/O&M?

Shelley,
       I haven't seen any invitation list for Friday's Plan Review with Stan yet, but we are up at 10:00 and will go until 1:00.  I'd like you to be in through the whole thing if possible.  After that, do you think that you and I should walk through the whole plan with the key people in your group (and maybe Steve's)?  Give me a call if you haven't received the Plan handouts by tomorrow.  Thanks.

Dan

Glad you had fun -- but sorry the Astros didn't do their part!

Shelley I just wanted to thank you for giving us the chance to win a ticket to the Astros playoff game the other day.  I know my name was not drawn, but I still had the opportunity to attend because Christine McEvoy called in sick.  It was my first time at Enron Field and I loved it. 
Thanks again,
Chris Miller

Stan,

Attached is a summary of the current pipeline segment GISB Board terms and suggested motions for 
the upcoming INGAA Board Meeting.

Summary of Pipeline Segment GISB Board Terms

 Name	Company 	Term Expires	Another Term?	
				
Stan Horton	Enron Transportation Services	Dec 31, 2001	No	
				
Richard Kruse	Duke Energy Gas	Dec 31, 2002	n/a	
				
Terry McGill	Columbia Gulf Transmission	Dec 31, 2001	Yes	
				
Ron Mucci	Williams Gas Pipeline	Dec 31, 2002	n/a	
				
John Somerhalder	El Paso Energy Pipeline Group	Dec 31, 2001	Yes	

Suggested Board Motion:
* Motion to extend board terms of Messers Somerhalder and McGill for another two-year term and elect 
Shelley Corman of Enron for a two-year board term though Dec. 31, 2003.

Joe - Please make sure that Joan Dreskin adds GISB Board Representation as an item for the upcoming
INGAA Board Meeting.
 

FYI Only

Attached is a copy of the Gas Logistics presentation that I gave at Phil Lowry's operations conference this morning.

 

Please add to my calendar

	Shelley, we have established Monday afternoon after Steve Harris' staff
	meeting to meet and discuss:

		1.  TW Shipper Imbalance Status

		2.  OBA termination/Resolution 

	We will stay in the conference room on 13.

	Just wanted to let you know this is replacing our Tuesday morning meeting
	which was not working well since everyone moved.

	Thanks. Lynn

Something like 

"Financial Support- IT & Gas Logistics"

Not a problem - any suggestions?   cvb

Caroline - Would you be amenable to renaming your weekly report?  There is some confusion that this report is the Gas Logistics report.  Thanks for your help.  

Danny,
 
Thanks for securing the Astros tickets for Gas Logistics.  On Monday afternoon I had everyone gather and we had popcorn and a drawing for yesterday's seats, the extra seats for today and this Friday's opening Aeros game.  It turned out great.  Even though I followed this democratic process -- the winners turned out to be exactly the people I wanted to reward.  I also made sure to have a leader in each group to buy the snacks.  Yesterday Brad took Jodie Floyd, Jerry Graves, and Tracy Minter,Toby Kuehl and Lanny Cramer.  Today Dannis Bellard, Dale Ratliff, Terry Kowalke and Steve Chambers are going to the game.  It was a great morale builder.  Thanks.  We'll try to do this again next week if we have extra tickets (Astros cooperating of course).
 
Today, Bill Murphy of FPL and Jude Campbell of TECO-PGS are coming to town to go to the game with Mike Bryant and I.  I'm also going to have a dinner for them after the game.  Perhaps at Irma's where hopefully Jack and Rachel will join us.  I'll have Ricki leave you a message if you are interested in stoping by.
 
Early this AM I'll be out speaking at Phil's Ops conference.
 
I'm going to call Julie to get on your calendar to brief you on some key logistics issues and talk about issues related to our current seating arrangements.  

Mike -
I'll be out at the Ops. conference until 9 AM.  Could you please coordinate the meeting time at the Enron building with Jude/Bill.  Ricki I'm assuming that you have set our travel to ballpark.
 
Also, I want to make sure that we make the trip worth their while.  Mike - Can we quickly pull together dinner/happy hour plans (casual) downtown after the game (perhaps Ricki could reserve a spot for 10 at the old Irma's over by the ballpark) where Dannis, Steve, Jack, Rachel, schedulers, etc. meet us.  I need to leave downtown by 7 PM for a meeting this evening and I want to make sure that we have entertainment reinforcements.  

Please RSVP that I will attend.
 
 

As you know, the Enron Management Conference will be held Wednesday through Friday, November 14-16, 2001, at the Westin La Cantera Resort in San Antonio, Texas.  

This has been an eventful and challenging year for Enron.  Now,  more than ever,  it is fitting to bring Enron's leaders together.  After all, it is up to our management team to lead our company through these challenging times.  Together, we will define Enron's character and determine Enron's destiny.

We have a great program planned for this year's conference.  I'm delighted that General Norman Schwarzkopf will join us as a keynote speaker on leadership.  I'm equally pleased to welcome back Gary Hamel, who will help us process the past year and prepare for future success.  As I've said before, we are a company that continues to look to the future, and there are many exciting things in store for us.

I look forward to seeing you at this very important meeting.

Regards,

Ken Lay 

NOTE:   This year,  registration for the Management Conference will be conducted electronically.  Below is a link to the online registration website along with instructions for navigating the site.  Everyone must register by Friday, November 2. 

<http://www.mplanners.com/enron>

When you access the Management Conference online registration website, enter your eMail Address and Password (password: enron) in the specified boxes.  The first time you access the site, you will be prompted to enter your First Name and Last Name.  Once completed, click Submit. 

On the next page, click Sign Up Now to register.  You will be prompted to enter your basic information and make selections for your hotel room, travel and preferred activity.  In the scroll box to the right, you can review and print the conference agenda, a list of activities, as well as travel arrangements and other general information.  

After you have entered the necessary information, you can Review Your Registration or simply Log Out.  Your registration information will be automatically submitted.  

Once registered, you can reaccess the site at any time to review or change previous elections.  When reentering the site, you only need to enter your eMail Address and Password.

If you experience any problems accessing the site, please contact Marge Nadasky at 713-853-6631.

Jo, Kent & Dave,
 
Per our joint meeting in Omaha several weeks ago and subsequent conversations with Jo and others, the morning meeting report has been revised to:
 
- Remove unnecessary line pack and yesterday's plan info.
- Add additional interconnect points
- Add fuel and a system balance computation for the Market, Midcontinent and Permian area
- Improve formatting and readability.
 
Dale will shortly forward a draft of the new report.  Please confirm that it meets with your expectations. We would plan to put this new format in place mid-week next week.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

I have been friends with Shelley Corman since 1985.  We have worked together and maintained a personal friendship through the year.  Shelley is a kind and loving person.  She is active in her church and in charitable activities.  I met her husband, Kim Erb, in 1997 and have been friends with Shelley and Kim as a couple since that time.  Both Shelley and Kim are loving parents to their six-year old son Chad.  It has been a delight to watch them raise Chad to be such a fine young man.  I believe that their home would provide a terrific environment for an adopted child.

Sincerely

Christi Nicolay
{contact info}

Please call Ava Garcia to pick it up when done.  Thanks -- I'll call you tonight

Caroline - Would you be amenable to renaming your weekly report?  There is some confusion that this report is the Gas Logistics report.  Thanks for your help.  

Please print and store for next week's calendar items

Please mark your calendars for Monday, October 15 from 3:30 to 4:30 p.m. Central for the below-mentioned meeting.  It will be held in the 50M Dining Room.  Look forward to seeing you there.

  -----Original Message-----
For those of you who have continued to participate in your Corporate Responsibility Task Force subcommittee since the task force was folded into the Culture Committee, thanks for your continuing help.  And for those of you who have not participated lately, we are asking you to join us once more for a final meeting.  As you recall, the subcommittees are:

Asset-related Activities
External Accountability
Internal Communication and Accountability
Market Opportunity
Measurement and Benchmarking

The subcommittee goals are attached:

 
I would like to pull together everyone who has been involved over the past year in the Corporate Responsibility initiative for a final review of all subcommittee recommendations.  Subcommittee chairs will then take these recommendations to Ken Lay and the policy committee, so we want to make sure that our final product accurately reflects the input that all of you have had this year.

Please identify your preferred dates (listed below), and respond to Stacy Walker via e-mail or at 713-853-3583.  The meeting should last less than one hour.
Thanks; look forward to seeing everyone again.

_____  Tuesday, October 9 (any time after noon Central time)
_____  Monday, October 15 (any time after noon Central time)
_____  Tuesday, October 16 (any time)
_____  Monday, October 22 (any time after noon Central time)

I talked to Ginger this morning.  She received my dossier and is sending it for translation.  She said she will be at Chris Ivins today reviewing dossiers.  She also said that there is a possible change in document requirements that would require that certain documents be "apostilled" in Austin.

I asked Ginger to send you the picture of Oksana.  She said that she thought she had already had.  She said she left you a voice message & would try to call you again later.

Talk to you soon.

 

Sorry but Lynn already gave it away

Shelley, Josue was able to get an okay from Rick and was wanting the ticket back he originally won the ticket if you haven't already given it away please let me know.

I can't join you in walking this year, but you can put me down for a $50 contribution.  I don't need a shirt though -- I still have JDF shirts from years past. 

    
Well, I can't believe another year has passed, but it has.  Sunday, October 28th  is the Juvenile Diabetes Walk for a Cure! Again this year, I'm recruiting walkers for my team or simply asking for your support.  I know you hate to hear those pleading calls for more of your money, but I'm going to ask anyway - most of you know me well!  You see I have to.  As an insulin dependent diabetic myself, it is my obligation to do what I can to support every effort to find a cure for this disease which affects so many adults and children!  I know many of you see me deal with this disease everyday as I face it each time I put food in my mouth.  I follow my meals religiously with a shot of insulin along with several finger sticks a day to check my blood sugar.  It was only 4 years ago that I was diagnosed with diabetes, but your dollars are making a difference.  Within 2 years, they are expecting to be able to release insulin that can be inhaled which would eliminate the painful injections.  

I know that you have been inundated with organizations seeking your support to fund their projects and this has been especially true this year, but I hope that you will consider JDF one of the few that you continue to support as I do.  Please consider joining my team or one of the many other Enron teams and help us find a cure for Diabetes!  An Enron JDF t-shirt will be given to each walker or sponsor who contributes $25.00 or more!  If $25.00 isn't in your budget, you can purchase a "JDF Shoe" for only $5.00 and it will be posted at the Big E Caf? on October 26th.  As always, your contributions are matched by Enron!  Thanks for your support and I hope to see you on the 28th!

Lisa Sawyer

I was referring to the fact that Bearpaw is an actual marketing affiliate of NNG and is posted as such on the website.  Bearpaw has a transport contract on NNG.

I want to clarify something from our Reg Roundtable earlier today. Bearpaw is currently a "potential marketing affiliate" of NBPL, and so far has not  crossed the line to actually trigger an event that would make them a full fledged MA. We are careful not to trigger such an event. Bearpaw may be a MA of NNG due to some contract activity on NNG, but that is not a problem for NBPL. Shelly, if you see it differently, please let me know.

    Bill

Hey all,

Can I get a copy of the settlement bullets sent to FERC staff and indicated shippers.  Lynn, Darrell, Brad & I are working on ideas on how we could revised current posting and customer point/path/segment look-up capabilities and are interested in learning whether our revised capacity procedures are any more specific than in the earlier draft we looked at.

Please see the attached notice about a drawing for Astros Playoff tickets t=
o be held today.

Please see the attached notice about a drawing for Astros Playoff tickets to be held today.

 

Fine with me

Shelley,

Please review and respond to the attached. The invoice is being revised as well.

Thanks,  Tim << File: OBAresolution-GulfSouth.doc >>  

							
Updated 8/28/01							
							
Transwestern Pipeline Company							
Summary of Red Rock Contracts							
							
			Start	End			
Contract #	Shipper	MDQ	Date	Date			
							
27608	WGR	10,000	6/1/2002	5/31/2017			
27605	Frito Lay	2,700	6/1/2002	5/31/2017			
27604	Frito Lay	5,300	6/1/2002	5/31/2003			
27622	US Gypsum	4,500	6/1/2002	8/31/2014			
27609	BP Energy	15,000	6/1/2002	5/31/2012			
27607	Oneok	1,700	6/1/2002	3/31/2004			
27642	Calpine	40,000	7/1/2002	6/30/2017			
27641	PPL	20,000	6/1/2002	6/30/2032			
27649	PPL	7,500	6/1/2002	5/31/2007			
		106,700					

Please also put all this data with the weekly calendar

I already have everything printed for this meeting.  Let me know if you wou=
ld like to review prior.=20

Please find attached three background documents for discussion at next Mond=
ay's Regulatory Roundtable (Oct. 8):=20

- Talking Points on the LDC Service issue=20
- Issues List on FERC's proposed Affiliate Rule=20
- Comparison between the Affiliate NOPR and the current Standards of Conduc=
t regulations (for gas only)=20

<<Issues List on marketing affiliate.doc>> <<Marketing Affiliates - Compari=
son to 1611.doc>> <<LDC service issues for ETS Reg.doc>>

I don't think that it is absolutely imperative to attend.  However, we may =
be able to help Joe define some of the customer benefits of electronic serv=
ice.  Can one of the Tobys attend?

Shelley: =20

Do you want me or someone in my group to participate in this proceeding?  I=
 don't see that the outcome will affect us directly but it might be interes=
ting to understand the issues. =20

Brad=20

Attached is an executive summary of the NOI on Electronic Service of Docume=
nts, RM01-11. Essentially, FERC wants to expand service electronically to a=
llow individuals to receive documents through email without the need for in=
terventions just to be kept informed of the proceedings. FERC is making two=
 proposals, one for service to parties and one for service to individuals f=
or a cost (FERC states cost recovery but no specifics).

Comments are due November 2. Joe has asked that I coordinate comments for o=
ur pipelines. Let me know who you wish to participate.=20

 << File: Summary-RM01-11.DOC >>=20

Looking forward to our discussion.  

In the past we have blessed RAC as a truly corporate function with whom we could share information and receive services.  When I read that there are power trading folks on the RAC team, my radar goes up about the need to put firewalls in place within RAC.
	In order to bring better legal coordination and standardization to Enron's Risk Assessment and Control (RAC) group, we have formed a new legal group, which will initially include Lisa Mellencamp (Finance), Marcus Nettelton (Power Trading), Carol St. Clair (Broadband/Power Trading), Mary Cook (Financial Swaps), Peter Keohane (Canada), Ed Essandoh (Retail), Paul Darmitzel (Retail) and Elizabeth Sager (Power Trading) (Team Leader).  This group will focus on, among other things, managing Enron's exposures with bankrupt counterparties, working out credit solutions with distressed counterparties and standardizing our overall credit practices.  The initial members in this group have been drawn from Enron's numerous legal groups in order to gain a broader perspective.   Each of these members will provide support to this new group in addition to their current responsibilities.

	Within RAC, Michael Tribolet will focus on distressed counterparties, in conjunction with Bill Bradford, who continues to manage the Credit Risk Management group.    

	Please join us in supporting the efforts of this new group.

I'd change the reference to Management Team to "Gas Logistics Team"
 << File: TranswesternMtg2001.doc >>

John - As promised, albeit a week late - ETS Communication Budget for 2001 & 2002.

		2002 Plan 	 
		2001 Plan	 

		2001 Plan vs Actuals	 	

If you haven't filed yet - the reference should be to gas logistics and not market services.  Thanks

Per Teb, two changes were made.  Change date and at end of letter "without condition" was eliminated.  Please review.

 << File: 0460.doc >> 

Liz,

I'm not sure if we met either time at the Austin airport this summer.  My husband and I hosted 4-year old Alina, part of the same Taraz group as your child.   We miss her terribly and are counting the days until we can bring her home.  We're certainly not looking forward to travel at this time, and even less happy about leaving our 6-year old son home while we are out of country, but we are resolved to bring Alina home -- the sooner, the better.

Based on conversations with Ginger and Chris, it sounds like we may face the travel adventure at the same time -- although I'm not sure when.

We have completed our dossier (although I haven't sent the originals to Ginger); completed our home study & sent into INS recently; and we've already done the INS fingerprinting.  So I guess the next steps are INS approval, shipping stuff off to Kazakstan, and getting our Kazakstan visas.

One of the hardest parts of the Kidsave program is not being able to communicate with the kids when they return.  She is in the Ulan orphanage in Taraz.  Alina speaks only Kazak, no Russian, so I'm not sure how I'd communicate with her long distance even if I had an address or phone number.  Fortunately I have received periodic emails from Larissa, the escort that came to Houston with the children this summer.  Her husband, Sergei, has been to visit the children in Taraz & she sent me a picture of Alina.

Sorry to ramble so.  I'm anxious to talk to you about your child, your travel plans, possibilities for hiring an escort, etc.  Please feel free to call or email me anytime.  Here is my contact info.

Shelley Corman (husband Kim Erb)
14126 Scarborough Fair
Houston TX 77077

scorman@enron.com (work)
cormanerb@cs.com (home)

713-853-7083 (work)
281-531-0385 (home)
713-857-2103 (cell)

Yes Thank You -  The Home Study arrived yesterday in the mail and I'm shipping it off to the INS today.
 
I just go back in town last night from a business trip and am anxious to Liz today.

Shelley,
 
Did you get the home study yet?  It should have arrived by now.  
 
Also were you able to email Liz?  I am still looking for her phone number.  I will email it if I find it. 
 
Suzanne

I think we expected it.  The ALJ said he need more time for his decision.  On a positive note, it gives the parties more time to discuss settlement

Do you think this is good news or bad news?  Just curious.

Gina

Initial ALJ Decision in Transwestern Case Delayed 
FERC Chief Administrative Law Judge Curtis Wagner Jr. has extended by two weeks the deadline for an initial decision in the case in which Transwestern Pipeline is alleged to have arranged more lucrative negotiated-rate deals last winter prior to posting available firm transportation capacity to its web site -- a move that extracted higher rates and limited the capacity availability for recourse-rate shippers for service to California. 
Due to "scheduling conflicts," Wagner pushed back the deadline for president ALJ Jacob Leventhal to issue a decision to Oct. 30 from Oct. 15. 
FERC ordered the hearing in late July to determine whether Transwestern exercised market power in arranging negotiated-rate contracts for capacity that led to some shippers being charged up to $27/MMBtu in February, which the Commission estimated was "70 times the recourse rate." 

 

I would propose to use only the Mainline West sheet.

Thanks for you voice message.  I have been traveling the last couple days and thought Tim forwarded the memo & invoice on Monday.  In reality, he was on a trip with some Gulf South folks & just returned to the office today.   He sent the attached memo and invoice this morning.  I was a bit off with my timing -- as September accounting close is tomorrow.  Thanks again for your help in resolving this matter.  

 

Please forward this letter & invoice to GulfSouth.  I am sending an email copy to Claire.

 

Please mark on my calendar & print out this file.

Please mark your calendars for Monday, October 15 from 3:30 to 4:30 p.m. Central for the below-mentioned meeting.  It will be held in the 50M Dining Room.  Look forward to seeing you there.

  -----Original Message----- 
Cc:     Iannarone, Lauren; McKalip-Thompson, Catherine; Alvarez, Gloria; Blackwood, Connie; Boling, Rosario; Dodgen, Kathy; Flores, Zulie; Glenn, Laura; Hicks, Debra; Jones, Melissa; McVicker, Maureen; Metoyer, Pam; Palmer, Rhonna; Romero, Isabel; Saunders, Sherri R.; Sczykutowicz, Marion; Valencia, Laura; Venable, Rachael; Williams, Angela; Winters, Ricki

For those of you who have continued to participate in your Corporate Responsibility Task Force subcommittee since the task force was folded into the Culture Committee, thanks for your continuing help.  And for those of you who have not participated lately, we are asking you to join us once more for a final meeting.  As you recall, the subcommittees are:

Asset-related Activities 
External Accountability 
Internal Communication and Accountability 
Market Opportunity 
Measurement and Benchmarking 

The subcommittee goals are attached: 

<<CRTFgoals.doc>> 
I would like to pull together everyone who has been involved over the past year in the Corporate Responsibility initiative for a final review of all subcommittee recommendations.  Subcommittee chairs will then take these recommendations to Ken Lay and the policy committee, so we want to make sure that our final product accurately reflects the input that all of you have had this year.

Please identify your preferred dates (listed below), and respond to Stacy Walker via e-mail or at 713-853-3583.  The meeting should last less than one hour.

Thanks; look forward to seeing everyone again. 

_____  Tuesday, October 9 (any time after noon Central time) 
_____  Monday, October 15 (any time after noon Central time) 
_____  Tuesday, October 16 (any time) 
_____  Monday, October 22 (any time after noon Central time) 

Suzanne,
 
Hope you are doing well.
 
Any update on when Gwyn will sign and forward the homestudy?  I was hoping that I might be in a position to forward to the INS later this week.   I have all completed the rest of my dossier and am now focused on INS approval.
 
Shelley Corman
713-853-7083

Looks great

	Attached is a draft of a letter we are sending to our customers as discussed
	at the Winter Ops Meeting in September.  Also, we have attached a "Frequently 
	Asked Questions" (FAQ) document that will go out with the letter and will be posted 
	to the WEB.   We will monitor the WEB site and update the questions periodically.

	Please review the letter and FAQ and let me know of any changes or comments by
	tomorrow evening, Tuesday, 5:00 p.m.  Our goal is to get these documents to the customers
	by Wednesday, October 3rd.

	We appreciate your input in this process.  Do not hesitate to call if you have questions. (Ext. 3-7637)

		
			 << File: winterops_followup.doc >> 		 << File: FREQUENTLY ASKED QUESTIONS 1.doc >> 

	Thanks. Lynn

There was no attachment
This is to review what will be reviewed with Stan on the 12th.   cvb

Ladies,

The Holiday Shopping Card is a wonderful holiday tradition.  The card entitles the holder to a 20% discount from November 1-November 11 at a range of stores throughout town such as Berings, Macy's, Events, Harold Powell, Banana Republic, Tootsies, JoAnn's, Williams Sonoma, Pottery Barn, Richards Liquors, Children's Collection, Talbots Kids, Zainy Brainy and many, many more.

The cards are available for $60.  The entire $60 goes to the American Cancer Society and is tax-deductible.   Checks and credit cards are accepted.

Please contact Kimberly Nelson at x33580 if you'd like to purchase a Holiday Card and start your holiday shopping early and benefit a great cause at the same time.

Sounds interesting (although I don't have capital dollars at this point for=
 modifications to make CAS accessible to customers).   Let me touch base wi=
th my team to talk about this concept & I'll get back with you.

On a similar note: in trying to come up with a settlement in the negotiated=
 rates proceeding, we have discussed the possibility of allowing shippers t=
o directly input a receipt and delivery point perhaps with a certain time p=
eriod in mind to determine if capacity is available.   What I'm thinking of=
 is like letting them have access to our CAS system with us giving the fina=
l ok as to capacity availability.  This would help IS who argue that our re=
ports are not user friendly.  Legitimately, this type of instant informatio=
n is all they should really need (as opposed to us having to post every dea=
l we do--why should they be able to steal it at the last minute by slightly=
 outbidding the deal or forcing a tie in a maximum rate situation when they=
 really didn't initiate a specific request for capacity.   It seems like th=
is is something we would want to do, but there a lot of outstanding issues-=
-is it feasible from a systems standpoint, is it economical, etc?   Is TW m=
ore doable than NNG since it has fewer points?  Greg asked me to get with y=
ou to see if this issue can be further explored.  I do believe Steve Harris=
 and the commercial group are interested.  Pls. let me know what you think.=
   Thanks,  Maria=20

[Pavlou, Maria]=20
=20
 : Corman, Shelley=20
Sent: Friday, September 28, 2001 9:58 AM

Here is my recollection of the sequence of events. The concept of an operat=
ionally available capacity report and what it contains are already in GISB =
standards.  FERC then picked up on this concept, added design capacity & sa=
id that the report needs to be updated at each nomination cycle in Orders 5=
87-L and in Order 637 transactional reporting.  GISB has since adopted stan=
dardized data formats for the transactional reporting, recently published i=
n GISB version 1.5 standards.  While these standard formats have been adopt=
ed, and I believe that we are following these formats, they haven't yet bee=
n adopted by FERC -- so other pipelines may or may not yet be following.
=20
I'll try to look at the NGPL posting over the weekend and compare to ours. =
 Also - I'm sending your email to Theresa Hess to confirm my recall of the =
standardization.

Indicated Shippers in their Reply to our Reply brief (at 19) argue that we =
implied that our capacity postings are consistent with the standardized Gis=
b format.  They compare our postings to NGPL's, which are different, to sup=
port their argument.  Then they conclude that there is no standardized GISB=
 capacity-posting format.  Is this true?  How can we respond if this comes =
up at oral argument tomorrow?  Maria

Pam,

Thanks for all your help on the move/relocation.  I think you, Donna Scott & Jean McFarland have made the process of moving very efficient for all involved.  

On the longer range issue; however, I need to elevate my level of concern that the moves are having on customer service issues.  Since Tropical Storm Allison, ETS has experienced one computer system outage after another; including the virus problem the week before last.  This morning our scheduling system is out and we are having Internet problems -- both of which are impacting customer nominations.  During system outages it is imperative that gas logistics be able to mobilize and implement back-up plans to ensure customer transactions.  This is best handled by having a central staging area.

I realize these system reliablity problems have nothing to do with our moves or with the ultimate location of the Gas Logistics group.  Certainly I am pursuing these reliability concerns with Steve Hotte.  But, in light of these issues, I would like to talk about the timing & end state of where Gas Logistics is to be located and how long it is going to take to make this happen.   I know that your first priority of late has been to get us off 41.  Now that that has happened, I'd like to talk about the timing for which floor remodeling comes next (39, 42, etc) and the ramifications for my group.

Gary -- The biggest problem that I have experienced with emergency employee contact information during Tropical Storm Allison & during recent system outages is that all our contact lists are stored in an intranet environment.  When systems or the Internet are down, we can't get to the contact info.  I am now resorting to keeping a copy of customer contact info stored on a diskette.

 Are there any plans to store a copy of this info on a non-Enron ISP that could be accessed from our Home ISP if the Enron intranet or servers are down?
ETS is developing a web-based Emergency Response Information (ERI) system to provide access to employee contact information including work phone, home phone, cell phone, fax number and pager numbers. To facilitate and manage the collection of personal contact data, a new field has been added to eHRonline. Beginning Monday, October 1, all ETS employees will be prompted to either ACCEPT or DECLINE publication of personal data (i.e., home phone number) when first entering the eHRonline system. All ETS employees should access the eHRonline system at their first opportunity to respond to this new request.

While certain positions within ETS mandate disclosure of personal contact data (i.e., home phone number) for emergency response purposes, in other cases disclosure of this information is at the discretion of the employees. If you are an ETS Operations employee and do not want your home phone number published, please contact your Director prior to electing not to publish your personal contact information. 

To access eHRonline, go to the ETS HRWeb link: https://ehronline.enron.com/ and select eHRonline. Employees must enter their SAP Personnel Number and Password to enter the system.  If you do not know your SAP Personnel Number or Password, please contact the Integrated Solutions Center at (713)-345-4727.

With heightened security concern in the building this morning, I wanted to report two items:

1. When I parked in the Allen Center Garage this morning, level 7 yellow section (at the top of the stairs from the Enron building, just under the covered area), I noticed a large brown/copper truck.  I park my blue explorer in this same spot every day and I have never seen this truck before.  It's probably nothing, just wanted to report it.

2. When I reached my desk this morning I wanted to call in this concern.  I pulled up the corporate security number listed on the website 713-435-2804.  The woman that answered the phone was rude and said that the number wasn't corporate security, but rather building security -- she laughed and didn't seem remotely interested in my concern.  Perhaps, I misunderstood the website posting about who to call with security concerns.  But, if I did, perhaps other employees will as well....

Please save these files to a diskette for me, make a copy (so I can store o=
ne at home) & label the files Customer E-Mail Contact Info.

    =20

email_address is a list of Email addresses and the associated name and comp=
any

The rest of the files are only email addresses.

The email_master has all three pipelines combined.

Dennis P. Lee
ETS
Gas Logistics
(713) 853-1715
dennis.lee@enron.com

Please store this info for me
Effective October 1st the primary point of contact for Southeast Operations are as follows:

	Rick Craig, Vice President of Southeast Operations
	Office:		713-646-7227
	Location:	3AC3299
	Fax:		713-646-6128
	Cell:		713-206-6352
	Pager:		800-975-8221

As Rick's assistant, my numbers are listed below.  Please do not hesitate to call me if you should have any questions or concerns.  We look forward to working will all of you.

Thanks,                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                     

Alliece Morris

Enron Transportation Services
Phone:  713-646-6284
Fax:  713-646-6128
Pager:  800-617-8709
e-mail:  alliece.morris@enron.com
Location:  3AC-3201

Mike - I have Stan's staff meeting at 8.

Here is my recollection of the sequence of events. The concept of an operationally available capacity report and what it contains are already in GISB standards.  FERC then picked up on this concept, added design capacity & said that the report needs to be updated at each nomination cycle in Orders 587-L and in Order 637 transactional reporting.  GISB has since adopted standardized data formats for the transactional reporting, recently published in GISB version 1.5 standards.  While these standard formats have been adopted, and I believe that we are following these formats, they haven't yet been adopted by FERC -- so other pipelines may or may not yet be following.
 
I'll try to look at the NGPL posting over the weekend and compare to ours.  Also - I'm sending your email to Theresa Hess to confirm my recall of the standardization.

Indicated Shippers in their Reply to our Reply brief (at 19) argue that we implied that our capacity postings are consistent with the standardized Gisb format.  They compare our postings to NGPL's, which are different, to support their argument.  Then they conclude that there is no standardized GISB capacity-posting format.  Is this true?  How can we respond if this comes up at oral argument tomorrow?  Maria

Sure -- Let me first make a run at the business needs and then prior to the=
 general notice email, I'll take care of charitable requests.  Good idea.
=20

Shelly
=20
I am involved in the Big Brothers Big Sisters Program.  If any of these dat=
es are open/unclaimed, then can they be considered for donation to BBBS?
=20
thanks
=20
=20

Below is the 2001 schedule for the Houston Aeros.  These tickets will be av=
ailable on a priority basis for customer entertainment .
=20
Customer Entertainment
If you have specific plans to entertain a customer, you can reserve the tic=
kets for any upcoming game by e-mailing  me with your game selection, compa=
ny and customer name.
=20
Personal Use
Tickets for personal use will be distributed periodically for games that ha=
ve not been reserved for business use.  I will  periodically e-mail  a list=
 of  the available games.  These tickets will be distributed on a first com=
e, first serve basis  following the email notice.   Reservations for person=
al usage will not be accepted in advance of the email notice.  Also, please=
 keep in mind that tickets may be recalled if a business necessity arises.=
=20
=20
 Please give me a call if you have any questions.
=20
Thank you,
Ricki Winters=20
Assistant to Shelley Corman=20
ETS Gas Logistics=20
(713) 853-5754=20
ECN4107=20

Here are my edits to the FAQ document.  Sorry but I don't understand the pool allocation response.  

 

My notes indicate that we also need to answer the questions
- where storage allocation notices appear 
- why storage allocation notices come out at a later time.

Fixes already put in place
In the follow-up letter we categorize the feedback.  Can't we go one step further and say that we have already addressed some items:

- Make customers aware that they can call HotTap Helpdesk for calls
- Raise awareness of need to minimize mrongin meetings
- Haven't we taken a step to notify EDI customers about system downtime
- We have taken the step of immediately notifying customers of system outages
- Aren't we adding an injection/withdrawal indicators
- Can't we immediately change the confusing descriptors "storage analysis completed" vs "storage allocations completed"  {See my suggestion in FAQ}

I'm fine with the filing
	Frazier -- a few last suggestions on response to data request.  (Posting is fine.).

	--Dot

	 

Attached is a draft of FGT's proposed response to the Commission's request for data with regard to FGT's posting of changes to (1) List of Names and Addresses of Marketing Affiliates and (2) List of Shared Facilities due to the sale of HPL.  This draft has had input from Dot, Shelley and Joe.  Please review and provide comments.

Also attached is a copy of our revised posting.  We should go ahead and post it today, if it is ok with everyone.

Finally, attached is a copy of proposed procedures to make sure there is communication when we to start to share facilities or when we cease sharing.

 << File: 01-97MG01-23(Compliance Filing).doc >> 	 << File: 01-96(SharedFacPosting)(9-18-01).doc >> 	 << File: 01-98Procedures for Shared Facilities.doc >> 

Not that I can think of

Would you ever have a need to schedule anything for you on this floor?

Dear Clients,
 
You have been identified as a user of the following conference room and/or shared calendar:

EB16C2

This conference room/shared calendar is scheduled to be migrated to Outlook in one week, on Thursday, Oct 4th. If you are still using this conference room/shared calendar, please follow the instructions below to request access to it, using the eRequest system. You will not receive access to the new conference room/shared calendar unless you request it. If you no longer use this conference room/shared calendar, you can simply ignore this message.
 
Once the above conference room/shared calendar is migrated to Outlook, access to the old Notes conference room/shared calendars will be set to read only for a period of one month. At the end of the one month period, these conference roome/shared Calendare will be deleted from the Notes servers and will only be accessible from Outlook.
 
If you experience problems with the conference room/shared calendar after it is migrated, please contact the Resolution Center at X31411.
 
Thank you for you cooperation,
 
Sincerely,
 
Outlook Migration Team
 
 
Instructions for requesting access to New Outlook conference rooms/shared calendars:
 
1.	Open Internet Explorer and connect to 'itcentral.enron.com' 
2.	Login as yourself using your NT Login ID and Password 
3.	Click on 'Update Account' 
4.	Verify your email address is selected, or enter it if it is the first time you send an erequest. 
5.	Click 'OK' 
6.	Choose 'Conference Room Administration' 
7.	Region must be 'Houston' 
8.	In the Conference Room box, enter the name of the conference room cited above 
9.	click 'Add' 
10.	Click Continue 
11.	Verify the info you entered and click submit.

yes - let it rip

Is this the way you want it to go out?  Thank you
 
 
Below is the 2001 schedule for the Houston Aeros.  These tickets will be available on a priority basis for customer entertainment .
 
Customer Entertainment
If you have specific plans to entertain a customer, you can reserve the tickets for any upcoming game by e-mailing  me with your game selection, company and customer name.
 
Personal Use
Tickets for personal use will be distributed periodically for games that have not been reserved for business use.  I will  periodically e-mail  a list of  the available games.  These tickets will be distributed on a first come, first serve basis  following the email notice.   Reservations for personal usage will not be accepted in advance of the email notice.  Also, please keep in mind that tickets may be recalled if a business necessity arises. 
 
 Please give me a call if you have any questions.
 
Thank you,
Ricki Winters 
Assistant to Shelley Corman 
ETS Gas Logistics 
(713) 853-5754 
ECN4107 
 

I agree. Elizabeth is making these changes.
Mary Kay asked me to relay the following comments.  Elizabeth suggested I put them in an E-mail so that the Houston group could discuss sat 3:30.

1.  Item #1 PDT record (roughly page 109)
On TI contract #26849 for 8/18/2001-8/20/2001, report shows scheduled & delivered  volume of 1068 with NO nominated volume.
Elizabeth suspects that this was manually scheduled overrun.  
If that is the case, Mary Kay recommends that you make the Nominated column match the volume in the Scheduled column.

2.  Item #3 Footnote #3
Mary Kay suggested the following wording.  Do you agree that this describes what happened?
She is assuming that this was still related to the Force Majeur with Gallup being down, since Operating Capacity went down
from 8/19 to 8/20 then back up on 8/21.

"After operating for a day under the Force Majeure, physical mainline capacity was adjusted based on operating conditions."

- Rita

 

I heard.  I'm just pulling intop garage and will call back in a minute

FYI
Attached is a revised draft including all the comments I received.  This is what we propose to file tomorrow.

The attachments are as follows: 
 Att. 1 - march invoices; 
Att. 2- SoCalGas' April 10 letter; 
Att. 3 is our June 8 letter; 
Att. 4 is SoCalGas July 5 letter; 
Att 5 is the map of TW's system;
Att. 6 is Appendix E to the Global Settlement;
Att. 7 are the tariff sheets 5B.01 and 5B.02.  For the rate sheet 5B.02  we have included the rates in effect on November 1, 1996; November 1, 1998, November 1, 1999, and November 1, 2000.

I will forward to you a complete package of what we file.  Thanks for all the input and help.  Maria

 

Ann, pls. check the spacing and footnotes (make sure they are on the right pages, etc.).  I will call you with further instructions on copying for overnight delivery to our DC office.  thanks, Maria

 

Below is the 2001 schedule for the Houston Aeros.  These tickets will be available on a priority basis for customer entertainment .
 
Customer Entertainment
If you have specific plans to entertain a customer, you can reserve the tickets for any upcoming game by e-mailing  me with your game selection, company and customer name.
 
Personal Use
Tickets for personal use will be distributed periodically for games that have not been reserved for business use.  I will  periodically e-mail  a list of  the available games.  These tickets will be distributed on a first come, first serve basis  following the email notice.   Reservations for personal usage will not be accepted in advance of the email notice.  Also, please keep in mind that tickets may be recalled if a business necessity arises. 
 
 Please give me a call if you have any questions.
 
Thank you,
